 Eroge is like a joke waiting for a retort. There are a lot of retort worthy points but first let’s have a look at the protagonist’s family. In most Eroge, the protagonist’s parents are usually absent. Why they never show up? That is because if they are, they can’t have the protagonist’s sister or childhood friend woke him up in the morning, or to make it easy for a girl to sneak into his room. Simply just anything to suit the scenario writer’s convenient. The detailed reason was never understood but there are various reasons presented such as the parents are working overseas or he is living in a dorm, away from his parents. there are even some instant that the parents themselves doesn’t exist in the first place. “On top of the fact that your parents aren’t home, you even have a beautiful little sister taking care of you !?”, people would normally want to insert such retort, but this kind of thing is normal in Eroge. Yes, the protagonist is a man that is living in an environment that has a lot of unique circumstances. The place that is inviting all kind of retort is not only his home. There’s also a special ability exclusive to Eroge protagonist called the [Eroge Protagonist Correction]. For example, a protagonist who cross-dress and went to an all-girl school. Why doesn’t anyone notice that? It is so obvious to the extent it make you think that he would be found out ages ago if there wasn’t some kind of special power helping him out. In a certain Eroge, there’s even a swimming class event and he still isn’t exposed. Well, in that game there was a ghost attended the class in place of the protagonist. So Yeah, if it’s a ghost then it couldn’t be helped that everyone would be fooled right? (WTF) However, there are a case of [After all that you still haven’t notice but you suddenly notice it now!!?] There are a lot of time that it was likely for the protagonist to be exposed, like when the protagonist running with a big stride in physical education class but his wig still doesn’t come off, Why does it easily came off so suddenly with a little brush from the heroine? Well, it couldn’t be helped since he was fighting with the heroine huh. Although we deviated a little from the main subject, the thought that a man attend an all-girl school while cross-dressing is already an abnormal setting, a normal person wouldn’t be able to wrap their head around that. However, this is just an ordinary event in the Eroge World, even if you are not an expert in Eroge you can still immerse in the story without discomfort. Those who would feel such a sense of wrongness would be only just those novice that just got introduced to an Eroge. On another point, the fact that the protagonist is so popular with the girl might be because one of the powers of his [Eroge Protagonist Correction]. For example, the protagonist is always surrounded by beautiful sight. A beautiful little sister or sister-in-law who would call him Onii-chan.(TLN:Big Brother) A beautiful childhood friend who even though you didn’t ask, would come to wake you up early in the morning everyday then proceed to flipping your futon without permission only to witness your morning wood and give you a slap. A talented, well-dressed student council president with a strict looks who suddenly turn meek in an ero-scene. Or even a teacher who should already have graduated from the university but no matter how you look, she still look like a primary school kid. And they all lust after a boy with little to no redeeming feature aside from that he is a little kind. They all acted like succubus trying to charm the protagonist. No, maybe it was the protagonist that was an incubus. Be that as it may, the only abnormal one here was not only the protagonist, even the heroines are abnormal. In reality you wouldn’t find a woman who has such a surprising high fighting power who happened to be a professional fighter falling for you or a housewife who already have a child in high school but still look younger than even her own daughter, a heroine that look like a primary schooler no matter which angle you look at her from. However, no matter how young they looked, before the game starts there would be a disclaimer stated that “All of the individual in this game are of the age of 18 or above” that made all the gentlemen (Eroge player) able to zealously perform their self-stimulation with a peace of mind. Well, the story itself is also mind blowing. Even if you compare it to manga or some drama, your mind would still be blown away. If I have to pick one as an example. There’s a game where the protagonist’s family consisted of his father and brothers, an all male household. While the family next door is an all female household with a mother and her daughters. One day both parents said they want a son/daughter respectively and come up with a good idea. Yes, let’s exchange one of their children. In an Eroge even such a stupid idea can happen. Then when the protagonist got swap into the female household he suddenly got himself a harem. What is with this situation? The same goes for the setting of the cross-dressing protagonist I mentioned earlier, that guy suddenly got a harem too. And I can’t say it too loud but there’re also game specialized in the art of Ero called Nuki-Ge with a super hard to understand erotic development that’s definitely not for a beginner. To put it in a word, Eroge’s world is a special world that commonsense can not be applied to. If you have entered such a world and you are the protagonist then there wouldn’t be a problem. (except for some game) The protagonist is the center of the world and because of that you will definitely become popular. “This is bad, This is really bad...;...;...;...;.” The me that is reflecting in the mirror right now, he is me but also not me. No, the reflection moved as I move but the body I see is not mine, saying it that way would be more accurate. And this face, there’s no mistake...;...;...;...;...;.. “It’s not the protagonist...;...;...;..it’s his unpopular friend that always being noisy on the side of the screen.” I crumbled down to my knee on the spot. The protagonist’s friend is always ridden with misfortune. The so called friend would repeat his eccentric behavior and be treated like a trash by the heroine. Sometimes he will have to intervene with the protagonist’s two-timing, and play a role to restore their relationship. Above all, there’s one common setting for a friend character which is the biggest reason for said friend’s misfortune, “He’s not popular”. They are seriously unpopular. Rather, they can’t even get close to a beautiful girl. The reason is simple. If the girl that the protagonist (player) liked is stuck with the protagonist’s friend what do you think would happen? The developer would be flooded with complaints and their sales will drop. I would most likely smash the screen with my fist if a cute girl I liked was taken by some trash that appear from a corner of the screen. If that happened, I would immediately go to the support page to ask for refund and write a bad review on their review page while choking on my own tears. Well, the me that is currently reflected in the mirror, “Takioto Kousuke” is a character that could only choose between a disaster or a misfortune. Obviously, good luck was never his option. In the game at which this character appeared is named “Magical ★ Explorer” (Majiero or Majiex for short). It is the so called battle simulation game. The player will go to school and study or encounter an event, then they can dive into the dungeon and fight to strengthen their character and their comrades. In the game you can craft weapons, armor, magic spells and magic tools, then you can equip them as your special equipment or open a store to sell them and aim to become the number one alchemist or blacksmith in the city. Of course, this is an Eroge, so the romance element also exist. Rather, the romance itself is the main feature. In the everyday life part the protagonist will encounter with beautiful heroines that are also ability-user which they will proceed to get closer to each other (protagonist only) and you would be able to witness a lot of erotic happening as if you have been blessed by a god (protagonist only). Peeking in the bath is somehow ended up in success and you can observe the full glory of the heroine’s figure (Protagonist Only). As a friend of the protagonist Takioto Kousuke can only look at the protagonist as he is flirting with the heroines while half-cryingly biting his handkerchief. The so called third-wheel. That’s his role. “That girl look totally cute, right? but you know actually she...;...;” or “They say that she is the most beautiful girl in school you know”, this guy always said something like that while the protagonist took all the girl for himself. Of course the girl that was meant for Takioto Kousuke himself doesn’t exist. Therefore, it could be said that Takioto Kousuke is already ridden with misfortune just by being in a love simulation game. In terms of combat, the developer wanted to strengthen the protagonist and the female characters so aside from the selected few, male characters have a low-key performance. However, the players graded Takioto Kousuke’s ability as “Not Bad”. He is not bad, but toward the end of the game when players want to maximize the heroine’s performance, there’s only a few people who would put him into their party. “Haaa” Takioto Kousuke in front of me sighed. “First, I have to confirm whether I really become Takioto Kousuke...;...;” I want to confirm this first, no matter how small the possibility it is. I proceed to remove the muffler that act as the identity of Takioto Kousuke. — Well, reality is truly cruel, it seems like, I really have become him. From the appearance to the identification card I found, everything only proof that I am indeed Takioto Kousuke. I also discovered some unfortunate details as well. “Hmm My parents died a year ago, and my grandfather from my father’s side already passed away. On my mother’s side she already cut ties with her family and the only blood-related relative I have left is my grandmother who has dementia and currently living in a nursing home.” Seem like Takioto Kousuke’s life is already in a very-hard mode comparable to the protagonist himself. No, I guess I can’t say it like it was someone else’s problem anymore. “Even so, isn’t this too horrible? And after this, how could he become such a frivolous character in the game?” ...;...;Come to think of it, when one of the heroines was talking about her family in the game, Kousuke has a sad expression for a moment. He immediately return to his usual cheerful expression so I thought that it was a mistake from the developer side but seem like it was not a mistake but an intentional background setting. Now then, what should I do? This place is similar to Japan but also not Japan. Should I talk to the police, the city office or the school...;...;? No, the thing that is rolling over there are my diploma and my admission paper, the current time should be when he just graduated so it should still be in spring break. Fortunately, It seems that I have passed that magic academy admission, but I don’t think I can pay the tuition fee. No, at this rate I am gonna be starving to death. “What should I do...;...;...;...;” When I was at a loss, I heard the sound of the doorbell. It seems I have a visitor, I don’t feel like leaving my room now though. Hmm, since I don’t know what to do, should I try going to the police? After I thought so, I heard another “pinpon” sound. I stood up while sighing and head toward the entrance. “Yes yes, who is...;...;...; !?” The Takioto house is not that large and I arrived at the entrance in no time. When I opened the door and saw the visitor’s face, I unintentionally leak a weird noise. A woman is standing there and I know her name. “Good day, Eeto, you’re Takioto Kousuke-kun, right?” I swallowed my saliva, Her face is the face I saw many time in the game, her voice is also the one that I already heard countless times before. “H..Headmaster.” The person who is currently at my doorstep is the headmaster of “Tsukuyomi Magic Academy”, the stage of Magiero. Hanamura Marino is standing there with a smile on her face. Hanamura Marino is a character that appears several times before the protagonist. Though she is not deeply involved with them she is always moving behind the scene. “You seem to already know about me, huh. That would make the talk easier. If you have the time then let’s find some place to talk.” I gave a small nod and we move to the nearby Cafe I recommended. “What’s wrong” Maybe because I peaked at her face many times, she asked while tilting her head. I can’t really say “Because a character from an Eroge suddenly appeared in front of my eyes” or “I can’t believe that you are already passed your twenties.” I mean, I can’t believe that an Oba-san in an Eroge could be such a beauty, this is bad she is too much of a beauty. It was like my eyes were sucked in by a vacuum, so when I am looking at her I ended up becoming conscious. “No, I just can’t believe that there’s a celebrity of the magical world right in front of me...;...;.” I answered her with an appropriate response. If this is the same as the game then she is certainly a celebrity. “Ara ara, please don’t mind that sort of thing. Moreover, I would like you to be more casual from now on.” Ha? I tilted my head, not understanding what she was trying to say. Then she narrowed her eyes and made a serious look. “Takioto Kousuke-kun.” “Y, YES.” Her voice suddenly turned sharp. My voice got involuntarily higher because of her change in attitude. “I will be straight. I will have you become my child.” “Ha?” Eh, what did she said just now? “You will become my child.” ...;...;...;...;...;...;...;...;...;...;...;...;...;...;...; “Ha? Ehhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh !?” What was that? I don’t understand what she meant. Why is this kind of super development is happening to me? “I am sorry I didn’t consult you first, but your custody has already been transferred over to me.” She already got my custody?! No, wait a minute, just what is this exactly? Certainly, it would be bad for me if I wasn’t taken in by someone. But it is that Hanamura Marino you know? That’s the witch of Tsukuyomi, you know !? The witch that rumored to have crushed an S rank monster solo, you know!?. The same witch that even though she is already approached her 40s but still possessed those baby-smooth skin and look like a student no matter how you look at her you know!! “I will be in you care.” “Pl, please treat me well?” After that she gave her condolences to the Takioto family. The one inside is not really Takioto Kousuke but me though, so I don’t really understand such feelings. Later I heard from her that she is actually a relative from my mother’s side. Moreover, it seems like she’s my mother’s cousin and that my grandfather from my mother’s side would become my guardian at first but my mother left a will which stated that Marino-san would become my guardian instead. Seem like my school and living expenses will be paid by Marino-san. “I will have you live in my house as well, are you okay packing your luggage by yourself?” “At your...;...;.house? Eh, not at the school dorm!?” I reflexively retort. Tsukuyomi Magic Academy is a magic education institution funded by the country. The ability of the enrolled students are all above average, it is a gathering of elites from all across the country with some coming to attend from abroad. An elite school that you would question how could Takioto Kousuke attend it in the first place. And because there are foreign students attending, the academy come equipped with a dorm. In the game, Takioto Kousuke lived in that dorm and met the protagonist who lived in the room next door. “Of course, We are becoming a family after all. Our house is also close to the academy. Moreover, I want to deepen the bond in our family so I thought that we all should live together” Well, even if you say it like that...;...;...;.I’m a little confused here. What exactly is going on? I don’t even know why I have become Takioto Kousuke or this heavy talk that was not even included in the game and now I somehow ended up living together with this beautiful magician? Why is this Eroge-like development happening to me? No, if this world is the same as the game then it’s truly a world of Eroge huh. But I am in a supporting role, a decoration or so to say. Even if I did something it should be pretty much be inconsequential to the game development. Wait, now is not the time to care about something like that, did she said that I should come live with her? But in her house there’s...;...;...;. “But If I remember correctly your are living with your daughter, right? Is she okay with that...;...;..?” Hanamura Marino’s daughter is a teacher and a professor at the academy, She is an important character who will teach essential skills to the protagonist. In the setting it seem she has taken over her deceased father’s research or something like that. Speaking of which, if Marino-san is mother’s cousin then, Marino-san’s daughter is my cousin too. “And...;.” When I tried to continue, Marino-san raised her hand and stop me. “Certainly, I am currently living with my daughter. But I properly got her approval. You don’t have to worry about it.” Even if you told me that...;...;. If I don’t live at the dorm then the protagonist shouldn’t be able to progress through various events. I feel like that will end up causing a lot of trouble, right? When I was thinking that, Marino-san lowered her head a little bit. “Right...;...;..it hasn’t been long since they passed away, I know you need some time to sort out your feelings. I will give you some time to consider it. But I want you to know that we will always welcome you as a member of our family.” Seem like there’s some misunderstanding, did she tried to cheer me up?. I actually was hesitating because a different reason though, I couldn’t come up with another reason anyway. Let her misunderstand it without correcting her might be better. “Yes, sorry.” “It’s fine. Well, have you eaten yet?” “Umm, not yet.” Probably. When I said that Marino-san smiled and nodded. “Then let’s find something to eat and you don’t have to worry about the money.” With that said she stood up, call the waiter then pay the price for two cups of coffee. I immediately took out my wallet to pay my share but Marino-san stopped me. “No, something like that...;...;I can pay for it myself.” When I said that, she astonishingly sigh. “You see, Kousuke-kun. You might think that you have a lot of money from your inheritance but you still haven’t received it yet right? It will eventually come down to me and would be handed over to you later, but that is still in the future, you know?” I involuntarily nodded. Certainly I have no money at all. “I’m sorry, I will have to rely on you then.” I said that and lower my head but then she lift my head up. “Wrong, not like that. You and I are family right? So...;.?” “Umm...;.Thank you, Marino,..-san?” When I said that, she smiled. “Right, don’t treat me like a stranger okay?” She said that as we leave the cafe, then I was taken to a fancy looking restaurant. After that we have a luxurious meal that I had never eaten before while I discussing about my future with Marino-san. “The dorm will be opened one week before the entrance ceremony so if you count today then it will be available in 2 weeks so you still have 2 weeks to decide. I want you to choose whether you want to live in my house or the dorm by then.” “Yes.” “Beside the matter of living together , I want you to at least visit our house once. I want to introduce you to my daughter too.” Well, of course. I will at least have to greet her daughter “Hanamura Hatsumi” once. “Ah, what time would be...;...;...;...;..Umm, when should I go?(Informal tone)” She sullenly stared at me for a bit when I used Keigo(TLN: Formal language) without thinking. “It would depend on you. I don’t mind taking you there now, but it seems you still haven’t finish your preparation, right? Oh yes, whether you choose to live in the dorm or our house, send your luggage to our house first, okay?” “Eh, Why?” “Ara, wasn’t your house planned for demolition by the city?” “—–!?” I’m speechless, after he lost his parents now his house is getting demolished too? Isn’t he too miserable? Won’t their memories be erased just like that? Looking at his circumstance alone, he is already on the level of a protagonist from a tragedy play. “Umm, I’m sorry about that. I will try to bring their mementos to my house as much as possible.” Seem like Marino-san mistook my astonishment as my despair. But even If you worried so much about me I didn’t even receive that much shock, you know? It’s more like I was sympathizing with Takioto Kousuke myself. Well, right now I am Takioto Kousuke, so it can’t be helped if I am sympathized with his circumstance. “Don’t worry, it’s alright. I already accepted it. Well then, I better send you my luggage, right...;...;?” “Yeah, I will pay for the transfer once it arrives at my house. I have a contractor I’m acquaintance with, so once you packed your thing give me a call, okay?” Once she said that I suddenly remember. “Come to think of it I still don’t know how to contact you...;...;I don’t have a phone too.” When I was confirming whether I am really Takioto Kousuke, I looked for his phone but unfortunately I couldn’t find it. In the game he always use the school terminal to exchange information with the protagonist after all. I thought that he has one though. “I forgot, come to think of it you haven’t had one since one year ago, right?” A year ago, around the time when his parents died? I don’t know his reason but something must have happened. “Let’s buy you a phone after this.” “Ah, Don’t worry about it, I don’t really need one.” Marino wants to buy a phone for me immediately, but I don’t particularly want one right now. It would cost money and I don’t really have friends in this world. I would probably use internet instead anyway, there’s something like a tablet back at the house so there should be no problem. In the worst case I could use an e-mail and with the right app I could even make a call. When I was about to tell her, she lowered her brows and look at me like she is looking at something pitiful.. “Sorry, I should have known that you still have your trauma from hearing your parents getting killed over the phone.” “——!?” Just how much did Takioto Kosuke suffered? I cannot find a word for him anymore. I’m begging you, please Takioto kousuke-kun don’t bully me anymore than this. Come to think of it, there was a scene where the protagonist tried to call Takioto Kousuke with his phone too. In the game he said he was sleeping, but to think that it was actually a trauma!! Moreover, his parents were killed by demons? I thought that he just overreacted against those demons in the game. Thinking back, the material book that come with the first limited edition of Majiero did mentioned the characters setting, the female character setting were well-made but there’s only basic info about the male characters. Well, of course. It’s an Eroge after all. “But it would surely make a different if you can contact someone when something happened, if possible I want you to carry one. If something happens then I will rush over to you immediately.” Her feeling is heavy. Rather if your life is this painful how could you be such a frivolous bastard at school? Nothing is going to surprise me anymore, maybe this guy was already broken by the time he got to the academy. Thinking about it now, I thought this guy sometime make a harsh comment in the game, if his life was actually like this then it can’t be helped, huh. But for now...;...;. “Eeto, will you go buy it with me? the smartphone...;...;...;” Marino-san looking at my face with an extremely concerned face then, “If it’s still hard for you then you don’t have to, you know?” Is what she said to me. But I don’t really find buying a phone that traumatic though...;.. We immediately went to buy a smartphone after our meal. Then I was able to witness the frozen expression on my new mother’s face when I asked for the most expensive one in the store. A woman that would become the class’s Madonna if she just put on the academy’s uniform is now my new mother, she is the academy’s headmaster and also an influential person within the magic society. “Sorry, I really want to spend more time with you but I have work to do after this...;...;...;” She said so and left the house, leaving me behind. To Marino-san defence, I know that she’s extremely busy person. But when you just drop the bomb that you will become my mother that day and said that we wouldn’t be able to meet for a while due to her work, what would you think about that? I myself don’t really have a problem with that, but since I have been reincarnate into this body I feel like my luck has been replaced with his misfortune instead. However, after Takioto Kousuke faced various kinds of misfortune, he suddenly got a new parent and a new home. With a bottomless anxieties swirling inside him, his new mother who should be by his side ended up going to work. It is to the point that I have to wonder why didn’t Takioto Kousuke in the game become a shut-in. He would always say something with a high tension like “Totally↑↑” or “Dude waaaaait a Minute.” or “ain’t that girl totally cute? let’s hit on her. I will play a hoodlum then you go in and help her. okay?” Honestly, I can’t believe that he became that kind of character. “This guy is too pitiful...;...;.” Well, let’s set aside the thing about Takioto Kousuke and focus on what I have to do. “Even so...;...;...;...;.isn’t this too much?” There’s a thick enveloped placed in front of me, peeking out are a bunch of banknotes. It seem like Marino-san said that it’s “one week living expenses”. There’s one thing I can say for certain. “Marino-san has no sense of money huh.” I pull out a bundle of banknotes from the envelope. The total amount is a million Japanese Yen. I wouldn’t be able to spend it all even if I use it to order a special sushi delivery every day. “I don’t mind even if you use it all alright!!” She said that with a smile but how do I suppose to use this. Should I buy a brand name bag or a luxury watch? Other things that seem expensive...;...;.speaking of this world it should be something like magic-tool, right? “...;...;...;..Wait a minute?” In the first place I am supposed to be Takioto Kousuke, right? “I should be able to use magic...;.right?” No, there’s no way he can’t. This guy enrolled in that magic academy in the first place. How would he get in if he can’t use magic. “Magic huh?” That would be a miracle-like phenomenon that can’t be explained by science. If I can use it then I would definitely like to try it. Rather, If I can’t use it then won’t I have to leave the academy? Hm, I have no choice but to try it out then? “Back in the game I just simply click on the button though.” There’s no screen so I can’t try clicking it. I can’t even see my status in the first place. I want to at least be able to observe my HP and MP. Well, that would be impossible, right. Wait. If this guy is a magician that was able to enroll into the academy, doesn’t that mean there would be a textbook about magic lying around here somewhere? “I’m still not sure about it, but let’s try searching the house first...;...;...;” I stand up from the chair and leave the living room. According to the game’s setting, Takioto Kousuke’s academic ability is not to be praised. The test results that was sealed in his notes and textbooks only have circles draw on only half of the answers. Even his magic history book or Japanese language textbooks have some low-level graffiti draw in it. And when I thought he should focus more on his study, somehow the textbooks from one year ago no longer have any drawing in it. Instead there were something about magic ritual or magic circles, a lot of things that were related with magic written on it. I close the magic history book and pick up a magic textbook with a picture of a monkey drawn on it, an awfully clean magic textbooks. “A magic that even a monkey can understand, huh?” I flipped the page around, there is no writing, no creases or any sign that this book has ever been used before. Some questionable thing came up in my mind but I can’t solve it no matter how I think about it so I will stop thinking for now. Let’s try reading it. According to this book, everything born to this world possessed magical power and there are also magical power lingering around in the surrounding. This matched the game’s setting. Then, when you utilize those magic power a miracle occur, Magic. You can produce fire, water, wind, earth and even metal with magic. In order to perform such a miracle, a magician must have a certain amount of magic power. The difference between normal people and magician are their magic capacity. or so it seems. If it was like in the game then, Takioto Kousuke possessed a magical power amount on par with the teacher at the academy. if you counting only the amount of his magic that is. “Ah, it’s like what was written in the book, is it this feeling? it feels kinda weird though.” For example, just like how eyes and ears perceive light and sound, it seems like the whole body has become a new sensory organ to perceive magic. However, as you felt this mysterious warm power that overflows from the whole body, it seems that something similar also exists outside.The outside magic power softly touched me and it kinda felt ticklish. “Why have I suddenly felt it so strongly just after I became conscious about it?” Well, even if I think about it there would be no answer anyway. Then why don’t I just try using it now? If I can use it then I can ascertain that this is certainly magical power. “Eeto, [Light].” It is an easy spell that even a normal person could use, an illumination magic [Light]. To be honest, I am half doubting myself whether I could use even an easy magic like [Light]. However, immediately after I cast it, its effect immediately happened. “Seriously...;...;..” There’s a light ball floating in front of my eyes. I tried touching it with my hand but it only pass through the air. I also check whether there are some string-like electric wire attached to it but my hand felt nothing. Now, I try bringing my hand closer to the light. “Ha, Haha, HAHAHAHAHAHA, Amaaaaaaaaziiiiiiing !” I am unable to touch the light ball, I don’t have a fever. My hand just pierces through the light, tearing it apart. However, it soon rearrange itself and return to its original form then stopped its movement. When I stopped supplying magic power, that mysterious light disappeared immediately. I turn off the lights and close the curtains then try using it again. Even though it was dim, the room was illuminated by a mysterious ball of light. I stop the magic supply and make it disappear. Soon after the ball of light lose it power and the area return to darkness. Then I recast [Light] to illuminate the room again. “I can’t believe it...;...;.” The light that appeared was not a heat producing light that powered by electricity. It was a light created purely by magic. I cut the magic supply and making the light disappear then cast it again. You would be moved every time you look at it, the mysterious power of magic is drawing me in. You guys might question what the heck am I doing? What I am doing right now is using the first magic I ever learn, Light. This seems to be a magic that was taught to kids in kindergarten or primary school. It wouldn’t be weird if I was told something like “What, you are moved by a basic magic like that? “ But it can’t be helped right? What do you think would happen if people from a world where electricity was not yet discovered to watch television or browse the internet. They wouldn’t suddenly peed themselves but they would fall on their butt in surprise, right? But our world see electricity as normal because we lived with it since we were little so we are used to it. That’s why we were not surprised. Magic is the same. If there’s a guy rotten enough to make fun of me in this world, I want to say this. Try visiting a world without magic. You guys might not find [Light] fascinating. But to me it’s an amazing light source that doesn’t even require electricity. “Amaaaaaaaaaaaaaaziiiiiing!” I repeatedly cast and recast [Light] again and again. Every time I cast it my feeling toward magic becoming stronger and stronger. I definitely want to learn magic. I reach out to the light and put my hand over it. Then I slowly open my hand, and look at the never fading magic light. As I did that, something started to burn and smoldering in my heart. I want to see and use various kinds of magic. I want to master this mysterious phenomenon. And if I am going to learn it anyway then I want to try aiming for the top. “The top, huh.” If Takioto Kousuke is exactly like he was in the game setting then he will have a considerable handicap. But still I want to aim for it. Rather Why wouldn’t I. It’s a world filled with supernatural phenomenon, you know? “I have decided.” My mind is made up. I don’t know how long it will take, but I will defeat those battle junkies at student councils, the public moral committee and Shikibukai (Literally translates as ceremonial department) I will defeat these strongest three faction then finally...;...;...;...;. “I will beat the hell out of that cheat protagonist who can grow so strong to the level that he can solo the Demon King.” I quickly act after I have decided my goal. Since I received the permission to use the money as I like, I started planning out how to strengthen myself. “I can’t rely on the wiki after all huh...;...;...;” There’s no such thing as a guidebook on how to beat an Eroge. The only good source of information came from the internet. A wiki created by brave warriors funded with support from the generous sympathizer, which choices to choose for each heroine, how to get to a specific ending, enemy’s detailed status, drop items and even damage calculation were written on it. “If I at least have my excel file...;...;...;..Well, I don’t even know whether the data can be used here.” The excel file has the data I collect from the wiki, it contains the optimized method I used to raise my level. I also made a drop table from the data I collected and data necessary for the RTA (Real Time Attack). No, now that the game has become a reality I can’t reroll by going back to the title screen anymore. “The problem now is that data integrity...;...;..before I only need to click on a button to use magic but now I have to calculate the amount of magic power myself.” First, let’s read this book to get a basic understanding of magic. I pick up the book that I place nearby. “The magic that even a monkey can understand, eh.” I prepare a cup of tea, sit myself deeply into the sofa and start reading it. The written contents start from the explanation of magic as a phenomenon, its concept, then onto how to use a simple magic. It was as if this book was prepared just for me. “To increase the capacity of your magical power you need have exhaust your magic and recover it by increasing your level, so basically I have to use my magic to the limit right?” In the game even if you did not use your magic to the limit, it will still increase more or less. For example magic capacity will increase as you raising your level, using a special item or a bonus from your equipment. But which method is correct? That’s the thing I need to find out. Whether what written in the book is really correct or should I trust in the game’s setting. There’s even a possibility that both of them are correct. “I need to test it out.” The experiment will be later, for now let’s continue reading and find an efficient method to verify it. “I need a check-list” I tore the nearby paper and use it as a sticky note. Then I sipped a mouthful of tea and turn the page. — After I finished reading, it is the experiment time. First, I decided to verify the content of the book by trying it out myself. I chose a magic that wouldn’t be dangerous even if I failed casting it and head out to the garden. An elementary level magic should be fine but as expected some of the elementary level is still dangerous and intermediate level magic is out of the question. “...;...;...;.As I thought, I have no aptitude for emission type magic.” In the game, Takioto Kousuke’s strength lay in his strengthening magic that can be applied to items and his own body, his ability in that regard is top-class. However, in exchange he is sorely lacking in the area of emission magic. “[Water-Gun]” When I activate the magic a small amount of water fly out. On top of it being slow, the water also loses to gravity and making the aim off, the power is also negligible. Even if I try my hardest I wouldn’t be able to make it useable. I can just use body strengthening then pick up a stone nearby and throw it at the opponent though, I have no reason to use such magic. If I ever make use of it then it might be convenience when I do the cleaning. As expected, it is still the same as the game. “Fuu.” I breath a small sigh and take out my muffler. To me who have become Takioto Kousuke, there’s one thing I know. His muffler that serves as his identity is in itself the strongest item for him. “To make use of his strong point, he always has a long muffler with him.” Considering what he specialized in, this might become my strongest equipment. It was like that in the game. If you make proper use of it. This muffler might even be better than some legendary sword or legendary shield. “Then, let’s use this money to buy a new muffler. The muffler I have right now is good too but there should be one with better quality out there.” Yup, let’s do that. Is there something else I want? Well...;..if I have to choose one then...;.I want a book. The current me has too little information. No, I guess I might be able to get my hands on the books for free after all. “I can just ask Marino-san huh.” If it’s her then she would probably lend it to me. I might also be able to borrow some from the library. I could check on the net about a library that lend out magic book and go borrow it afterward. But let’s leave shopping and the book for tomorrow. It’s already getting late, so the thing I need to do now is...;...;.. “Practice my body strengthening and enchanting magic.” I return to my room and open my closet then put on my jersey. I used the tablet to check the map around my house. After that I left my house and activate body strengthening then starts running. I am really lucky that there’s a big park nearby. Another good luck I came across is that there was a running course built inside the park. This running course is pretty good for people who workout at night since it came with many streetlights alongside the course. The only disappointing thing is the fact that there are people running other than me. Even now I just ran past a person. From the perspective of the person I passed, he seems to think “what is up with that guy?”. I mean if I were him I would think so too. I ran through the wind with twice the speed of everyone else due to body strengthening magic. If I keep running like this I could easily get a world record. This is not the only reason other runners are staring at me. There’s a muffler fluttering behind me when I run after all. Why does he run around with a muffler? They would probably think so, if this was the Tokyo marathon then I might have been questioned already. But there’s a meaning behind it. I channel magic into my muffler while I am running. The muffler that fluttering through the wind just now suddenly harden like an iron block. It was the magic that the original Takioto Kousuke was good at, [Enchant]. He would put a huge amount of magic power into his muffler and make it move as though it was a part of his own body. In the game his skills was called [Third Hand.] and [Fourth hand] Moreover, the versatility of this muffler is high, it was also possible to change the property of the muffler using magic. It could be made into a shield that as hard as iron or it can guard against fire attribute attack when applied with water attribute. Furthermore, since it can be use? freely like his own hands and feet, he can wield two swords with his hand and equip another two to his muffler which resulted in a four swords style. What I thought was the most useful feature would be how he able to add elemental property like fire and ice attributes into it. It wasn’t only good at holding things but also how it can be applied with elemental properties. But when I tried using it myself, rather than using it as is, I think it would be more effective to add some property into it. I might making enchantment magic my habit. I can even imagine myself casually using the ice attribute the most. If I enchant it with Ice attribute, the muffler would be cool and comfortable without using the air-conditioner. In the winter I can just give it fire attribute and warm myself up. What a wonderful idea. Well then, Takioto Kousuke in the game should be able to freely move this muffler to receive his opponent’s sword or even deflecting it. It is a necessary skill to strengthening my close-combat ability. He was able to freely move it like that by the end of the game, but I need to be able to do it as well. First, I used body strengthening magic then I activate it on my muffler make it move as I want. ——— How far did I ran? I feel like I ran for about five kilometers but I don’t feel tired at all. Is this the effect of body strengthening? If so I feel like I can run ten times farther than this. I ended my run while thinking about my stamina that has no sign of depleting. Again, the game setting was right about Takioto Kousuke’s magic power. Even though I kept up my body-strengthening and muffler enchantment for a long time, my magic power doesn’t seem like it will run out at all. “I want to know my limit though...;...;rather if I don’t even know that I can’t confirm whether my magic power really increased or not.” Doing ordinary task wouldn’t be able to make you exhaust your magic power. I need an efficient method to exhaust my magic power. Like, isn’t there any magic that can show your status in number? If there’s one I would be able to make progress on various things. “Well, I got no choice but to do what I can, huh? For now let’s just practice on attribute enchanting. According to the information I gathered, the easiest kind of fabric for magic to channel through and apply attribute to is the one made from monster’s material. But it is hard to find one that has enough length to wrap around my neck. I sighed while looking around the Magic Tool shop. There is a great deal of merchandise available at the Magic Tool shop. But when I ask the clerk specifically for what I want, they don’t have any. What I wanted to buy is kinda special product after all. “Umm, a four-meters long stole ? We don’t have one that long...;...;..it also an off season too. Rather than buying a ready-made one, maybe you can purchase some fabric as material and have it order-made?” Yeah, that’s right. A normal two-meter muffler or stole is already considered as too long already. And now we are talking about buying one with twice the length. “Right.” I go along with him and move to the handicraft section that the clerk recommended and my sigh escape me again. Using my hand to pick up a white cloth. Nearby there is also gray, black, red and yellow clothes lying in order. They’re made with a normal fabric. The one that magic can pass through easily are few in color and the prices are higher than the normal one. “For now I will have to make do with this huh.” After I was hesitating over which one to buy, I decided to buy two pieces with checker-pattern design. One red&amp;black and another colored white&amp;blue, both are made from threads gathered from monster. The total price is eight-hundred thousand yen. Let’s hope that it will be worth the money I spend on it. When I got home, I immediately take out the clothes I purchase and wound it around my neck. After that I stood up to check if there are any discomfort. “Like I thought four-meters is too long, but its magical conductivity is the best I could ask for, as expected from an Arachne’s thread.” I can cut and adjust the length later and since the fabric properly channeling magic power I have no complaint against it.. If I have to point out a flaw then...;. “When my magic power is exhausted, I’m gonna have to drag it along right?, and it might entangle or hook on something too. I have to come up with some countermeasures...;...;” Since there’s currently no problem, I will ignore it. Thus I stopped thinking and channel magic power into it then start training to move it according to my will. However, it was much more difficult than moving a muffler. Is it too long? I can’t use it as freely as the muffler. If the surface area is the problem then it can’t be helped. But considering the future it might be better to be able to move an even bigger one. With the former length I wouldn’t be able to do anything against even one of the “Sankyo” (TLN: school’s three strongest) and got done in for sure. “No choice but to train harder eh...;...;” I immediately change into my jersey and wound the cloth I bought today around my neck like a muffler. Then I start training by running while using body strengthening and moving the cloth at the same time by constantly channeling my magic power into it. I move both ends of the stoles at the same time by having Third hand (right stole) swing for 45 degrees and have [Fourth hand] (left stole) perform a 25 degrees leg sweep. My aim is to be able to attack both arms and legs freely by using Third and Fourth hand. In the mid-game, he just said something like “Oh, I am already used to moving it.” and as if that was the reason he suddenly become able to use [Third hand]. Then when he was able to use [Fourth hand] he was able to use some Asura-like move at the end of the game. In some special circumstance even a half-baked character can have his moment too, huh. For the time being, I have to be able to utilize four hands at once as soon as possible. If possible I would like to be able to do it before I enter the school or before I move into Hanamura house. If I don’t hurry up and get used to it while I can, when the battle with the first heroine arrive, I would be defeated without being able to do anything. If the event proceed like the game, then I would probably lose. No, If you think about it, isn’t it better if I lose? Well, I planned to crush a lot of flags from now on, so we might not end up fighting in the first place. “I still need more practice...;...;” After finishing a ready-made meal I bought from the convenience store I continue my training. Later, I return to my room to read a magic book and plan out my future training with its content. “Seem like the most important thing is to increase my level and acquire skills, huh.” What I got from the book is that this world has a level concept just like the game. Overall level, physical level, magic level, endurance level, enemy level, hidden level etc. Other than the overall level there are a lot more detailed classification, it would be impossible to cover them all but it seem more than double of those that existed in the game. In the first place these detailed classification is only a conjecture from the researchers, and their existence hasn’t even been proven yet. They only asserted their broad interpretation of level concept. Why so vague? Because there existed a magic tool that can roughly check your level. The item is not really popular due to its expensive price, but there is one that is already set up in the academy. I already got confirmation from Marino-san. If possible, I want to use it to check out various things but it doesn’t seem like I will be able to. After all, there’s nothing much I can do right now. While I started circulating my magic, I heard the sound of the doorbell. I keep circulating my magic and make my way toward the front door. “Fufu, I’m finally done with my work.” It is the person whose face I haven’t seen days, Hanamura Marino. I immediately invite her in, she then entered the house without hesitation. “Kousuke-kun, have you always been doing this?” Marino-san pick up the cloth I have been pouring my magic into. The scene is like a dog(me) being held with a leash by his owner (Marino). She touched the stole with her hand. It shouldn’t feel like touching a cloth anymore though. The cloth that have my magic power circulating through them is as hard as steel and I can move it at will. “No, I only started using it in my training recently.” “...;.The amount of magic you applied in your enchant is really abnormal.” I nodded. Truthfully speaking, the character who possessed the most magic power in the game is Takioto Kousuke. His magic capacity is even larger than the one from the Sankyo who always shoot an extra-large magic from a distance, his magic power is double the amount of even the heroine who inherited the blood of the saint. However, you can just go around such limit by using doping items, if you keep using it like an idiot any character’s stats could surpass their limit. Even though he has such high magical capacity, he is for some reason a close quarter combat character. His role is so weird compared to characters in other games. If I have to use Dr-g-n Q-est as a reference then it is like a warrior or a thief that has the highest amount of MP in the game. However, in his case the amount of magic power is very important to him. That’s because in the game he has a handicap that every action he took would always consumes his magical power. Even if he doesn’t use magic to attack it will still decrease. He is a character that always running out of magic power despite having the highest amount of magic in the game. Some pro did come up with a strategy utilizing his Third and Fourth hand abilities though. If you think about it now, the reason why magic power decreases every time he performs an action is probably because he has to put some of it into his muffler to use the Third hand like how I am doing it right now. “If you can manage this...;..you are quite amazing already. If you used it to defend you would be able to make several meters long steel shield and if you use it to attack , it can even break a boulder.” Moreover, if I carry weapon or armor I could enchant it with various attributes too. By the way, in the game there’re a lot of guy with a peculiar constitution like Takioto Kousuke. Of course, their constitution have different peculiarity to them too. and each and every one of them received some kind of cheat-like special weapons like they were fancied by the developer. If I have such an item too I would be considering getting it. But unfortunately I have none. It might be because the developer weren’t really think much about me. Well, If I have to talk about a strong item then it would be something like my muffler, right? “Kousuke-kun, can you add more magic power into this? or spread it out like a shield?” I add more magic into the cloth as I was told then spread it in the shape of a fan. It make a sound like opening an iron fan, I was surprised a little bit. In the game there are stealth section that you have to stay silence to hide from monster, I need to train in order to open it without a sound. Marino-san touched the cloth then sighed of astonishment. “It would be able to endure my magic to some extent...;.but instead of making it spread out can you make it into a circular shape?” Marino-san said. “Why?” “With this, if you received a strong attack you wouldn’t be able to kill the shock, right? And wouldn’t it break if it got repeatedly attacked in the same place. so if you make it into a circular shape then it should be able to receive the attack and let the shock flow over the shield, right” “I see.” I muttered. Certainly, the shield I saw in the game often draws an arc, so it was made with that in mind, huh. Contrarily, I could also trapped the opponent’s sword inside if I move it in reverse?. No, if I lose to the opponent’s strength then I will be the one who got blown away instead, then should I just normally receive it? The shape will have to be varied from fight to fight, huh? “Kousuke-kun, how long can you maintain it like that?” “For now I think it should be around ten hours? I set my goal at twenty-four hour though...;...;” I tried it out before and it lasted ten hours, but that is only in a daily life state. If I am adventuring or in the middle of battle then I would have to use my magic on other things as well. In that situation I think I wouldn’t last five hours. Marino-san sighed in exasperation. “If it only the strength of your enchantment and magic capacity then are you already better than me?” “That might be the case, but my emission type magic is utterly awful though...;...;...;.” Even if I have a huge amount of magic power I can’t count on the magic on emission system. Therefore, if a dragon or chimera attack me from the sky then I can do nothing about it. I can endure their attack but my attack would be like a breeze to them. If I can bring them down to a close-quarter fight then I can manage though. “Fufu~~ It would be good to find a good party at the academy then. If it’s Kousuke-kun I think you can even beat the lowest level of the academy dungeon you know.” “If that’s the case it would be great...;...;.” A strong character like Takioto Kousuke would be able to clear that dungeon without a doubt, but if he has a party that is. “What’s wrong?” “Ah, No, I was just thinking whether can I find a party member.” If I join the protagonist’s party It would be easy for me since they are already strong enough. But is it really a good thing to join the protagonist’s party when planned to defeat him? No, I supposed to enter it huh. I will strengthen him and have him defeat the demon king. That demon king’s dungeon is a pain, capturing it is going to be really bothersome. Besides, the one I want to defeat is not the demon king but the protagonist who has defeated the demon king. Then, I will mix in with his party and if there’s a chance I would strengthen him to some extent. If he looks like he can get stronger by himself then I will leave and go solo for a while. All that is left is to gather the prospective members for my party. For the candidate should I get someone from the protagonist’s heroines? There will be some left over heroines after all, If I borrow some it should still be fine, right?. Considering the future It might be better if I’m affiliate with some faction too. “...;...;It will be fine.” For some reason she suddenly make a gentle expression and approaches me softly. Then she put her hand on my back and drawn me in. “Fuah..” Some part of my body involuntarily reacts and a strange voice escaped me. Her rich bulge contacted my face, the mysterious elasticity and warmth caused blood to gather on my face. My face is getting hot as if it would boil. What kind of reward is this?. To be hugged and patted on the head by a widow who look like a high school girl. But why did she suddenly do this? “It’s okay, once you have moved in with me no one is going to bully you , there’s no bad people around my house and even if something did happen I will protect you. From her words, it seem like Takioto Kousuke was also a bully victim. “...;...;...;...;...;...;.Thank you.” As I thought, This guy’s life is too hard. ——————————- Surprising fact about Hanamura Marino is that she is really good at sewing. She turned the simple piece of fabric I bought (Worth around a hundred Eroges.) into a proper stole. Just by putting a little accent color at each end of the cloth make this much different? She said that she will add some embroidery if she has time too. “Is this all the stuff you will bring over? What about the rest?” Home electronics, dishes, curtains, sofas, there are a lot of leftovers. “...;..let’s dispose all of it.” “I see.” She didn’t say anything more than that. These things may have taken care of me before but if I bring everything along it will only end up as a trash anyway. No choice but to just abandon it here. “...;...;.Are you okay?” “Yes...;. oh, it seems like the contractors are here.” When we left the luggage to them, we asked the contractors to dispose of the remaining furniture before we leave the house. I won’t be returning to this place again. — The fact that I am moving in with Hanamura Marino could be said that I couldn’t get luckier than this. It is not because she is a widow who still look like a high-school girl (not entirely). It is because I can learn a lot of things from the Witch of Tsukuyomi, a great magician even inside the magic world. “So as I thought, the use of magic is connected to increasing one’s own magic power after all?” “Yeah, I think that the method Kousuke-kun used to constantly channeling enchant magic is the most efficient one, but as expected such method could only be done by you alone.” The way I use my magic, if it is an ordinary magician their magic power would run out immediately. But if it me who has an aptitude in enchanting magic, even if I keep using it like an idiot I would still be fine. “Even so, Kousuke-kun is really a hard worker, huh.” “You think so?” “I can’t really say much about other people but...;...;..” She said that as a preface. “Everything is about magic with you.” She said that with a wry smile, it felt like she wants to praise me and tease me at the same time. “Really?” “Really, but you don’t have to overdo it like that, you know?” Even more than praising or teasing, it seems like her worry is stronger, huh. I didn’t overdo it though. “It’s nothing like that, I just think that magic is fun, that’s all.” I was just fascinated by how fun it is. There are people like that back in Japan too, right? Those who reading for hours and hours, playing games until the date changes or playing football until the sun goes down. I do it because I like it. “I see. if you have anything you want to ask, don’t hold yourself back and ask away, okay?” Of course, That’s my intention from the start. “Sure, then first question...;...;...;.” Then while being shaken by then magic-car I was able to receive one-hour magic lesson from her before we finally arrive at our first destination. “Well, after this we need to split way for a bit. Sorry, I always troubling you with my work.” She apologized to me because she has to meet up with someone and want me to wait for a while. “It’s nothing. Rather, I should be the one troubling you instead.” Clothing, food, a place to live. I who can’t make any money and have to rely on her for all of those. She relaxes her expression and give me a smile. Then she reached out her hand and flicked my forehead. “You’re a family so it’s alright for you to feel a bit troubled, you know!” “That go for Marino-san too right? We are family after all.” When I said that, she made a puffy face while looking like she was happy about something. Immediately after, the mood improved and we chuckled a little. Good grief, someone please tell me her real age. — I parted ways with Marino-san in a good mood and walking around the unfamiliar street. “Five hours, huh...;...;..what should I do.” The city I’m in now is one that connect with various countries around the world. It is filled with airport and various ethnic group. Obviously, there are a lot of people that are coming in and leaving this town such as businessmen and tourists. And as people from all across the world come to this town the souvenir industry has also developed. The country I am currently living in right now is a country that is overflowing with magic. Naturally there are a large number of people that come to purchase magic tools. There are many places I could use to kill time but exactly because there are so many of them, I’m currently at a loss. What I do to kill time back in Japan was to watch movie, eating at a restaurant or chillaxing in a cafe. But now I don’t really have a choice beside looking around for magic tools. Seem like my body and soul really been eroded by a magic maniac ever since I came to this world. I immediately take out my smartphone to check the map and select some good magic tools store to visit. In the magic tools store I visited, I was able to see various forms of magic catalyst. From a wooden wand to iron one and those that were made using some unknown materials like mithril. There’re even book-shaped catalyst or those that shaped like bracelet and ring. The book-type catalyst seem to have magic stone embedded into its hard cover and it was unusually thick and heavy. Additionally there are also some interesting catalyst like a parasol-type or one that has its handle shaped like a lollipop. “The parasol-type is surprisingly useful, dear customer.” The clerk seems to like the parasol-type catalyst and advertise it with confidence. So I asked her “what would you think if a man were to use it?”. Of course, she shows a bitter smile and said that it wouldn’t look good. Suddenly when I was looking at various kinds of catalyst, I start to wonder what weapon should I use. In the game Takioto Kousuke only use sword and shield. He is the type that is not good with long range attack and always charge in to slaughter his enemy up close. His special abilities, [Third hand] and [Fourth hand] are particularly useful in that regard. Rather, those skills are essential in order for him to do that. I need to be able to move my stole as freely as I want as soon as possible. Let’s set that as the goal for now. Then what weapon is the most suitable to Takioto Kousuke. In the wiki, the most popular strategy among the gentlemen (players) was to abandon his attack all together and focus on defense by equipping shields on all of his hands (Including Third and Fourth Hand). Takioto Kousuke has no special weapon, so his attack power was somewhat lacking. Of course if you equip four swords on all of his hands then his attack power will become decent, but that will come at the cost of dramatically lowered defence. That’s why people thought that he should just become a wall that tank all the attack for everyone.  In the first half of the game Takioto Kousuke was used as an iron wall because the enemies mainly use physical attack. That’s the reason most people used Takioto Kousuke for anyway. However, that was only up to mid-game. After that his usefulness was overshadowed by the iron-wall cheat-san and the zombie-saint-sama that just awakened her power. Of course he possessed the power that wouldn’t lose to that iron-wall-cheat-san, but unlike him, her cheat equipment can be acquired later and as an Eroge she also possessed the most important advantage. It is the advantage that he can’t possibly overcome. That’s right...;...;. Iron-wall-cheat-san is cute. Iron-wall-cheat-san is TOTALLY cute. If it you gentlemen (Eroge players) then you already understand right? As an Eroge player you wouldn’t possibly use male character in your party. Removing Takioto Kousuke from the party is but an obvious choice. I did it too. And since he is good at enchant magic, many people left him at the magic tool development center. Just because he’s there the development speed is double. However, if you left him there his character will not be able to grow. in other words, he can’t raise his level. In the end he was not used for combat and was kept at the development center as a manual labor. It seems he himself said that he wants to become stronger or that he wanted to defeat the demons. However, god (players) never answer his prayer, he was deprived of his freedom and put to work only on magic tool development . It was like working for a black company. Still, in the main story he was treated like a fool by the protagonist and heroines. Poor guy, even though his life is already so miserable in the first place. “Dear customer. Is there something wrong?” Did I make a bitter face? The brown-haired clerk is worriedly peeking at my face. “N, No, I was just thinking about what kind of weapon should I use.” “I.., Is that so?” She kept looking at my face worriedly. “Are there any recommendation?” Let’s distract her for now. She might be able to recommend a good weapon for me. After that, she recommended me a parasol-type catalyst again. Please give me a break already. ——— I let my back sink into the sofa and place an iced coffee on the table. When I took a look at my smartphone screen, I let out a small sigh. I thought I spent a lot of time at that store, but the meeting time is still much ahead. I was guided around the store for a while. I look around at the merchandises but I wasn’t able to find anything that piques my interest, their design didn’t really clicked with me too so I bought some items that seem necessary for enchantment magic instead. ...;...;...;Anyway, I’m bored. In my surroundings there are several students on their spring break, a salaryman, and an office lady having a drink. Is it because this cafe is next to a luxury hotel, there are a lot of people that seem like they came from a different world from me. For example, people in the surrounding area are wearing some kind of uniform or a suit but here I am, wearing a plain cloth and sticking out like a sore thumb. The group of students sitting nearby are also speaking using polite language. The male foreigner sitting nearby seem like he is working. A large bag was placed under his table and on the table was a bundle of paper filled with letters I had never seen before. He’s frowning with a crease on his forehead while staring at his documents. The woman sitting nearby is operating her smartphone with her pocket book opened. The drink in front of her is already empty but she showed no sign of leaving. When I return my eyes to the table in front of me, and saw that I already drank more than half of my iced coffee, a sigh escaped me again. I am wasting time here. It would be good If I have some magic book on me. No, it’s too late now. All the books that I considered useful were already sent to Marino-san’s house. Then, should I go shopping for some? That might be a good idea. After I finish this coffee let’s head back to that store and take a look around. The ice had already melted into the coffee. I poured everything down my throat then stood up and leave the cafe. When my shopping trip smoothly ended,I got my hands on an alchemy book. I head back to the cafe I was relaxing in before. The clerk might think “This guy again?” but the meeting place is in the lobby of the luxury hotel next door so it is better than moving to another cafe. Needless to say, this place got an air-conditioner, comfortable sofa and I can get a delicious cup of coffee for just a thousand yen. If I was still in Japan I wouldn’t dare coming to such a luxurious store. Back then I would order a drink only up to eight-hundreds yen. This would have been one of the places that I would never approach. But right now my standing is slightly different. “Hanamura-Teito hotel, huh...;..” (TLN: Hanamura imperial hotel, if you prefer.) The towering silver building in front of me, a building that the other buildings in the surrounding area have no choice but to bow their head to. The hotel that was built for the wealthy, a hotel that is dazzling with its modern design which also exist in harmony with nature. That beautiful garden next to the hotel, I wonder how much money it would cost just to maintain it. “Hanamura Group, eh.” Speaking of Hanamura Group, they’re influential people in the magic and financial world. The chairman’s words seem to hold enough power to influence the entire country. Hanamura Marino is a person that left the house but she is no doubt one of its members. She is also one of the pillars of the magic world. Her magical prowess is a real thing and she also has influence over the magic world with large number of assets she possessed. Even though Hanamura Marino alone already possessed such power and wealth, I wonder what will happen if her main house is also being added to the picture. I just become the son of that Marino-san. If you think about it, my mother should also be a member of Hanamura family. Even when the game has become reality I still don’t know much about his mother. I can only guess that his parents had ran away. “...;...;...;...;Well, let’s head to the cafe.” I muttered, but when I look around at that moment. it happened. What my five senses delivered to me first is a flash. then immediately follows by the sound of an explosion . The thing that hits me first the hot wind. Black smoke and burnt odor are spreading around while the surrounding fell into chaos. I was speechless. Scream and cry echoed from the surrounding people as they are running away from the black smoke. I could only look at the cafe where the fire broke out. Several people are coming out of the cafe. Those who walking while holding their arms, those that carry another person by their shoulder and those who used their handkerchiefs to cover their mouth. ‘I have to get away from this place too.’ As I turned my gaze away from the cafe, I found a person that is sticking out. “...;..What’s with him, that foreigner.” Among the people that are running away in panic he was calm. His face doesn’t show bitterness nor does it distort in fear. I can not see any emotion from it, just like workers doing their routine work in a factory. Not only his expression, his action is also out of place. He didn’t go toward the place that people are trying to escape to, instead he is heading to the hotel next to the cafe like he has some objective in mind. He started walking toward the place we planned to stay at, Hanamura Teito Hotel. From the hotel people are panicking and scrambling to leave the hotel. Then when I look at the cafe again, I am bewildered. Several people were surrounding the cafe with their smartphones using it to call others some people even use their phone to film the scene. Aren’t they worry that there will be another attack after the first explosion? That strange foreigner keep walking toward the hotel where such people are starting to gather. He went against the flow of people and entered inside. I decided to follow him from behind. The inside of the hotel is noisy. The customers and receptionists are confused, angry voices were heard from the surrounding. There’s a man wearing a suit who is making a call. An elderly couple speaking about something to the staff. A child who is looking around while crying and his mother who holding his hand as if to protect him. The suspicious man walk pass the pair of mother and child and head into the corridor. When he went deeper into the hotel for a few minutes he finally stopped. In front of him is a door, beside the door is a red-haired man in a suit. They seem to be speaking with each other with a small voice so I can’t hear what they’re talking about. As I tried to get myself a little closer, I heard a small explosion from the other side of the door. I can hear the red-haired man in front of the door clicked his tongue. They seem to be talking about something as they went into the room together. I secretly follow behind them. The room they entered is a large party room. Did they have some kind of buffet party here? There’s a big table that seem like it was there to place food and dishes on, but now the food and dishes are scattered on the floor. When I take a look, I see several men in a suit, surrounding someone. Noticing the nearby table, I lifted the tablecloth and dive under it. I concentrate and try to hear what they’re saying. “You damn traitors!” Seem like an enraged young woman is shouting at someone. “Returning our kindness with malice, you people lacked what important for a human being, you guys” are nothing but trashes.” While I listening to her endless barrage of insults I slowly lifting the tablecloth. Then, when I saw what in front of me, my voice nearly leak out. Three people are being surrounded. A man and woman with long ears are standing in front of a girl as if they are trying to protect her, everyone has a wand in their hands. In front of me is a woman with blue eyes and long blond hair in a half-up hairstyle. Her eyes lifted up due to anger, she also have slightly pointed ears that is currently quivering. That appearance.. there’s no mistake...;.. (Isn’t that one of the main heroines!!) The initial version of Magical Explorer has twelve heroines (Including main and sub heroines) that can be captured. Among them there is one who is especially popular. One of the main heroines, Ludivine Marie-Ange de La trèfle. Because of her hard to remember name, her friends and the gentlemen (players) called her Ludi. I still remember the pleasant feeling when I was berated by her in the game. For those who have a special kind of fetish, hereby referred to as Ludisease patient, being able to call her by her full name is a must. Needless to say, I am able to say her full name. In the popular old light novel there are heroines with a hard to remember name like a tsundere with pink hair and tiny breasts or a vampire girl that can change her form into an adult woman who happen to love mister donut. Why the hell do I able to remember such a long name and still remain hopeless when studying for exam? Well, what kind of heroine was Ludi, you asked? She’s a woman with androphobia. No, it’s more like she is not only hate men but all the human itself. Simply put, she is a cool-type heroine who often use harsh words when addressing others (especially men). Therefore, when you try to get closer to her, she usually said something like “Get away from me” with an angry voice. However, that was only at first. After you complete a certain even and gotten closer to her, her attitude will turn 180 degrees around. Yes, she will turn DereDere before you know it. She is like a sour fruit, but you can turn her into a sweet one by trigger a certain event and solve her worry. Additionally, her reaction to men other than the protagonist somehow getting harsher instead. She even treated Takioto Kousuke lower than an insect. But that seems to provoke the gentlemen’s desire to monopolize her thus came her extreme popularity. Later on in the DLC even with twelve additional heroines her popularity was never overshadowed. Though, why does she hate people (and especially men) so much? (Is this the cause?) Ludi and co who are being chased after took out their oddly shaped guns. At the same time, the suspicious man who I secretly followed from the cafe also readied his gun. “My lady, you are making a mistake. We never betrayed you...; We have never been on your side in the first place.” A skinhead man answered Ludi. From assessing the situation, it seems like these guys used to work for Ludi. Ludi’s face warped in anger while grinding her teeth. She is being cornered to the wall by the approaching men, her eyes show no sign of giving up. When I saw that, I remembered the thing that was written on the developer blog. [Why Ludivine hated men that much?, there is a proper reason for it. When we came up with a setting for her, we intended her to not be a virgin. Then when we proposed that, the higher-ups told us “The complaints will come at us like a tsunami. So please can you do anything else, you can have her die by a natural disaster, reborn from a different dimension or having her body possessed by an evil-god, just PLEASE let her be a virgin.” LoL. Well, in the end we came up with a lot of settings for her and she finally ended up as a virgin hahaha. ] That was what the scenario writer came up with, it was like they tried to pick a fight with us gentlemen (Eroge players). After the players got close to Ludi in the game, there was an event that revealed her past. “ I was betrayed by the people I trusted in the past.” she confessed that with an expression like she was about to cry. That figure of her was engraved on to my brain. This scene must be the cause. What should I do? Helping her here might cause a lot of changes to the story. The organization that is hostile to her appears as enemies from early to mid game so there’s also a possibility that they will not hurt her yet. Should I go and help her out? No, calm down. In the first place, do I really have enough power to save her? Can I really fight against their unknown weapons with the equipment I have? I only have a stole and my spare muffler. If this stole was pierced through then...;...; Moreover, will the me who never experience a real fight be of any use at all? The only thing that resembles a fighting technique I know is the Judo I learned back in my student days and I already forgot all about it afterward. Will I really be able to save her? Furthermore, If it was exactly like the game, then the one who was supposed to save Ludi in the setting was Marino-san. Not me but Marino-san. I know that much from her line in the game. In the case that I dash out I might worsen the situation and make it hard for Marino-san to make her move. In the worst case scenario I might head straight to a death-end. Is it better to just turn back and treat this as if it never happened? “How about you give up already?” The skinhead man said to Ludi. But Ludi did not shake her head. “We have the Iron Wall Claris on our side, you couldn’t possibly break through her defense. If this is a drawn out fight you guy would be at an disadvantage, No?” Is Claris the wand holding woman who stood in front of her? I have never seen her in the game before. The Skinhead glanced at her and shrugged his shoulders. “Good grief, Ojou-sama. Do you think that we didn’t come prepared?” “What do y-...;...;eh?” When Skinhead said that. Something went past Ludi’s eyes and Claris fell to the ground. Passing in front of her was a man who was standing next to Claris, a handsome guy who was supposed to be on her side. Claris seem to received a blow to her stomach and she fell to the ground while holding her stomach. The handsome guy then stomped on her. “Aghhh.” He stomped on her again and again until her scream stopped and her expression distorted in agony. “No way, It’s a lie, It’s a lie, right?...;...;...;..Aurelian, even you too?.” The face of Ludi that was so strong up to now crumbled and it looks like she could cry at anytime. Her limbs are trembling to the extent that I can tell from here, even though there is nowhere to escape to she tried to run away. Then she realized she was facing the wall and look behind her. She was reminded that there was no escape. “Kuku hahahahaha, Haaaahahahhahaa” When he saw that, Aurelian laughed out loud. he was holding stomach and laughing at her. “Yes, that’s the face I wanted to see! haha, that’s the reason I keep up with the selfishness of a brat like you for years. It is all for this moment !! This is the best!.” Then the skinheads took one step forward. Everyone of them pointed their guns at Ludi and approached her slowly. “Oi oi, don’t you dare shoot her now, I need to have some fun before I kill her.” That Aurelian guy said so with a smile while the men around him are cheering. I took out my spare muffler and wrapped it around to hide my face. Then I adjust the muffler to secure my eyesight. After that I used strengthening magic to enhance my body, the muffler and my stole. The skinhead guy is slowly approaching Ludi while Aurelian is laughing maniacally. There’s not even ten meters between them. A line of liquid was being made from Ludi’s eye. a drop of her tears spilled from one of her pupils. Aa, this is such a strange feeling. The anger got to my head but somehow my mind is still clear. It is kind of contradictory but I can only put it like that. Well then, let’s do this. [The development might change so I can’t help her.] [Since it’s seem dangerous, I will ignore it.] Those choices were already gone from my mind. After Aurelian kicked Claris one more time, he heads toward Ludi with long strides. When he was about to reach his hand out toward her, I jumped out from my hiding spot. First, I aimed for the skinhead man. I picked up a nearby table with Third Hand and threw it at him. The time when a glassware on top of the table I threw broke was the exact moment Aurelian rip away Ludi’s skirt. They were occupied with other things so their reactions were delayed. Several people were blown away by the table. I keep running to Ludi while using my Fourth Hand (Left Stole) to pick up a table and throw it at the place where the suited men gathered. “Who-..!, Argh!” Before they could finish their sentence they were already blown away. On the way I picked up the collapsed Claris with Third Hand then switch to princess carrying her while hardened Third Hand to block the incoming bullets. “Kuh.” I felt the shock on my head and intense pressure on my neck. Seems like I wasn’t able to kill all the shock. Third Hand was able to block multiple bullets but it seem like one got through and hit my head. (If I didn’t have this muffler I would probably already be dead...;..) I seriously swung my Fourth Hand at the stunned Aurelian’s face with full intention to smash his jaw into pieces. “GyaaaaaaaaA” I spread my Third and Fourth Hands while shifting Claris to one of my hands and pick Ludi up with another. After I got hold of them all I covered all three of us by sending large amount of magic power into the spreaded out stole and hardens it to form a shield. Bullets kept raining on the stole. I can hear countless bullets pounding on it but the stole didn’t budge even slightly. It seem like they won’t be able to breakthrough. However, I’m clearly aware that I am still at a disadvantage. I take my eyes off the stole and look at both of them. Ludi is staring at me stunned as if she was confused while Claris’s body is all tattered but it seems she still able to hold on to her consciousness. Now, what can I do with these two? I am not even confident that I can get away alone in the first place. “You, can you use restoration magic?” I ask Ludi who is currently in my right arm, Her body shook from surprise and shake her head sideways. “I see...;...;” As I thought. She is a mage specialized in long range attack magic and couldn’t use restoration magic. Of course, neither can I. By obtaining an item in mid-game and clear a certain event, Ludi and I would be able to use restoration magic but It couldn’t be helped since I don’t have it now. I felt my back getting slightly hotter. It seems they tried using fire magic this time. The stole is still holding somehow but I want them to stop it soon. I don’t know how durable this stole shield is, but I don’t want to gamble on it while taking these attack without doing anything. No, considering current situation I have no choice but to gamble, huh. It might be able to withstand all of their attack but If my magic power ran out first it will be the end. I still have plenty left but if it did ran out these shield will just turn into a simple cloth and I will be defenseless. But, I still can’t go on the offensive. The reason being. “...;...;.To think that there is such a defect like this, what should I do.” I didn’t think about it before, but when using the stole circular form to cover us, I can’t see what’s in front of me at all. The stole wall is indeed sturdy. However, using the stole to shield us from damage also block our field of vision. It’s like spreading a huge black umbrella in front of you. If it is something like a vinyl umbrella, I would be able to see through it though. No, but...;conversely speaking they also can’t see the situation on our side. This moment might be perfect to come up with some plans. We need to come up with something to take them down by surprise...;...;...;...; But what should I do? Even If I come up with a plan, the attack magic I could use are only Third and Fourth Hands. I still haven’t practiced much on other magics yet. To take them on I would either have to approach them or find something to throw at them. But if I do that...;...;...;. I take my eyes off the stole and look at the two. I face Ludi who is looking at me with an uneasy eye. If I go on the offensive here, these girls will be in danger. If I can remotely activate the stole shield then there wouldn’t be a problem...;Wait a minute. I lightly shake Claris’s body in my arm. “Hey you, I beg you please lend me your power!” “Uuu...;...;...;.Ugh” Ludi said a while ago that Claris known as the iron wall. It meant that she could use shield magic. By having her protect Ludi, the situation will completely change. She slowly opens her mouth with a painful expression. “Uu...;you, who, are you...;” I clicked my tongue. There is no time to answer such question. What would happen if a magic get through the shield on my back ? A bad premonition seep into my mind and my frustrations gathered. “Sorry but I don’t have time to do a self introduction. Just answer me, Yes or No. Can you cast a magic to protect yourself from those guys? “...;...;Gyaaa” I strongly shook Claris’ body, her expression turns into that of agony. Does she has a broken bone somewhere? Damn, I shouldn’t carelessly move her, but regretting it now is too late. “Claris!” Ludi look anxiously at Claris, then when Claris look back at her and said “I, think I can, use..it, but not for..long.” “Then I will leave it to you. And don’t move, just play dead and silently cast the magic.” Then I turn to Ludi “You, act like you were using shield magic, gather your magic and pretend to cast [Aegis]. You have to shout out the magic name, but it is only pretending. What you will actually cast is a blind spell.” Ludi took her eyes off Claris and look at me with an uneasy eye. “Blind ?” “Yes, that’s right. At least you can use [Flash], right? Just a moment is fine. Leave the rest to me.” Sorry but I will have them act as decoys. What they will aiming for right now are Ludi and Claris without a mistake. They wouldn’t aim at an unknown like Takioto Kousuke. That’s why the first thing they will aim at will be those girls. Some might come at me but it would probably be only a few. And while she tricked them that she is casting a shield magic the flash spell will activate. I can only hope that this will go well. “Okay, let’s do it.” “Eh, Umm...;.” Her words seem like she beware of me. “What is it? We are in a hurry you know.” Ludi didn’t say anything. She is making an uneasy face while looking at my arm. “...;!?” Soft, exceptionally soft. When I noticed it, the warmth of their skin travel though my palm and I became conscious of it. Their bodies and mine are completely in close contact with each other. I can even feel their rough breath. I haven’t noticed until now, but apparently I have been holding on to them. If I move my hand up a little bit it would touch her small but firm...;...;...;...;. “Sorry...;...;.” I hurriedly let go and make a small cough. “Okay, just to confirm. At the moment I went out you will cast a shield magic. But you will pretend to be the one that cast it and when they shot all of their magic at you, cast the blind spell with light magic, understood? Sorry, but we have to start soon. In ten.” When I said that Claris immediately moved. I can tell that she is muttering something and casting her magic. “Ten, nine, eight...;...;...;” Ludi also gathering her magic power. “Seven, Six, Five...;...;..” I also start preparing to transform my stole and laid Claris down to make it look like she is already dead. “Four, Three, Two...;...;” I grab Ludi’s arm to make her stand up, then.. “ONE, LUDI, DEPLOY THE SHIELD NOW ! ! !.” I shout out loud while she stood up. “AEGIS!!” At the same time that the light attribute shield was deployed I release the enchantment spell from my stole. I then confirm my surrounding. It seem like they were spreading out and not gathered at the same place. They were confused at my charge for a moment but the skinhead soon giving out his order. “Aim for the Trefle!” As expected, they aimed at Ludi who is from Trefle family. But the guy closest to me is pointing his gun at me. I immediately spread out Fourth Hand to defend and proceed to beat him with Third Hand. Just then the room was covered in a blinding flash. Seem like Ludi casted her blind magic. There is one guy wearing sunglasses so I caught him with Fourth Hand and send him flying. “GyaaaAAA” I blow away the man who was looking after Aurelian while using Third Hand to form a shield. By blocking the incoming bullets and sweep them off their feet, I somehow able to beat the last guy. I threw table and stuff at them to make sure that they couldn’t move. I hurriedly gather them all together then I took the nearby tablecloth, put it over their head and use large amount of my magic power to harden it by applying my enchantment magic. This should do. While sighing, I moved my eyes toward Ludi, and I unintentionally gulped. (This is bad, come to think of it, her skirt was torn away, right?.) What appeared in my sight was Ludi with an “unladylike” appearance. Maybe she noticed my gaze, her face is turning bright red and she is moving her hand to cover her skirt. But she couldn’t hide her white panties with a cute amber colored ribbon adorning it. It is an underwear that go well with her white skin and it doesn’t feel like the underwear itself is too cute for her. And it is slightly...;. No, I will stop thinking. “Don’t look! Please Don’t look.” Th, That’s right. Why have I been staring at her ?! I took my eyes away from the red face Ludi who seem like she is about to cry and looking for something in panic. But what I found was a torn-down remain of her skirt. It seem like I unnecessarily increased her shame to another level. No, there is a stole wrapping around my neck isn’t it? I hurriedly took it off and averting my eyes while quickly walking over to her. “Ah.” Was it because I look at the ceiling while walking or maybe it because I was a little fluttered and I stepped on a plate making me slipped over. Then. “Kya” I fell face first but there wasn’t much pain. On the contrary though...;. Boing. I felt something soft and warm in my hand...;.both hands actually. On my right, there is a little stiffness but it still soft enough to bring me happiness, there is something on a tip too though. From the other hand I felt a very soft elastic feeling like touching a wavy pudding...;.. What’s this, I moved my hand again to confirm. “Aaa, Kyaaaaaa!” “Waaaaaaaa!” The two girls ring through my ears. Then I finally noticed what I have been touching. “Uwaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa” What I am currently grasping is Ludi’s chest and Claris’s butt. I look at Ludi’s beet red face and immediately let go. I jumped up and threw my stole toward her lower body and start dashing. “S,S,s,Sorryyyyyyyyyyyyyy.” —- When my brain started working again I was sitting blankly in the toilet with my memory after I ran away from Ludi wiped clean. It seems there’s some commotion outside. I remove the muffler on my face and wrap it around my neck. “Seems like I did something bad at the end.” Why did I do such a Eroge-protagonist-like thing. To slip and fall face first into a girl’s chest, isn’t that something an Eroge-protagonist would do? What a third-wheel like me should do is getting beat up by the heroines after doing such a sexual harassment. And while he got sent flying, a proper third wheel character must also peek at the heroine’s panties as well. That is what Takioto Kousuke should be doing. Her white panty was nice though...; Wait, what am I thinking? Let’s change the subject. I’m glad I saved them. Even though I think it will cause a lot of problems in the future, I still don’t regret saving them. If I didn’t do anything back then, I would regret it for the rest of my life. Still, “It surely will cause a lot of changes to the scenario, huh...;...;.” Comparing the timeline of this incident to the game, the story still hasn’t even started yet. Since the story will begin a day before the entrance ceremony there is still more than a week left. But there’s a high possibility that the change I made this time will make a huge impact to the story. In the first place, Ludi will enter the school a little after the semester has started. She will immediately cause a certain event to happen and will fight alongside the protagonist’s party. ...;..But I doubt that will be the case this time. The reason she was unable to attend the academy from the start of the school year was stated in the game as [family reasons], but it most likely related to the incident just now. The incident itself was something that already happened so it is still possible that the scenario will stay the same as well. “The possibility of the scenario changing because I saved them exists as well though.” The game’s Ludi held a lot of respect for Hanmura Marino. There is no mistake that it is related to when she was saved by her. It might not be the main reason but it should still be considered a factor. Since I ended up saving her this time, I wonder how the result will be like. In the worst case she might return to her country without attending the school. She is a strong character since she is one of the main heroines. If she entered the protagonist’s party she will certainly become a reliable force. “Well, I can’t do anything about that...;...;Rather, it would be more constructive to think about the future...;...;..” I learned many things through the fight this time. First is my weakness. When I was using shield to protect them I can’t get a hold of the situation around me at all. It was like having a thick black umbrella blocking all of my vision, I can’t see the enemy’s location at all. Is it possible to construct a wall without obstructing my vision? “Normally that wouldn’t be possible, but this is a world of magic...;...;..” If skills existed then something like [Mind Eye] or [Clairvoyance] might be useable. The Mind Eye can be acquired at that place where senpai guide the protagonist to later in the story. Fortunately the owner of that place is Marino-san so my first goal is to acquire that skill first. ...;...;...;.If my luck is good then I can meet her again too. Well, the next thing is long range attack. My ability is weak at long distance. Very weak in fact. Although I already noticed my weaknesses from the beginning this incident made me understand the importance of long range attack in the last battle. If there are stuff lying around I could grab and throw it but if there’s none I will most likely become a sitting duck. It might be a good idea to carry something like a bow, a gun or even a shuriken with me. If I use enchantments on items that I throw the power should increase and it should make up for my weak point. “That might be good huh.” It is a perfect way for a mana tank like me whose only good point is his enchant magic to fight. Let’s confirm the most suitable weapon for me at the academy and focus on its training. I need to consult with my wallet first though. “My only obstacle is...;..money huh...;..” Just when I already spent most of my money, I ended up leaving the most expensive stole I purchased with Ludi. I won’t go back to retrieve it though. “My identity might get expose after all...;.” I hid my face with the muffler so she can’t see it, but do I have to act like I don’t know anything about this incident? Impossible. It is only a matter of time before Ludi enters the school and notice me. Since my way of fighting is very unique after all. “To not make her notice I can’t ever fight in front of Ludi. That’s my only option. If she eventually found out then I will think about what to do afterward ...;” Should I dogeza? Well, at that time I will have her return my stole too. Come to think of it I gave away my stole in place of her skirt but there were tablecloths lying around too, right? why didn’t I think of that? No crying over spilled milk, huh. Well, I will manage, since I already sent the spare one to the new house. “Ah, what time is it now? I have to meet up with Marino-san soon...;...;!?” I hurriedly took out my smartphone and checked the screen. However, I wasn’t able to confirm the time. “Ah, AReRe...;..that’s weird.” There’s a huge crack on the smartphone I just bought. I try pressing the power button but there’s still no response. ——— I was able to get in touch with Marino-san after a day has passed. Since the meeting place was sealed off I couldn’t go and meet her and I can’t do anything since my smartphone was already broken. It seem Marino-san also tried to contact me but she couldn’t reach me. “I’m really glad you’re safe.” We were somehow able to meet up thanks to the hotel’s staff. I did asked the receptionist Nee-san to contact her several times. The receptionist didn’t contact her for me in the end but it seems like she got notified and we somehow able to meet up. “Our sincerest apologies, we will compensate the accommodation fee for you.” “No, it’s okay. I didn’t spend much since I stayed at a Manga Cafe, I still have the leftover living expenses I got before too.” When I said that, Marino-san glanced at the prostrating man. Standing next to the man is the receptionist whose body is all curled up. Apparently Marino-san seems to be furious. Well, it seems she rented a suite(JPY450,000) to surprise me, but I ended up staying the night at a Manga Cafe (JPY1,480). I didn’t say it out loud but I did want to try staying in the suite here though. The mistake came from the fact the we only reserved the room with Marino-san’s name. And unfortunately I can’t stay at such a luxurious hotel alone since I am still a student. That’s why it’s not weird for the staff to act that way, in the end they had done nothing wrong. In the first place the hotel can’t treat those incident as if it didn’t happened. there was an explosion at the cafe next door and there was even a magic fight in one of the hotel’s halls after all. “As the great-grandson of the chairman and grandson of the director you know. he is ...;...;...;...;...;...;.” “It’s okay it’s okay, Marino-san let’s leave it at that...;...;It is natural for the hotel staff to protect their client’s privacy, right? Their response wasn’t wrong.” It seem Takioto Kousuke really has the blood of a great family running through his veins. I interrupt Marino-san while being surprised by my own circumstances. Apparently my maternal relatives are among the top executive of the conglomerate. These two people seem like they could collapse at any moment, their faces are pale and the woman is already shaking a little. “Right...;.sorry. You guys, take care of the clean up here.” Saying so, Marino-san and I leave the hotel. Since there was an explosion at the cafe and terrorist attack at the hotel they’re still not open for business. We planned to have a meal here at first but since they’re closed we decided to head to the nearby restaurant instead. Well, it really can’t be helped, but...;...;...; “What’s wrong. Why are you looking like that?” “No, it’s just that I didn’t expect to be picked up by a limousine...;...;” Please stop with this rich people treatment. Suddenly picked up by a limousine and even accompanied by tough-looking sunglasses guys in a suit. I never receive such treatment before arriving at this hotel. “It was the hotel side that said [By all means, Please allow us to escort you], you know. They seem like they want to do this no matter what.” Well, there was that terrorist incident just yesterday, It’s natural that they can’t have a person from the Hanamura family walk around without a guard. Rather if I am the hotel’s staff I would be the one to arrange the limousine myself. The cafe’s surrounding is filled with police officers, the media and a lot of onlookers, if you look from the distance it would like a normal town though. The place is full of people and there are many people with shopping bags in their hand. What a peaceful scenery. “Hey, Kousuke-kun” I took my eyes off the car window and look at Marino-san. She is touching her bracelet with the magic catalyst installed inside with some serious expression. It’s like she was ready to release a spell at anytime. “What is it?” “You see, yesterday not just at the cafe there was also a terrorist attack at our hotel too...;..you already know that right?” Of course, I know that. I was there after all. “Kousuke-kun, you said your phone broke because you were near the cafe when it exploded, right? But actually it wasn’t because the explosion at the cafe, but because you were caught up with the terrorist at the hotel instead. Am I wrong?” I unintentionally bit my lips. Indeed it was like that. I can’t lie to her, but I will avoid telling her the important details. “...;...;I was there, but I don’t know whether It broke at the cafe or the hotel.” I was wondering how to answer but I decided to confirm her story. It was a decision made by weighting between the merit of lying to her or telling her the truth. “Right, Actually I already confirmed that with the footage from the surveillance camera.” So you already confirmed it!? Isn’t this just a bait then? What would happen if I lied? “Kousuke-kun, Why didn’t you tell me?” How should I answer this? There are a lot of reasons, but I can’t tell her the most important one. Something like “I saw an Eroge heroine that took care of me( in a lot of ways) in a pinch and I jumped in without thinking” I can’t tell her that, right? “...;..I thought that you would be angry.” “I am certainly angry, but from what I heard, didn’t you save the girls from the terrorists? You did a good thing, right?” This is bad, if Ludi and Claris were questioned and if they were to check the surveillance camera footage then they would know that it was me. Considering the event, I want to avoid meeting her before we enter the school. But if Marino-san talk to her then there’s a possibility that she will realize my identity. Okay, let’s not touch the dangerous topic and grasp how much Ludi knows about me. “...;..I followed a suspicious person on my own and got into a fight without contacting you ...;..since I’ve put myself into danger,...;.I thought you would be angry.” “So you do understand...;I told you to not overdo it and contact me didn’t I !?” While smiling she was pulling me in and doing a grinding attack on my head. It didn’t hurt as much as I thought though. “...;...;...;...; But you did well.” Saying so, she stopped her attack and hugged me while patting my head. “It was really a fine play. Did you know, that girl you saved, she was the second daughter of the Emperor of the Trefle Empire, you know.” “Hmm...;...;Ehhhhhhh!” Or so I pretended to be surprised. Of course I already know that kind of thing. Did you know how many ending I have seen? I already know she likes pickles and that she always sprinkle salt and pepper on her fried egg or that she is very weak in the morning and even her fetish. “Fufu, are you surprised?” “Yes I am, but is it okay to tell me such important details?” Disclosing the information of the victim. Certainly I was there so it was okay to tell me, but it is also an information that she doesn’t really have to tell me too. I did not intend to hear it here, if she didn’t tell me I would bury this matter deep inside my heart. It will pop out someday though. “Actually I was hesitating to tell you...;...;...;. But I have decided to tell you everything from now on.” From now on, huh. “What do you mean?” “It still not set in stone yet, so I will tell you the details a little bit later...;...;but first, I think we have arrived.” The car stops and a muscular man opens the door for me. I thanked him and proceed inside with Marino-san. After I looked inside the opened sliding screen I involuntarily swallowed my breath. It was a room I had only seen from television. It was a high-class Japanese style room. The first thing I saw was a golden folding screen. On that folding screen, a beautiful crane was smoothly drawn on it with a sakura branches and flowers drawn next to the crane. Diagonally behind the screen there’s an alcove displaying a expensive-looking vase with pictures of sakura branches drawn on it. If you break one you would be billed at least a few millions, no doubt about it. You can also see a beautiful garden through a paper sliding door. Next to the splendid pine tree, there is a pond with water so clear you can see the bottom of the pond and you can also see brightly colored carps swimming in it. The clearness of the water could make you mistake that the carps are swimming through the air. Just by sitting and looking at the landscape here could probably (Financially) kill you in several hours. I wondered how much I have to pay to have lunch here. We sit in the seat in front of the folding screen. Soon after, a clerk in Japanese clothes prepared teas and served it to us. This kind of place, it is a place I will never even consider coming. “Well, let’s continue where we left off.” I was drunk in the atmosphere so I didn’t pay attention, let’s nod along for now. Rather, if I know we would come to such a place I would at least put on a suit or my school uniform. Right now my current clothes is really out of place. While we are eating, I told her why I was in such a place with some lies mixed in the story. Marino-san was nodding to my story while letting out “hmm” sounds “Hmm, I see. In the end you did see Ludivine-chan’s panties and even grabbed her chest, right?” “I would like you to not skip the part where I was helping her and pick up on the small details though.” “But isn’t that the most important part?!” Marino-san’s voice is slightly louder. Well, certainly if you sort it by the seriousness then it could be said that it is on a level of picking a fight with the head of state, it was “Ludi” chest I touched after all. “But, that was an accident.” If I was asked whether I wanted to touch it or not then of course I want to touch it and if I can solve this with a dogeza then I would. But that was an accident. I didn’t like forcing myself on others in the first place. “...;.Well, I did see you tripped over the table’s leg but...;.you sure that was not intentional? “IT’S NOT !! “ When I said that, the Marino-san’s stiff expression melted away and she returned to her slightly gentle expression. “Then it’s all good. You see, those girls, Ludivine-chan and her guard seem like they wanted at least say thank you, you know.” “Guard?” “The elf you touched her butt.” That was true but, could you stop putting it like that? Of course that firm butt was easily coming to my mind. But since Ludi is an elf too, I was confused for a moment. “...;It’s hard to show my face to her, so can I just indirectly receive it?” “That won’t do. Since Ludivine-chan will be coming to our school, you know.” “Ehh–really?!” I already know that. In the school she was even called the wind princess because of her beautiful appearance and skill in magic. If it wasn’t Ludi, I might not intervene in the first place. “Yes, how is it? Surprised?” Seems like I am really good at acting. Marino-san is nodding while absolutely enjoying herself right now. “Yes...;.to think that she would attend the same school. What should I do? I did touched a bunch of things I shouldn’t touch so it’s kinda hard to show my face now...;..” “It’s fine, they seem to mind it a little but they weren’t angry. They were the ones that told me they want to thank you in the first place.” Well, if it’s not like that I will be troubled. If they were really angry and said something like “Take responsibility” she wouldn’t be satisfied until I commit seppuku...;..probably, I started becoming afraid of her. Next time I meet her, should I call her your highness? Well, we will meet when the semester starts at the earliest anyway. There’s still time. Let’s take my time and come up with an appropriate response. This matter will be postponed for now. Yup yup, I nod while sipping my soup. “So, I planned to bring her to our house soon, keep that in mind, okay.” “Cough Cough Cough...;...;...;...;...;...;.” While I was choking,Marino-san’s words registered in my mind. Eh, seriously? ——- When one talks about worry, most people would think about money or relationships. I also experienced it first hand in my previous life. There are even research on this subject conducted through questionnaires. This held true even in the game. Especially to an Eroge player. The protagonists would always have to worry about how to better get along with beautiful girls. It was natural considering that they were love simulation games though. Furthermore, an Eroge is very expensive. It was really harsh to pay ten-thousand yen for a game. It was the price that a normal salaryman couldn’t afford. You have to rely on your guts and make a gentleman’s choice. After you are done choosing what to buy, next is the [relationship] problem. When you buy the first edition of an Eroge you will get bonus items like posters, clear file set or other store specific bonuses. However, every heroine will not be included in these bonuses. Each product will often feature only one specific heroine. In other words, you had to choose an item featuring only one heroine when you haven’t even played the actual game yet. Of course there was the choice of buying everything, but for a salaryman to spend ten-thousand yen just for a heroine bonus item is too expensive so us gentlemen had to choose their favorite heroine before the game was officially released. Even when you can finally play the game you still had to ponder on who to capture. You have to compare various beautiful girls and decide who to go after. What a luxurious problem to have. By the way, although it was not revealed in the game but Takioto Kousuke seemed to have a lot more of these trouble than the protagonist. There’s his backstory, his limiting special constitution and now he has to adjust himself to his new family...;...; “Umm...;..” “...;...;...;.” A woman is staring at me without even the slightest movement. Hanamura Hatsumi, as Marino-san’s daughter her height and appearance was similar to that of Marino-san but her expression is much harder to read. One could say she is so expressionless that I don’t know what she’s thinking about. I know from the game that she is a silent type character but...;.. When I was wondering about what to do, suddenly Hanamura Hatsumi opened her mouth. “...;...;I heard about your situation.” “Y, Yes.” “...;...;...;..” “U,Umm...;...;.Hatsumi-san?” “...;...;...;.” That’s all !? Can’t you at least say something more !? She said nothing more and keep staring at me. Is she upset with me? There’s no doubt that this is one of the reasons Takioto Kousuke didn’t stay at the Hanamura house. He couldn’t live with Hanamura Hatsumi. Of course, being the daughter of Marino-san the beautiful magician, she is undoubtedly a beautiful person. However, I don’t know what she is thinking, I don’t know how to start a conversation with her, plus she is so gloomy. Looking from the outside Takioto Kousuke seemed like a frivolous character so they are opposite to each other. He is already broken inside though. Well, Takioto Kousuke and Hanamura Hatsumi are like water and oil. Choosing to stay at the dorm might have been the only viable option for him. If I didn’t know that this was the world of Magiero I might have chosen to stay at the dorm too. Of course, I won’t deny the possibility of being taken care of by a pair of beautiful mother and daughter. I am not the game’s Takioto Kousuke but a gentleman who thoroughly experienced the world of Magiero. Thus I will not choose to stay in the dormitory. I already experienced various kinds of human relationships from my previous life, I worked in a black company after all. I ended up accustomed to those shitty bastard already (I have to check-in at the hospital due to stomach pain though.). Since I was already used to dealing with difficult relationships there’s no reason for me to leave this place. “Hatsumi-san, I will be in your care from now on. I am sorry for bothering you all of a sudden but could you lend me a book about magic? One about space magic if possible?” This was the house of Hanamura Marino, the Witch of Tsukuyomi and a lecturer from Tsukuyomi academy, Hanamura Hatsumi. It was natural that there are magic books here. This place also has the pair’s magic workshop. Of course, there’s a workshop for enchantment magic as well. There’s also one at the academy but you can only use it for a limited time and I had to consider the dorm’s curfew too. Certainly it might have some uncomfortable mood but this is the best house (environment) for a magician. Why do I have to leave this place on purpose? I have to use what I can right? However, I hope that I won’t cause too much trouble for them. “...;...;..This way.” Hatsumi-san said that and started walking into the hallway so I immediately followed after her. The place she brought me to was a big library, it was too big for a single household though. At the center there was a table, a sofa and a number of chairs. On top of the table is a PC-like device and on top of the sofa there was a blanket and pillow. Around the center were bookshelves that were filled to the brim. Not just thousands but ten thousands of books were being kept here. The scale was even bigger than a small library. When I casually looked around, there seem to be books other than magical ones. There were picture books for children, plant encyclopedias, there are also normal literature and light novels. Of course I found the books aimed for alchemist and the one with details on advance magic too. “Here.” I was guided to the corner of the library. Among the many books that were lined up, there were also things that could only be described as a paper bundle “Is it okay for me to read everything here?” I knew that her research subject was space magic and that she would eventually invent the cheat space-time magic and teach it to the protagonist. There’s a possibility that the books here are important to her research. If there were some papers with important details on her research lying around, her research might leak out...;Can she easily show it to a stranger like me? “...;...;..You knew my research?” “You were researching space-time magic, the subject of your father’s research, right?” Hatsumi-san nodded. Although there was no detailed explanation in the game, it seems like her father was caught in a trap set by a certain researcher and killed. The developer blog on the official site said [We worked hard to come up with her backstory but it was cut due to budget reason lol] so there wasn’t much to learn in the game. Rather, isn’t this game cut too much content? “There’s no real important things here.” I nodded. “Thank you very much, then please let me read here for a while.” After that she turned her back and walked away. Normally it might have been better to talk with her a little longer to get closer to her but that exciting future is still not possible for me yet. Moreover, it would be hard for her to talk to me too. We seem incompatible after all. I took multiple books from the shelf and placed it on the table. Then while I was reading I was also practicing my magic by turning the pagse with Third and Fourth Hands. I already confirmed it from several days of experiments that the larger the area the more magic power was needed to control the stole and the longer the length was, the harder it was to make a delicate movements. Since I practiced a lot, I was gradually increasing its dexterity...;...;...;probably. When I read a few pages I heard a rustle like something moved behind me. When I turned around, I saw Hatsumi-san moving her belongings my way. “...;...;...;Don’t mind me.” What did she come here for? While being conscious of Hatsumi-san I kept reading the book. However, there is no sign that Hatsumi-san will leave anytime soon. I took my eyes off the book and looked at Hatsumi-san, for some reason she had a cup of coffee with her. When I met my eyes with her, she got up and approached me. “Here.” “Th, Thank you.” Saying that, she gave a small nod and headed back to her corner and started working. ...;...;...;.Why did she start working here? Is it to keep an eye on me? “Ah, it’s delicious.” It had a unique flavor that was slightly different from ordinary coffee, it had low acidity and rich in bitterness along with a clear aftertaste. Because it was such a strong coffee, people who hate bitter coffee will definitely hate it. However, if you prefer coffee with less acidity you would surely be delighted by its finesse. I glanced at Hatsumi-san. She seemed to be silently writing something on the paper. I will talk to her about the coffee later. I proceed to turn the page with my Third Hand again. ——————- I wonder how many hours have passed. Hatsumi-san got up and approached me. “Let’s have a meal.” I took a look at my smartphone and it was already well past noon. A company or school lunch break would already be over by now. “Did you wait for me?” “No, because it’s not crowded at this time.” Seem like she planned to eat out. Come to think of it, does the Hanamura family hire a housekeeper? The house was smaller than I thought but for just three people living together, it was very very big. Marino-san always seem like she’s busy so I thought that it wouldn’t be weird if there’s someone to clean up and cook for them. “I can guide you around the neighborhood on our way back.” When she told me that, I shook my head sideways. “Ah, It’s okay...;...;.Marino-san already guided me around beforehand.” When I said that, her expression slightly changed, the change was so small that I thought I was making a mistake. “Okay, let’s go then.” The place she brought me to was a small cafe about five minutes away from the house. It is not very large and there were only a few tables and a counter for several people. We sit down on an empty table and looked at the menu. I looked at Hatsumi-san and dropped my eyes to the menu again. “Do you have a recommendation, Hatsumi-san?” The town I lived in before was nearly the same as Japan. The buildings, the magazines sold at convenience stores and the food in restaurants were similar. But this town looks like a whole new world to me, the buildings look unique and dishes written in the menu are unfamiliar. “...;.Everything is delicious. I will go with Bloodhorn Rabbit Karaage if I have to choose one.” You might laugh at me for this but...;. Isn’t Bloodhorn Rabbit a monster? I remembered hunting them to raise my level and find some rare drop in the early-game. Seem like monster meat can be eaten here. “Then I will have that.” We ordered the same thing and silently wait for the dishes to be served. What should I talk about? I could just sip some tea and take out a book to read but now that I was sitting face to face with her, taking out a book now would be rude. Let’s try talking to her about something we have in common. “Umm, Hatsumi-san graduated from Tsukuyomi academy right? What was it like? Like, what kind of people were there, are all of them elite like the rumors said?” She averted her eyes. “...;...;There were a lot of great people...;but I had very few friends at the academy.” “Ha, haha ha.” I feel that the atmosphere grew heavier. Certainly, I thought that was very likely to be the case for Hanamura Hatsumi. “But, if you are looking for academic ability and strength then it is the best environment. I can confidently confirm that much.” “I will do my best.” When we started to talk properly, the food was being served. The atmosphere might have turned cold but the food was still warm. We continue our talk while having a meal, this time I changed the topic to the classes. “Eh, so the higher my performance the more classes I can choose to attend? “Yes, First are basic subjects and classes on basic magic. Which additional classes you will be able to attend will depend on the subject you have acheived enough mastery in.” I nodded to her answer, seem like it was still pretty much the same as the game. In the game if one raised one own status, more lessons will be available. As multiple classes have been unlocked, you will be able to learn more magic. However, even if the class I can choose from is the same as the one from the game then it might not be worth much to me right now. To Takioto Kousuke additional classes won’t be necessary after all. “Is that so...;..By the way, will the additional classes focus on attack magic?” “...;...;...;...;...;.That’s right. You can learn high ranking attack magics there.” Yup. it’s not necessary to me after all. Specifically speaking, I can use attack magic but the output will be so bad that it would be better not to use it. Well, I don’t really have to care about those classes. It’s all good as long as I can graduate. When the time comes I will just train my other skills or dive into a dungeon instead. With that said, I am organizing the schedule inside my head. I will train my basic physical and magical strength after I entered the school, after that I will probably train my countermeasure against long range attack. Wait...; Isn’t that the same as what I am doing right now? “...;...;...;..I can teach you.” What is she talking about? I was confused for a moment but I realized that it was about the magic from the additional classes. “I have to tell Hatsumi-san this first, actually I can not use most magic with my constitution,. So even if you taught me how to use them, I don’t know whether I will be able to use it or not.” When I finished, she said [I see.] with a sad expression. She even stopped eating and started staring at the food in front of her. “Rather, I want to consult Hasumi-san about my constitution...;..I was hesitating whether it was okay to consult with you but...;...;” Hasumi-san raised her face and made a thumb up. “Leave it to me.” She was very quiet and I don’t know what she is thinking most of the time but I think she is not a bad person. This monster meat is surprisingly good though. The benefit of staying at the Hanamura house is not just being able to learn magic from the pair of Hanamura family Mother and daughter. I also gain access to their workshop, plus there is no bothersome curfew to worry about. But most importantly, I have unlocked a certain place. “Ah, That waterfall? Sure, you can use it. But...;...;..how did you know that there’s a waterfall there?” I hang up the phone before she can ask me more questions. Since I easily got permission from the landlord, I immediately go to Hatsumi-san’s room and knock on the door. “Hatsumi-san, I am going out for a run. I will be back by dinner.” “...;...;Understood.” I left Hatsumi-san’s room and put on the running shoes I recently bought with my surplus money. I feel like I am losing my sense of money recently but it is probably my imagination. Think of it as an investment. I can use the shoes every day after all. ”Let’s go.” I am running along the road that was unknown to me until recently. I roughly check the road in advance and got some direction from Hatsumi-san beforehand. However, I haven’t asked her the way to my destination. Thus I will have to rely on my instinct from halfway onward. “Fu fu fu fu fu fu” I am running along the road at a constant pace. The road starting to change from concrete to gravel to dirt and finally to a grass field. I gradually move away from the town where people live and enter the forest. When I ran far enough from the house, the sound from the surrounding changed. From the noise of the trees to the sound of water striking against something. The more I advanced the louder the sound became. I arrived at the waterfall. It was fifteen meters in height and around thirty meters in width. The waterfall was smaller and not as flashy as Niagara Falls. However, at such a thin and long waterfall its water surface reflects the sky and shines dazzlingly. Its beauty made me involuntarily take my eyes away with my mouth half-open. Should I describe it as a humble beauty? Also, in the basin, the fallen water created a small hazy white mist. I unintentionally stared at it but I immediately returned to my senses and started moving to my destination. I walk along the edge of a small river to approach the waterfall. I am approaching the waterfall and noticed that I can see a rainbow from the right angle in this waterfall. The small rainbow which I haven’t noticed before is wrapping itself around the waterfall. I keep walking on the path with slightly bad footing and continue behind the waterfall. “ !...;...;...;” I could not say a word. If I have to put it into word then it was a curtain of water. This waterfall is beautiful even if I look at it from the back. Over the bluish-white curtain of water is a scene of a lush green forest being bathed in sunshine. When the wind blows, the trees are swayed as if it is swimming in the water and the green leaves are fluttering through the wind. The scene is overwhelmingly beautiful. My heart was about to be cleansed just by looking. I want to look at it forever, its beauty is on the level that caused me to think so. However, there is something even more beautiful than that. Gulped. I swallowed my saliva. Hyu Hyu Hyu Hyu The sound of something cutting through the wind can be heard with the noisy sound of the waterfall. In my sight is a woman wielding a Naginata. Perhaps she already noticed my presence. But she didn’t stop swinging her hand. She stares at the curtain of water and singles mindedly swinged her naginata. She follows it with a stab and swipe. Actually, I thought she would probably be here. The reason the protagonist could arrive at this place for the first time is that he was guided by her after all. To tell the truth I was expecting to meet her here. Because she is the heroine that I wanted to meet the most. A drop of sweat is flying away from her cheek every time she swings her naginata. I wondered how long has she been swinging it like this.? If I look closely I can notice a bead of sweat on her beautiful face. Even though a beautiful scenery was spread all around me, I can’t take my eyes off her. Her black hair shined like a shiny onyx, Her uniform face that is like it is being projected from a mirror. Her eyes are sharp like a sword. Her expression that makes you feel a sense of loneliness that seems like it could suck me in before I know it. If the developer said “ We have made the best girl with our company dignity on the line” the player could retort that “There’s no way that someone like that could be made by human hands” If there existed a goddess in this world, she would already be right in front of me. I am still staring at her right now, but there’s no reaction from her. It’s like she doesn’t mind at all. To her, my presence was like was like a small animal that is not worthy of any thought. She is excluding me from her consciousness and treated me like I am a part of the scenery. Her dark hair dances every time she swings her naginata. Her white arm that can be seen from the sleeve of her Dougi is so thin, I am surprised that she can swing her naginata at such an incredible speed. I tried to wipe my sweat off my eyelids and noticed that my body is slightly shaking. Is it from fear? My excitement? Or is it from my happiness? Perhaps I am trembling from all of it, but the strongest feeling is my joy from being able to meet her. I keep staring at her figure that is still swinging her naginata. How can I not be happy? After all, she is the character I put my heart and soul to raise the most in the game. I never took her out of my party. No matter the situation I keep dispatching her and let her slaughter countless strong bosses in the game. The character I trusted the most is currently in front of my eyes. That’s right, she is here. In this reality. One of the three strongest of Magiero, Vice-captain of the public moral committee, The water magic master called the Water dragon Princess. Mizumori Yukine is in front of my eyes. The swings that have been repeated innumerable times suddenly stopped. She lowers her naginata and takes a new stance with her weapon on her side. “Fuu” The moment she exhales, something flashes. When I noticed it her naginata was already thrust out. The water curtain was split vertically in two. Aa, I have seen that move in the game before. It’s that move, right? I can’t think of a move other than that. [[Shiden-Issen]] That move of hers is one of the reasons I favored her so much in the game. I couldn’t follow her thrust with my eyes at all. The dance liked move of her naginata is not over yet. Upward slash, downward slash, and a side sweep. Her technique beautifully flow. My body is getting hotter and hotter. I can’t contain myself, I want to start dashing now. I was attacked by such an impulse. I immediately arrive at the cause. I turn my back on Mizumori Yukine who is still swinging her naginata, leaving the backside of the waterfall. Then I put all of my power into my legs and dash out. My heart is burning. My blood and magic flow like a flood in the typhoon, my body feels hotter. Ah, damn it. I am cursing in my mind. The beauty that can rob away my heart, the envy makes me want to drive my fist into the wall and the jealousy that is burning my body. They got mixed up and lit my fire. I want to get stronger. I want to be able to use my weapon beautifully like her. I want to become strong like her. No, I want to become even stronger than her. My entire body screaming so. I climb up a mountain a little away from the waterfall and enter an open space. There I circulate the entirety of my magic power and start running with all my might. As if to extinguish the flame that is burning my body, I keep running. —- I wondered how much I ran. The bright sunlight is already getting dark as the sun is setting. Training at this place further than this is not possible anymore. There’s no light and I promised to return before dinner too. “Let’s head back...;..” I muttered so and start running back to the house. The only thing on my mind is Mizumori Yukine. It’s so crazy that I can’t even see the movement of her naginata. Even though I looked at her from a distance I still can’t see it at all. What should I do to achieve such speed? How can I counter it? If I can’t keep up with her speed, I won’t be able to win against her for life. Then, What should I do? The simplest and surest solution is to make the first move. Fortunately, my stole wall effective range is huge, I can seal her movement with this. It will be fine as long as I set up my guard before she moves. But will that be enough? I am thinking while taking off my shoes at the entrance and heading to the bath. There might be humans or demons that can move as fast as her. If you asked me whether I can come up with a countermeasure the first time I see such a move, the answer would be impossible. Especially with the demons. If I got done in, I will surely be death. If I can save &amp; load then there wouldn’t be any problem though. However, this is a reality. I need to train my sight. My reflex as well. I remove my stole and take off my sweat-soaked shirt. It seems athletes can train to improve their eyesight and reflexes. How can I do it too? Acquiring some skills might be good...;hmm The moment I touched the doorknob, the door opened. “...;...;...;” “...;...;...;” What appeared was a white skin dyed with pink, sakura tint of Hatsumi-san. Did she just take a bath? Droplets of water and wet hair clung to her face and skin. I can see steam rising from all over her body as if to emphasize her warm body. She’s the type that looks slimmer in her clothes huh...; When she has her clothes on, I didn’t notice that she has such a nice pair of ample fruits, I got the urge to suck on her cute pink t...;...;. Moreover, since her hip is not too thick or too thin, it is the hip fitted for childbirth. The important part was somehow being barely hidden behind a towel though...;...;...;...; But this situation is already out, isn’t it. I register the view permanently into my head and quickly close the door. I want to make a backup of this image right now if possible. “KyaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaAAA” I heard Hatsumi-san screamed at the volume that I’ve never heard from her before. Then finally, the guilt hit me. “I am Sorryyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyy” At that time, I heard footsteps from the corridor. “What’s the matter ! ?” Apparently, Marino-san just came home. She should be arriving here soon. When she arrived and saw me, her face is getting red. “Kyaaaaa? “ Why does her scream sound so weird? Wait, why is she screaming? I glance at my body. It’s my healthy body that I take pride in its tightness. I feel like boasting about my well-defined chest and abs...;...;..well, let’s not go there. What below my abs though, is the part of me that is currently defying gravity, this missile. I see I am naked. I left my clothes in the dressing room, so there’s nothing I can use to hide it. “Ueiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii” I hurriedly hide my missile with both hands. I didn’t expect this second disaster. “Kousuke-kun, you work so fast????” Marino used both of her hands to cover her face but she is staring intensely through the gap of her finger, at my crotch that is. Ah, What should I do, what should I do? It’s over, my head is a mess. I can’t think anymore. The door suddenly opens and Hatsumi-san comes out in her underwear. Magic was released from her hand and my defence surely won’t make it in time. Rather, I don’t even have my stole. “Ah, I’m gonna die.” Ever since I came to this world, I have had many [first experiences]. Using magic for the first time, riding on a magic-powered car and today, ever since I was born, my first dogeza. I planned to use it in front of a certain royalty first though. Hatsumi-san is staring at me for a while now. There’s no sign that she intends to look away at all. All I can do is to continue rubbing my forehead on the ground. “...;...;...;...;...;...;.” This silence is painful. But the bad one here is me. No matter how I think about it, I was to blame. I entered the bath without checking the inside first. I was deep in thought so I didn’t check and ended up just entered it like that. “The food is ready.” A carefree voice came from the kitchen. Of course, I keep grinding my head on the ground. The front of my head seems like it is getting bald but I can’t stand up here. “Haa...;Kousuke, raise your head.” I raise my head as she told me to. She is no longer staring at me. “Dinner, let’s go.” Seem like she forgave me, for now. When I arrived at the kitchen, what’s on the table were mushroom, potage soup, hamburg steak, and rice. A lot of food that children would like. Everyone took their seats and start eating. Hatsumi-san is no longer look angry. I silently put the hamburg steak into my mouth and keep eating while minding Hatsumi-san. Unexpectedly, Marino-san is good at cooking. When I told her that “It’s even more delicious than the food I ate at a hotel or ryokan” she replied happily with “Nn, Geez?” The one that I find especially delicious is the hamburg steak. The handmade Hamburg is very juicy and the juice floods out when I put it in my mouth. It’s the flood of supreme bliss. “In fact, I was trying to make your favorite food...; but since you said you didn’t have any preference and whatever I made is fine, that’s why I mixed in the things Hatsumi like too, you know? Hatsumi’s taste is still so childish.” Speaking of which, it is unusual for Hatsumi-san to shaking her head so flusteredly. “Come to think of it, what Hatsumi-san ate yesterday was...;..Karaage and omelet rice, right?” No matter how I think about it they are both children’s favorite food. “Mom!?” Hatsumi-san’s face got a little bit redder while glaring at Marino-san. In the game, Hatsumi-san doesn’t feel like she has a human-ish part to her at all, that is completely not the case here. “But I love it too. Hatsumi-san, if you have a place to recommend around here please tell me by all means.” “...;...;...;...;...;...;.” She said nothing and puts rice into her mouth. Well, maybe she will bring me along in the future, I believe so. When I was enjoying the soup, Marino-san let out a voice as if she remembered something and hit her hand together, she then turned to face me. “That’s right. Ludivine-chan will come here tomorrow.” “Ehh, is that so...;...;...;..HA?” What did you say just now? “She will probably come after lunchtime so stay home. Okay?” Seriously? Don’t just drop the bomb like you were saying you will be home late tomorrow. ———————————— After dinner, I returned to my room worrying about tomorrow. Certainly, I know that this day will come sooner or later, but I still haven’t been able to come up with anything regarding what I did that day. Let’s organize the situation for now. Ludivine Marie-Ange De La Trefle, the second daughter of the Emperor of Trefle empire. To such noblewoman, after I helped her I stared at her panty and touched her boob. “...;...;...;...;It will surely be capital punishment.” First, let’s dogeza for the time being. “Please accept my sincere apology for everything I did, your Highness Ludivine” If she won’t forgive me with that then there’s no more future waiting for me. Will she really forgive me if I apologize? What if. Let’s say that a random woman suddenly touches my important part. Can I forgive her? Wait, wouldn’t that be considered a reward for me? She might unexpectedly forgive me too, right? “Nope, not happening” So while I’m thinking of various countermeasures, I suddenly heard a knock from the door. “Kousuke.” “Hatsumi-san? please come in.” Hatsumi-san entered the room. She took a small breath and looks around. My luggage that was carried over arrived and I can maintain the minimum standard of my daily life now. However, aside from the necessary stuff, I discarded everything else, so the room might be a little empty. Of course, there’s no dangerous stuff lying around in the room. “Is something wrong?” I called out to Hatsumi-san who is staring at my room. “No, nothing. I just have something to ask you.” “What is it?” “I want to confirm...;...;.Kousuke, umm, do you like an older person?” “Ha?” “Kousuke, do you like a mature woman?” What is she bringing up so suddenly? “Kaa-sama is already in her 40s you know?” “Could you tell me in detail about why you came to that conclusion?” Now, please sit here and explain it from the start. “But you seem to be on a really good term with Kaa-sama (TLN: Mom). I was wondering if you are running for the Otou-san (TLN: Dad) position.” How did she come to that? And how did she think that Marino-san would romantically love the son of her close cousin? That’s only happening in an Eroge. Of course, Marino-san is right in the middle of my strike zone (except for her age). That’s why there are various things to...;...;...;No, what am I thinking. “For the time being that is not possible. Moreover, I only interact with her on the same level as you, Hatsumi-san...;...;.” “But, you’re so stiff when you are talking to me.” That might be the case, but. “You see, I was strictly ordered to not use polite language with Marino-san...;And using polite-language and honorifics are like a habit to me, I just used it without thinking most of the time.” I am a former member of society. It just that if I treat Marino-san like a stranger, she would just inflate her cheek so I got no choice but to be casual. But inflating her cheek? Umm, uhh...;how old was she again? She’s cute when she does it though...;...;...;...;..(Semi-despair). “You don’t have to be so polite around me too, I want you to call me a little intimately. Onee-chan (TLN: Big-sis) is fine too.” So you just want me to call you Onee-chan? There was no event to get close to her in the game so I don’t know but it seems like she is the type that will collapse her established character, huh. Rather, could it at least be Onee-san instead? No, I will call her that anyway. “Umm...;...;..Understood. Hatsumi-neesan.” As if a fishbone caught in her neck, she nodded with a vague expression. I thought that she would leave the room as is, but she didn’t. We hung out in my room and chat about silly things till the day was over. Needless to say, the Ludi countermeasure plan was completely forgotten. I wonder If a typhoon hit, will she canceled her visit? I entered the futon while thinking about such a thing, unfortunately, the weather today is fine. I made eight Teruteru-bouzus (TLN: Rain warding dolls) and hung it upside down but doesn’t look like it will be effective. Tearing it inside out and burn it might work better. I open the window. The spring breeze blowing in felt a little cold, it’s good weather to wake up to. I changed my clothes and left the house to do my daily running. I chose the running course to be the one near the waterfall. I thought back to when I was guided around the city, the roads are filled with cars and there are a lot of traffic lights. But in the forest, there is almost no private owned land and pretty much no one around. I can run without worrying about the red light too. “...;..Ha Ha Fu Fu Ha Ha Fu Fu.” Originally, Takoto Kousuke is already physically fit. But maybe because of the running I have been doing every day, I feel like my physical strength is increasing. The next necessary thing is how to use my power with high output and how to move when I’m out of magic. When I dive into the dungeon, I won’t know when the demons will attack after all. I run silently through the barely maintained forest road. It will be a little bit more until I reach the place I was yesterday. Since there is a gentle slope before that place I have to put more strength into my legs more than usual. On the way, when I reached the waterfall I saw Mizumori Yukine swinging her naginata. As always, she looks so dignified and somehow ferocious too. I stopped and looking at her for a while, but I soon turned my back away. I’m already motivated just by looking at her. Feeling such, I proceed to my destination. After that, I ran for about an hour and return home. I head to the bath right away. Of course, I knock the door beforehand. People who never learn from their mistakes are just an idiot, an example being the eroge’s protagonist. That applied to a third wheel like me too though...; After the bath, I walk through the cool corridor and head to the dining room. “Morning, Kousuke-kun.” “Good morning, Marino-san” The one standing in the kitchen with a cute apron is Marino-san. No matter how you look at her she still looks like she is still in her teens. I can tell that the breakfast she is making is fish dishes judging from the smell. “Kousuke-kun is always so early, I wish Hatsumi would learn from you too.” “I was just early for my daily running though. It’s still a holiday so wouldn’t it be fine to let Hatsumi-neesan sleep a little longer?” Marino-san suddenly stops her hands and turns to face me. “Hatsumi-neesan?” Ah, I nodded. “She asked me to call her like that...;...;yesterday.” “Really now...;...;fufu.” She let out a small laugh and dropped her eyes to her hand and continue cooking. “Sorry, but could you go and wake Hatsumi up for me?” “Eh, is that okay?” “It’s fine, you are her brother. Just enter her room and shake her a little, she will wake up immediately.” Marino-san is smiling happily and continue cooking. I still wondered whether it is really okay while I head to Hatsumi-neesan’s room. I walk up the stairs and knock on the room which has [HATSUMI] written on the room plate. “Hatsumi-neesan? Are you awake?” I knock again since there was no response. “Hatsumi-neesan?” I knocked on the door again but there was still no response. Marino-san did say that it is okay to enter, right. I fearfully open the door. Hatsumi-neesan’s room is very simple with not much stuff inside. The room is very well organized and looks very spacious. It was not to the level of my room whose luggage just arrived recently though. “Nee-san. Umm, Hatsumi-neesan?” I approach the large white bed and peek at her face from above. Her eyes are tightly closed and her long eyelashes are visible. Maybe because she stays inside most of the time due to her work, her nape is white and is very charming. I gulped down my saliva. She doesn’t look like she will wake up anytime soon so I slowly reach my hand out to her. “Hatsumi-neesan.” I place my hand on her shoulder and gently shake it. However, she still doesn’t look like she is going to get up. I tried shaking her again, this time a little stronger. “N, Nn.” Her thin lips moved a little, she started moving her body and slowly opened her eyes. “Morning, Nee-san.” “...;...;...;...;..Morning.” She crawls out of her futon and stretches her body, her ample breasts got emphasized while she is stretching. Is she not wearing a bra when she sleeps? If she wore one I wouldn’t be able to notice her cleavage like that. I can tell just by looking on top of her clothes. My half-asleep sister still looks absent mind, suddenly she seemed to remember something and put her hand on her clothes. (Not good.) The moment her pretty navel is visible to me, I turned my back away. “W, Well, I will head to the dining room first, okay.” I said so and leave the room as if running away. Apparently, she is really weak in the morning. Well, should I say that the time has finally come? I know this would happen sooner or later but it still felt so sudden. In front of my eyes is the person I saw many times through the display, to which my son has been indebted to countless times (TLN: ( ?° ?? ?°)), her Highness Ludivine Marie = Ange De La Trefle is sitting there. Standing next to her is a woman with a splendidly elastic butt. I can’t recall her name though. Anyway, the woman with splendid butt is standing next to her. She is wearing an Ero(TLN: Erotic) armor which makes me question its practicality while making a strict expression. Hanging on her waist is a metal wand and a thin sword(TLN: can mean many kinds of a sword such as rapier or cutlass). I don’t know why she is fully armed, did she come to execute me? There are too many reasons to count after all. “Good day(TLN: Gokigenyou), Marino-sama, Hatsumi-sama, and Kousuke-sama.” Ludi said her greeting and stares at me. I returned her greeting with “Good day” which by the way is the first time I ever use the word in my life. Perhaps my voice might have sounded a little high-pitched there. “I think Marino-sama might already have introduced me. But again, My name is Ludivine Marie = Ange De la Trefle. As you may already tell, this person is my maid.” “Please call me Claris.” Wait, A maid? A maid wearing armor and sword with a beautiful butt? The concept of a maid in this world and Japan might be different after all. “How polite of you, my name is Takioto Kousuke.” Now that the self-introduction is out of the way, should I start doing the dogeza now? “Takioto-sama, Thank you very much for the last time.” Before I could do that, Ludi thanked me. At the same time, Claris-san also expresses her gratitude. Because they suddenly lowered their heads, I was stunned for a moment. “Ah, please raise your head. I haven’t done such a great thing. Rather, the one who should lower his head here is me, right?” “No, you saved my life. Furthermore, you do not need to apologize, that was an accident after all.” Ludi said with a cold smile while Claris-san puts her hand on her sword handle for some reason. Why are you touching your sword? She seems angry, should I just play dumb here? But if I make even a slight mistake in my response, it wouldn’t be weird if she cut me down here and now. “Is, Is that so. But as I thought, please allow me to apologize. I am terribly sorry.” I said that and deeply bow my head. “Please raise your head. Understood, I will accept your apology. Let’s treat that incident like it never happened. More importantly...;...;” “Our future course of action, huh.” Marino-san entered our conversation. What Ludi wanted to say is that I should forget about that matter already, right? Since I have a common sense I will not tell anyone about it. I will never forget that sensation for my entire life though (Absolutely). “Yes, let’s start with the report from our side. Our conclusion on the identity of the people who targeted me this time is...;...;...;...;the leftist faction from our country and the evil god cultists.” Cult of the Evil God, when she heard that Hatsumi-san’s body shook a little. She then took a glance at me from the side. Ludi continues her talk. “Once I enter the school, I think that they might start attacking me in secret. But...;..” “You still can’t be completely sure, right?” Their prediction is correct, it was actually bullseye. If the situation continues to develop just like the game then Ludi and Co will be targeted by the Evil God Cultist. That is the reason why Ludi and the protagonist got so close very quickly and the reason she becomes the protagonist’s party member, the story will keep progressing with that flow. “We were able to obtain some information regarding the Evil God Cult from our intelligence department, using torture on those we caught. With that, we have acquired some unbelievable information.” Come to think of it, in the game the one who told the protagonist about the Evil God Cult was Ludi. If I correctly recalled, it was during their cooperation in the Evil God Cult event. I get the feeling that the information was fairly confidential too. Is it really okay to tell that information to me? “Umm, is it really okay for me to listen to such a story? The story has become quite important, don’t you have to worry about confidentiality.” The confidentiality is at the level of national secret. That’s why the protagonist was not told anything about them until he was involved with the cult itself. “I am very sorry but...;...;..” Claris continues her word instead of Ludi who seems like she has a hard time saying it. “Truthfully speaking, The Hanamura clan is already targeted by the cult from the start. And the fact that Kousuke-sama from Hanamura clan saved Ludivine-sama will certainly make Kousuke-sama to be included as one of their elimination targets.” “Heee...;...;...;...;...;...;Ha?” What did she say just now? “You will be recognized as one of their elimination targets. To share all the information to you who are already targeted by them, that was the decision of his Majesty the Emperor.” “Is, Is that so.” In Magiero the ones who were supposed to be targeted were Ludi and the protagonist though. Why are they including me as well !? “I am sorry...;...;” Seeing the upset me, Ludi apologized. “W, Well Originally it was my curiosity that got the best of me and I am not particularly bothered about it, so please pay no mind to it.” “Umm, it’s not about whether or not I care about it, but I must still be mindful, considering the thing that will happen from now on.” “Well, since Kousuke-sama already understood the situation, the Next topic is...;Claris.” “Yes, M’am.” Claris saluted. No matter how I think of it, rather than a maid you are obviously a knight here. Claris-san took out a leather envelope from a bag with a lot of sparkling decorations and presented it to Marino-san. The envelope is firmly tied with a scarlet string. When Marino-san circulates magic power into her hand and touches it, some kind of emblem float up from the envelope. Ah, I have seen it in the game before. It is the royal family coat of arms. When Marino-san passes her magic into the envelope the strings became untied. From there, a single paper flew out. I and Hatsumi-neesan go around behind Marino-san and look at the said paper. ?Greeting? How is this freezing winter before spring treating you? It seems our youngest daughter is infatuated with the blossoming flower, she is still happily running around our garden and playing with flowers and small animals right now. Apparently, the smile of our youngest not only affected me but all those in the castle. Thanks to that, the inside of the castle is more vibrant than ever. Her cuteness might even invite the jealousy of the gods. Well, changing the subject. Something unbelievable happened the other day. To think that they would aim for our beloved daughter, Ludi. We want to express our heartfelt gratitude to Kousuke-dono. Regarding the culprit, We have already made a blood painting out of him with our own hand. It is the thing we heard during that time, but it seems like there is a spy inside the academy, However, We can not grasp whether this information is correct or not. We want you to be careful. Speaking of being careful, our youngest daughter comes to our mind. Recently her curiosity seems to be over the limit, she has become interested in various things. The thing that piqued her interest recently is magic. Even though it is still early for her to learn magic, she already picked up a wand and play with it. We’re worried, but we also have our expectations. Our youngest daughter is very good at handling her magic power. At this rate, she will grow up to be a superb magician. Ah, I want to show the figure of our youngest daughter using the magic wand to everyone. She is the cutest in the world, but eventually one day she will receive a marriage proposal, huh. Well, it is almost springtime, please take care of yourself. I wish you all the best. ?Sincerely? I take my eyes off the letter while scratching my head. My eyes met with Hatsumi-neesan, our expressions are like we just look at something delicious but the taste was not that good when we actually tasted it. Anyway, despite the fact that his letter was so damn long and ridden with weird/ troublesome sentences, the thing that his Majesty wanted to convey was few. 1. His youngest daughter is cute. 2. Thank you for saving Ludi. 3. There is a possibility that a spy has infiltrated the academy. It was just a conjecture but you still need to be careful. 4. My youngest daughter is cute and a genius, I want to marry her. There are many places to retort. For the time being, the thing I need to confirm is, “Is your country OK? (with an Emperor like this)” “...;...;.I can at least say that he is very skilled in politics.” Seeing Claris-san answered so, I felt sympathy for her. Since Ludi is making face like she is giving up, she must have been raised like that too. If you entered her route, there will be an event where His Majesty the Emperor visits the academy, from the look of that there is no doubt about how much she is loved. “A spy in the academy, huh...;...;” Marino-san muttered and look at the letter with a bitter expression. She didn’t say it out loud but her face seems to say that “ is there really such a person?”. However, the spy truly existed, and not just a few too. As a result, many events will occur. Well, it will all be solved by the protagonist anyway. “For now, I think it is better to keep that in mind. They are the ones who cause the terrorist attack at Hanamura family’s hotel too.” When I said that, Marino-san muttered: “That is certainly true.” “Also, there is a proposal from father.” Ludi sent the signal to Claris with her eye. Claris nodded and start speaking. “We expected that the people who are likely to be targeted at the academy are Ludivine-sama and Kousuke-sama.” “Eh, me too?” I unintentionally interrupted her mid-sentence. “Yes, Kousuke-sama is the son of the Hanamura main family, you even helped Ludivine-sama. From their perspective, you are quite an eyesore.” Additionally, from her story it seems they’re wary of Marino-san and Hatsumi-san, considering their skill as a magician their chance to be targeted are slim. “Then, will the Trefle Empire do anything for Kousuke-kun?” Marino-san happily laughs. “Yes, we were thinking about attaching an escort to Kousuke-sama. But since Marino-sama is with him at home, the escort might not be necessary. However, Marino-sama is a busy person and there are a lot of occasions where you couldn’t be home.” “In that regard, we are thinking about sending someone to follow up on such occasions.” I see. But...;. please give me a break already. From now on to strengthen myself, there are a lot of things I must do. Dangerous stuff included. If I have an escort, they will try to stop me on a lot of things and my action is likely to be restricted. “Umm, please don’t mind me. I will be able to protect myself.” “I’m against it too. I cannot tolerate people I don’t know coming to my house.” My Nee-san who has been silent until now opens her mouth. Good, tell them more. “Yes, that’s why we are thinking of deploying Claris who is already an acquaintance with Hatsumi-sama, Of course, I am fine with the arrangement too.” No, if it’s Nee-san who is not good at socializing with people, if it is only on the acquaintance level she will surely refuse the offer. I turn my eyes to Nee-san “Then that’s fine.” Why are you nodding as if you are satisfied with that? “Anyway, we went so far off-topic, let’s return to the proposal at hand.” “Yeah.” Marino-san agrees to Ludi’s word. “Father thought that if there are two escort targets then it would be easier if we put them together.” Well, that’s true. From the side of the escort, it would be overwhelmingly easier and the labor cost would be much lessened. “I get it, I see your point now.” Marino-san nodded. “Yes, it seems you already understand but I will elaborate. Will you allow me and Claris to live together at Hanamura house?” “Li, Live together?” My voice cracked. No, who cares about that. What the hell are they thinking? It is no good no matter how you think about it. Living together with a girl that is close in age with each other, such foolish development even in an Eroge there is no such...;. No...;...;...;...;Sorry for my rudeness, it was a common development in an Eroge. Ahem. Anyway, it is absolutely no good. In the first place, there is an Ero boy in the middle of his puberty here, you know! There is a man with the heart of a gentleman who bought two copies of Eroge each month here, you know! Even if I know the danger of the Evil God Cult, my chastity is in danger. Moreover, in the game Ludi was doted on by the Emperor, right? Didn’t His Majesty even deploy the imperial guards in her route? I can’t believe that he would allow Ludi to live together with me. No, wait a minute. In the first place. Marino-san is here. She is a good adult and splendidly raised Hatsumi-san. For a character from an Eroge, she is very rich in common sense. If so, she should already know what to do here. I turn my eyes to Marino-san. She noticed my gaze and as if saying “Leave it to me.” she smiled and winked at me. As expected of Marino-san. As the headmaster and a big shot of the magic association, she is a very reliable person. Having a boy and a girl whose ages are almost the same living together under one roof. She will certainly be able to notice such physical danger. “It’s okay. I know what Kousuke-kun is trying to say.” As I expected, she is a reliable adult who is also modest and sensible. Come on, tell them off !! “Fufu...;..it is about the preparation for the welcome party, right??” That’s right. In order to live together from now on, the welcome party is a good chance to get to know each other...;!...;...;...;...;...;.. Wait? Isn’t this getting weird? “Kousuke. Leave it to Onee-san.” Hatsumi-neesan puts her thumb up. OOH, Are you the Messiah!? Right now your favorability within me risen all the way up. If you were to confess to me right now I will no doubt give an OK immediately. Good, Nee-san please, refuse them for me. Looking at Nee-san, she puffs out her ample chest and says...; “I know a place with a delicious cake.” “Nooooooooooo.” Impossible things are impossible. Yes, Impossible things often happen in an Eroge but that doesn’t apply in reality. However, when it does happen it will happen. After all, this is the world of Eroge, one can’t expect the rule of reality to be applied here. This is the story of when I was in Japan. I once saw a friend dumped the ice cream she just bought into a dumpster. Apparently, she intended to rip wrapping off but she ended up throwing the whole thing away. She acted as nothing happened afterward but I still honestly can’t wrap my head around that. Though, when she saw me throw away a bag full of chocolate, she said: “Are you friggin serious?”. Well, I have seen many unbelievable things since I came to this world, it is already annoying to count. The latest thing is how Ludi and Claris will be living together with me in the near future. Even now I still cannot believe that the current situation is real. When I was running in the path that I used almost every day lately, I look to my side. “Fu...;...;Fu...;.Fu...;.Fu...;.” A black ponytail is moving through the wind like a wagging dog’s tail. Her hair that is usually move freely on her back is now tied up, maybe she tied it up for running? And on her back is an apricot-colored Naginata. It looks very hard to run with. As always, I wanted to admire her beauty and style to the extent that I want to immediately halt and appreciate her running figure. Especially those swaying hills that currently swing up and down as if they’re trying to announce their presence, even if I try not to be conscious I will end up staring at it. Now then, someone please tell me...; why is Mizumori Yukine is running beside me...;..! I don’t get it. Did I do something to anger her? Certainly, I will not deny that I watched her training to cultivate my spirit for the past three days. But that was all I did. I didn’t stalk or ogling her with my eyes. I only stare at her at the level of seeing someone studying in the library to motivate myself to try harder. No, I can’t deny that my focus was on her boobs though. But she is the one that keeps swaying it. I am not in the wrong. The bad one here is Sempai who keeps swaying those beautiful breasts. (Yup, all my fault.) Well, since this is the world of Eroge, I got the feeling that some pervert actions are allowed to a certain degree. &#8211; However, that is only limited to the protagonist. In my case, I will just get beaten up by the heroines later. In the worst case, it wouldn’t be weird if they just cuff my hands and throw me into jail. Once I have run the planned distance, I stopped and wonder whether if it’s okay for me to call out to her. In the end, I decided against it and complete the usual training menu. I train to use Third Hand and Fourth Hand to attack while I am fatigued along with training to momentarily channel a large amount of magic power into the stole to defense against the enemy’s attack. It is monotonous and simple training, but for me, I believe this basic stuff will be the thing I will always use from now on. When I turned my eyes to her for a moment I saw sempai swinging her Naginata. Stab, Sweep, Downward strike. It is different from the form I usually see, but the basics are still the same. ——- Finally, I finished everything on my training menu. I transform my stole into a chair and sit down. My breath is faint and it was hard to even stand up, But Mizumori Yukine is still fine even after she goes through a similar training menu. (Is it the difference in our basic physical strength...;.) Yukine is adjusting her breath and sweeping her fingers through her sweat-soaked hair. She put her naginata on her back and walked over to me. Did she notice that I was staring at her chest, butt, upper arm, nape and etc. during the training? “Are you always training like this?” “...;..Yes, as long as it doesn’t rain.” “I see...;...;...;...;.” Her gaze fixed on my stole. My stole is currently loaded with magic power and transformed into a soft chair made of fabric. “...;...;..Do you want to sit down?” “No, I’m fi—. Sorry, could you let me sit too?” She tried to refuse but she soon changes her mind. I immediately expand the surface to be able to fit the two of us together. She nervously touches the stole. She gently pats it and rubs its surface at first...;...;...;.. then she tries strongly pushing her weight on to the stole and slowly sits down. For the first time in my life, this is the moment I want to switch places with my stole. “Ump, this feels so good.” Whoa! What are you saying? You just did critical damage to my mind. “Even so, I still can’t believe it...;..” Mizumori Yukine said so while rubbing my stole. ” Wh, What about?” I pull myself back together and pretended to be calm. “...;..It’s your magic power, if it were mine it would already run out. Moreover, you can still maintain your enchantment even though you are so tired...;. Are you perhaps a freshman at the academy?” “Yes, my name is Takioto Kousuke.” “I should also introduce myself as well, I am first ye...;. No, starting this semester I will be on the second year huh. I am the vice president of the public moral committee, Mizumori Yukine.” “VICE PRESIDENT OF THE PUBLIC MORAL COMMITTEE ?” I pretended to be surprised. In Magiero, the public moral committee is one of the organizations that held authority in the academy. Being a member of such an organization indicates that you are quite powerful. Acting surprise here should be the correct choice. “Ah, it’s not such an important position. There is always a sky above the sky after all...;...;...;.” She said so and look up at the distant sky. I can assume from her atmosphere that this person has the same worry as Mizumori Yukine in the game. “If it’s you, you might be able to join one of the three Academy’s committees in no time.” I horizontally shake my head. “I think that will be impossible...;...; Actually, I was born with a special constitution that made my emission magic very inefficient.” I said that but of course, I will join the three committees. I won’t say it though. I already made some plans in order to join them. Honestly speaking, I couldn’t come up with a way to deal with Ludi so I was escaping reality by concocting such a plan. I am the type that comes the time to study, I would have ended up doing some cleaning after all. When she heard about my condition, she nodded to herself as if she was convinced of something. Well, normal people wouldn’t have this much magic power right?. She must be convinced that my constitution is really abnormal. “Is it the same with the third-generation saint?” “Umm, It is similar but still not the same. Saint-sama was very specialized in recovery magic, right? But in my case...;...;...;...;” sempai turns her gaze to the stole. “It’s enchanting magic, and in return, my emission magic became like this..” I said so and send a fireball toward a tree. It was such weak magic. The tree is not dry so it probably won’t even burn. “I see...;...;..you are, umm...;...;...;..No, it’s nothing.” sempai tried to say something but stopped herself mid-sentence. I already guessed what she wanted to say though. “As a magician, I know that this might be a big handicap. There are lots of experts on long-range and large scale magic after all.” sempai stared at my face while making a gentle expression. “I am jealous of others and I also felt the despair of the difference in ability from the strong people around me, but...;” “But...;...;.?” sempai’s brows lowered a little. “But there is a possibility that this ability of mine will become stronger, on the contrary, I am thrilled...; Thinking of how to beat a stronger opponent, I am looking forward to that...;. Also, there are surprisingly a lot of ways to use this magic, like this...;” I said that and transform my stole bench and make a backrest. I lean on it and put on my weight. When I made one for sempai too, she touched it with her hand then she slowly put her weight on it and lean down. “Is that so...;..You are strong in a lot of ways huh.” sempai’s face broke into a smile. As if she is looking at something pleasant, her smile spread throughout her entire face. “I am not strong at all. But I’m still thinking of wanting to try standing at the top someday.” Hahaha, when I laughed so, sempai grinned and said: “That’s impossible, right?” Certainly, it might seem impossible. But I still haven’t tried everything I can yet. It isn’t like my old world that always makes you taste the bitterness on the ground. Giving up here is too soon. However, if it is Mizumori Yukine there’s a chance that she can become the strongest depending on her growth. “Sempai.” When I tried calling out to her a gust of wind suddenly blew. It passes through sempai’s heated body and the smell of dry land with a little of sempai’s scent entered my nose. It is very pleasant. I could ask for a second gust. However, unfortunately, Mizumori Yukine did not wear a skirt. Sempai places her hand on top of her Hakama and focusing her eyes in front as if she is meditating. ...;.If possible I want to solve her worry right away. I want her strength to grow to the level of the Sankyo. On the path to become the strongest, I want her to travel up this steep mountain path together with me. When I was thinking so, “Ah.” Sempai let out a voice as if she just remembered something. “Come to think of it...;. Did you know Takioto-kun?” “what?” “This place is private property, you know. Since it’s her it would be okay even if I don’t tell her, but should I get permission for you?” I know but since I got direct permission from Marino-san there’s no problem. In the game she probably asks permission for the protagonist to use this place, there was no such description in the game. However, if it is this tactful sempai then she will definitely do it. She didn’t even tell the protagonist about it. This is the reason I loved sempai so much. “Oh, It’s fine. Marino-san is my mother’s cousin and since a lot happened I am currently in her care.” Sempai is very surprised when I told her, her eyes opened wide and her mouth is half-opened. “The strong people you mentioned...;..That was the headmaster?” “Yeah. by the way, Hatsumi-neesan is my cousin.” “Wow, is that so...;..Sorry for bringing that up. If that’s the case then there’s no problem. She seems convinced as she says that. She then put her hand on her chin as if she is considering something. “Is there something wrong?” “No, it’s nothing.” She slightly shakes her head then...; “Changing the topic, is it fine for me to use this place too?” She said that and looking around with her eyes. Hmm? I also look around. This oval-shaped empty field in the middle of overgrown trees. There are clovers and wild grass grows everywhere around our feet. It would probably feel great to have a meal under the big tree over there. It won’t reach the level of fairy tales from classical literature class I received during my middle school, but it was like I would get sucked into the world of dream at any time. Well, let’s return to reality. I wonder what sempai is trying to say. This land is the property of Marino-san but she must already have asked for her permission since she already training under that waterfall. “Isn’t it fine?” “It’s not like that, I am asking you here. I sometimes got a glimpse but isn’t this your running course?” I finally understand what she wanted to say. “It’s not like I think Mizumori-sempai is in the way of my training so I don’t really mind it. Moreover, when I see someone seriously try their best it also motivates me to do the same, you know.” “Is that so, allow me to use the place then. Come to think of it, I think I will avoid training under the waterfall since my training there might disrupt its beauty after all. What are you talking about? disrupting? Something like the waterfall only serves to supplement your beauty. “No no, please don’t say that. When I see Mizumori-sempai train, I also got motivated from it so it is totally fine !” “R, Really.” I emphasized. But I wonder why she is backing away? After we talked for a while she slowly stood up. “Well, it’s getting late. I have to get back soon.” “I see...;...;...;..Ah.. sempai.” Sempai turned around to face me. “Hmm, What is it?” “Um, excuse me but I have a request for you.” “A request?” I nodded at sempai who let out a question mark. “Yes, I don’t mind if you do it in your spare time but can you accompany me in my training? If possible I want you to accompany me until I got the Mind Eye skill.” Sempai looked at me with a surprised face. —— Mizumori Yukine is truly a goddess. Honestly speaking, I already prepared myself to be refused. I mean we only talked once. Other than that it was only me staring at her during the training. Still, she listened to my request. She is a goddess after all. If there truly existed a god in this world, they should vacate their seats and give the position to sempai already. She is a goddess, yes. But I am but a common man. “SeseseseeseSempai. Is isissis Is this really working?” The water flows along my body after it struck my head. Because the warmth of spring hasn’t arrived yet, the water I felt on my body is freezing cold. It felt like I am naked in the middle of the snow. No, it felt even colder than that. “Takioto, I can still see your worldly desires.” She told me to shut up I presumed? I complied and continue meditating. Next to me is Mizumori-sempai who has her eyes shut and meditating with me, while being struck by the waterfall. Her figure is dignified and beautiful. “If you lose your concentration, close your eyes and concentrate magic power in your body. Then imagine those magic power scattering around you.” She explained it like that but I still have no idea how to do it. For the time being let’s do as she said, close my eyes and concentrate my magic power. It’s the next step that is the problem. “I absolutely cannot see anythinggggggggggg.: “If it works, you should be able to sense where I am even with your eyes closed. If you are used to it, you can even sense the movement of your opponent’s magic power and take advantage of it. I still haven’t reached that level but it seems clairvoyance and even precognition can be achieved.” The skill called Mind Eye is a skill that can greatly increase your character evasion and hit rate in the game. It also makes your hit rate stay the same when you are in complete darkness or when your character is temporarily blind. The skill description in the game said something like [Using eye of the mind, the enemy’s location, and movement can be sensed.] With this skill, I can avoid the “I can’t see anything” situation when I use stole wall. There are two ways to acquire this skill but the easiest one is to be taught by Mizumori Yukine. I opened my eyes and looked at her. In contrast to the shaking me, she is completely still. Her spine straightens up to the sky like a beautiful flower. She is one of the few characters in the game who possessed Mind Eye skill from the beginning. The skill is very practical and is recognized by the gentleman (Eroge Player) as one of the cheat skills and considered as a skill that must be acquired. Needless to say, I also considered it a cheat skill and I always have every character that can learn it such as the protagonist acquire it immediately. Rather, was there a guy who can not learn it? As long as one has Mind Eye you will get [Hit Rate Increase], [Critical Chance increase], [Thirty percent increased evasion chance to all attack except large scale magic and special homing attack.] On top of the evasion chance bonus the hit rate increased is very handy in the second half of the game enemies with high evasion stat will appear so you either have to let your party member who got this skill do the attack or cast large scale magic. It is an important skill for me who can’t cast large scale magic. Moreover, if I use it I can get rid of the stole wall’s weakness. Killing two birds with one stone. If I can learn it that is. I was one of the characters in the game that can learn it, but...;...;...;...;.. I moved my eyes away from senpai, look at the lush green landscape through the waterfall and start concentrating my mind. I continue my meditation but I still did not get the skill. I had lots of drinking party with a friend from high school in my previous life. He worked as a system engineer at a black company. (TLN: A slave driver company) He worked like a horse every day and never complain about it, he worked seriously and climbed up through the ranks. But one day he shows up with a depressed expression. I tried asking him why is he so down. He said that the program he was working on didn’t work as he expected. He tried many times but it still couldn’t be fixed. “The program is just doing what it was told to. If it is acting weirdly then it must be my fault.” He said something like that while drinking. In the end, the cause was not his mistake in programming. It seems that the machine itself was broken. “So even something like this could happen.” He said that and laughed. It is the same as the situation I am facing right now. Yes, I am not in the wrong. Takioto Kousuke is a character that can learn Mind Eye but the one inside him is me go crazy every Friday (*Eroge release date.) Well, two days have already passed since I asked Mizumori Yukine to help with the skill acquisition but there is still no progress. Even though I have a lot of preparations I must do before school starts, I’m still being struck by the waterfall. That being said, what troubled me the most under this waterfall is her presence. I don’t know where she got it from but she is wearing Miko-like clothes and her appearance when the clothes sticking to her skin when it gets wet is very sensual. There is a place that I want to carefully inspect but when my body was struck by the freezing cold water, such thought immediately disappears. Rather, I can’t feel my body at all. Maybe because my worldly thought keeps disappearing it is easier to focus my mind. After we finished training under the waterfall, we warm our bodies using magic. Then I called out to sempai who is wiping her hair. “I really appreciate what you do for me but is sempai fine with this?” The fact that the school will start soon does not apply only to me. Sempai is the same. Even so, she still accompanied me to train at the waterfall every time. “Takioto, you don’t have to worry about me. This is my training as well.” She laughed while saying so but I still felt guilty. I already know from the game that she is a very caring person. It is also one of the reasons that I was charmed by her. “Takioto, the important part is the focus. You have to sharpen your nerve much more than this to sense magic power. Without using your eyes but your seventh sense.” Wait, seventh sense?...;.. I understand what you said but it is hard to implement. In the first place, there was no seventh sense back in Japan so even becoming conscious of magic is difficult for me. “I heard that if you master Mind Eye, you can even feel the sense of touch. My father said that you could probe the monster’s weakness using that.” So the reason why critical rate raised with Mind Eye is that you can feel the opponent’s weakness. I think this skill is very important in order to fight monsters. It is an ability that I absolutely have to get. But when will I be able to use it? “Hey, are you misunderstanding something, Takioto?” Maybe she started speaking as she couldn’t just watch me who was keeping my mouth shut. When I turned my eyes to look at her, I see senpai wearing her soaked and almost transparent Miko costume holding her arms while staring at me. “Normally there’s no way you could obtain a skill that fasts, right?” That might be a common sense of this world. However, I know from the game that skills could be obtained within three turns. After converting...; it should take about a few days. For the protagonist to win at the end of the game, he must learn all the best abilities he could. Well, since I don’t particularly have a deadline so it’s fine to do it slowly. All I need to do is just beat him up after calling him out when the graduation ceremony ended. But, I have experience from my previous life. If I slow down too much it would be difficult to raise it later. “You don’t have to hurry. Just keep going one step at a time. It is fine as long as you don’t stop.” Sempai’s word, If you know her current circumstance then it held a lot of meaning. “Sempai...;...;...;...;. No, it’s nothing.” I managed to swallow it down. I almost burst it out but it is not good to say it now. “I see.” She said so and gaze at the river. The clear water keeps flowing without stopping. A single leaf flows down from the waterfall. That leaf flows along the river but soon gets caught on a big stone. The leaf stopped moving and stuck just like that. The Hanamura house is currently filled with boxes and beautiful elves. As the entrance doesn’t have enough space, cardboard boxes are lying around the corridor. The boxes have labels such as “Clothes”, “Books” and “Tableware”, etc written on it. The elves split the boxes among themselves and take it to Ludi’s room. “...;...;...;.Is there something wrong?” Suddenly I heard a voice calling out behind me. The nice butt...;...;...;Claris-san is looking at me. Instead of the Knightly dress, she wore last time she is now wearing a green sweater and shorts. In her hands is a small cardboard box. “No, I was just thinking about something.” Involuntarily, my eyes went to her long slender legs. She is considered tall even among the elves, comparing to the others she is at least a head taller. She seems to be the same height as me. However, her face is still small and beautiful. Well, according to the game setting, elves are generally more beautiful compared to humans. “Is that so...;..?” Claris’s eyes keep staring at me. Judging from her reaction, it seems like she still has some needless distrust toward me...;...;...;..I wonder why? When I was about to ask her, my leg was caught by something. What is this? When I take a look, my foot bumped into one of the boxes. On the side of the box, there is a paper with something written on it. [Claris’s Clothes.] This is that, right? Claris-san is misunderstanding something. No, it was me who was standing in front of her clothing box while acting like I was seriously thinking of something. Anyway, this is a misunderstanding. “N, No. I didn’t plan to do anything.” “Is that a confession...;...;.?” “N, No. I was just thinking about how it is getting harder to raise my strength...;...;That’s what I was worried about.” “S, sure.” She still looking suspiciously at me. “Th, That’s right. How did Claris-san normally acquire skills? I have a skill that I want but can’t seem to learn it.” At a time like this, I can only change the topic. Well, there is a possibility that it will end up with [Don’t change the topic. Bam!! (Sound of the table being smacked.)] ...;...;...; If it comes to that, I will have to prepare for a beating. “Skill is it?” Claris-san’s expression calmed down. This is like killing two birds with one stone. On top of changing the topic from her clothes, I can consult her about the skills. If it is advice from a long-lived elf who is rich in life-experience like her, I might be able to get a good one. “Yes, I am being taught by an acquaintance but there’s still no sign of acquiring the skill...;.” She put her hand on her jaw and tighten her brows. “Yeah...;...;.there’s no choice but to earnestly train, right?” I sigh involuntarily. “So there is nothing more I can do huh. As I thought ...;” No choice but to continue training as it is then. It’s quite harsh to continue without knowing when I will get the result though. “There’s one theory but...;...;” She said so and smack her palm with her fist. “It is that it is easier to acquire the skill if you desperately desire it.” She fiddle around like there was something invisible on her palm. “In fact, I did actually developed a skill that way...;...;..” She smiles nostalgically while touching the invisible something on her palm. “When I was young, even though I have a lot of magic power, I was very poor at using magic...;.” Eeh, I opened my eyes in surprise. “Was that the case?” “Yes it was, that’s why I also learn how to use a sword and bow for a while. But when I acquired the skill I later change my fighting style to a magic sword and shield. Heee, I leaked a sigh. Seem like she is an all-rounder type like Mizumori Yukine, huh. “Knowing your special constitution, Takioto-sama. If you acquire a skill a new path might open up for you too.” Even if you said that, isn’t it impossible? In the game, no matter what you do Takioto Kousuke will never be able to use long-range magic. And it is not only me, but it also applied to a certain famous saint in the game. “I see...;...;Thank you very much. I will try my best for a little bit longer.” I said that to her and look at Claris-san again. “Is it fine for me to help?” In Ludi case, there are maids(they are knights no matter how I look at it.) carrying the luggage for her but there’s no one helping Claris-san. Well, normally they would give their priority the princess, right? “No, umm, there’s heavy stuff as well so...;...;..” “Exactly. Moreover, I may need to continue consulting you about skills in the future, please let me return the favor.” I put magic into my stole and make it do a gut pose. Claris-san smile and nod her head. “Right. The boxes in this area are my belongings. Could I ask you to carry them to the second floor?” “Please leave it to me!” I quickly start moving. First I pick up the closest box to me labeled clothing...;...;..not, I picked up the box that said [Claris’s Book] with my Third-Hand instead. “Eh, why is it so light...;..?” “Hm, Ah a, Ahhhhhhhh” I was surprised by her sudden voice that I almost dropped the box. “Takioto-sama! Please carry this box instead, Takioto-sama !” For some reason, she presented me with the box with [Claris’s Clothes] written on it instead. What is she thinking anyway? And I was intentionally avoiding that box too. Why did she offer it to me herself? “S, sure.” I received the box with my Fourth Hand. The box was much heavier than the book box. “I will carry this one myself !” She said that then proceed to snatch the book box away from my Third Hand and start leading the way upstairs at a fast pace. I can kinda guess the reason why the book is lighter than the clothing box though. The stuff packed inside is probably different from their label, huh. Is it for crime prevention? It’s not weird to expect a pervert to steal a box labeled as Clothes. No pervert would steal a book, right?. There is also a possibility that it was an honest mistake but she wouldn’t have made such a blunder. I assume that isn’t the case but I will avoid opening boxes with books written on it as a precaution. I am a gentleman after all. I pick up more cardboard boxes around me and follow after Claris-san. I followed after she and I have to stop my legs as I admiring her figure ascending the stairs. As expected of the butt. As thicc as it is firm, above all it is in good shape. Her beautiful butt is being emphasized every time she moves her leg, her white thigh that can be seen from her short pants. It wouldn’t be an exaggeration to call it a form of art. If it’s her thigh I wouldn’t mind getting crushed by it. “It is kinda messy around here, please mind your step.” She suddenly called out to me, My soul that almost got sucked away returned to my body. “Haha, I haven’t lived here for long yet but I won’t trip over so easily, you know.” “Yeah, that’s right...;..Fufu.” We laughed while ascending the stairs but suddenly her body started swaying. “Ee eh eeh” Speak of the devil. Claris-san tripped on her leg right in front of me. I don’t know why but the box she has been carrying fell toward me like she was doing a German suplex. At this rate, that box will directly hit my head. If I was asked whether I could avoid it, I could. But we are on the stairs if I dodge here Claris-san will get hurt. I stretch my hand out to support her body and receive the falling box. “Ooof.” In the end, my vision turned completely dark. My head is wrapped in some sort of cloth and it is very hard to breathe. Silver lining, the smell is good. It smells like the sun. “Ahhhhhhhhh!! I, I’m very sorry !” She got off and try to remove the box from my head. “Uh, Umm, Are you okay?” “It’s alright, there’s no problem.” At the same time as I give a big laugh the box was removed from my head. A bright light entered my vision. Suddenly, I felt discomfort from my head. There seems to be something stuck on top of my head so I pulled it out to take a look. “String?” Looking at it, it appeared to be a string. However, it is not. At the end of the string, there is a thin piece of cloth attached to it. Is it that item? The item that protects the most important part of a human, it’s a panty. A black sexy panty. (TLN: Isn’t that the G– something...;..) Anyway, what is this? Most of them are string type that emphasizes her butt. Moreover, the front part is almost a see-through...;...;...;Eh, why is there a fist in front of me? “IYaaaaaaaaaaaaAAAAAA” “OOOOooff” My vision turns to darkness once again. Well, if you asked who was to blame for this incident, then it would be Claris-san without a doubt. I just offered my help in good faith. I already did my job when I protected her from falling down the stairs. You could say that I saved her, right?. Then why is her Highness Ludi keep looking at me with such suspicious-looking gaze? “Is it true?” Not only her expression, but the word coming from her mouth is also getting more and more harsher. “It is!!” Eh–? She takes a look at Claris’s face. Of course, she is nodding along with my word. Well, Certainly I did touch their chest and butt before so I understand the reaction but I want you to put a little more trust in me. Unfortunately, I can’t deny that I’m a pervert thought. “It, it is true.” Claris-san follows up for me with an extremely sorry face. “Is that so, Sorry, I apologize for hitting your face.” Somehow she seems like she is still not convinced but she apologizes and lowers her head. “It’s nothing, anyone who saw such a scene would misunderstand.” Well, If I saw a man who was in the pile of woman clothes with a black panty in his hand I would punch the hell out of him too. I didn’t expect to be hit by both Claris-san and Ludi though. “I am truly sorry...;...;” Claris-san apologized and deeply bowed her head. “No, please don’t worry about it.” When I called out to her, Ludi whispers something into Claris’s ear. She then returns with “It’s nothing like that, probably.” which even I can hear it. I wonder what they are saying. I can guess it a little but it is certainly not a good thing. At that time, a knock can be heard from the door. “Ludi-sama, There is a call from his Majesty...;...;” It was a timid looking elf dressed as a maid. I was thinking this is how a maid should look like and compare her to Claris-san. Claris-san will definitely look good in a maid outfit, though. Ludi discuss something with Claris and left the room without paying me any mind. “...;...;...;...;...;” “...;...;...;...;...;” The room is dominated by silence. Well, what should I say? I have worked hard as a member of society but I have never faced this kind of situation before. Inside the awkward silence, the one who opened her mouth first was Claris. “I was saved by you so many times now. If there is anything I can do, please do not hesitate to ask me. That being said, do you have anything in mind?” I doubt my ears instinctively. Eh, you would really do anything? Wait, what was I thinking...;..I reflectively thinking something inappropriate. She must say it like that because of her lack of common sense. The thing I want to ask her for, huh...;...;...;...;. I can think of a lot. Let’s choose the thing that is necessary for me. Of course, I am talking about enhancing myself. “In that case, I have a favor to ask.!” Surprised by my sudden reply, her body got a little stiff then she nodded with a grave expression. “Of, of course. I’m already prepared myself.” I wonder what she prepared herself for? “...;...;Umm, I don’t quite understand but...;...;...;...;.the thing I want to ask of you is just a sword training though” “...;...;...;...;...;...;...;..” Claris-san blinks her eyes twice and raises an ”Aaa” voice. “Sw, Sword practice is it?” “Yes, but...;...;..” Just how far did her imagination go. (Looking to the distance.) When I thought she was going to scream “Aaaah.!” again, she suddenly got up. “Th, that’s right. A sword practice, Of course. Firstly, let’s build up your physical strength. Come on, let’s go.” No, No, Wait a minute. I seized her who was about to head for the door with Third Hand. Aren’t you a little too nervous? “Pl, Please wait a minute. Umm, It didn’t really have to be now. In the first place, please look outside the window.” The sun had sunk and stars have begun floating in the sky. Even if we go running now it would be too dark to train and it is almost dinner time too. “Don’t worry, I will become the light...;!” “No, what? How?” “Please leave it to me, it is my specialty.” “You are not making any sense. Please calm down.” If this is a manga her eyes would already turn all swirly. In reality, though, her eyes are already darted around in all directions. “No, I’m calm. I’m okay. Yeah, back in Trefle they even called me the day lantern———“ (TLN: A proverb meaning a person that did not stand out or a useless person like a lantern during the daytime.) And how is that supposed to do with light? Rather, isn’t that a mockery? “Heyyy, Ludivine-sama, Ludi-san, please help me!!” I open the door and call for help. I can’t handle this anymore. —————————————— Unfortunately, the person that appeared shortly after that was not the one I called for. “...;...;...;What’s wrong?” Hatsumi-neesan who is always expressionless appeared while slightly tilting her head. I don’t know what she was doing but the white coat she is wearing looked like it was scribbled with paint. “Umm, Claris-san is..” I haven’t finished my sentence but Nee-san immediately said Ahh and nodded as if she already understand the situation. “It’s fine. if you leave her alone she will be back to normal by tomorrow.” Eh, leave her alone? Rather...;...;it take a day? “...;...;Claris somehow made a big mistake, right? The way she always obsessing over her mistake never change, huh...;...;..Fu fu fu.” Don’t just go and laugh, please stop her already. Later, it took the whole fifteen minutes to calm down Claris-san. She finally settled down, I explained what happened to Nee-san and after that the person I called for appeared before my eyes. “I’m sorry, I was late. Seem like you were calling for me but...;...;...;look like you already solved the situation?” I was about to say “You’re way too late.” but of course, I refrained. “Yes, it’s already fine now.” “I see...;...;...;...;” After Ludi said that, her eyes stopped at Nee-san coat. Nee-san doesn’t seem to care though. “Well, let’s get back to the topic...;...;..Claris-san tripped on her leg and fell down the stairs, I caught her...;but the luggage she was carrying fell on my head, you see.” “And that luggage happened to be mature underwear, right?” Her highness Ludi picked on the most hurtful thing while Nee-san understandingly nodded. “That was really lucky.” “Yes, definit...;...;..Ludi-san, the magic in your hand!!! Please, that was a joke.” It’s not really a joke though, my true feeling just leaked out a little. “Ludi?” Her brow is making a wrinkle, I have seen her like this in the game before. When it was just a game I felt so happy being coerced and abused by her, but I never thought she would be this scary in real life. There’s still a part of me that felt a little happy though. “Hii, My apologies your Highness Ludivine.” She shook her head a little. “Ludi is fine, I don’t need the honorific. Rather than that, You. You do not really intend to roll over in Claris’s clothes for real, right?” Oh. seem like due to Nee-san’s word her doubt in me dissipated a little. No, was it because I show her my sincerity? “There’s no way I would do that, right?” “Well, yes. But remember this. If you approach us with an ulterior motive...;..I will make you regret ever being born.” She said with a smile that makes a chill runs through my spine. This atmosphere is too scary. Let’s change the subject and talk my way out of this. I look around for a topic and saw Nee-san’s clothes. Come to think of it, why is Nee-san’s coat covered in paint? “Of, of course, I don’t have any ulterior motive at all! Spe, speaking of which, what were you doing Nee-san? Are you perhaps in a hurry!?” If it’s okay, I will go and help Nee-san then I will be able to slip out of this place. “A little. Actually, Kaa-sama...;.. She was teaching me how to cook, so I was preparing dinner.” Hee, I see, cooking, huh...;...;...;...;...;...;...;Cooking? My gaze turns to Nee-san’s white coat once again. I don’t remember any occasion where your coat could be covered in fluorescent paint when you are cooking though. No, wait a minute. There is the possibility that food in this world of Magiero and my previous world are different. At least monster meat was delicious. I have eaten a weirdly colored snack in a foreign country before, even though the outside looks weird but the inside was safe. It would be weird if it wasn’t safe to eat. Ludi is standing next to me. Let’s try asking her about food in this world. She would probably answer “ What, you don’t even know something like this? Can’t be helped then, I will show you.” it will somehow end up like that, right? I turn to Ludi to dispel my anxiety. However, her face is pale white while having a forced smile on her face. She’s done for. “When I asked Kaa-sama to taste it, she said she got an urgent business and went out...;..I still have some left...;...;...;...;how about it?” Marino-san ran away. She knew she can’t handle it and ran away. “– —-...;..Aa~a~A~Ahh. Sorry, Nee-san. I forgot to buy my school supplies...;.I am heading out to buy it now.” I felt her expressionless face...; turn a little sad. “I see...;...;.how about Ludivine-san?” Ludi jumped when the conversation was directed at her. “Ee, Umm...;..how should I put it.” The confused Ludi look at my face and smiled like she has some idea then she walked over to my side. “That’s right, I planned to go shopping with him.!” Wha–? “Eh, I never hea—-Ooof.” Before I could finish, a sharp pain ran through my back. Seem like Ludi strengthen her body and pinch my back. “Go along with it...;...;.” She whispered into my ear. This is bad, my vein is popping. “Ye, Yeah that’s right. Sorry, Nee-san. I will have a taste next time...;...;” “I see, it can’t be helped then.” She said so and leave the room looking slightly depressed. As we watch her back leaving the room, I and Ludi sighed at the same time. — Well, why did I use shopping as an excuse? In the first place, I was the one who mentioned the time to stop Claris-san from going berserk. Well, it’s still not that late since there are a lot of cars and people moving around. The sky is all starry though. I walk with Ludi on my side along the night street. On the contrary of me who faced a lot of failures today, Ludi looks like she is having fun. For a while now she keeps happily asking me “Hey, what is that?”. I don’t know why but it’s fine as long as she enjoyed it. When her curiosity settled down, I decided to ask her the thing I was concerned about. “Hey, what do you think Hatsumi-neesan was making?” She stopped for a moment but immediately start walking again. “...;...;...;She said it herself, right? Umm, Uhh...;Food?” “When Ludi is cooking, do your clothes covered in something like fluorescent paint and colorant?” Ludi is silent. The only sound that could be heard is our footsteps. “...;...;...;...;...;...;...;...;.Was it, a biological weapon?” I was about to say “There’s no way that’s the case, right?” but...;...;...;...; “...;...;..I can’t deny that possibility.” Heavy air enveloped the area. When a drunken passerby was about to collide with Ludi I switched places with her, then a hopeful word popped up in my mind. “It might be edible.” “Have you ever eaten anything mixed with fluorescent?” Well. “I wouldn’t want to put something like that into my mouth.” “See?” We keep walking with a heavy atmosphere until we arrive at our destination. It is the place that can be found everywhere, a convenience store. As a result of our discussion, we decided to come here as it is almost time for dinner. “Have you ever visit a convenience store before, Ludi?” “Don’t take me for a fool, I visited one before.” So you only visited one? Even though the place has taken care of me more times than I can count when I was still in Japan. She enters the store and walks around it brimming with curiosity. I already decided what to buy, so I went straight to that corner. The [Cup Ramen] Corner. I chose one that seems like it would be delicious among all the colorful ramen and put it into the basket then I take a look a Ludi. She grabbed a women’s magazine that seems like what highschool girls nowadays are likely to read and flip through it. Seem like the content doesn’t really appeal to her, she is tilting her neck slightly to the side. I return my eyes to the Cup Ramen Corner and grabbed the most expensive one then put it into the basket. When we left, I felt a little chilly as the cold wind touch my skin. If the coolness continues like this the blooming sakura wouldn’t scatter for a while, it will keep its beauty for a while longer. “You sure bought a lot.” She said as she looked at my bag. “Well, it won’t trouble me even if I bought a lot, I can use it in case something happened after all.” I bought so much that it could fill a large bag. On the contrary, there’s only a small bag in Ludi’s hand. I ask her while looking at her bag. “What did you buy?” “There is some curious candy, you see...;...;.I unintentionally grabbed it.” She took something out of her bag. Taking a closer look, it appears to be some cheap sweets. “Ah, I ate a lot of that a long time ago, it was somehow addicting so I used to buy a lot.” “Hee, was it delicious?” “If it the same one as I (Ore) had that is.” She tilted her head a little. “Have you ever use (Ore) before? I was stunned for a moment. “Ah, sorry. You were so easy to talk to so...; I was unconsciously using it.” “Oh, then it’s fine to talk like that. Actually, it was the same for me too.” She said that but, the me who has captured her many times before already noticed that. “I see, then you don’t have to use honorifics with me. Just calling me by my name is fine.” “Understood, I will be in your care, Takioto.” “Oh, speaking of which, Ludi, you haven’t eaten many sweets before?” “Haa? Of course, I have, why do you ask?” “No, I thought that since I saw you staring at the sweets corner.” Ludi whispered “ Aah “ and continue speaking while taking out sweets from her bag. “You see, my house is a prestigious one with lots of history, right? I can’t visit such a store very often and when I am going to eat one, some nutritionist would stop me. That’s why I have so much fun today. I am also looking forward to eating this.” Having said that, she raises the sweets in front of her face and smiled. Ah, I see. The greater you are the more troublesome stuff you have to deal with, huh. She probably couldn’t visit a common store too much. Moving to Hanamura house is a chance for her to be freed and visit the place she wants. “Okay, let me take you to an interesting store then.” “Eh, you?” She laughed while saying so. “Aa, leave it to me. It hasn’t been long since I moved to this city but finding such a store is my specialty. It is me who keeps being told [You sure enjoying your life a lot] you know.” “Fufu, What’s that. Are you trying to make me anxious instead? ...;...;.. Well, I will leave it to you. If you said that much then you have to entertain me properly, okay?” “Sure, leave it to me.” We were laughing as we walk toward the house. We walk for a while after that. When we have almost arrived, I noticed something in my pocket, so I use my hand to take it out. When I did, something that felt like a string was entangled around my hand. I try touching it to figure out what it is. “Ehhhhhhhh” The moment I realized what it was I involuntarily shout while feeling something cold running through my spine. “What’s wrong?” “N, No, it’s nothing. I just remembered something.” “Yeah? About what exactly?” “It’s nothing important, don’t worry about it.” “Hee.” Ludi scrunched her eyebrows. “If you say it like that I would get more curious about it, right?” “S, Seriously, you don’t have to worry about it! Moreover, I think it is better to think about our dinner, right?” When I said that, she dropped her shoulder. “That’s true...;..” It is the expression of despair. The damage from that might be higher than our imagination so we may have to devote ourselves to evade the crisis. But now is not the time for that. When we arrive at home I quickly separate from Ludi and rush to my room. I closed the door behind me and take a deep DEEP breath. Now then, how did this thing ended up in my pocket? I put my hand into my left pocket. The string-like something touched my finger. If my assumption is correct then, it is not a shoelace, neither is it an earphone nor power cord. This thing is not mine in the first place. I wrapped it around my finger and pull it out. What appeared was a black string with a small piece of cloth...;...; Claris-san’s panty. “Haha...;...;..Ehhhhhhhhhhhhhh” I fell to my knees. In a certain sense, a challenge tougher than Fermat’s last theorem has fallen into my hands. Silence is currently enveloped Hanamura house. The maids earlier today might be the cause. If there is an army of maids moving stuff around, of course, it’s going to be noisy. If you compare it to that you will definitely feel how quiet it is right now. Everyone in the dining room is silent save for one. How did it come to this you asked? No, let’s stop with the foolish question. The real reason is clear to everyone. Anyone who has to be here will definitely keep their mouth shut. I took a glance at that object. As I look at the colorful dishes lined on top of the table I want to immediately look away. Colorful dishes are lining up like a light show in a theme park. Yes, let me say it again, it is like a night view of the theme park. The only saving grace was the white rice, the only decent-looking thing on the table. I look around. “...;...;...;.” Ludi whose face is currently pale is keeping her mouth shut. Once she saw me, she slowly turned toward me with her trembling lips. However, I could only shake my head in response. “M, My. this is so beautiful !” Said Marino-san with a forced smile on her face. Marino-san who escaped from the scene where these biological weapons are made is the main cause of this tragedy. “I’m confident.” Said Nee-san with an expressionless face while pushing out her chest. I would like to question her for around an hour about where this confidence of her came from. The reason why Claris-san is not here right now is probably that she still hasn’t recovered yet. It was around thirty minutes ago that we found her body in the kitchen. There were traces of something emerald-green (Which also reflecting light) around her mouth. I knew immediately what caused it. It would probably take a while for her to revive. With that, I completely missed my timing to return her panties. There’s no other choice but to seal it away as my treasure huh. “Now, let’s eat.” I wonder why. Nee-san’s word sounded like a death sentence. I turned my eyes and realized that Ludi and Marino-san are watching me. They didn’t say it out loud but seem like they want me to eat it first. I grabbed a spoon and scooped up the mysterious substance in front of me. Its texture is close to pudding. But why? Why does its color changes depending on the angle I look at it, it’s like looking at heavy oil floating in the sea. “It should be delicious since I cooked the meat well.” Did that meat undergo a chemical change? I pray silently inside my heart for it to be delicious and put it in my mouth. I heard a voice coming from somewhere. It is not only a single voice. A large number of women are inviting me over. They said that there are a lot of pretty girls over there. (They all look like they are in high school but all of them are over eighteen years old.) They would ask me to open wide to feed me fruits. Moreover, they said that I can enroll in an Ojou-sama school despite being a man. What a wonderful place. Let’s go there immediately. When I decided to cross over, I felt a pain in my left leg. “Ha!!”  Ludi flusteredly looking at me. Seem like she was the one hitting my leg to pull me back to reality. “How is it?” Nee-san asked me. “Ye, Yeah. seem like you still need more training.” I answered her. Eating this I need to resolve myself for death in a lot of ways. “Uh!” Suddenly heard a voice from behind. When turn to look I saw Marino-san eating the white rice which was supposed to be safe while holding her throat. “Hatsumi, don’t tell me, you washed the rice with detergent?” “Yes, It seems strong so I used it.” “Is, is that so. You see Hatsumi, the rice should be washed by water without using detergent, you know.” Seem like the rice was a lethal trap. “I’m sorry, I will be more careful next time. Ludivine-san, feel free to eat anything other than the rice.” Ludi who was stunned by their exchange jumped in surprise. Ludi who looked like she just lost all her money through forex (TLN: Foreign currency exchange) got pulled back to reality. “Eh, Umm.” She picked up her spoon with a forced smile. I turned my eyes away from her and put the food(?) inside my mouth while suppressing my trembling hand. The taste is like a full course of bitterness, sourness, hotness, and pain. The texture is that of a salmon roe that breaks down every time you chew on it, I can not help but feel bad about it. Moreover, every time you sink your teeth in, the bitterness and acidity will spread through your mouth. The warmth is also helped in making it feel more disgusting. Its bitterness and sourness spread through my mouth the moment I put it in, the feeling remains even after I swallowed it. “AaaaaAAaaaaaaAAH...;...;...;...;...;...;○×■＃★〒‡▼※“ I heard a scream coming from the place next to me. It was Ludi’s Soon after Ludi let out a strange scream (which may be the death throes of her body) she stands up and hurriedly leaves the room. Hatsumi-neesan sadly casting her eyes down. Marino-san who saw that flusteredly opens her mouth. “M, My my, I wonder what happened to Ludivine-chan. Maybe she has morning sickness or something.” Perhaps her brain is already overheating, Marino-san is acting funny. I don’t have time to insert the retort though. But I can’t stand to see Nee-san’s sad expression so I desperately stuffed the rest of the food(?) into my mouth. ————————————- Okay, when did I return to my room? When I noticed it I am already back in my room, collapsing in front of my desk. On the desk, there is a note with a message on it. “Form is emptiness, Emptiness is form” . Did I just saw the truth of the universe? I don’t know whether being unable to remember is a good or bad thing. (TLN: For those who want to learn more about Buddhism.https://studybuddhism.com/en/advanced-studies/lam-rim/vipashyana/commentary-on-the-heart-sutra-dr-berzin/form-is-emptiness-emptiness-is-form) Knock knock, someone is knocking on my door, it is not Marino-san or Nee-san. If it is them, they would already call out to me. Then which of the other two is it. “Please, come in” The person who slowly opens the door and show her face was Ludi. Her elf ears that always point straight is hanging down and her face is still pale. It’s clear that she still hasn’t recovered from the earlier incident. she enters the room without saying anything and sits upright(Seiza) on the carpet then opened her mouth. “...;...;..Hey, are you still alive?” She’s serious. I may have been in the same condition as her a little while ago. “...;..That’s a thing to be happy about.” “Happy?...; What are you talking about?” Then, I heard a pretty cute Ku~u~U~~ sound from her stomach. However, she showed little reaction to that. If it’s her from the Eroge, her face would already turn red and say something like “It’s not like that~~it must be some kind of conspiracy!!” or some bland excuse like that. But now she just slowly put her hand on her stomach. I offered her a cup ramen without saying anything. It is the most expensive one I got from the convenience store. However, she doesn’t move even though she received it. Apparently, she doesn’t know how to cook it. I took it from her and put mineral water into the kettle that was placed in my room. Then after I taught her how to prepare it, I hand it over to her. I handed her a pair of chopsticks, she then started eating slowly. A teardrop is dripping from her eyes. “Uuu, Delicious, It’s so delicious ...;..” She started crying. I understand how painful it is. However, her crying face gave me a shock in a lot of ways, besides it is making me lose my composure. She is not a woman that would easily cry in the first place. Certainly, I have seen her cry before, like at the hotel for example. But that was all. The only time I saw Ludi cried in the game was only at the climax of the fight with The Evil God Cult. There are no others besides that. But she is crying right now. Her crying face, to think that I would be able to see it when she is eating cup ramen...;...;...;...;.. Today my body feels kinda heavy. It wasn’t just my imagination because even Mizumori-sempai is also looking concerningly at me, so I think that there must be something wrong with me. “What’s wrong. Somehow your look kinda sick, you know?” I give a vague smile to the worried-looking sempai. “Sempai, are you good at cooking?” I already know the answer but I still asked. She is a good cook. It just that she can’t cook anything but Japanese food, she has that kind of setting. However, through other heroine’s event, she can learn to make a wide variety of dishes. “...;.Are you the type that answers the question with another question? I don’t know what you are thinking.” “Sempai, what do you think about the food that can glow like fluorescent paint?” Sempai is tilting her head. “Is that really a food?” If you ask me whether that is food, then I don’t think so. I could believe it if I was told that it is an attraction at a theme park or a firework. But I can say one thing for sure...; “That was a mind-breaking weapon.” Ludi finally resurrected after a day. Apparently, you can reset the effect by sleeping it out. She appeared this morning with a red face while saying thank you for yesterday and asked me to not tell anyone about it. Of course, I wasn’t planning to in the first place. She is a comrade who has survived the same battlefield after all. “...;...;...;I don’t really understand but how about we leave it at this for today?” I consider it a little. Certainly, if I was struck by the waterfall now I would end up being swept away. Let’s not do that today. “That’s right...; I think I will only run today. I am really sorry, even though sempai coming all the way here.” After I apologized to her and heading toward my usual running course, my shoulder was grabbed. “Takioto-kun. That’s not it, I meant for you to stop your training for today.” “Eh, stop training? Won’t you feel sleepless, muscle cramp or having a hallucination if you do that?” “Are you having withdrawal symptoms if you don’t train !?” That certainly did sound like withdrawal symptoms. “I somehow feel anxious when I do not move my body...;...;...;” “Anxiety, huh...;...; I certainly have one before an important match but I feel like it is a bit too extreme in your case.” Sempai removed her hand from my shoulder and beckons me to follow her. The place sempai brings me to is a shopping street a little distance away from the academy. She seems to have acquaintances around here so she was giving them a greeting while we are making our way through the street. “Takioto-kun, do you like sweets?” I nodded to sempai who is walking next to me. “I see. Then I think you will like it.” Having said that, I somehow got some expectations of our destination now. When I was raising my expectation, sempai suddenly stopped her feet. “Sempai, what’s wr...;...;...;...;..that look suspicious...;” A woman is wearing a hat like she was trying to hide her blond hair. She also wearing a deep green sunglasses with a mask covering her mouth. She is not as tall as senpai but I think she is considerably tall for a woman. Judging from her smooth legs and a small face, she could probably pass as a model. “You also think so?” “She is too suspicious. Should we call out to her?” Sempai starts walking toward her. I quickly follow after and stand in front of senpai then gather my magic power into my stole, readying it so that it can transform at any time. “Excuse me, is something the matter?” Senpai asked. The woman turned to face us. The moment she looked at me she jumped in surprise. “N, Nothing !” Somehow, I feel like I heard that voice somewhere before. It’s recently I heard that voice too. When I take a closer look...;...;...;...; “...;...;...;..Don’t tell me.” When I was trying to call her name, she turned her back and started running away. But since I was prepared I immediately captured her with Third Hand. She struggling inside the stole. Doing so, her sunglasses slipped away and I saw the fac I already expected. “...;...;...;..What are you doing? Ludi.” The suspicious person that is currently wrapped inside my stole is her Highness Ludivine Marie=Ange De La Trefle. __________ “Please take your time.” Saying so, the waiter went away. In front of Mizumori-sempai’s seat is a Matcha Tiramisu. Ludi who is sitting next to her also ordered a Matcha Parfait. The Matcha ice cream has a lot of strawberries and fresh cream gathered in the cone. It looks amazingly delicious. Aaa, I want to eat it all. It might be a good idea to order something else other than my matcha fondue. “I didn’t think that it would be Trefle-sama.” Sempai whispered. Ludi quickly swallows the thing inside her mouth and shakes her head. “You are Takioto’s master, right? You can call me Ludi. I am not fond of stiff manner.” Haa, I let out a small sigh. Sempai was just feeling obliged to do so. Well, I was like that at first too. “Anyway, what are you doing out here all–...;...;...;...;...;...;...;...;!” I was about to ask her but my foot got stepped on. It seems like she doesn’t want to talk about it. “Th, that’s right. I wanted to ask you about Tsukuyomi Magic Academy. If it’s fine with you, could you tell me about it?” Ludi tries to forcibly change the subject. Sempai answers her while being puzzled by Ludi’s sheer pushiness. From her answer, I was able to get some useful information for myself as well. “Hee, so it has to be a while after entering the school that we can get permission to enter a dungeon?” “Safety first, or so the teachers told me. Additionally, for the first time you enter the dungeon, you are obliged to enter with an upperclassman.” I see. Ludi and I nodded along with her answer. It seems like the setting is still the same as the game. Then, assuming that the first set of party members is the same as the game, I will be with the protagonist. Other members will change depending on the protagonist’s choice. Depending on the method, other than me there would be a beastman, there is also a pattern that has Ludi and sempai as party members. I can’t really talk casually with a person I met for the first time, so I want to at least be together with Ludi or sempai. “Then, can sempai enters the dungeon with me? It would be reassuring to have you with me.” When I asked her, she answered with a small laugh. “If it was the same as last year then that would be unlikely since it was randomly selected. I will try asking the teacher I know but don’t get your hopes too high, alright?” I intended that as a joke but it would be okay to at least ask. Thinking about it now, if I ask Marino-san wouldn’t I be able to choose my partner? No, without doing that I already know all the possible options. Wouldn’t it be fine if I guide the protagonist’s action? “Thank you very much,” Senpai smiled as I said that. “I want to ask one more thing. I heard that there are many dungeons around here, but is it okay to enter any dungeon I like?” “That’s not the case. If you are doing well then you can eventually visit them all but only two dungeons can be entered from the beginning. Even those two dungeons will be available a while after you entered the academy...;...;...; it is still the matter of the future.” Hou, I nodded. It is still the same as the game. However, I am a little worried about the total number of dungeons. There were only twenty in the initial version but, there will be six more from the first limited edition bonus, five more from the store special bonus, eight from DLC that came with illustration book, nine from another DLC coming with the fan book and twelve more from the Majiero collection that can be bought from Winter Comiket(TLN:https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Comiket)...;...;...;around sixty dungeons in total. Well, they did well releasing all those dungeons. Especially the five from the store bonus, to get it you must buy one copy from each store five times, it was super troublesome. I still have a bitter memory when I have to buy it together with my friends since I want sempai hug pillow. I reached for my Matcha Chocolate Fondue. When I look to the side I saw Ludi who was about to put strawberry and matcha into her mouth. “What?” “No, I thought that it looks delicious...;” Saying so I opened my mouth while thinking that the icecream will enter my mouth. Of course, such a miracle didn’t happen. “Haa? Why should I?...;...;.. Don’t tell me you like parfait?” “I like all kinds of sweets. I’m really weak to the matcha inside too.” Of course, I also like that parfait. It’s like experiencing the condition where [another heroine’s face float up in my mind in the middle of capturing another heroine], I called it [Why did I capture her first disease]. Kagikko (Key-child) (TLN: Loyal fan of softhouse KEY, example: Kanon, Air, Clannad) might become another disease name too. (TLN: I don’t really get the reference on this part) “Hou, what a coincidence. I have a weakness for matcha too. I already ate some of it but would you like some?” Sempai rotates her cup and pushes it over to me. I see, I planned to use a new spoon but if I eat the untouched part it won’t become an indirect kiss. Huh? That’s a shame. “Thank you very much.” Saying my thanks, I pushed my Matcha Chocolate Fondue over to sempai. Sempai seems to understand what I was thinking and reached out for the Choco Fondue. I picked up my spoon and dig into the Matcha Tiramisu. “Ahhhhh, It’s so deliciousssss.” I couldn’t stop smiling. The Fondue was good but Tiramisu is good too. Rather, the Tiramisu is even more delicious. I will order a tiramisu next time I come here. “...;...;Seeing you eating it so happy makes me want to eat it too...;You sure enjoying yourself huh.” Ludi said while offers her parfait to senpai. The three of us shared our sweets after that. “UUUOOO” When I swung down my wooden sword, Claris-san unhesitatingly steps forward and only turned her body to evade. She gathers her magic power then use the momentum to make a roundhouse kick while applying magic to strengthen her leg. “Fu,” I immediately block it with Third Hand.  I was thinking whether to just catch her leg while I am at it but decided not to. The power behind her kick was so strong that all I could do was blocking. I couldn’t even stay root to the ground, her kick even left a mark on the ground as her foot slides through. “Such power...;even though she looks so slim.” This also applies to Mizumori-sempai. “Oh spirit of the wind...;...;.” Shit. Seeing Claris-san started chanting, I immediately close the distance. However, I was unable to stop her. “Wind Storm” As if I was hit by the maximum speed of a super large typhoon, my body was blown away. “Uwaaaa, I’m flying...;...;I’m flyinggggggggg” I harden my Fourth hand and strike the ground. I was somehow able to endure the wind but...;...;...;.. “I can’t see anything...;..” The wind blew up the dust around us, making it so that I can only see a few meters ahead. Which direction will she attack from? I used Fourth Hand to prevent myself from being blown away so stole shield can only expand to half its capacity. If I am hit at a blindspot now I can’t defend against it. If I can see neither front nor behind then I will defend my back. If the attack came from the front ...;...;. I will use my sword to parry it. Deciding so, I deploy the shield to my back and took a stance with my sword. Claris-san will definitely attack before the dust settled. “From the front, seriously...;...;...;!” She knocks the sword I placed in the middle stance off my hand and proceed to kick me away I was rolling on the ground. I strengthened my body to reduce the damage but...;...;...;. “Ahgf, Blargf” I look at Claris-san while lying on the ground. Ah, I feel like puking. “It’s over...;...;.?” Claris-san immediately rushes over and rubs my back. “As I thought, long-range magic sure is unfair.” When I muttered so, Claris-san bitterly smiled. “From my perspective, the one being unfair here is that stole though...;..An average swordsman would already be finished after the first kick.” She said while looking at my stole. After some time passed, I put magic power into my stole and pressed it on the ground to push myself up. “Right, I might have won against you but mock combat against Takioto-sama made me realize that I am still immature.” Certainly, I have a chance to win against her, but it was only around twenty percent. It is not that I let her win. Her strength is obviously above mine. “No, I still have a long way to go.” “I don’t really think so though.” The one who interjected that was Ludi who was watching from nearby. She separates herself from the tree she has been leaning on and came over to me. “I have never won against Claris before, you know?” Saying so, Ludi walks toward me. I look at Ludi’s figure and recall her starting abilities. The magic and skill she possessed. “Ludi...;...; if you learn how to shorten your cast time...;...;I think you would have a lot of ways to win though.” As one of the main heroines, if appropriately trained Ludi should be able to become stronger too. She also has a special skill that enhances the power of her long-range magic. A complete opposite of me who can’t use most of the long-range magic (I can throw stuff though.) and can only attack the enemy that is right in front of me. Conversely speaking, it is no exaggeration to say that if we work together it would be the best combination to cover our weaknesses. “Chant Shortening, huh. I want to learn it but...;...;..can I really learn it as I am now? There’s no one around who could teach me in the first place.” She said so and tilt her neck. Chant shortening and Chant Cancelling are essential skills for a character that focused on long-range magic like Ludi. Chant Cancelling can be learned from an item drop by high-rank dungeons or an end game event regardless of the user’s ability. But first, one has to learn Chant shortening. In the game, it is a skill that can be learned regardless of the user but...;. Even now I still can’t learn Mind Eye so I don’t know whether that is true or not. “If you are looking for a teacher then they’re close by, you know, two of them at that.” “Eh?” Ludi tilts her neck to the other side. With that said. “Please teach her, Nee-san” I bowed my head to Nee-san who is sipping a cup of tea while looking at her document. Ludi also bows her head. Is it okay for royalty like her to lowered their head? Since it was for her teacher then it might be alright, probably? “If it’s now I can teach you...;...;since I will be busy once school started. But don’t ask Kaa-sama, she is very busy.” I leave Ludi with Nee-san, Then I went to the library with Claris-san. “Claris-san, I am fine alone you know?” Cast Shortening is an unnecessary skill for me who is a front line fighter. It is different for Claris-san who is good at mid-range combat though. “No, I tried learning it a few times already but the results are not so good. What about Takioto-sama?” Well, the magic I usually use only involves putting magic into my stole and modify it. “I just simply channel magic into the stole so...;..” Recently, I always channeling magic through it, it is like continuous magic so there’s no need for chanting. Speaking of which, since I always activate it for the whole day...;..I wonder what happened to my magic power. “Then, what will Takioto-sama be looking for in the library.” There is a little time before I have to go train under the waterfall with sempai. I could just relax in my room but...;. “Well, I was thinking about looking for a magic book that I could use in the library.” I just want to kill time though. “I see.” The thing I am wondering about is why Ludi’s personal maid is following me around though. Well, since she has Hatsumi-neesan with her, it should be fine, right? When I opened the library door, the wind carrying the smell of ink and paper waft passed me and Claris-san. For now, let’s check the table to make sure that there’s no research material left behind by Nee-san. After looking around the library, Claris-san looks at something at the corner of a bookshelf. I will look around for some magic I could use like Body Strengthening and recovery magic in one of the library corners. I found several books I could use. I take the books in my hand and take it to the sofa. I grabbed an iced coffee from the refrigerator inside the library and sat down on the sofa to start reading “Is that Gift magic?” “Whoa” Since she called me from the place very close to my ear, I startled and dropped the book. “Don’t surprise me like that, When did you get so close? I couldn’t feel your presence at all !?” I don’t know since when but Claris-san is standing next to me. “It’s a natural skill for a maid.” Even if you said that while smiling, isn’t that a skill for an assassin rather than a maid. “I also want that kind of skill.” Honestly speaking, I want to acquire a skill like that before gift magic. A stealth skill is really convenient in the dungeon. The one I really want is the Ninja skill but ...;...;.she wouldn’t happen to have it right? “Yeah, I will teach it to you in our sword training. More importantly, do you intend to learn gift magic?” Gift magic is a magic that transfers one own magic to others. “Claris-san should already know this, my magic capacity is rather unusual, you see.” Those weird gentlemen who use Takioto Kousuke did not only use him as a shield but also a mana pot, Making him learn gift magic he was used to restoring the other party member’s MP(Magical power). It is the optimal solution for Takioto Kousuke who has the highest magic capacity in Magiero. But he was only used by those gentlemen who want to play with a handicap for First or Second playthrough. The reason is that the players keep their recovery items and money when you beat the last boss and start a newgame+ with all the shops in the game unlocked from the start. Since the player already got their hands on the recovery item, there was no need to bring Along Takioto anymore. If it’s me I would fill all my party slot aside from the protagonist with beautiful girls. It’s an obvious choice. “I see, it would be very effective if Takioto -sama were to use it.” Claris-san nodded convincingly. If it consumes a turn to learn the skill like in the game then I wouldn’t want to learn such a skill. But since the game still hasn’t started yet there’s no loss in learning it. “Since Ludi consumes magic power like water, I think I will be able to use it effectively.” It’s safe to say that doping was essential for Ludi who dish out powerful long-range magic one after another. In the game, there was no item usage limit, as long as you have the money you can obliterate any enemy that comes your way. Then I look at Claris-san, she looks like she has something to say. I wasn’t sure why but I soon found out the reason. “Umm...;..I don’t recall Ludivine-sama learning such magic though.” I slipped. I forgot that this is still the beginning of the game when she could only use her starting magics. “Ah, it’s, it’s for the future, yes! The future.” “Ri, Right, Certainly Ludivine-sama will surely be suitable for such magic.” The atmosphere ended up turning awkward. As if to run away I focus on my book instead. Then I noticed something and ask Claris-san. “Perhaps Claris-san can use it?” “Yes, do you want me to teach you?” I coughed out a dry laugh. Perhaps I might have already acquired a cheat. One that never appears in the game before at that. “It sure raining cats and dogs, huh” The raindrop hit the roof. The weather has become like this recently, for plants in would be like the blessing from heaven but to me, it is an unfortunate event. I can’t run, I can’t see sempai’s face, I can’t hear sempai’s voice, I can’t breathe in the air of tranquility sempai emit and above all I can’t see her bewitching soaked figure when we sit together under the waterfall. “Kousuke.” Someone called my name so I turn around to look. It was Hatsumi-neesan who is looking at me while holding a wand. Walking behind her is the tired-looking Ludi. Perhaps they just finished with their Chant Shortening lesson. From what I heard, Hatsumi-neesan is very strict and didn’t show any compromise for Ludi at all. But since Ludi also has a hostile organization to worry about she has the proper motivation. However, since she has to train until her magic depleted, she has a hard time just to keep walking. She seemed to be asking Nee-san to go easy on her a little bit. I know that her training is harsh but I want to support Nee-san’s training method. As a result of my experiment, I found that the more you use magic, the easier it is for you to use them. “Did you completed your preparation, Kousuke?” I tilted my head as I wondered what she was talking about. “The school will start the day after tomorrow, right?” Ah, I nodded. Certainly, the entrance ceremony will be on the day after tomorrow. Of course, I have already done a proper preparation. “I’m fine, there’s not much to worry about in the first place.” When I answered, Nee-san’s eyebrows raised a few millimeters, and I feel like the corner of her mouth is shaking. Is that perhaps a smile? She then made an okay hand sign with her right hand. -for your imagination “Un, be sure not to forget anything.” Nee-san walks straight to the stairs. I called out to Ludi who is sitting on the sofa like her soul already left her body. “Are you still alive?” “...;...;...;..It’s no good. Before I die, I want to eat ra...;...;...;.no, ice cream would be better.” She said it while stretching out her hand like she was trying to grasps something. Please come back already, your Highness Ludivine. “Can’t be helped then.” I open the freezer and look for ice cream. Somehow, this house always has a lot of high-quality cup ice cream like it was only natural. I take two of her favorite Choco Strawberry out from the freezer and take it to her. “Thank you...;...;.” I hand over one to her and open the lid of the one I am carrying...;..Recently, it seems like I stopped being modest around her and treat her like a sibling. Well, it is completely better than being awkward around each other. Come to think of it...;..This aspect of Ludi should only be known to the protagonist, isn’t it? Is it fine for her to show this side of her to me? “Hm, did I ever told you my favorite flavor?” Ah, I might not have heard of it before. I heard it too many times to count in the game though. “Oi oi, didn’t you told me about it when we were with sempai?” At a time like this, it would be better to say it with confidence. Most people should be fooled by this. “Was that the case?” She uninterestedly scoops up the ice cream with her spoon. It might be because her magic power still hasn’t recovered yet, her every action is so sluggish. Seeing her like that I remembered something. “...;...;...;.Hey, Ludi. won’t you help me in my experiment.” “Ha?” “What are you talking about?” She answered with a sour look while trying to eat her ice cream. “Well, actually Claris-san just taught me gift magic and I still haven’t tried using it on others yet. If Ludi is fine with it I want to try it with you.” She nodded while having a spoon in her mouth. Normally it would be really cute but she looks kinda sloppy considering she is an actual royalty. “Hee, You learned some unusual magic. I remembered that it was inefficient magic isn’t it?” Certainly, it is as she said. However, if I raised it to the max level the efficiency should be raised considerably. That’s why I want to raise its level as soon as possible. “It really is, but if I use it, it might get better in the future, right? That’s why I want to practice it.” “I see.” “It will be a training for me and it will make you feel better, so how about it?” She answered my question with a nod. “Sure, I will be in your care then..” As Ludi turns to face me, I give her my hand. However, she tilted her head. “What are you doing?” “Ah, sorry. I still have to touch the target to send over my magic, because, you know? my constitution.” Ludi nodded. “Th, That’s right.” She put her ice cream on the table and wipe her hand with a handkerchief. I then approached her slowly and touch her hand. “Don’t be so nervous.” “I don’t.” Her hand is sweating a little even though she wiped it just now. “Ludi’s hand, so warm.” “Don’t say something strange and just do it already, Stupid (TLN: Baka)” I don’t remember saying anything strange though. Well, as she said, let’s do this. “Nn...;.. it’s flowing into me...;...;” I felt Ludi’s magic power, I gradually send my magic power toward them. “How is it? If you got the magic properly then I want to gradually increase the output here...;...; can I? “Yeah, I got it. Okay...;..keep it coming...;...;Nn...;...;.Fueh?” I gradually raise my magic output. However, the more I increase the more my magic is leaking out. I still don’t have enough training. “Nn...;.nn. Wai, Wait a minute!” “Eh, what’s wrong?” Looking at Ludi, her face is slightly red. “I’m...;.I’m fine. It felt very ticklish though.” “Aa, you’re not fine at all, right? Claris-san’s face got red when I tried it too.” Come to think of it, when I transfer my magic power to Claris-san she said some vague thing like “Kuh, I will never give in”...;...;...;...;what was that all about? Well fine, let’s raise the output for now. “U,uuuuuuuuuuuuuuuuuu, Ahhhhhhh” “H, Hey stop making weird noises.” Ludi has an incomprehensible expression where she looked to be in pain and feeling pleasant at the same time. Moreover, her face and her distinctive pointed ears are red as well. “Th, this is...;bad o..O..s...;Stop it.” “Ah, sorry. I still haven’t train it that much so I can’t immediately lower the output...;...;” You see, when you turn off the old faucet the water still flows a little before it completely stops, right? Switching it off really is troublesome. “Y, youuuu idiooooot !! (TLN: BAAKAAAA) Seeing Ludi’s swaying body I thought that this is seriously bad. However, I have no choice but to slowly lower the output. She could just let go of my hand though. When I was pulling my hand back, I noticed that I can’t let go since she is not just grabbing my hand but also tightly squeezing it too. Then...;. “Kya.” Failing to pull my hand away from her, instead, I ended up pulling her body toward me. Currently, our eyes and body are in close contact. By the way, I noticed it just now, but it seems like the more the contacted area is the more I can send my magic power efficiently. “AbababaBa” From the part our skin is touching, my magic power flows into her with tremendous force. Ludi let out a scream like the one I have seen in a manga I read a long time ago while leaning on me. “Hii...;Hyu...;..Halp mee...;.” I felt her weird breathing on me. Her forehead is sweating and the woman-specific sweet smell is mixing in with the smell of her sweat, stimulating my brain. But that was not the only thing that gives the stimulus. Her bare skin I am touching is soft and warm, also the sensation of her sweat. The weight that she entrusted to me while leaning in and a bead of sweat that is flowing along her smooth white nape. They are all providing me stimuli. This is getting dangerous “Lu, Ludi. Are you okay!? Let’s move away from each other first.” Her wet eyes seem like she wants to ask me for something. Then she increases the strength in her hand and wouldn’t let me escape. Honestly, I don’t want to let go either but...;...;...;...;.this is truly getting dangerous. Dangerous in a lot of ways. I can’t let go, even if I can, I don’t want to. She won’t let me go in the first place. In the end, she didn’t let go of me until the gift magic was over. — ( ?° ?? ?°)( ?° ?? ?°)( ?~ ?? ?°) ( ?o ?? ?o ( ?° ?? ?°)( ?° ?? ?°)( ?~ ?? ?°) ( ?o ?? ?o ( ?° ?? ?°)( ?° ?? ?°)( ?~ ?? ?°) ( ?o ?? ?o ( ?° ?? ?°)( ?° ?? ?°)( ?~ ?? ?°) ( ?o ?? ?o ( ?° ?? ?°)( ?° ?? ?°)( ?~ ?? ?°) ( ?o ?? ?o ( ?° ?? ?°)( ?° ?? ?°)( ?~ ?? ?°) ( ?o ?? ?o ( ?° ?? ?°)( ?° ?? ?°)( ?~ ?? ?°) We sat a little away from each other while we are fixing our appearance. Ludi using wind magic to dry herself since she sweated so much that one portion of her hair and clothes are sticking to her skin. On my side the place that Ludi held on was full of wrinkles, Just by looking I notice that she holds onto me with quite a bit of strength. Well, seeing Ludi as she is, my Gift Magic was quite a stimul—...;..Umm, it was successful. Right now she is brimming with magic power and her expression has gotten better. However,...;...;.. “...;...;...;...;...;..” “...;...;...;...;...;..” Even though her body is perfectly fine the same couldn’t be said for the atmosphere in the room. This silence is so awkward. Ludi suddenly stood up. She said nothing to me and turn her back to walk toward the door. Her clothes stuck to her sweat-soaked back. Looking for a change of mood, I head to the magic practice field in the house. At first, I intended to practice my magic for a while but I can’t concentrate. Let’s give up and go take a shower. I want a cold shower if possible. Since the whole thing happened I really want to cool down. My body felt so hot and my head is literally boiling already. It is to the level that if it isn’t raining right now, I would like to go meditating under that waterfall immediately. I take my stole off while letting out a huge sigh. It was not as much as Ludi but I am soaked in sweat as well. I wipe away the sweat from my forehead and head to the bath. Then the moment I entered the dressing room, the bathroom door opened at the same time. The hot air and steamy water touched my face. Inside the fog-like steam, a woman with blond hair and pointy ears is standing. This body...;. Yup, it is definitely Ludi’s. “...;...;...;...;...;..” “...;...;...;...;...;..” In silence. Ludi is petrified while gazing my way. [TeHe], will she forgive me if I did something cute like that? No, I will just pour oil over the fire. “...;...;...;...;...;..” “...;...;...;...;..KYaaaaaaaaaaaaaAA!” It was a strange feeling. How should I put it, the feeling like I am an almighty being? It feels like everything beside me is moving in slow motion and for some reason, my thoughts alone are moving at high speed. Aah, I can feel my body temperature rising through the blood that gathered in my head and between my legs. While she is screaming, I can see that she is gathering magic power in her hand. Her magic will surely hit me directly. However, if it is going to hit me anyway I at least want to witness her naked body as got blown away. But since the door is still open, there is too much fog and I can only see her face and feet. Is it no good? Is it useless? Can I see it or can I not. I want to see it no matter what. I prayed inside my heart. Please let me see. Did my vile prayer reach god? The steam is starting to dissipate. No, it’s not. It doesn’t dissipate but, I can see her dim silhouette. The vague silhouette is getting clearer as if I am adjusting focus on a camera. Then when I saw her body, I was stunned. To think that she is wearing a towel...;...;...; I cursed the towel in my heart. What is with the towel? (question). Why is she wearing it? (rage). Why the hell does something like a towel existed at all? (going mad). I already saw her in her birthday suit several times in 2D (some part was covered by the worst invention of the Ero-society, the [Mosaic].) I just want to see it in 3D. Why can’t I see it? I want this, I need this. I find myself staring intensely at the towel. Then the towel is getting strange. I don’t know the reason but the towel is gradually getting transparent. This is...;...;I can see it, I can see it now, that pale pink tip on her swelling chest...;...;...;!?. “What are you STARING ATTTTTTTTT!!” “HIIIII! SORRYYYYYY!!” When the ball of light slowly approaches my face, my vision turned white. ■ The skill [Super – Mind Eye] has been acquired. ____________________________ How long has it been since I have been glared at with that absolute zero gazes? Without a knock or greeting, Ludi enters my room. I hurriedly prepare a chair for her, she then sat on it with no hesitation. After that, I immediately grind my forehead and knees on the ground, but the situation still hasn’t changed. I raised my head a little and look at her. Without a single movement, Ludi keeps staring at me with half-open eyes. Her lips are tightly closed like it was glued together. Personally speaking, I desperately keep grinding my head on the floor while enduring the urge to rub my cheek against her sleek white feet that peaked from her short pants. She suddenly gets up and reaches her hand out to my face. She uses her hand to firmly grab my right cheek then using the other hand to grab the other side and pull them with all her strength. “Ouch, dat hurd.(that hurt.) Ludi let out a huge sigh then give a strong final pull. I am holding my cheeks while staring at Ludi who has her arms folded. “It can’t be helped...;...;I will forgive you. I was wearing a towel after all.” She said that with a weak smile. Sorry but actually...;...;...;...; “OOH, Thank you very much, Ludi-sama.” Of course, I can’t say it. “But, you see. I will forgive you but under one condition...;...;...;...;..I want you to grant my wish.” She said that and took her eyes away from me. “Your wish?” What wish? Is it something I can do? If it something like “become my chair” or “lick my shoes until it’s clean” then I can do it as many times as she wants though. No, that would never happen. She restlessly looks around and when her eyes met mine she immediately averts them. Moreover, her long ears are bright red. “...;..Umm, I want you to take responsibility.” Aa, responsibility, so it’s just responsibility, huh. Fufu, wait...;..responsibility? “...;...;...;...;...;...;...;...;...;...;...;..Eh?” Wait a minute. Re, responsibility!? Don’t tell me it was the one that often comes out in manga!? “It might come out a bit weird coming from me, but you see, I am a noble lady, you know? There are some things that I can’t just let people see, right?” Oi Oi, it’s a lie, right? [Noble Lady.], [The thing that can’t let people see.] and [Responsibility] just these keywords alone already smells like trouble. B, but is it really fine with her? For her to confess to me who has already given his heart away to countless Eroge heroines. Well, Ludi is among them though. “So you see...;looking at your face, you can already guess it, right? That thing I experienced once making me addicted to it. Yes, I fell in love. But since it was so embarrassing...;...;...;. I can’t tell anyone. If possible I want to feel like that again...;. every day. It is the thing my body is craving for and if this gets to my father’s ear then he will definitely stop me.” I make a serious expression while fixing my collar. I will bring out my determined face here. “Ta, Takioto Kousuke !” Ludi raise her head and grabbed my hand, her face full of determination. Her lips are trembling while exhaling her heated breath. Her blue eyes are sparkling and wet like it could break into tears at any time. She tried to open her mouth to say something but she could only bite her lip and turn her face down. Then she whispered something as if to scold herself and vigorously raise her face. Her lips are trembling and she takes a deep breath. “I, I want to eat cup ramen!” ...;...;...;...;...;...;...;...;...;...;...;.Eh? My time stopped. As a member of society, report- contact-consult(TLN: try google Horenso) is a must. When I was newly graduated I often got scolded by my boss but after I got a subordinate myself I turned to the one who does the scolding. Personally though, I think that reporting, contacting and consulting are very important in human relationships. You can solve the problem you can’t solve by yourself by consulting or reporting while contacting are the part that connects people together, it is one of the important kinds of communication. That is why it is only natural that I have to report to Mizumori-sempai that I finally acquire Mind-Eye. Since it was the thing I consulted her about, it would be rude not reporting to her. However, when I am actually telling her about it...;...;...;...;...;. “That’s great!! To think that you would be able to acquire it this fast! How did you do it!?” Seeing Mizumori-sempai who is rejoicing as if she accomplished it herself, I involuntarily avert my eyes. How did I acquire the skill you asked? I remembered myself wishing to see a beautiful girl naked. ...;...;Like hell, I could say that. If I said that I can imagine sempai’s smile that can invite the jealousy of the gods changing into a bleak demonic Noh mask. The urge to catch a glimpse of that is probably the work of my M side. -Not quite accurate but a random Cumberbatch could do no wrong right? “It’s all thank to you, sempai.” As to not let her read the emotion from my face, I immediately lower my head and fixing my expression. “Fufu, I see I see, I am happy if you say so.” Saying so, sempai told me to raise my head. “I am very grateful because you are here with me even though the school will start tomorrow. If something happened please do not hesitate to tell me. As inexperienced as I am I will do what I can to help you.” Quickly change the topic and choosing an appropriate subject to continue the conversation. I will let the story of how I got the skill slip away naturally. Sempai let out a small laugh when I said that. “It’s nothing, guiding an underclassman is an important task of a sempai right?. Moreover, you were so earnest that it made me want to help you.” “No, I am not that earnest at all...;..Ah, speaking of which, did senpai already finish your preparation for tomorrow? Isn’t the public moral committee going to be quite busy? “Haha, It’s alright. The student council might be busy preparing but the committee’s only task is to guide the new student around tomorrow. If you get lost at the school you can call out to me or the member of the committee anytime, okay?” Mission Accomplished. Now she won’t remember anything about how I got the skill. If I was asked the detail I might end up running away after all. “If the time comes I will be counting on you then. The school is quite large as well, I am getting a little nervous.” “Fufu, It was so wide that when I first enrolled there I ended up getting lost too. From what I heard there would be at least one student who got lost every year you know.” In the game, the protagonist used the transfer magic circle to move from classroom to classroom. Since that was the case I guess it would be so wide to the extent that it is quite troublesome to walk around. There are research institute, a battle arena and even magic practice hall inside the school. There is one of the sub-heroines that often got lost inside the school too. I really don’t want to end up like her. It would be nice if there is a GPS map inside the school though. “And what about you, are you ready for tomorrow?” “Of course. Though, there aren’t many things to bring along in the first place.” The necessary materials are distributed at the school, the things that I have to bring there myself are my writing instruments and my stole. Even the uniforms are already hung in the place that I can easily put on. “This year...;...;.I can look forward to a lot of things, huh.” Senpai said so while staring at my face. “I am looking forward to it too.” Sword, magic, dungeon, eroge. It is the world that boys and gentlemen alike would be getting excited for. There is no reason to not looking forward to it. “Sempai, I will get stronger quickly and catch up to you soon. Please prepare yourself for when the time comes, okay?” Senpai who keep staring at my face suddenly took her eyes off me and smile. “Since it’s you...;..you might be able to catch up with me pretty soon, though.” I reflectively shake my head. [[Sempai...;..you are still haven’t stopped growing, you know. You might not notice it yet, but little by little you are still growing stronger, you know.]] I wanted to say that to her. However, the word is stuck in my mouth. It is not something I should say at this time. After school starts, I will be able to confirm it with that person and after that, I might be able to tell her then. Two people stare at the waterfall. The water’s surface reflected the sunlight and shine dazzlingly. “Ah, come to think of it...;...;.” Sempai hit her hands together as if she just remembered something. “What is it?” “You still haven’t told me how you got Mind-Eye, right?” I stood up, turn my back around and kicked the ground with all my strength. You still remember to ask that!? Speaking of the entrance ceremony, what kind of ceremony would you imagine? For a common Japanese person, it would be the blooming of sakura as if in celebration for the freshmen. Indeed, the first thing that came up to my mind is sakura. Speaking of [[Sakura]], it is a plant that has deep ties with Japanese culture. The picture of sakura trees blooming all at once always attracted people since long ago. They even held a banquet under the sakura tree. I too like sakura. The beautiful petals that dance to the touch of the wind made us forget to blink, the fallen petals dyed the ground in sakura color and give off the haze of beauty. It might just be me but I also love gazing at the green trees The image of a lone green tree standing in a deserted place always invite the sense of nostalgia. Incidentally, the sakura that is loved by the common Japanese people is also loved by Eroge and Galge. There is a lot of games bearing [[sakura]] in its name, important events happen under the sakura tree and sometimes are even used as a heroine’s name. Sakura also appeared in Magical Explorer. The protagonist of Magiero will commute to the academy by walking from his dorm to the academy via a road that is surrounded by sakura. “Haa...;..” When I scout the way a few days ago, they were still just buds. But seem like they couldn’t bear the warmth of the past few days and started blooming. Many sakura trees planted on both sides of the road are in full bloom, I want to stop my feet and take my time appreciating it. Yes, I want to take my time, if I have time that is. “I couldn’t imagine that an event like that happened to me...;...;.” I look sideways at the sakura and proceed to the academy with quick steps. I thought I left the house with enough time to spare. On the day of the entrance ceremony Marino-san and Nee-san got some preparation to do so they left the house two hours earlier and since Ludi seem like she got a place to visit she left one hour before me. Even if you slowly walk your way toward the academy it would only take ten minutes or so I left the house with that impression. However, I can’t even see one student on the road which is the only one they have to take to commute from their dorm to the academy. Since the entrance ceremony has already begun, it would be strange instead if there is anyone present here. Well, something just can’t be helped. Would you just ignore an old man who hurt his leg and just head to the academy? “What a huge difference from the protagonist...;...;” The protagonist of [Magical Explorer] will bump into a girl(heroine) who has a slice of bread in her mouth at the entrance ceremony, laying down his foundation for his harem. Instead, I am the hero of an Ojii-chan(TLN: Grandpa). He was so grateful to me that I couldn’t feel bad about helping him though. “What time is it now?” I took out my smartphone to look at the clock and check the received message. I receive a message from Marino-san saying “I understand, take your time.” and it is accompanied by a lot of heart emoji and some illustrations that seem like modern art that try to look cute but failed miserably. Honestly speaking it was quite ugly. I then check the time and nod. “And here I am, trying to break the flag.” In Magical Explorer, the first time the protagonist met Takioto Kousuke was during the entrance ceremony. After the oversleeping protagonist met the bread girl, he picked up her handkerchief. After that, he looked at the sakura trees and remembered the girl’s panties (it was sakura color). Yes, he begins his erotic recollection there. When he returned to his senses and head toward the academy the gate was already shut tight. That’s where Takioto Kousuke appeared. They cooperate and jump over the gate but soon found by a teacher who is also a sub-heroine and got scolded. The story was supposed to flow like that. I intended to ignore that event but I never would have thought that I would be late. “Well, how should I put this. Is this some kind of fate?...; Rather, why does using the word man and fate together made it sound like THAT?” I muttered, at the end of my line of sight a male student is at a loss. In front of the academy gate, he has his arms folded, a black-haired man with neither a handsome or ugly face. He is wearing the academy uniform and carrying a bag with the academy emblem on it. That plainness, That guy is the protagonist without a doubt. Giving up, I walked over to him and intentionally let out a big sigh. “Aa~aa, it closed already.” I muttered it like a monologue while looking at the gate and sigh. “Yo, are you a freshman too?” The protagonist looks at me with a half-opened mouth. Well, I understand his feelings. He should have already noticed from my word that I am also a freshman, but he must be confused about how I dressed despite being one. Even though I am a new student my shirt was unbuttoned, with a cardigan(My favorite) on top, loosened neckties with the tie pin sticking out of my pocket and a long stole wrapped around my neck. Comparing to me he would look like an honor student. By the way, the game’s Takioto Kousuke also gave off the same kind of feeling but instead of a cardigan, he would wear a paka and muffler instead. (What is with this frivolous man...;?) Is probably what he is thinking right now. Well, I think so too. “A, Ah, yeah.” I nodded to him as he said that and show him the tie pin as its color is different for each school year. “As you can see, I am a freshman as well.” I said that in case he doesn’t notice it. “Ehhh” He let out the voice in confusion. I ended up laughing at him. If he was a cute girl then I might fawn over him but I have no eye to spare for a charmless man. Now then, what should I do? Since I’ve come this far, let’s just go with the original scenario. Just jump over the gate and got scolded, I don’t really hate that aromatherapy-sensei (sub-heroine) after all. If that’s the case then let’s do that first. I want to at least try saying it once. It’s a shame since it’s the same line Takioto Kousuke used in the game but I will concede this time since it’s cool. I give him a wide smile and a big thumbs up. “I still haven’t given my name yet, right?” I slowly turn the thumb toward myself while putting the other hand at my waist and puff my chest out. Now let me say it, the declaration of war. “The name is Takioto Kousuke, the man who will become this academy’s strongest.” — When you mention an entrance ceremony, it is almost the quietest day for the students. There are a lot of reasons for that. People you don’t know, the nervousness from coming to an unknown place, the anxiety of whether you can make new friends. Of course, It was the same for me back when I was in Japan. I keep to myself and I have no idea which place I am allowed to be, I even remembered doing a lot of exploring at that time. Obviously, my classmates are also the same, I can still recall the day that quietly gone by. I thought today would go on like that, if not for Mr.protagonist [[Hijiri Iori]]. I didn’t touch the door’s handle. instead, I touched the magic circle on the side. When I do, the magic circle shone a little and the door slides open. What first appears before my eyes are the teacher, along with the gaze from the entire classroom. “Sorry, I’m late.” When I said so, the teacher who is standing at the desk in front signals us to the empty seat. “I heard it, Takioto-kun and Hijiri-kun, right? Take your seats.” Apparently, the seats were arranged by the name order. I noticed Ludi when I was heading to my seat. She was moving her mouth, she seems to be saying “Why are you arriving so late” or something like that. Guess I should have sent her a message, huh. The moment I sat down, I tried to call out to the mob that caught my eyes but I heard a loud voice from behind me. “AAAhh, it’s the pervert from that time.” “Ah, you’re the one from this morning.” A red-haired woman and the protagonist, Hijiri Iori is pointing at each other. Seem like the encounter event this morning properly happened. Incidentally, The way that you can tell the main character that appeared in the story and the background character AKA mobs apart is very simple. You can just look at their appearance. The mobs are dressed properly according to the academy’s rules (The protagonist is an exception) but the characters that will get involved in the story will have some characteristic added to how they’re dressed (There are some exceptions too.) For example, Takioto Kousuke the joke character (His inside is a miserable mess though) has frivolous fashion sense. Her Highness Ludivine Marie Ange de la Trefle, second daughter to the emperor of Trefle empire plus a beautiful elf, her uniform will always have some parts that are green and she will wear a green accessory at all time. Now then, how about the girl who is arguing with our protagonist? Wearing a white shirt she has bright red hair and a pair of beautiful eyes that shone like red jewel with a pair of earrings adorned with red gems. Just by looking at her appearance it is totally oblivious that she is one of the main characters. “Even though I put 3 times the butter on that bread, why did you have to bump into me!?” “No no, aren’t you the one who ran into me!!” The girl who is enraged by some weird reason and Iori who couldn’t insert the retort. Normally just adding 3 times the butter on her bread is already worthy of retorting, right? Since I might accidentally enter their world I will stop thinking about it. Of course, to me who have already completed the game countless times, she is no stranger to me. She was a member of a rare species, a girl that runs while having a slice of bread in her mouth. She is the beautiful girl who dropped her bread when she ran and clashed with Iori. Furthermore, she landed her butt on Iori’s face when they clashed. She is a girl that such an accident(?) or tragedy(?) often happened to her. Well, of course, it was an accident(Which happen very often in an Eroge). Yes, the main heroine that has been arguing with Iori, Katou Rina (Katrina) is a heroine that can rage at the strangest thing. “Moreover...;...;. Y, you sniffed it, right!? You damn pervert!!” “ Ititit ‘s a misunderstanding, I didn’t sniff it at all.” If it was the same as the game then he is currently lying. He earnestly sniffed at that time. I remembered he recalled the smell to be...;a mixture of citrus and butter. His impression was so lasting that the gentlemen(Eroge Player) referred to her, not by name, but called her Citrus Butter instead. But although it is limited to only a few players, me included, referred to her as Katrina. “BE QUIET!!” The noise finally died down after the teacher intervene. Careful not to get notice I call out to the mob that is sitting behind me. “Hey, did the introduction session already over?” Seem like it is not over yet. I have a light talk with Max-kun who is sitting nearby and getting to know the pink-haired Juliana-san and the girl with chestnut hair Nicoletta-san. For some unknown reason, it seems like they don’t really want to be friends with me though. After the homeroom and the simple introduction session was over, we have a new seat arrangement. The reason was to aid the students who have poor eyesight. Interestingly, the freshmen are full of motivation and most of them are full of hope for their future. The teacher made a separate lottery for the front row and back row. I who don’t really particular about my seat so I choose to draw from the unpopular back row lottery. It seems like both Iori and Ludi were the same. The seat I got from the lottery is also interesting because it was the exact same seat Takioto got in the game. It is the gold spot where you can sleep freely without getting caught, the furthest back seat by the window now belongs to me...;...;Nope. that was the protagonist’s seat so Iori got that one, I got the one in front of his instead. Again, the person who is sitting beside Iori was the same person from the game. “Wha...;.!?” “Eh...;...;..!?” Iori met eyes with the bread girl, Ms.main heroine AKA Katrina. They both avert their eyes and head to their seats at the same time, even the way they sit down was in sync so I burst out laughing but since Katrina stared daggers at me, I folded. I thought that there was some correction force at work since everyone got into the same seat as they’re in the game but that doesn’t seem to be the case. “Ara, Good day.” “Good day, Ludi.” When the elf which I have been accustomed to seeing every day sitting in front of me, we exchange the greeting uninterestedly. It is the second time in my life I used “good day” (TLN:Gokigenyou). Yesterday she said something like putting on some appearance at the academy during the dinner. Seem like she is serious about it. According to the game, Ludi is very harsh when it comes to dealing with men. But since the incident that should be the cause of all that was already resolved, I’m not sure why she still does that...;. Well, let’s try asking her later. “Good day, I will be in your care.” Ludi greeted the mob girl who is seated beside her with a smile. Taking hit by Ludi’s angelic smile, the male mob in front of her arch his head back like he got hit in the head with a kendo’s sword. Seeing how much that mob is into her with his greeting, I remembered something from the game. Since she enters the academy later than the other, the seat she got in the game has to be added and she ended up sitting behind the protagonist. “To think that Ludi would end up sitting in front of me, huh...;...;.” When I muttered so, Ludi somehow heard it and facing me with a smile. Her eyes are not smiling though. “Ara, do you have some dissatisfaction with that?” I shake my head. “Nah. Rather, it was exactly what I wished for. To be able to look at the beautiful face of your Highness Ludi while receiving your wise tutelage and above all...;...;..” I lean in and whisper into her ear. “It’s convenient to invite you for ramen on the way home, right?” Of course, I made sure to not let the other hear me. It is not really a thing to be embarrassed about, but since she does seem to mind it I will be careful here. “...;..Idiot.” (TLN: Baka) She muttered with a voice so small it sounded like she just exhaling. I was a little surprised by her reaction. To be honest I thought she would say something like “Ha? What are you talking about.” with a classy manner while staring at me with her absolute zero gazes. And here I was already prepared myself to say “Thank you ma’am.” when that happened. I don’t know how to respond to her so I was being a little awkward but fortunately, a helping hand appears from an unexpected place. “Good, everyone properly got to their seat, right.” Sensei’s voice gathered everyone’s attention, seem like the next thing on the itinerary will be a campus tour, huh. After completing the entrance ceremony, campus tours and classes overview, the first day of school comes to an end. Well, I guess this is normal for the first day. Seem like I don’t really have to worry about getting lost here too. Students will be moving around the campus via the use of transfer magic circles so the possibility of getting lost is low unless you wander into some restricted area. Though, being the protagonist that he is, Iori will have to get lost once in a while in order to meet the heroines. Rather, since I have a heroine that I want to cheer for no matter what, I will have him lost his way a little here. Well, there’s a thing I found out by talking with a lot of people. It seems like I exude the hard to approach air around me. Apparently, my appearance and mannerism are a little too liberal. “Then c’ya later, Nicoletta-san, Max-kun, Juliana-san.” I have become able to talk normally with Nicoletta-san and Max-kun but seem like Juliana-san is still being reserved around me. Well, according to my Japanese person experience she will warm up to me if I talk to her a little more. In case of a hesitant person like Juliana-san once we can be comfortable around each other I think we will be able to develop a deep relationship with each other. This is the world of Magiero though, so I don’t know whether this will work out or not. After I said my farewell, I join up with Ludi at the sakura road which is the hotspot for events to happen. “Isn’t this just the first day...;.. Aren’t you too fast to get along with other people?” I don’t know if it is because there’s no one else besides Claris-san who come to pick us up but Ludi already dropped her act. I don’t know whether she is praising me, sulking or just being envious so I reply with some vague answer. “It’s still only on the greeting phase, I do want to get along with them better. Well, for now, my goal is to get all the contact information of everyone in the class.” It would be convenient to have their contact info when something happens. When there’s a school festival I would end up being nominated as the staff though, it could be used to easily contact everyone after all. No, since there is a function for group message I should create a message group for our class...;...; Nah, there will always be someone who absolutely does not want to tell me their contact info, should I settle for a bulletin board instead then? “It looks difficult to me, you know...;...;I wonder if I can someone I can trust...;...;” Ludi looked timid...;.. Come to think of it, her trust was betrayed by that elf guy(Forgot his name) from before. “Hey hey, I trust you, you know Ludi.” “I know that ...;I trust you too. I’m talking about other people besides you.” Hmm, then should I get cozy with other trustworthy heroine and introduce them to her?. No, if memory serves me right, although limited to female students, Ludi would still be able to make friends. Moreover, besides the first year students, she already met Mizumori-sempai too. At present, the number of trustworthy people around her is not zero. When we arrive at the house, we were greeted by the maids(Elf girl) Ludi brought along. It seems like Marino-san and Nee-san still have some work to do at the academy. I change into an easy to move in clothes and prepare the stuff for tomorrow. When I gaze at the clear sky from the window, I felt it would be a waste to not go out so I leave the house a little earlier than planned. I climb up the steep slope and run to the back of the waterfall. Sempai was not there. I turn my back and head toward the running course. How much have I run I wonder? I started to get tired so I was thinking about heading back to train at the waterfall, then I saw sempai doing practice swing for her naginata. In order not to get into her way I move a little away and start training my third and fourth hands. “How was your first day?” After we finished our training, sempai called out to me when we sat down on the stole bench while she brushes the hair that stuck to her skin and wipes off her sweat with the towel. “Well...;...;I ended up late.” “Oi oi, did you sleep in?” “No no, I was stuck helping people. If there is a troubled person in front of you, sempai would help too, right.” If it’s a girl then I would be even more eager to help but unfortunately, it was an old man this time. Sempai put her hand under her chin and nod “That’s not necessarily true though.” “You will definitely help, sempai. You already helped me a lot, right?” Sempai’s sense of justice is considered high even among the heroines of Magiero. She is a splendid knight(heroine) no matter how you look at her. “But I was really surprised, doesn’t the academy has too many facilities?” First Magic Practice Hall, Second Magic Practice Hall, Third Magic Practice Hall, First Gymnasium, Second Gymnasium, First Martial Art Stadium, Second Martial Art Stadium, Third Martial Art Stadium and an Amphitheatre that can accommodate the entire student of the academy. Furthermore, there are three academy featured dungeons and countless research facilities which not only for the students but also a lot of researchers as well. “Well, even if you are already graduated you can still visit the research rooms and the dungeons via transfer magic circle. There are a lot of people who come and go to the academy after all. Depending on the program I might have to come back to the academy after my graduation too.” Sempai laughed as she said that it is less likely for her not to come here. This place is certainly wonderful after all. “I see...;. Speaking of graduation, How about your dungeon capture, sempai?” “Ah, at this pace, I should be able to dive into the dungeon that grants the graduation qualification soon. But to beat the record for the fastest clearing might be too hard for me.” “Yes, since that record will be mine after all.” Sempai laughs while wiping her sweat. “You sure say it now, huh. If you said that much I will have to place some expectation on you then.” She said so and slapped my back. Seem like she doesn’t take my word for real. Well, I wasn’t joking though. — Magic Academy’s classes when compared to normal schools are a little special. In the morning we take essential subjects like general education and in the afternoon we can take optional classes like an applied magic lesson. Surprisingly, both the essential subjects and practical lessons are not the only requirements for advancing the school year or graduation. Instead, you can drop the classes and graduate by acquiring the dungeon credits. On the contrary, you can also graduate by dropping the dungeon credits and focus on the classes as well. “It is not good for you to neglect the essential classes. Why? Because earning dungeon credit will not be easy.” The teacher said so and write the number 60 on the whiteboard. “The 60th floor of Tsukuyomi academy dungeon, this is the floor that you have to aim for in order to graduate.” In the game, capturing the 60th floor is the requirement to avoid the bad end. You will enter the bad end for sure if you can’t capture it by your third year. No matter how well you get along with the heroines you will end up working alone at the frontier, a lonely ending for your story. Well, there is an ending where the protagonist joins hand with the demon which you can get without capturing the 60th floor though. If Iori ever goes into that direction I will use all my power to stop him. “Only 50 percent of the students are able to capture the 60th floor by their third year, in other words only half of the students are able to graduate using dungeon credit.” So, how much time should I take to capture the 60th floor? In the game, if it is your first run the normal speed to capture that floor is around the second year or the end of the first year at the earliest. If it is your second run, you can capture it the same day you enter the dungeon though. To surpass the protagonist, my goal is to capture it within my first year. “Those of you who aim to be a researcher wouldn’t have to capture the 60th floor but I think you should still aim for it. There will be a lot of things you can learn by going in there.” The teacher said so and put down his pen sweeping his gaze around at the students. “Well, in short, both ways are applicable but the ideal is to have a passing score in both fields. It will help you get a job after all. Ah, for those who aim to join the magic knight order, having good grades in both fields is a must. Be sure to take note of that.” I lean against the wall(window) while taking a peek at Iori. It is the same old boring face of an eroge protagonist. He earnestly listened to the teacher so much that he doesn’t notice my gaze. The reason why he is listening so seriously right now is probably the same as the game. He was saved by a certain magic knight when he was a child so he looks up to them and even his reason for entering the academy was to become one. When there’s a talk about the knight order he will always listen to it seriously. Well, if there’s a talk about eroge I would listen seriously too. “Well then, for those who want to enter this dungeon, you will have to enter the beginner dungeon which is managed by the academy first.” The beginner dungeon has eleven floors. If you capture it normally you will only be able to advance up to the 10th floor but if the conditions are met the path to the 11th floor will open. “The dungeon will be available in five days, we will tell you more details at that time. For now, use this period to thoroughly prepare yourselves. “ Speaking of which, how will this world treat the existence of extra floors or hidden dungeon? Do people just announce the clearing condition or are they keeping it a secret? Is it possible that no one knows about them at all? A little research might be necessary. While I was deep in thought the bell chime signaling the end of the class. The only class left for today is the physical fitness measurement, it is a very very important scene in the game. “What are you doing looking so serious?” Iori calls out to me while staring at my face. “Nothing, I was just thinking about something.” “Let’s go then.” Iori said, pointing at the door. I get up from my seat and head toward him. Now, what should I do? Speaking of fitness measurement, in the game, it is an opportunity you can witness the heroines(plus the mobs) in their underwear from the third person point of view (God POV) and get the CG(Illustration). If I can, I want to get one...;...;. No, I want to burn it into my own eyes. Then, isn’t there any way I can get a peek inside that changing room? Can I pretend to coincidentally enter the room? No, that’s too difficult. Should I get in by using some kind of magic? I don’t remember such convenient magic though. Damn it, I should learn some illusion magic for a situation like this. “Ugh...;.I can’t remain like this.” “?” A question mark appears on his head. I stare blankly like an abandoned cat (One of the heroine’s moves) at Iori. “Hey Iori, what kind of girl do you like?” “Eh, what are you saying all of the sudden.” “Well, it’s a fitness measurement, right? You can see the girl’s unde–Ahem You can see their athletic abilities, right? Wouldn’t you want to look at the girl you like?” “Eh, don’t you have to think about getting a good result yourselves before that?” SO EARNEST!! Wouldn’t you normally worry about the girl first (I’m joking.) “No no, there are a lot of cute girls in our class, right? The class rep for example, even Ludi is cute too.” There’re both main and sub heroines in the class along with characters that can join the party. I am interested in which of these people is on his mind. “Yeah, th, they’re certainly cute.” Iori turned a little shade of red when he muttered so. “RIGHT? If you have any girl you like just tell me, okay? I can tell you their blood-type, favorite food, hobbies to their three-sizes.” “Th, THREE SIZESS!?” The color in his eyes change and shouted with a loud voice. “Tsk, you idiot, your voice is too loud.” Iori flutteringly covers his mouth with both hands. Good thing that there’s no girl around. I don’t mind being stared at by men after all. “Of course I won’t tell you for free, all I need is a little compensation.” Saying so, I made a circle with my right hand. “You are charging money?” “Well, the price will depend on the importance of the information. You can find out their favorite food just by doing a little investigation after all. Some juices or lunch coupons will be enough for that. I could tell you their blood-type for free though. I will have you pay for the information that I have to risk my neck to get them and I won’t be selling you any of their personal information though.” As a matter of fact, the game’s Takioto Kousuke did something similar. I can pay him with magic stone or money to get information about the heroines but it is not really useful since you can just save and load when you made a wrong choice after all. “M, Money..” Somehow Iori is looking depressed. Come to think of it, the protagonist hasn’t got much-starting money, huh. He will be loaded by the end game and the second playthrough though. On the contrary, on the third run, you will start running out of things to buy and by the fourth run, your money will just stay rotten inside your inventory. “Well, I can give you a friendly discount for the first time though. How about one lunch coupon for a piece of information sound?” We continue our meaningless banter while changing our clothes. After that, we just head to the test venue for our fitness test. Regrettably, I couldn’t collect any CG today. In Magical Explorer, Takioto Kousuke is considered a poor student. It was not because he can’t use long-range magic despite possessing a large amount of magic power. There is a troupe you often see in a light novel setting such as “This damn second rate can’t even use basic magic” but that is not the case here. This world recognizes the thing that should be recognized. For example, if you can’t use magic but instead you can invent magic tools you could still get invited to teach at the Magic Academy. Then why did people treated him like a second rate? That is simply because he was a muscle brain (Even his brain is made of muscle) and even his academic ability was poor. Also beside muscle, his brain is filled with erotic stuff (His brain was made up of Ero). Seem like I have the quality to become like that too. Not that I am against the Ero part though. “Shit, this doesn’t make any sense.” Basic arithmetic and language are pretty much the same as Japan so I am not worried but in terms of magic knowledge and history, rather than middle school level, I am at the level of elementary school students. On some subjects, I might even be worse off than them. “What’s wrong?” Ludi called out from the seat in front of me. Originally she should use some uncomfortable noble’s polite tone but...;...;recently it seems like she can talks with her informal tone a lot. She still uses the polite tone against other people besides me though. “It’s nothing, I’m just shocked by my own lack of academic ability.” Actually, I’m especially bad in history class. What’s wrong with it you asked? Over half of the commanders in the warring period turned out to be female. It’s like I wandered off into a world of smartphone games. Rather, this eroge world keeps getting more and more confusing every day. “Heee.” She said while smiling at me. I don’t know what she is thinking but it is certainly nothing good. I might not be able to avoid that but I still have a hand to play. “Well, I got Nee-san so it should work out in the end, probably.” Since I have a teacher at home, I have to enjoy her service to the fullest. I believe with all my heart that Nee-san will help me out. Come to think of it...;...;. I gaze at our protagonist and main heroine, Iori and Katrina (Katou Rina). Iori met my eyes and say “hmm, what’s wrong.” Seem like this guy has no problem studying. From the game setting, he has an average academic ability so he doesn’t have any particular problem with studying. But Katrina on the other hand. I remember seeing her staring at a formula like a snake stare down a frog in the game. “Iori, seems like you are not my true comrade, huh.” “Eh, what with you all of the sudden.” “My true soul friend is Katrina over here.” “Haa...;.?” Replied, Katrina like half her soul already left her body. “Katrina...;.. Well, that’s fine. Anyway, what with this soul friend business about?” So she is okay with being called Katrina...; since I have been unconsciously called her that, I will appreciate her permission. “If we fail, we fail together you know!” I shook her shoulder while saying so. “Wha...;I won’t. I was just only a little bad at studying.” Her voice getting smaller with each sentence. Moreover, putting it as just a little bad is quite optimistic of her. “Fret not, for we have our savior.” “Hey you,...;...;. Takioto Kousuke, right? You didn’t listen to a word I say at all, right?” I turn around and lightly poke Ludi’s back. “We can just ask Ludivine-san here to teach us. Rest assured, her brain is made up different than ours!! Now our grade is in safe hands.” “As I thought, you didn’t listen to me at all. You have been casually treating me like I am an idiot for a while now you know.” “It seems you already decided on your own that I will help you study, huh. Well, I don’t mind teaching Katrina-san though...;..” So you won’t teach me? Well, it’s fine since I don’t really mind from the start. My real objective here is to have Ludi and Katrina get along after all. These two, along with another sub-heroine can trigger an event that will be convenient for Iori in the future, that event will trouble me in a lot of ways though. Though, I expected that they might not get along so easily because I kinda force them together but on the contrary, it seems they have moved on from having an awkward conversation to having a friendly chat with each other. The reason might be because Katrina is an honest person and is very easy to talk to. To be honest, I had a lot of fun talking to her. She does retort to every joke I shot her way after all. However though, even if they’re chatting so friendlily, Ludi is still using her polite language like an Ojou-sama (TLN: Lady). I hope there will be a day when she can chat casually with her friend. All that left is...;...;...;...; I move my eyes toward Iori. “Hmm?” He gave me a rather cute reaction and continue to pack his stuff to move to the next classroom. Even though he is the protagonist of an eroge, he is so unreliable. Who would have thought that a boring guy like him would be an eroge protagonist? Well, let’s have him meet some suitable strong guy. He can probably get stronger faster than I can even notice. — To this academy, magic skills are apparently those that can be applied in combat. At first, I got the impression that it would be like ‘Let’s try using magic like how they do in the light novel.’ but it seems like that subject will be included in a different class. “What’s wrong, Iori? Looking around like that.” I follow his gaze and look around. At the first magic practice hall, students are holding their weapons and casually chatting. Let’s see who Iori is looking at. Among the students that he’s looking at, the sub-heroine class rep is there. I see, so Iori is properly acting like an eroge protagonist, huh. “Aha, I see. You took a liking to the class rep right?” “WHA.. IT’s..IT’S NOT LIKE THAT!!” Reacting to Iori’s voice, people are turning their heads to look at him. The class rep is among them too. “Idiot, you are too loud. Come here for a bit.” To my beckoning, Iori walks over toward me while looking at my face. “You are curious about class rep, Higurashi Kaede-chan, right? Well, you have good eyes. If you put her into the ranking then she is a solid B+, you know.” “Class rep...; she is? More importantly what is with the ranking.” Class rep is the class rep, right? I don’t know what’s wrong with calling her that but every player called her like that. About the ranking, to be honest I’m not quite sure either. It’s the thing that Takioto Kousuke created in the game. Seem like it is just his score based on his perspective. Of course, his bias is mixed into the rating as well. “She’s a super straight-laced person alright? It seems her family is not really doing well right now, I heard she has to look after the house and her little sister by herself.” Class rep’s family only consists of her father and little sister. It seems her mother died before her sister can even aware of her surroundings. Looking at her father who has to work busily every day, she felt that she has to do something. After that, she took care of her household chores and little sister. And since she always looking after her sister she is good at taking care of her classmates. If I have to point out her flaws then it would be her natural airheadedness. In the game, she once goes on a date with Iori while wearing a mismatched pair of socks (Iori seems to think that she was just wearing it to be fashionable though). Well, for the detailed story I will let him hear it from her once they’re close enough to each other. “As her look suggested, her hobby is reading. Oh, she also likes children ...;.. Anyway, be sure to give me the lunch coupon after this okay?” “G, Got it.” While saying so, he sent a heated gaze toward class rep. Then suddenly he called out to me. “Ah, come to think of it the school has only started for a week right?...;...;. Where did you get that kind of information from?” For now, I laugh it off and say. “Well, that’s a trade secret. If you want to know more then prepare me some lunch coupon or just get along with her directly, okay?” Of course, I got all the information from Magiero. This kind of simple information is nothing to a walking eroge database like me. If I have to display my skill then he can even make a pass on a foreign Blond Nee-san too. No, considering the spec that might be a bit too much for him, huh. Well, let’s leave it at that. I already introduced him to class rep. From now on I will just have to lightly introduce more heroines to him. “Now then, since it has already come to this I will introduce you to the high-ranking girl in our class, alright?” First, I move my line of sight toward Katrina, Iori followed my gaze. “Okay, next is Katrina.” When he sees her, his mood gone a little sore. Personally, I think Iori will stick with Katrina for a long time. If there’s nothing wrong then you will certainly be able to capture Katrina. Rather, if you do not enter a special route then it is impossible to not capture her. She was called the easy heroine/easy mob after all. Incidentally, I started calling her an easy mob when I watch the anime adaptation of Magiero. She was with the protagonist until mid-season but suddenly the protagonist enters the good ending route for student council president. Honestly, I felt a bit sorry for her. “Hey hey, don’t make that kind of face. She’s athletic, easy to talk with and totally cute, right? People are aiming for her both from our and the other classes, you know? You guys also think so too, right?” I kinda forced it here so the guys I called out to was a bit surprised. “Well, she is certainly cute.” The guy with orange hair said. He’s not wearing a white shirt but an orange one instead. There is also a pendant with a magic stone hanging around his neck. “Umm, well...;. you see, I think she is cute too but...;...;I’m more interested in the elf standing next to her.” The other guy added while pushing up his glasses. His hair is deep blue with long bangs that covers his eyes, I wonder if can he really see through that. Rather it was like he is wearing his glasses on top of his bangs, he also wore a blue cardigan under his jacket. “Yeah? I thought the red-haired one is better though. I won’t complain if she looked a little more like a milf though.” “Man, I know you for a long time but I still don’t get your preference. For me...;. I like a woman that gives a calm feeling, you know. Someone like Ludivine-san, you see?. You think so too right, Hijiri-kun?” The bangs guy asked Iori. “Yeah, I think she is very cute.” “Haha, aiming for the unattainable, are we? Are you guys really going to set your eyes on the second princess of the Trefle empire?” Hearing what I said, the orange guy and Iori jumped in surprise. “...;..So that was the case after all.” So the only one who knew was bangs huh. Really, shouldn’t a person from this world normally know this? Well, some people were surprised by her status in the game after all...;. Well, who cares. “An elf with Trefle as her surname Isn’t that already give it away? Ludi is properly an Ojou-sama alright. Blessed with intelligence and beauty along with her majestic atmosphere. She got everything from intellect, magic prowess, charm, asset, wealth and status. Truly, she is the S+ class beauty. While I was narrating her spec, Ludi sneezed. “Though Katou Rina(Katrina) loses to her in terms of wealth, power and intellect, her magic power and beauty are top class even within the entire academy. Moreover, different from Ludi she is easier to talk to, that’s why she gained quite a popularity you know?. If Ludi is the high-class noble lady then Katrina is like the class’s idol, alright? So the final rating for her is around A+.” Another sad thing about her is that her chest is also A+ though...;. Katrina-san why are you looking this way? She doesn’t hear what we were saying right? RIGHT? Thinking so, Katrina and her group are making their way toward us. Iori is already preparing to run away but orange and bang are still clueless about the approaching disaster. — “I felt something unpleasant here, what were you guys talking about?” “Nothing, we were just talking about how there are so many beauties in our class.” I tried to answer her naturally. “Is that so, I kinda got a bad vibe from you though, yeah definitely you.” You don’t have to say it twice...; I was just thinking about your washing board. Perhaps she’s conscious about this? “There it is again...;. Where are you looking at!?” Thinking about it, the same thing happened in the game right? After this Takioto Kousuke will blurt out his thoughts and got beaten to a pulp by her in the mock battle. When I was thinking about that, Katrina approached me with a smile. She gripped hard on my shoulders. “Hmm, if you have something to say then say it.” “Ouch, Ouchhh.” If it’s the game then Takioto Kousuke might already spill it but I am not an idiot. Saying that to her would be rude right? Who would honestly say something like that to her face when we just recently met. Moreover, I have already experienced working as a member of society, I can read the mood, okay? Understanding what people are thinking is like eating breakfast for me. In the first place if you work in a company and can’t even work with people’s moods then aren’t you already a liability to your company? “I see.” Katrina let go and laugh. “Sorry, seem like I was a little paranoid.” I smiled while fixing my collar. “It’s okay, don’t worry about it.” So easy, as expected of the easy mob. Leave it to me, the gentleman(eroge player) to choose the best option to avoid such an unnecessary event. Even if it is the event I encounter for the first time I still can perfectly evade it. Wahahahahaha When I was laughing in my mind, Katrina suddenly rolled her shoulders. “Aah, It’s such a pain...;. My chest is so big it made my shoulder stiff.” I involuntarily shifted my gaze. “Pfft, Nice joke!! There’s nothing there right!” When my sanity returned, it was already too late. I can feel her anger...;.. No, that’s her killing intent coiling around me. “...;...;..Shit, It’s a trap.” Her joke was so funny I ended up retorting. “Trap, my ass. I know TOOOOO well what you were thinking. Hey, you ready to say your last prayer yet?” Should I run or should I use Iori as a shield? When I was hesitating, the teacher enters the room. “We are starting.” Oh, are you my messiah? A hand grabbed my shoulder. Slender fingers and well-polished nails, it’s clearly her hand. But this time she didn’t put any strength into it. Instead, she channeled it with magic power. My cold sweat is pouring “Takioto, you know what a mock battle is?...;...;.you understand what I mean right?” No, I do not. Ludi who was beside her is glancing at me but I have to walk away with Katrina while the others guys can do nothing but watch. Iori, orange and bangs can’t move from their spot. Seem like I was not the only one who received her killing intent. “So it is really a washing board, huh.” The other guys didn’t open their mouths. She got a hell of an ear after all. Ah, it’s alright, the word washing board is already written all over your face. “G, Good luck.” Iori said with a look of pity. ——————————————– Katrina, one of the main heroines is a close-range fighter. She is a character that has a good attack power, good defense and decent evasion, a balance type character that even a beginner can use well. She also excels at learning new magics and skills, she is viable for every fight from the first boss to the last and even hidden boss in append disc. She still needs other characters to follow up for her in case of a bad match up though. “You ready?” Now then, even if she’s a powerful character it doesn’t mean that she is strong from the start. Because she is one of the first characters to join the party (she will join after the first 2 – 3 dialogue choices), her starting stats are low. To me who can already control my stole to a certain extent, I can’t imagine myself losing to her. In the first place considering my battling style she already looks like a sitting duck to me. I even know of her every moves so there’s no way I could lose. “Oh, gimme a minute.” Saying so I started considering which weapon I will be using. Sword, spear, cudgel...;.. Well, I haven’t been focusing on weapon training so it wouldn’t make any difference though. Come to think of it, I have been doing nothing but stole training huh. Let’s just choose the cudgel since it seems somehow useable just by swinging it around. There’s a proper way to use it though. I let Katrina know that I’m ready. Seem like she picked a sword huh. Well, It’s her specialty so I kinda already expected it. Now, let’s discuss the main question. Is there any meaning for me to win here? In the game, Takioto Kousuke had a mock battle against her. I don’t really care about this part because after I lost to her Iori the protagonist will come up against her next and win. She will then develop a one-sided rivalry with him and they will gradually grow closer to each other. The protagonist will grow stronger from the experience and it is one of the events to capture Katrina, I can’t afford to win here. Moreover, Katrina is one of my favorite characters, I want her to find happiness with the protagonist. Thus, I will seal my stole for this fight. I don’t know how to use cudgel(the same applied to both sword and spear) so I will probably lose immediately because of my weird habit to use my stole in battle huh. I took off my stole and approach her. Ludi seems like she wants to complain about something with her eyes but I will pretend not to see that. I firmly grasped the cudgel and stare at Katrina. I even couldn’t call what happened next a public execution. When I opened my eyes, Ludi is in front of me. Her face is an odd mixture of emotions. She looked worried, surprised and a little angry...;...; I can’t really tell. “Unfamiliar ceiling.” I have wanted to try saying it once. “Are you awake? Are you okay?” “I’m fine. Sorry, it seems like I made you worried.” “Worried huh...;.. I was surprised actually. Why did you remove your stole? Isn’t that your lifeline? You even got beaten up so badly. You are accustomed to using your stole to defend right? Your physical enhancement was also done poorly, your movement was all sluggish.” It was exactly what she said. I lost because I didn’t use my stole. I was able to track her movement with mind eye, my body was also ready to react but since I usually defend using the stole, my movement ended up becoming awkward. From my opponent’s perspective, it would look like I am completely defenseless. “I have no excuse.” “I know that you would be able to guard against her attack if you have your stole but In the end, it is just a what-if scenario right?.” I involuntarily smiled, even Takioto Kousuke from the game wouldn’t lose so badly to the extent that he would get knocked out like me. “What happened after that?” “Since you passed out like that everyone is worried you know? Especially Rina-san, she is quite flustered about this.” Ehh, then the event after that didn’t progress accordingly? My lost is meaningless then. “Umm, what happened to the mock battles after that? Especially Katrina’s battle.” “After you, Rina-san fought with Iori-kun but it’s Iori-kun’s win. It might be because of her previous battle against you but her movement was a bit sluggish in that match.” So it at least progressed like Magiero’s scenario huh. My guilt is terrible though. At least if I didn’t get knocked out I would feel a little better. On top of that, I couldn’t even get to hear her frustratingly say [D, don’t think you have won with this!]. My lost was certainly unnecessary. Moreover, since I got beaten black and blue, it would break my heart when she comes and apologize to me and say [Sorry, I didn’t hold back, I didn’t know that you were so weak.] “Yeah, that was definitely unnecessary.” I muttered so and noticed that Ludi is staring at me. “Hey Kousuke, why did you take off your stole?” She asked a difficult question. I just did it on impulse though. “Well, you see I learn a new skill recently...; It’s an evasion type skill so I was trying to use it. I think I have been relying too much on my stole lately so I want to know how much I will be able to fight without using it.” “Hmmmm.” I thought that I came up with a good excuse but Ludi is still suspiciously staring at me. If it comes to this, I will just change the subject. “B, by the way, what time is it now?” “Mmh, the afternoon class should be started by now.” I see that’s why Ludi is the only one here. Then that means...;. “Sorry, you have to miss the class for me.” Ludi shrugged her shoulders. “Well, it’s okay. I planned to go to Hatsumi-san’s lecture today after all. I can have her teach me later. She wanted me to look after you and happily sent me off you know? She even checked the attendance for me.” Oi, is that really fine? Well, since the person with the highest authority in the academy is in my house it should be fine right? “Anyway, sorry.” “You better be. Now then...;..since made me wasted my time worrying about you, you surely do have some compensation in mind, right?” She said with her ladylike tone while smiling at me. Well, I did waste her precious time after all. “Yosh, let’s hit the ramen shop right away. I bought a guidebook for famous ramen shops around here, let’s find something nice to eat.” I buy it to raise her mood when something happened but I never thought that I would have to use it so soon. “...;...;I want something light today.” “Yeah yeah, let’s go...;.” When I was about to get out of bed, I lost my balance and fell on my back. “Kousuke!! Are you okay!?” “It’s fine I only slipped...; More importantly, you really were worried about me huh?” She anxiously looking at my face. When she looked like that I unconsciously said that to her. In the game, Takioto Kousuke is lower than an insect to her after all. Moreover, who would leave a pen on the ground like that? “Idiot...;. It’s a given right? Well...;.. Let’s go.” While receiving the sidelong glance from the students who are taking their afternoon classes, we are heading to the ramen shop. Though I don’t know whether it is because she is embarrassed or what but she is wearing a hat and sunglasses. She looked totally suspicious. Since I am here as well can you at least please act normally? — “Hmm, what you have beside your stole huh.” Mizumori-sempai is washing her sweaty hair while saying so. Wearing her light-purple practice clothes with her shoulder-length hair tied up into a ponytail. Her refreshing white nape is so tempting. It was like it can cast magic that won’t let my eyes wander off. I mean I tried but I still couldn’t look away. I want to touch it. “That’s a very hard question...;...;” “It is isn’t it.” I wonder why she still hasn’t got her own fanclub yet when she is this pretty? I can’t find it even when I asked around the entire academy. Though, I found three fanclubs that currently exist. The student council president’s guard (Fanclub) MMM, the current generation saint’s holy knight order (Also Fanclub) SSS and the newly established Ludi’s imperial guard (Again, a Fanclub) LLL. Well, I can just make her one. How about YYY as the abbreviated name. I look forward to getting membership No.Zero. “Depending on the weapon you can extend your reach and even compensate for your weakness.” “...;...;.Actually not just weapon, I think I will try to carry a shield too.” Last time my reaction was delayed because of some weird habit too. “I see, defending yourself with a shield while focusing on attacking with third and fourth hand huh. In some cases, you can even use it along with third and fourth hand to defend too. That’s like fighting against an iron wall.” Well, since he can’t equip bow or any long-range weapon in the game, having him equip four shields and tank the damage was the most popular way to use him after all. But this is not a game, there’s no such thing as equipment restriction here. It might be good to carry the bow around to cover for my weakness. “In my opinion, I will recommend using the weapon that you find easy to use.” “I see, as expected huh...;...;” “In my case, I use Katana, Naginata and I can also use a bow for a little bit. But at first, I tried a lot of weapons early on too. In the end, the one that fits me best is naginata, it is also my strongest weapon. I think it is important for you to keep your motivation and have your own specialty.” “So...;.it is good for me to experience all kinds of different weapon right?” Sempai nodded to my conclusion. “Yes, I think so. It just that...;., if you want to experience the weapon I think it would be good for you to do it until the end. Doing something half-heartedly is a waste after all.” Instead of jack of all trades, it would be better to be master of one huh. That’s certainly right. “Then I will do that...;...;...;but what weapon should I try first?” An orthodox sword? Japanese katana? A long-reaching spear? Mace? Axe? Or bow?” “I can look after you if you choose a katana or naginata, you are welcome at the dojo too if you want to learn more. Katana and naginata are wonderful weapons you know...;...;. Comparing it to another weapon it cut much better...;...;...;it is also simple to enchant it with magic so I really recommend using them. Moreover, since you can’t carry a shield while wielding a katana you have to rely on your skill to evade or defend by a paper-thin margin. But since Takioto already learned to use mind eye along with using your third and fourth hand you can cover its weakness and draw out its strength to full potential...;..HOW ABOUT IT!!?” Even if you are saying that while holding my hands...;...;...;.Sempai’s sales pitch is too heavy. Well, it’s fine I guess. I was looking for the weapon that Sempai and Claris-san can use anyway. “Yeah,...;...;...;. I think I will try using katana then.” “Well, I thought you would say something like that so I have prepared this for you!!” Saying so she pulled out a wooden practice katana from who knows where. Seriously where the hell did she pulled it out from? Even so, the happy sempai looked so cute. It breaks my heart that I have to turn her down for now. “Umm, I am very happy that you prepared all this for me but I have school after this so...;..” Sempai understandingly nodded. “I see, I want to do it after school too but I have the public moral committee duty today so...;...;.. How about we start tomorrow morning?” If it’s tomorrow morning then I won’t have any problem. “Yes, I will be in your care.” When I said that sempai clasped her hands together as if she remembered something. “Come to think of it, it seems the matter that we talked about last time is going along smoothly you know.” “Umm, which matter?” Is it the launch of her fanclub YYY? Wait a minute, I don’t remember ever asking her for permission though. It would be foolish not to huh. I wonder if she will forgive me if I take membership No.1 instead of No.Zero...;. Well, I’m sure she is not referring to this though. “It’s the beginner dungeon. It seems we were able to be in the same party, of course, Ludi is also with us.” “Hee.” I nod along. “Is it Marino-san’s work?” “Since grouping, the student for that dungeon is her work anyway. she said to leave everything to her.” Marino-san good job! Having sempai in the same party and depending on the other member, capturing the first ten floor might not be impossible anymore. “Takioto...;..you seem really happy, huh?” “But of course...;...;...;. I’m together with sempai after all.” Hearing so, sempai broke into a smile. “You said that so casually, Takioto...;...; no, it’s nothing. Let’s head to the academy.” Saying so we head back home. Thinking about it, considering that I have to head back and take a shower I will barely have time to make it to the academy. The first thing I encountered after arriving at the academy is Katrina who came to apologize to me. I said I don’t mind but...;. “Well you see, I ended up attacking you without holding back after all.” She said that while making an apologetic face but isn’t it rude for you to come and apologize to your opponent after beating him in a serious match? I will tell her that later. “That was my fault so don’t mind it, okay?” “Yes definitely. No matter how you thought, Takioto-kun is the root of all evil, right?.” Ludi followed up for me with a body blow as a bonus. Well, since I blurted out the truth about her chest, last time was certainly my fault. It just came to me but if I just joke about her chest now won’t she stop being so mindful about it? My evaluation might lower after this but it would be way better than having her make such an apologetic face. “Yeah, originally it was me who mentioned your cutting bo...;...;..Hiiiii.” I was sent flying, My body suddenly bent and now I feel what it’s like to fall from a skyscraper. “It seems my worry is lost on you...;.” “Haha, sorry sorry..!!” Yes yes, Katrina is supposed to look down on Takioto Kousuke like he is some kind of lower life form like this. Somehow I got a weird thrill from this (In a lot of ways). “Kousuke-kun...;. Are you really okay?” Iori, you are here too!! Come to think of it in the daily life part I didn’t really talk to this guy that much huh. I do get jealous when he is alone with a girl though. “I’m fine, more importantly, isn’t the first-class today held in a different classroom? Let’s go!!” To my urging, the three pick up their necessary luggage and head out. When the four of us are heading to the first class, Ludi and Katrina who are walking in front suddenly stopped. “Hmm, what is it? You are blocking me you know.” “That’s a huge crowd...;. I wonder what they are here for. Usually, there isn’t anything that can attract people here. Normally people would just go(through transfer magic circle) to their classes here after all. I make my way through the curious onlookers and found the person who is at the center of the crowd. Ah, it’s that event huh. I make my way back to Ludi through the path I made. Some students noticed Ludi, they were stunned at first but then they open a path for her. It’s more like they are taking the initiative to do so as well. I wonder if they are a member of LLL. I guide Ludi and Co to the place that can easily observe the crowd and signal them to look with my chin. The person standing there is one of the main heroines and the student council president, Monika Mercedes von Mobius with her is the chairman of the public moral committee who is also the current generation saint and one of the main heroines, Stefania Scaglione. “It’s the president and saint-sama, the two top of the three committees are here!!” “Ahh, so beautiful.” The curious students are speaking among themselves. I ask a male student nearby about what happened. “Aah, it seems some students were quarreling using magic so president and saint-sama who happened to pass by just solved the incident.” Well, there’s no mistake then. It is the event that the protagonist first encounters the Three committees and the main heroines. If I remember correctly, the protagonist is still clueless about the three committees so it would be good to introduce them, huh. Though, shouldn’t there be one more person? I can’t spot one of the popular main characters the chairman of the Ceremonial department, Lord Benito at all. Isn’t this event the one that the three of them are all gathered? I do remember him being here though. When I thought so, I saw him walking toward the scene. Besides him is a woman dressing in Japanese style clothing. As they walked toward the president the noisy students went quiet and a path split open for him as if he is Moses parting the Red sea. Though lord Benito is the president of the Ceremonial department (Ceremonial lord) but because the Japanese clothes are so unusual the vice president (Ceremonial advisor) stood out more. As expected of the woman who placed 1st – 2nd of the woman with the highest destructive power. There’s not even a trace of her uniform left anymore. “Hey, what’s happening here for both the student council president and chairman of the public moral committee to be together in such a place.” When he arrived the atmosphere changed. For the first year students they were left with a question mark but for second and third-year students their gazes are filled with anger. The male student in front of me clicked his tongue while another just called him ShittyNito(TLN: wordplay on shitty neet). While the female students are expressing their discontent to the vice president who is standing beside him. “Ara, Benito-kun.” “Hello, Benito-san.” “Did something happened? There’s such a huge crowd here.” He said so and look around. I briefly felt his gaze here but he is probably looking at Ludi. “There was a little quarrel here and they ended up fighting each other with magic, you see.” “I and Steph were happened to be here so we just solved it.” The student council president Monica said so and shrugged. “Is that so, then what about this fuss...;..” Benito look around again and smile. “It’s a waste of time right? I’m wondering why the academy hasn’t dropped those problematic and inferior students yet. They’re truly eyesores. Really, I want them to just go back to their home and never come back in my ever sight again. Wasting the time of the elites like us. Since there are so many onlookers here, I wonder how many such eyesores are there.” Hearing what he said the atmosphere around the president changed. “Ara, Benito-kun, what did you say just now? That’s some improper word you said, do you have any plan to withdraw that?” “Yes, don’t you think you said too much?” “No, don’t you think these talentless problem students should just leave the academy too? They can’t study, they can’t do magic, the problem must be how they were raised at home. They’re just ‘Incompetent’.” “Right, it is as lord Benito said. These stupid monkeys are better cut off altogether.” “Ara ara, Benito-san, Shion-san please do apologize to the students.” Looking at the saint who did say something decent a while ago I ended up laughing. Among all the characters that are gathered here aren’t you the one with the most rotten personality. Hearing that instead of shrinking, Benito ended up laughing at her. “Hahaha, HAHAHAHA, I just said the truth right?” Hearing what Benito said, the spiky hair male student look up and move face to face with Benito. [Hey, Shittynito]. He said so and start arguing with Benito. The male students around them start making noises. “Tsk, it’s frustrating but Nito’s ability is the real deal right?” “It seems all the member of the ceremonial department has already completed the first sixty floors you know.” “Seriously, even though he usually playing around like that?!” “He made people that actually put in some effort look like a fool. Is it really talent after all?” When I was listening to them, suddenly something struck my shoulder. It was Ludi who hit me. “Hey, who are those people? I recognize the student council president but who are the other two?...;. If you know what the three committees are, then tell me about them.” “What, you don’t know? Iori and Katrina too?” I tried asking but they obviously don’t know. It’s the scene where I do the explaining in the game after all. Sure enough, Iori and the others shook their heads. I make a small cough and start explaining. — “You see, in this academy, there are three organizations that held great power. People called them The Three Committees.” I said so and move my eyes toward Monika-sempai. “The first one, the student council led by Monika Mercedes von Mobius. You guys should already saw her at the entrance ceremony, yeah?” I and Iori haven’t attended the ceremony though. Well, whatever. Next, I turn my sight toward the one who wears a white robe on top of her uniform, Stefania-sempai. “Second, you have the public moral committee led by the saint, Stefania Scaglione. She is the current generation saint so there’s no need for me to explain further right?” Finally, their eyes move along with me toward the snobbish man and the woman with a Japanese dress. “Third, the ceremony department led by Benito-sempai. The woman wearing a kimono beside him is also an executive of the ceremonial department. It seems he is a noble from the principality.” “A noble huh...; I don’t know what kind of organization the ceremony department is but I certainly don’t have a good feeling about them.” Said Katrina, I nodded along with her. “Well, leaving the first impression asides. These three organizations are the ones who decide how things run around here. Moreover, you have to be a first-class magician to join them. They are the so-called elites. If you want to be a magic knight, court magician or getting a job that gives you authority, joining them is your best bet. From what I heard, you will receive higher evaluation both from the private and government sector just by being a member.” “But it won’t be easy getting in right?” “Ah, of course. Asides from being a first-class magician there might be more requirements you have to meet, there’s also the number of seats available too. For first-year students, the seats available are two for student council, three for the public moral committee, and two for the ceremonial department. There are no limits for their subordinate organizations though. The organizations that have their own subordinate organizations are only student council and public moral committee though.” In the game, in order to join these two organizations you have to raise through the ranks in their subordinate organization first. The only special one is the ceremonial department which can only be entered after your second playthrough. When I was explaining to my friends, the argument between Benito and co has turned difficult. “Oi, ShittyNito...;...;. try saying that again, I dare you.” The man glared at Benito as if he killed his parents, Benito on the other hand just let out a sigh and move his lips. “Aa, I will say it. An eyesore like you who still haven’t captured the dungeon, can’t study and go around flashing with your unsightly behavior should just pack up and leave already. This is all for your own good, Hahaha. How considerate I am!!” Said Benito. “Lord Benito, you said the truth but wouldn’t it be better if you speak with a little more subtlety?” The oriental beauty beside him reproved his words. “No, I think making myself clear here is for the best.” Seeing the two from the ceremonial department like that, the student council president let out a huge sigh. “Seems like it’s the usual ceremony department huh. Aren’t you guys lack something as a human being?” “Ara.” Hearing so, the ceremonial department’s ojou-sama muttered so and smile while making her way toward the president. Her eyes weren’t smiling though. “Hoho, should I file a no-confidence vote for you Ms.president?” “Feel free if you can, If my memory serves me right, shouldn’t that be the authority of the Ceremonial department’s head, not his advisor?” “It might not be possible with my authority but destroying your official position is still a fair play, no? If you lose your reputation, your presidency will collapse soon after.” “Hee, the person who will go down after losing their reputation...;...; I wondered who it is...;..!” Just looking at them glaring at each other already make me break into a cold sweat. They are smiling but not smiling at the same time. If this is a shonen manga then there should be a ゴゴゴゴゴゴ and a dragon or an Oni background effect behind them already. “The class will begin soon. Let’s leave it at that for today.” When I thought that there would be no end to this, a word of the saint dismantles the situation. “Hmph.” Both of them turned their faces away from each other and leave by entering a different magic circle. Seeing so, Benito said “HAHAHAHA Let’s meet again Stefania-sama” and entered a magic circle. The spiky-haired man who was arguing with Benito didn’t use the magic circle but head toward the exit instead. After the others left, the only one here is only Steph the saint. “Now, everyone has classes to attend, right? Let’s be on our way.” She told the gathered people to break up and look our way with a smile. (At Ludi probably.) She then proceeds to a magic circle and left. “Ah, those people belong to the three great fanclub...;...;” “As I thought Stefania-sama is so splendid. I think I will join the SSS later.” “I think president Monika is more wonderful. I somehow feel like I couldn’t accept Stefania-sama, you see.” “No, I think I will join the newly established LLL after all.” Hearing the conversation of people around us, Iori asks me a question. “Hey, Kousuke-kun. What are these three great fanclubs?” “Oi oi, you don’t even know that much?” I exaggerated such a reaction and start to explain. “They’re Fanclub of famous students in our academy. There are two over there, see?” “Don’t tell me it’s Monika-sempai’s and Stefania-sempai’s?” Did she notice from the fact that they’re the people that stood behind those two? “Yeah, that’s the president guard MMM and the saint’s holy knight order SSS.” “Wait, what’s MMM? Is it her initial? If that’s the case then SSS doesn’t make sense right?” Katrina asked the best question. At first, I thought Monika-sama’s Fanclub name came from her initial too, her full name was Monika Mercedes von Mobius after all. But that was not the case. “It was actually [Monika-sama Maji Monika] (TLN: Monika-sama seriously Monika) and SSS is [Stefania-sama Sugoku Stefania]. (TLN: Stefania-sama Super Stefania)” “I don’t think I will ever understand, so I will give up.” Ludi said while sounding confused. Well, at first I thought “The heck are these guys saying” too. “Yeah, I think for its member MMM means Monika-sama is as beautiful as the war goddess. You see, the name of the goddess of war is Monika, right? They made that connection and came up with the name.” “Nope still doesn’t make sense...;...;” “Okay in other words, for them they replace the Monika in the back of [Monika-sama Maji Monika] with [the war goddess’s name] so the actual meaning of their fanclub’s name is [Monika-sama is seriously our War Goddess]” Simply put, they just do a wordplay on her name. “I’m having a headache...;.” Said Katrina. “SSS is the same. They replaced the latter Stefania with [Daitenshi] (TLN: Archangel) so the name is actually...;” “Stefania-sama super Archangel, right?” “Yeah, that’s right Iori.” Iori convincingly nodded. Is it a matter you should be convinced though? “Come to think of it, you said there were three right? What about the other one.” Katrina asked and moved her eyes toward me. “Ara, What’s the matter?” Ludi who has been receiving a lot of gazes still hasn’t noticed yet but seem like Katrina and Iori are able to guess the answer already. “I see. Certainly, she’s a beauty, her head is good and her magic is excellent too.” Her chest is bigger than yours too...;...; Rather, comparing to you most women would be bigger right? “Somehow I am getting irritated...;.” Shit...;...;..I forgot she has the intuition skill. “That’s right Ludi, you hang in there alright?” I forced the subject back to the original. “?” Ludi who is still clueless asides, judging by their reaction the others seem to understand the situation already. Some people are whispering something while looking toward our direction as well. “I will join LLL after all.” “Ah, such beauty, such brilliance. Moreover, she’s an elf princess too. “Uuuu...;.She’s the best!!” Such noise continues to spread around her. It seems like she is starting to notice it too so I decided to tell her. “The third Fanclub, you see, it is the one that only established recently and rapidly gaining a lot of members. The new star, Ludivine Marie-Ange de la Trefle’s imperial guard. (Love Love Ludivine-sama). Yes, it’s your Fanclub.” When I said that while touching her shoulder a cute “Fuehh?” escaped from her lips. I will never forget the looks of pure surprise on her face. — As expected, most of the afternoon classes are useless to me. According to the syllabus, almost all of them teach you how to use long-range magic. There are some that act as researcher’s workshop but I don’t think such lectures are going to be useful when I dive into the dungeon. In the first place, my basic understanding of magic is still lacking. Rather than research-level knowledge, I want to improve my basic first. Though, there might be a miraculous possibility that I can use long-range magic too. Maybe I can find the magic that even I can use! So, I decided to attend my waifu’s lecture (In this game alone I already have multiple waifu though.) but there was almost no result. But I do have my ulterior motive. A sweet voice that shook my body, the sanctuary for my eyes and ears. Ah, so satisfying. You don’t even have to ask which one is more important between long-range magic and bewitching beauty. I bet half of the guys here aren’t even looking at the letter on the board, their focus would be on those pair of hills instead. “Okay, let’s try it out! If you did it, call me over so that I can test your magic, okay?” Her sweet voice is like chocolate dipped in honey. It made me feel like I’m lost in a candy house. This is beyond happiness, her voice already made me euphoric. Can’t she whisper sweet nothings to me for an hour? No, it doesn’t have to be that. Just read me a story is fine too, your beautiful voice would easily send me to dreamland. “Umm...;..Takioto-kun?” “Y, Yes Ma’am. I’m currently single and currently recruiting a girlfriend Ma’am!!” “I, I didn’t ask you about that.” When did she get so near? Her face is so close. When I look around, I saw the light of magic scattered from the other student’s hand. They are practicing magic, huh. “Won’t you try using the magic too, Takioto-kun?” “Ah.” “Umm...;. I can’t use long-range magic due to my constitution so...;...;” Sensei cutely tilted her face while having a question mark pops out on her head. “Ummmm...;..” She took out a smartphone-like device and checks something. When I tried to peek at the screen, she got angry like a small child and said “BAD!”. ‘KAWAII'(TLN: The author literally typed KAWAII here). She’s so cute I ended up using English. I want to hear it one more time. Should I try peeking again? “...;...;I see so that was the case.” Seems like she was looking at my personal information. “Yes, I thought I might be able to get something I can use by attending this class but...;” Ninety-percent of the reason is that I want to meet sensei though. I can’t say that right? “My goodness!” I was healed a little with sensei’s exaggerated reply. Compared to Mizumori-sempai, she would give off a feeling like “ Let’s try our best!” but in sensei’s case, it felt like “You had it hard but let’s cheer up and try our best!”, something like that. “Oyoyo, I see...;! I understand! Sensei will help you. Please tell me more about your condition.” I explained my condition to her while demonstrating my magic. Looking around, the other students also looking at me while whispering about something among each other. Are you guys jealous that I am monopolizing her? No, not that huh? Then it should be something like “Why did this guy chose the applied magic course when he can’t even use long-range magic?”. Well, stare all you want. I won’t be here next time after all. “This is quite difficult...;..” Did sensei not noticed? When she folded her arms like that it emphasizes her ample che-...;.. Ahem. What am I thinking? “I have to research whether there is any precedent case. Hmm, but even the condition of the first generation saint is still not resolved yet too.” The first generation saint can only cast recovery magic, strengthening magic and barrier magic. In exchange, her recovery magic can even heal the person on the verge of death back to full health. And since her power is so OP (in a lot of ways) The gentlemen even gave her a nickname. “Speaking of the first generation saint...;.. She is already dead, right?” The first saint is one of the heroes from one thousand years ago. Normally thinking about it she would be dead already. However, she is still alive...;. If certain conditions are met she will even join the party. Rather, when she joined the party, Takioto would go straight to the trash can, She is one of the strongest three after all. Well, Takioto is already considered a spare character from the start though. “Alriggggggght! Sensei thought of a plan. Let’s do our best together!” “Oohhh” Sensei clenched her fist and raised it to the sky...;...;...;...;...;Alone. “...;...;...;...;...;..” Sensei tares at me with her inflated cheeks. Eh? I’m in on this too? “Ahem! Alright, let’s do our best!!” “O,Oh–!” — Author Note: Sensei is in her late 20s but still looks young. The topic of her age is forbidden, you can refer to her as an old miss and you will be able to see what hell looks like. Additionally, as a lecturer at Tsukuyomi academy, she should be loaded. She is also good at cooking and sewing, her girl power is too high to quantify. A certain Nee-san who serve you dinner that glow like neon lights should take a lesson from her. She is good at looking after others and received a lot of praise from her junior since she was a student. Regarding her appearance, if asked whether she is beautiful or cute then the answer would be cute, she has a mole under her drooping left eye. She is 155 cm in height and WILL NOT GROW ANY TALLER THAN THIS. BTW her hair is strawberry blond...;. Though when I came up with her setting, I can’t stop wondering why isn’t this person married yet? It’s been two days since Aromatherapy-sensei vowed to help me. Unfortunately, I have no plan to visit her class again. If I got my heart broken then I might consider getting heal by her though. But right now, I have no time for a broken heart. I have been breaking a lot of flags too. Moreover, rather than joining her class, hurrying home and practice with Claris-san would be more effective. — “Even though Claris-san is this strong, why did you got caught off guard so easily that time...;...;..?” “N, no, that time it was my negligence so...;.” Her face darkened and her long ears drooped down a little. Contrary to her expression, her attack increased in intensity. However, my stole that’s currently loaded with my magic power is still able to parry all of them. I can only keep parrying them though. “Ugh.” Attacks that are strengthened by magic held a lot of power. I couldn’t properly defend against her attacks and currently struggling to keep my feet on the ground. Certainly, my stole’s defense power made her attack felt like she is hitting a taiko drum. However, I can’t kill the momentum behind her attack. I have been training daily and even got Mind-Eye but I still have a long way to go. “Oo wind...;. Raise up!” Claris-san cast her magic. The wind sweeps the dust up into the air and my visibility quickly turns to zero. When she cast magic from time to time like this, it makes the fight quite troublesome. I can mostly defend with my stole but Claris-san’s technique is very tricky. Though, she made a mistake in her magic selection this time. Using my Mind-Eye, the dust curtain is meaningless against me, as all of her movements are completely visible to me. I started running toward Claris-san’s position as a counteroffensive. She noticed my approach and back away while casting magic. When I close the gap, I have to attack her with Thirdhand before I got hit by her magic...;...; When I was about to reach out using my stole, my vision suddenly turns sideways. There was a dent in the ground. “Since when ...;!! This was the place Claris-san was standing. Did she pretend to cast magic at me while she dug this? It’s good that my leg does not receive any damage. In exchange the hole made me lose my balance, which at a time like this could prove to be fatal. I restore my posture and spread the stole in front of me. Then, I saw a huge rock flying at me from the front. I can hear the sound of a rock smashed against a metal shield. “ISN’T THAT ROCK TOO BIG!?” That thing is not a rock anymore, that’s a friggin boulder. That thing is as big as a human head. If I got hit by that I might die you know? Claris-san quickly approached me as I couldn’t kill the force behind her boulder attack and fell on my butt. She kicked my stole away and insert her sword through the gap. “I, I give up.” I got no choice but to give up since her silver blade is right in front of me. “Fuu, I lost two times in a row yesterday, right? Now I can protect my dignity.” I grabbed the right hand she offered to me and get up. “It felt like I was dancing on your palm from beginning to the end though.“ “This time I came up with a plan to fight you. If I widen my distance against you from the start I think my chance of winning will go up considerably, No?.” Certainly, if it is a long-range fight, it would lower my win rate. The reason is that I don’t have the means to attack from long-range. Sure, I can throw stones at her too but Claris-san who has been fighting against me all this time should already expect such attacks. If she knew what’s coming, there’s no way she can’t think up the countermeasure. She can even use barrier magic. Rather, isn’t that her specialty? I have no choice but to close the distance myself. “Hmm, it’s the distance as I expected...;...; should I try using a bow?” “Surely, I think the bow is very suitable for Takioto-sama. A gun might be good too. However, both of them are quite costly...;...;. With that said, as one of the Hanamuras. surely money shouldn’t be a problem for you.” Well, I don’t particularly worry about money. On the contrary, a while ago Marino-san already accompanied me to her armory. As expected, I can’t use wands or grimoire but since she said that I can take whatever I want, I will borrow some weapons from the armory later. “Bow or Gun...;.. Well, whichever I pick it would have to be next week, huh.” “Next week?...;...; Come to think of it, you will start diving into the dungeon this week right?” I took out a new stole and shape it so that Claris-san could comfortably sit down. Firstly, I strengthened both ends and make them raise up like a bridge while making the other areas soft and fluffy. This way, I get a simple hammock. “Takioto-sama...;. Umm, this might be rude of me but I think you are quite a monster when it comes to magic capacity.” Claris-san was a little hesitant but she slowly sat down on the hammock. She lightly rocks the hammock and let out a soft smile. Perhaps I am the only man in the world that wants a magic spell that can swap my body with the stole from the bottom of his heart. Ah, I want that butt to lay on me. “Takioto-sama?” “Eh, Umm, did you say something about peaches(butt)?” “No, I don’t remember saying anything about that...;...;. It’s about the dungeon.” Aah, that’s right. “Well, I’m not particularly worried since it is a beginner dungeon. I will enter it with an upperclassman, an adventurer, there’s even a teacher accompanying us too.” “That being said, even if it is a beginner dungeon please do be careful...;..” Hee, I nodded to her word. “Umm, it is a little embarrassing but, when I entered the dungeon for the first time, well, umm, there was quite a lot of unexpected things so...;..” “Is that Claris-san’s personal experience?” “Yes, the other party members had to help me at that time. That’s why please don’t neglect your preparation. Umm, My apologies. I said too much.” Why is she apologizing? I was just admiringly staring at her, did she think I was angry? “No no, I am not upset or anything. I was very thankful for your advice. It was really good advice for a rash person like me.” “Takioto-sama being rash ...;? I don’t see you like that at all though?” I kinda have regret on how careless I was when I saved Ludi though. But I don’t regret saving her at all. “Well, a lot happened. Anyway, thank you for the advice. I think now I can thoroughly prepare for the dungeon the day after tomorrow.” Actually, since I know about the events that will happen in the future, I already planned to come up with some countermeasures though. “No, you don’t have to thank me...;. Considering Takioto-sama’s real ability, there shouldn’t be a problem in the first place. I think there might be some small problems but you should be fine.” Well, the event that the protagonist will encounter is by no means small. Rather, it might even be more dangerous for a person that will get caught up in the event like me though. Brilliant sunlight shone from the clear blue sky. It is still spring so the temperature is not high enough to make you sweat and it is very good weather to be outside thanks to the gentle breeze. On a day like this, I want to invite Sempai, Ludi or Nee-san to a picnic or a camping trip. Nee-san will probably have an expression that says something like “Isn’t something like barbeque a riajuu’s specialty?” (TLN: https://www.urbandictionary.com/define.php?term=riajuu) It might be unexpectedly fun if we try going together though. My imagination is running wild but unfortunately, the place that we will be going today is a dungeon. Something like the weather is totally meaningless in there. Well then, since the dungeon we will be diving into this time is the beginner dungeon, the layout will consist of temple-like floors and passages. Hopefully, the temperature inside will be comfortable. It is not something I can experience in the game after all. Maybe they can emulate that in the future but if such a thing came true, everyone might turn into a shut-in. “...;..So...;...;...;...;...; any questions?” Nee-san asked the assembled students but since the details have been told to them beforehand, there was no question from the students. “Then, do your best.” She gazes my way for a moment and heads back to the infirmary with the other healers. “I didn’t expect Hatsumi-san to send us off.” Ludi isn’t in her noble lady mode since there are no other people around us. “Yeah, most of the teachers are participating. It seems they can turn down the job but she said [Since Kousuke and Ludi are here, I will participate.] or something like that.” “Is she simply indifferent to other people or just outright dislikes them...;.. I wonder?” “You are asking me that? Nee-san is a little indifferent to others but she is actually gentle, beautiful and she is quite tolerant too...;” Speaking up to that point, I felt Nee-san’s presence so I decided to praise her more. “She always does her best to take care of me, I was really in her care and sometimes I even voice a troublesome request to her too. It’s fun being with her, she is the best sister I could ask for.” “...;...;I’m glad.” “HII” Ludi let out a surprised voice. She probably didn’t notice Nee-san’s presence. Before I got used to her, there are times that I hadn’t noticed her presence until she was right next to me after all. It is thanks to her that I gained the presence detection skill even before entering the dungeon. “Th-that was surprising. I-if you are around please at least call out to me first, Hatsumi-san.” Hearing Ludi’s complaint, Nee-san scratched her head. “Stop, you are making me blush” “Was there anything in my sentence that worth blushing for...;...;?” When Ludi started to ponder about that, a voice calls out from behind her. “O–i. Takioto, Ludi, Hatsumi-sensei.” The person that appeared from behind is Yukine-sempai. She is in her uniform with her naginata on her back. She stood beside me and looked at Ludi while tilting her head. “Is something the matter?” “Hmm. Figuratively speaking, it’s like using the Pythagorean theorem to study biology or something like that.” “You make no sense at all.” “Well, let’s leave that aside.” I put an end to the subject. “Come to think of it, why is Nee-san here? It seems they are going to announce the grouping, right? Don’t you have to prepare for the departure?” “There’s something I have to tell you...;.. Yukine too.” “? What is it.” Asked Ludi who seems to already given up pondering about Nee-san. “Alright, everybody listens. The total member of the party that will be entering the beginner dungeon has changed to five people.” “We already received the explanation. Rather, aren’t you the one who just inform all the students just now? Every party should receive a message from Tsukuyomi Traveller (A terminal device used for acquiring general information in Tsukuyomi Academy) to gather at their designated location, right?” I said so while taking out the smartphone-like device every student received on the day of the entrance ceremony. “...;Yeah, About that. There was a little special circumstance so you three won’t be receiving that message.” “Eh?” “Haa?” “Fumu, Hatsumi-sensei. Can you explain the situation?” “The power level of you three are already more than enough, so Mother and I decided not to recruit more party members at our discretion.” “Don’t tell me...;..? Ludi seems to already guess the answer. “The people that will be diving into the dungeon in your group are only you three.” “Ehhh!?” “!?” Our expression gets cloudy at the same time. No, please wait a moment. Isn’t that weird? It’s totally weird, right? Why am I not a part of Iori’s party? The thing that happened up until now has been strangely following the game script, how come there’s such a twist here. Moreover, it’s just the three of us? “Hatsumi-sensei, can you explain it to me in detail?” Sempai who is probably the calmest among us asked the question. Ludi seems to be surprised too but the one who is the most surprised by this is probably me. “When it comes to close-quarter combat, Kousuke already has no problem dealing with this dungeon and Ludi already can shorten her chant and even use intermediate magic. In fact, you two are already enough for this dungeon. Moreover, with Mizumori Yukine with you, there’s no reason to be afraid of anything in this dungeon anymore.” Well, I do understand what Nee-san is trying to say. Ludi also powered up a lot thanks to Nee-san and Marino-san. Sempai is with us in the first place so there was really nothing to worry about. “That’s what I came here to explain.” “...;...;Understood, Nee-san. Then what should we do now?” “You can enter the dungeon now if you want. There was no decided time for you to enter. You will not meet with the other groups in this beginner dungeon after all. I take a look at sempai and Ludi. They both gave me a nod saying that they are ready to enter the dungeon anytime. “Understood. We will enter the dungeon now.” More importantly, will Iori be okay if he encounters the Majin (TLN: Demonkind) according to the event? Well, he will probably be fine. That guy (the Majin) is super weak since he’s just an early boss after all. — The picture that made me realize the difference between looking at something in real life and a picture is the one from my field trip when I was still a student. It made me think about that famous painting [The Last Supper] I saw from the textbook in middle school. I felt that something like a picture can’t convey all the meaning of that moment. To me who doesn’t even know the [A] in Art, I understand that much from that painting. The difference I feel right now is more than I ever imagined. I felt it so vividly just by having the things I saw in the game exist in front of my eyes in 3D. The feeling is so overwhelming, I can’t put it into words. Ludi’s mouth is hanging open like a goldfish waiting to be fed. The image is just like a person who just came to the city and sees a high-rise building for the first time. But I can’t laugh at her. I was making the same expression after all. Well, since she also shows that stupid expression, let’s consider it a draw this time. “This is amazing...;...;” The structure we saw is like a stone temple that could be found in Rome or Egypt. I know how it looks like from the illustration in the game but I never felt its presence before. Looking at it now, it gave me such an overwhelming emotion. I would believe you if you tell me that this isn’t a dungeon but a tourist attraction. Just by looking around the place, My Chuuni-self that I had sealed away tried to make a comeback. I might let out a high pitched laugh and cast magic around meaninglessly here. Unfortunately, the only visually pleasing magic that is safe to cast right now is [Light]. Mizumori-sempai laughs while slapping the stone pillar. “You sure are strange, Takioto.” Said sempai. “Eh, how?” “I have been diving into this dungeon many times already but it is the first time I see someone with such a reaction.” “Then normally how would people react to this?” “Hmm...;. you act like you come to sightsee, experiencing some cultural differences, being moved or something like that. Most people that came here are those that give off the feeling of full battle-readiness, you know. Well, it was rare for people who enter a dungeon for the first time to act like you.” You are kidding? I glanced at Ludi, she is exasperatedly looking at me. “Eh, wait, but isn’t it amazing to see a building like this...;..? You think so too right, Ludi?” “...;..I was actually quite nervous you know. It’s my first dungeon after all. But since I saw Kousuke acting like that...;...;...;.” No no, if you are Japanese then this reaction is totally normal, right? “Well, you are enjoying this place plentily already right, Takioto? Let’s move out.” Sempai said while looking at the stone door in front of her. After consulting with Sempai and Ludi, the result is that I and Sempai will act as the vanguard while Ludi will be the rear guard. Sempai will not be interfering much and leave most of the jobs to us. That’s why I am at the forefront of the formation...;...; “Sempai, I don’t know how to open this door.” In front of me is a heavy door made of stone. It is about ten meters tall. I don’t think it will budge even If I push it with all my strength. Was it made for a giant or something? There was no such door in the game. Rather, the screen just switched to the dungeon interface and we start exploring immediately. Seems like the dungeon doors were excluded from the game. “Aah, it will open automatically if you touch it. Monsters will start to appear from inside though, I think it will be okay but let’s be careful.” Hearing her answer, I touch the door. The ground starts to shake like there’s an earthquake. “Kya!” Maybe it was due to her nervousness, Ludi gripped her wand and channel magic power into it while using her other hand to grab my arm for some reason. I was surprised by the sudden shaking too but since I was born in Japan, the country ridden with earthquakes, a person like me who often experienced a big earthquake while inside a skyscraper won’t be surprised much from such an earthquake. However, the me who was almost indifferent to such shaking is now quite shaken by the hand that is grabbing my arm. The shaking was followed by mechanical sounds then the shaking became stronger. I am still standing because I use the stole to maintain my balance like a cane but it would be difficult to stand without it. Ludi tightens her fingers that were wrapped around my arm while making an anxious expression. Sempai remains calm and casually put her hand on my shoulder to balance herself. Sempai, hand, the other side too, calm down, don’t mind it. As I wish for the thing that won’t come true, the mechanical sound suddenly stops and the shaking began to subsides. Then there was a sound ringing out when the shaking completely stopped. When I take a look, there was an entrance in the corner of the door that was wide enough for a person to go through. With such a huge door and all the mechanical sounds along with the earthquake class shaking when it is opening, was this door just a decoration to create atmosphere? “I don’t get it...;...;” Ludi is trembling, she released my arm and blast the door away in anger. Sempai gazes at the door nostalgically while muttered: “This reminds me of the first time I was here.” What a tensionless start. Is this really gonna be okay? If the content of this beginner dungeon is the same as the game then it is impossible for us to get wiped out on the early floors. As long as we assemble all the necessary items, taking on the hidden boss on the eleventh floor shouldn’t be a problem either. To use RTA strategy (Real Time Attack- the shortest real-time capture (Counting not the in-game time but the actual time in reality) ) for the most efficiency, the player will only loot items from the treasure boxes(Ignore all monster encounters), head toward the tenth floor and beat the boss. The difficulty of this dungeon is so low that you can beat the boss black and blue even when your levels are low. The only obstacle for you in this dungeon is that when you enter this dungeon for the first time, you have to defeat a Majin summoned by the evil god cultist. That being said, the summoned Majin is very weak. UNIMAGINABLY WEAK. It was so weak that after you defeat the Majin, one of the heroines just casually said “Well that’s it, are you guys tired? Let’s go home.” or something like that. But if you choose to keep exploring you can still beat the boss on the tenth floor pretty easily. Rather, for a person who already experiences the RTA run like me, not going to the bottom floor is considered a loss of time. With that said, I will definitely capture the bottom floor. Well, since I’m not the protagonist, I wouldn’t encounter the Majin anyway. Let’s just go and defeat the tenth-floor boss and head back. “Umm, is there nothing but Gyoblins on this floor?” Gyoblins are monsters that have goblin body and a head of a fish. They are trash mobs that are super easy to defeat. “Yes, or so I heard.” Ludi replies while keeping her eye on the surrounding. The Gyoblin shoots water out from its mouth. The power is at the level of children’s water gun though, at most, it can only make your clothes wet. Out of ten times you got hit by it you will receive only one damage, it is the weakest attack in the game after all. However, Gyoblins are indispensable for collecting Ero CGs. If you later become a Tamer, it is a monster that will accompany you most of the time. It is a monster I want to tame when I have the chance. The other party members might glare at me so I kind of hesitating a bit. In the first place, becoming a tamer takes quite a lot of time so I likely won’t do it. “...;...;! It’s coming!” When I heard Ludi, I moved my third hand to intercept the Gyoblin that entered my line of sight. It seems to be alone. “C’ mon!!” I made a shield with third hand and started running. I defend against the water gun with third hand and struck the gyoblin with fourth hand. “GyoGyoo~~!” Is battle something this uneventful? The Gyoblin that got blown away convulsed a little then turn into particles of light, leaving behind a small magic stone. Then something like a haze raises up from where its body supposed to be. It split into three parts and fly toward us. Maybe, the haze was magic power. Something equivalent to experience points in this world. When you collect it, you become more powerful. Well, let’s leave it at that. More importantly...;. “...;.Weak.” “...;.Indeed.” “Well, Takioto’s firepower is simply too much for a first-year student after all.” I grab the fallen bead-like magic stone and put it in the bag. Was there any meaning in gathering this in the first place? “Alright, let’s keep going.” Hearing sempai, we keep advancing into the dungeon. I feel like our caution dropped a level. “There isn’t any change for a while now. Everywhere looks the same, I might get lost at this rate...;...;.” Ludi muttered with a small voice. It certainly is true. The dungeon consists of simple stone bridges and corridors, I felt like I saw this same environment many times already. It is just that most of the corridor continues into a straight path so we still haven’t gotten lost yet. If this place was constructed into a maze, we might not be able to tell where we are at all. However, I won’t be getting lost here. In the game, this dungeon has a fixed map except for a certain floor and I have been walking through this place according to the map I remembered. “Yeah, If this place was a maze then it would totally give me a shiver...;.” I stopped mid-sentence and beckoned to Ludi. “Ludi, I heard a voice from over there. It sounds like something is walking at that corner.” Ludi nodded and gather her magic power. [Gyo Gyo] their voices are getting closer, they keep walking our way unaware of our presence...;. The magic hit the gyoblins the moment it appeared from the corner. They helplessly turned into particles. I look around but there seems to be no magic stone this time. The stones in this dungeon are often very small so I might miss it though. “Let’s head to the next spot.” I nodded to her word. Though, why does gyoblin walk around while making that [Gyo Gyo] noise? After that, we smoothly make our way toward the second floor where other monsters besides gyoblin start to appear. “Golem, huh” The things that appeared are mud dolls (Golem). As I observe its movement, they’re quite slow and their behavior is monotonous. If I defend and counterattack with third or fourth hand then I should be able to defeat it without taking any damage. I thought so at first but to think that I would actually be able to do it...;...; Their movement is too simple, it surprised me. “Maybe, I just have good compatibility with them?” Saying so, I pick up a small magic stone. Comparing it to the fight with the gyoblins up till now, the only difference is that these guys will come to attack you normally. Putting it like that might sound a little strange but those gyoblins do really have a lot of ways to attack us. “We are still in the lower levels after all.” As a result of learning chant shortening, Ludi also has no problem dealing with the monsters around here. We chatted casually among ourselves while advancing through the dungeon. “Ara?” When we advanced halfway through the second floor, we encounter our first forked path. Well, saying that we finally found one should be better. If this was Dragonquest then people would already be complaining about the straight path we traveled in up till now. “Which way should we go?” Left or right, this time the correct answer is left but on the right, there will be a dead end with a treasure chest. People usually say that right is the right way and most of the gentlemen who do RTA usually go and collect the treasure on the right first. Well, considering your party member, the treasure might not be necessary for you but most players would choose to collect it anyway. “Hmm, my guts said that the right path is a dead end so let’s turn right here.” As expected, Ludi scowl at me. “Why are you going there if it’s a dead-end? The correct path is to the left, right?” I raise my hands to calm her down. “Think about it carefully. Can you really believe my guts?” “...;...;No, not one bit.” I see...; she won’t believe, huh. Is it just my conceit that I am right most of the time...;. Seeing me depressed, sempai let out a laugh. “Why are you so shocked when you said it yourself?” “It’s not that, I just somehow expecting a kinder word.” Sometimes when you make a joke about yourselves it comes back to bite you. “Well, fine. Let’s head right then?” “Yeah.” We started walking. We reached a dead end, but the thing in front of our eyes was not a wall or a box decorated with jewels but an old wooden box. “Is that a treasure chest?” “Probably, is it a trap though?” Truthfully speaking, there’s no trap set around this treasure chest. Rather, there’s no trap set around the treasure chests in this dungeon it the first place. I will not share that information though. “No use asking, you can’t use scout skills, right?” “Nah, It can’t be helped so I will try to open it while using stole shield to protect myself.” I said so and look at sempai but it seems like she doesn’t want to voice her opinion about this. I harden third hand to defend myself and slowly open the box with fourth hand. The thing inside the box is a small engraved red magic stone. “It’s fire magic stone, right?” “Yeah.” This kind of magic stone is called a battle magic stone, when activated it will cast the magic that has been engraved on the stone. In this case, if you supply this stone with magic power it will blow out fire...; I never actually used one so I don’t know how it really works though. “Can I have this?” “Kousuke seems to be the one that needing it most, huh.” Considering that Ludi can already use fire magic and how poor I am at using long-range magic, this stone will surely be useful to me. This thing will prove to be a trump card to me who can’t use long-range magic. Even if I can’t use the magic myself if I just supply the magic stone with my magic power the stone should be able to cast the magic for me. I still haven’t used it yet so I can’t say it for sure though. Nonetheless, this stone still has its weakness. Firstly, they’re expensive. It is a rare item that can only be obtained from dungeons. The price for one also jumps exponentially if it can cast an intermediate level or higher magic. Secondly, these stones are consumable items. This means once you use it, the magic inside will disappear and it will turn into simple stone. That’s why these stones are so expensive. Third, its lack of firepower. By the time you get your hands on the strongest battle magic stone, a character like Ludi should already be able to cast more powerful magic. Comparing them to a magic recovery item, the recovery items are uncomparably cheaper. In conclusion, they are early game items. Since the second half of the game is quite bloated, these stones are just there to look intimidating or to serve as a warning shot. “Alright, let’s head back to the junction.” “Okay.” — Author note: Takioto and co are too strong at the moment so the battle will be boring for a while. By the way, Gyoblins are breathing through their lungs so if they can’t breathe they will die. ...;...;...;...;...;...;..Even in water. The appearance of the third and fourth floor was almost the same as the second. The significant difference between these floors from the first two was the monsters that appear in them. Firstly, the gyoblins stop appearing and the rate we encounter the golem has raised. Additionally, new monsters started to appear. “Normal goblin, huh.” Judging from a Japanese aesthetic, you can only describe them as ugliness itself. There are wrinkles all over their skin and they are so thin that you can literally see their bones. Furthermore, their eyes are popping out of the sockets like they have some eye swelling disease one-third of their eyeballs are already out in the open air. Their tongue is always hanging open with saliva dripping from their mouth. They have a piece of rag on their waist while holding a club in their hand. Their defense may be paper-thin but I might have to be careful of the club they are using as their weapon. In fact, the guide said that the difficulty will jump up from the third floor onward but...;...;...;.. I grab the club that a goblin swung down at me while smashing its head with fourth hand. “GOBUUUUU” “As expected, their compatibility with me is the worst.” Since I have been training with Claris-san, their attack looked so slow and monotonous to me. There’s no way that such an attack can hit me. It’s like I am fighting with a baby here. I retrieve the magic stone and return to my party member. “If I am alone these things could give me quite a trouble...; I wonder if I should learn some close combat skills too.” Ludi expressed her thoughts, but since she is not a close-quarter combatant but a magic-user type, I think it should be fine if she just learns some skills to keep away the approaching mobs and leave the rest to the other party members. Later in the second half, she could use chantless magic anyway. Should I tell her that though? “Well, I think you should learn one at the very least...;...;...;...;. But, focusing yourselves on the long-range magic is fine too, right? You can leave this kind of monster to me after all.” This only applies to when I’m together with her though...;Well, whatever. “Hmm...;..that’s true.” I do have an optimal path for her if I can raise her freely though. But I can’t just go out and say “Hey, I just got the best way to train you” like I’m saying “Hey, there’s a bug on your shoulder”, right? “Certainly, Ludi is the type that cast long-range magic. You reminded me of the student council president.” Sempai who has been silent since we start capturing the dungeon agreed with me. If a jack of all trades guy like me can grow to be proficient in every skill, Ludi who is specialized in long-range magic should have no problem casting magic of the highest rank. She should be on the same level as the president, she might even be able to surpass her too. By the way, sempai is not a “Jack of all trades” like me, she is a first-class in everything (some even on the level of super first-class). She is way different from me. “I will try thinking about it some more.” “If you are ever in doubt about which path to take you can ask me any time. Okay? If it’s about magic then I have to leave it to sempai though.” When I direct the conversation to sempai, she smiled and gave us a nod. “Aa, I will teach you as much as I can. Well, in your case, it might be better for you to consult with Hatsumi-sensei or the headmaster.” Ludi’s case is settled there after all, huh. Even if they normally look like that and their personalities are a little problematic, Marino-san and Nee-san are one of the top magicians in the world after all. Comparing the current Ludi and the game’s Ludi, I feel that her growth rate is a lot higher. I guess it is thanks to the current environment that is suitable for her growth. Being in a good environment helps a lot when you are trying to study or training for sports, right? Well, I can’t say for sure though. “Should I consult with Marino-san and Hatsumi-san then...;...;.. Wait, isn’t it the same as what I have been doing up until now?” Ludi said while looking my way, what exactly do you want me to say here? “If you are asking me then I think you already achieved more than enough considering the current circumstances though...;.” I put my thoughts into words then sempai exclaimed like she just remembered something. “I understand what Ludi wanted to say. I understand that feeling too well. I also have a similar experience. It was quite an embarrassing topic but I sometimes felt that kind of frustration too.” “...;...;...;...;..” Ludi stays silent. She just stares at sempai while clenching her fist. “In my case...;. Well, let’s talk about this later.” Sempai shut down the conversation. I haven’t confirmed it yet but it seems that a group of monsters is approaching our way. A little later, we discovered a group of goblins. When I urge Ludi to use magic, she immediately begins chanting. “Storm Hammer!!” Her magic activated and a giant green hammer appears in front of the goblin group, smashing into them. The sound of impact rang out along with a gust of wind. As its name suggests, storm hammer is an intermediate magic that deals physical damage. In order to learn this magic, you have to be proficient in earth and wind magic. This spell’s firepower is so high that I don’t know why it is categorized as intermediate level magic though. Rather than that, I don’t remember that she could use such magic at this point in time...;...; Is it because she entered the academy at different times from the game? Well then, the strong point of this magic is not just its initial impact but also the gust of wind pressure that the spell produced afterward. The two goblins that were hit by the hammer seem to die instantly and turn into particles. The others were blown away by the strong wind pressure and hit the dungeon wall with one already stopped moving. The group of goblins that were some distance away got hit by the wind and fell on their butt. “And, Done.” I crush the goblins that fallen down with third and fourth hands, they raised their death throes and turn into light particles. “As I thought, I’m really jealous of Ludi’s magic, I can’t do something like that at all.” I want to use it if I can. I have been the target of such magic several times already in the mock battles. Even though I can defend against them, those magic still gave me a hard time. More importantly, if I can use a magic like that, I could flip Nee-san’s skirt who was acting as the referee too. (I peeked once and surprisingly. it was red.) I’m seriously jealous of her magic. “The grass always greener on the other side, huh.” Mizumori-sempai who is watching the situation muttered so. — Sempai’s POV ———————- The first time I thought: “Oh, so there’s also a person like this”, was when I observed my sister’s training. My elder sister is a first-class magician and a monster when it comes to the martial art. I have never been able to win against her. We were two years apart but I doubt that I would become as strong as her even if I train for another two years. As I observe her growth which is clearly faster than mine, I thought that I will never catch up to her. “You are a genius Yukine, I guarantee it.” That’s what my sister always saying. But ever since I was a child I know that it is not true. Father and Mother only care about my sister. I understand them. They were both charmed by my sister’s sword. I understand painfully well why they never care about me. The one who had been entranced by her sword the most was me after all. The genius one is my sister. I could say that I will never surpass her blade even if I am assisted by magic. Of course, I don’t think that it is because of my lack of talent. That’s the reason why I picked up naginata. I realized that my half-baked sword talent will only serve to make my sister’s talent shine brighter. This is the first time I ran away. Well, the first time I thought like that about someone is toward my sister but I just recently found the fourth person, Takioto. The me who thought that I wouldn’t get surprised anymore after knowing the legendary headmaster and the president. Takioto is abnormal, both physically and mentally. I once said that Takioto is like a magic tank but that was incorrect. If his magic power keeps growing like this, it wouldn’t suffice just calling him a tank, it would be more accurate to call him the dragon vein (TLN: Magic Ley line) itself. Honestly speaking, I was relieved when I heard that he couldn’t use long-range magic. Since it is the thing that worried him the most, I do feel bad for him. Of course, If it is within my power then I want to help him. But sometimes I think, what if a spell is cast with this amount of magic power wouldn’t it surpass even that of the headmaster. what will happen to this academy? Even so, I know that even if he could cast long-range magic he absolutely would not do such a thing. If his magic power is that monstrous then what about his ability to wield weapons? Honestly speaking, I couldn’t even feel a shred of talent from his sword swing. This also applied to other weapons as well. A plain, simple commoner’s sword. However, he possessed an ability that no one else had. It is the ability to optimize his growth and nerves of steel. I still remember that day when he told me that he wants to borrow the wooden sword. I handed it to him and observe his training. ‘Aah, he doesn’t have the talent’ Or so I thought. The next day, I was surprised. The swings he showed are like those of an experienced swordsman that has been swinging the sword for years. But when I take a look at his stance, It was as I thought, he has no talent. Since I did not expect his swing to be this good, I asked him how did he manage to improved so much. “Eh, I just keep swinging it, you know?” He said it like it was a matter of course. There’s no way that was the case right? I held my head. Even though he is usually so sharp, why is he so dense at a time like this? The person who told me about his abnormal growth rate was the headmaster. “He was practicing that same swing all day, you know? Ah, sometimes he also took pictures of himself and correct his posture too.” “That’s all!?” I unintentionally shout. “Even if you say that Kousuke always swings the sword every chance he got, you know? While maintaining the physical enhancement too.” Hearing so, I was so surprised I gave up. Physical enhancement spell is not something you use all the time. It is impossible for me or even Marino-san. Moreover, he was doing practice swings as well. That’s too weird. The action itself is like when you keep sprinting at full speed all the time and he did that all day? But Between normally swinging the sword and keeping up the physical enhancement spell while swinging, If you are asked which one would make you improve your sword faster then it is obviously the latter. It was considered a myth until recently but it is now clearly proven. Then it came to me. What if he keeps continuing like this? My body trembles. He might be able to master one of the ultimate techniques of the Kyouhachiryuu. Because of the technique’s own peculiarity, even my sister told me that no one would be able to master that technique. After that, I desperately recommended the katana to Takioto. I would like to think that it was just my imagination when I saw him pulled away from me though. No, let’s face reality here. Maybe I came out a little too strong at that time. Even so, I did not regret it. — (TLN: Flashback over) Takioto freely manipulates his stole and deflect the club that was swung down at him. He then uses his right stole to parry the sword that is coming from the left side and unsheath his katana. [[Iai]] The technique that is said to be one of the ultimate techniques in swordsmanship. Usually, anyone can use such a technique. However, the power difference between a novice and a skilled practitioner was incomparable. If there is a novice who can’t even cut iron, there would be a master who can even cut through Mythril and Dragon scales. Some masters can even cut metal with a wooden stick. Is he really just pick up the sword recently? Even me who watched my sister’s master using the same technique before could only follow the blade with my eyes from this distance. As I thought, Takioto is really abnormal. “Eh, no way? Only one blow?” Ludi who was attacking the goblins from the safe distance shouted in surprise. The hobgoblin that got cleanly sliced in two soon turns into light particles, leaving behind a magic stone. I let out a dry laugh. The tenth floor’s boss, Hobgoblin which gave me and Shion a hard time was defeated in one blow. Moreover, this is his first time in the dungeon. Nonetheless, since he overwhelmed the fifth floor’s boss so easily, I already predicted this result. Even so, although this should be something that we should celebrate, Ludi turns toward Takioto with a sour face. “Leave something for me too!” “We are not sharing candy here, you know...;...;..” Seems like Ludi still can’t settle down. It couldn’t be helped since Takioto end the fight with one blow when she was so enthusiastic before the battle. However, I think that if the hobgoblin was hit directly by storm hammer then the fight would end in one blow too. Considering that, Ludi’s abilities are overwhelmingly powerful for a first-year too. Since I know both the president and the headmaster, it is not much a surprise to me though. Somehow, the conversation turned out that Takioto will be treating Ludi at a ramen shop so I call out to them. “The ramen will be on me. Well, it was a splendid dungeon capture guys.” “Is that true? As expected of sempai. You are completely different from a certain elf I know. I will start calling you Goddess-sempai from now on.” As Takioto said so, Ludi smiled and stepped on his foot with all her strength. I reprimanded her a little as we proceed deeper into the boss room. What lay ahead was a wooden box. Ludi opened it and pick up the magic stone inside. She confirms something with Takioto and put the stone into her bag. While we are making our way toward the return magic circle, Takioto took out his smartphone and muttered something I couldn’t make sense of. “...;.I don’t know how much I can shorten it but should I try doing RTA?” I don’t know what he means but for now, I didn’t ask him anything and enter the magic circle. Well, I can ask him later at the ramen shop. We make our way toward a restless looking teacher to report our return. As we make our report, I noticed that it is not just this teacher that is behaving strangely but the other teachers and upperclassmen as well. “—then we captured the tenth floor, that’s all for the report...;...; umm, everyone seems panicked, did something happen?” “Ah, since you are the vice president of the public moral committee then it should be fine to tell you...;..” The teacher said so and whisper to me in a small voice. “Well...;...;. It seems a Majin appeared in the dungeon.” Seems like the ramen will have to wait, huh. Seeing the state the teachers were in, Ludi and I decided to immediately head home. Of course, our ramen trip was canceled. Well, it couldn’t be helped since the situation has turned out like this. The cause of the panic is likely to be the Majin. The game described the event as “It became a hot topic inside the academy” with only one line though. I changed into my running clothes as soon as I got home and prepare to head out. When I said that I will be going out to Ludi who is relaxing, she frowned at me. “...;.Don’t tell me, you are going to run?” “Yeah.” Isn’t that obvious? “We just got back from the dungeon right? Aren’t you tired?” If you asked me whether I’m tired or not then Yes, I’m tired. But...;.. “It’s not to the extent that I can’t run or do a practice swing though.” She shook her head like she was giving up and stretch while standing up. “What’s wrong?” “I’m going to train too.” She called Claris-san and left the room with a wand in her hand. Claris-san glanced at me before she left. As for what she wanted to say, I am totally clueless. Mizumori-sempai is not at my running course nor the waterfall. Of course, a serious person like her wouldn’t leave the scene before the incident resolved. Well, since the only one that got attacked should only be the protagonist’s party, the rest is to deal with the resulting panic of the incident. Let’s pray that everyone can go home soon. “Now the protagonist will attract the attention of the three committees.” If it’s the first lap of the game then the incident will end with just that. First of all, being able to attract the attention of the three committees (with Takioto in the party) is already a considerable feat. If it’s the second lap then the event will be gloss over though...;...; That’s probably not the case this time but If it is then I will have to be more careful. When I arrived under the waterfall I start practicing third and fourth hands. After that, I proceed to do practice swings. I will aim for a thousand swings for the time being. Once I started swinging the wooden sword sempai gave me (which seems to have additional weight added to it) I try to recall the figure of sempai’s swings then swing the sword down again. I felt a discomfort coming from my right side so I adjust my posture and swing down again. After I swung the sword for a while, I started reflecting on the things that happened so far. Using the game standard to judge the action I have taken up until the dungeon capture, the score would be close to a hundred points. I acquired all the available skills that I can get, Acquiring the presence detection skill from Nee-san was out of my expectation too. Even if my acquisition method is a little out of the norm, I did acquire mind eye which is a skill that was quite tricky to learn. Iori seems to be able to raise his power in his own way too so I have nothing more to say. What a smooth start. Everything goes so well to the extent that I’m beginning to worry. If we are talking about the future course of action then, firstly, I will have to completely capture the beginner dungeon. Once I got all the skills that can be acquired from beating the eleventh floor, should I go for the dungeon outside the academy? Since I already captured the tenth floor of beginner dungeon, I should be qualified to challenge the other dungeons now. Then where should I head to first? Personally, I want to capture the store bonus dungeon first since there is a special clear bonus there. Well, there’s a possibility that I might not get it though. If that’s the case then it might not be such a good dungeon to capture first. It’s almost time for dinner, the surrounding has already gone dark. I stopped swinging and head home. I take a shower and cancel the sleep mode on my phone. It seems like Nee-san still hasn’t come home yet. Marino-san and Nee-san came back when the dinner was already over and the late-night anime is airing. Their faces looked tired which is rarely the case for them (Ludi still can’t read Nee-san’s expression so she still sees the usual expression.) I served them coffee filled with plenty of sugar and milk, they thanked me and started drinking. “Even though I investigated so much, I still don’t know much about what caused the incident.” “It’s a good thing that the students are safe.” Seems like the only one who encountered the Majin was the protagonist group. Well, it is the same as the game. His party was fine since they have president Monica accompanying them. If she is with them she alone would be enough to wipe the floor with that Majin. That person, unlike Mizumori-sempai, she was a cheat character from start to finish. Rather, out of the strongest three, Mizumori-sempai is the only one who was not strong from the beginning so let’s considered sempai as the minority here. But the event turned out to be troublesome now. “The entry of the beginner dungeon will be banned for the time being due to safety inspection.” Nee-san said with an indifferent tone. Apparently, they were able to capture some suspicious individuals but they still have to find out whether there are any dangerous elements remains in the dungeon. Well, it’s reasonable. It’s reasonable but this is troubling. I want to acquire the skills that I can get there before heading out for the other dungeons but it seems like I have to change my plan a little. It seems the captured individuals are being interrogated right now. Since they said that this is a joint investigation with the Trefle empire, they might have found out about the culprit’s connection with the evil god cult already. — Because it has only been a day after the incident, the academy is buzzing with the stories of the beginner dungeon. Mizumori-sempai said that normally we would already be a center of attention right now because we are the first party that captured the tenth floor but since there’s the Majin incident, the dungeon ranking hasn’t catch the eyes of the general students. Normally, the ranking will be posted on the general information terminal Tsukuyomitraveller (the smartphone-like device) provided by the academy. But somehow the information about the majin was leaked out and now Iori’s party became the center of attention (especially the party leader Iori). Some upperclassmen even sneak a glance at him. “Oh, there’s someone here to see you again. You sure have gotten popular lately, huh! Now then, which one do you prefer?” “I’m curious too, you are a handsome guy after all.” The orange-haired male student added. Originally, it should be my job alone to act as the clown among the group but he (Orange) seems to have become the friend character instead of me. He is originally a possible party member in the game though. To our question, Iori lowers his eyebrows as if he was troubled. “Aren’t they both men? Moreover, it seems like their main objective is Trefle-san though...;...;.” Certainly, they peeked at Ludi while pretending to pay attention to Iori. Yeah, Iori is certainly the side dish here. I don’t know whether Ludi noticed or not since she kept chatting with Katrina. It might be quite a bonus for those who were aiming for Ludi, they got to see another beautiful girl like Katrina too after all. Her chest is non-existent though. “Hyiiii” She glared at me so I quickly avert my eyes. “Th, that’s right, orange, you were with Iori when you guys dived into the dungeon right? How was it? Especially about that Majin.” “Ha? Orange...;? Whatever. Well, I was a little scared but...; Iori is surprisingly reliable, Kato was doing quite well too.” “Surprisingly, huh...;..” Well, I guess you wouldn’t be able to tell how strong he is from his appearance, huh. He usually looks so normal that he doesn’t leave any impression after all. “Then how about the president?” “Prez huh, she’s quite bad news. She’s totally a monster, right Iori?” “Yeah, even though our opponent is supposed to be a majin...;...;.. it was like an adult picking on a baby. I almost felt sorry for that majin” Fumu, the president’s cheat is confirmed. “And she is kind and super beautiful. I now understand why her fanclub is so big.” “I even thought about joining MMM you know?” Both of them praised her highly. But orange. If I remember correctly, aren’t your preferred type...;...;.. “Are you going after the president, orange?” “Nope, Prez is certainly cute but I can not go Moe for her. She’s not married after all.” Iori’s face stiffens. Yeah, I was surprised too when I first learned of his preference. Remember, this guy love Netori, you know? Moreover, his level is so high that he will not succumb to any women unless they are married. Besides this point, he’s a good guy though. “As expected, I will be going after the math teacher, you know her? Seems like she just got married last year, you know?” “E, Ehh, is that so!” Oi Iori, your face’s a mess you know? “We pass by each other a lot lately, I think I will try calling out to her next time!” “Yeah...; do it in moderation okay?” “OH, married women are so Moe. The trembling appearance when she tries to hold on to her fidelity when I forcefully corrupting her is the best!!” “Y, Yeah?” “What? Don’t tell me you still doesn’t have experience? It was the best you know? But I will lose my interest immediately if they get divorce though, I wonder why?” The hell is up with this guy? If you don’t watch your mouth, you will get stabbed you know? I whisper to Iori with a small voice. “If one of us ever get married, let’s break the relationship with this guy” “Yeah...;..” Rather, it might be better to just cut ties with him now. ————————————————————————– Author note: I still haven’t come up with a name for orange yet. In shoujo manga, there’s always a rival character who seduce the male leads (or just there to repel the other women) and get jealous. However, in eroge, the friend character always says “I won’t lay my hand on the heroines”. They are the exact opposite of each other. Well, An old man and a young girl’s existent are the complete opposite from the beginning though...;.. It might just be my personal opinion but I think that it is necessary to lose something to get what you want. It doesn’t have to be an equivalent exchange. There existed a possibility that you might pay much more than needed for what you got. However, if the price is what I considered to be small, I am willing to pay it anytime. That’s why I sacrifice the teacher’s evaluation of me by abandoning the classes and head toward the beginner dungeon. Since the classes are taking place right now, there is no student around. The delinquent that normally skip the morning classes won’t be here too. I take out my student ID and channel my magic power into it to make the details on the card visible then I show it to the man at the reception table. He stared at the ID card with a face like he wanted to say something. The reason that he made that kind of expression is that he is wondering if it’s okay to send a first-year student into the dungeon alone even if the safety has been confirmed for the time being. Or was it because he is wondering why I would enter it again after I have already captured the tenth floor. It might be both...; He made a face like there’s a fishbone stuck in his throat but he let me pass without saying anything. I took out my smartphone before stepping into the magic circle, open the stopwatch app and press start at the same moment I step inside the magic circle. The most important part about time attack is to waste the least amount of time. One of the most time-consuming tasks in dungeon capturing is battling with the trash mobs. Of course, you may hunt them If you want to farm the experience points but normal time attackers would just ignore these trash mobs and fight the monsters at the place that you can accumulate the experience points more efficiently. In this case, there’s no need to earn experience points (raise level) midway so I will ignore all enemies and head to the next floor. “Gyo Gyo!!” Seeing me rushing past them, the gyoblins are shouting at me. I paid them no mind and keep sprinting to the next floors. I collected all the items though. Now, in the game, you can run through the dungeon without taking a break but that is impossible here. It’s impossible to run for so many kilometers without taking a break. My breathing will be disturbed, my legs will turn to logs and I will be susceptible to surprise attack because of the drop in my concentration. Then where should I take a break? Wouldn’t the place that the three of us take a meal break before be good? No, to get to that place I will have to take a detour. Then...;. “It’s the boss room after all.” On the fifth floor, there is a goblin boss that wield sword and shield (goblin knight) I correct my breathing while running and immediately defeat the boss using third and fourth hands. After sometimes it turns into magic elements (experience points) and leaves behind the drop item. I don’t really care about the magic elements (experience points) here but if I can’t find a place to rest then I can only do it like this. It would be a different story if there’s something I can ride to advance further while resting but something like that doesn’t exist. From the sixth floor onward, the monster’s troublesomeness raised a level higher. The reason is the flying monsters. Sempai and Ludi are more compatible to fight them than me. Their attacks wouldn’t get past my defense so I won’t lose but since I don’t want to waste time with them, I decided to run away. I rush through the sixth, seventh, eighth and ninth floor just like that and finally reach the tenth floor. The place I arrived at was not the place that I fought the hobgoblin with Ludi. I take out my smartphone and press stop. “It’s been one and a half hours. Seems like I can capture this place within two hours with time to spare, huh” You can unlock the hidden floor by capturing the dungeon earlier than a certain time and it seems like I made it. Now then, instead of the boss room, I am faced with a maze. To advance toward the hidden floor you have to get past this place. It is such a troublesome place to the extent that the gentlemen have to take notes while capturing this floor. However, once the information becomes available, the guide for RTA was made and this maze that shuffling its pattern all the time turned into just another straight path for the gentlemen. This special tenth floor has eight patterns of layouts. All of them are very brutal as there are many branch paths and even some infinite loops in some pattern. I also had a hard time when there was no clear data for this place. The only saving is that monsters will not spawn on this floor. The eleventh floor that I aimed for can only be reached from this maze within two hours of game time. Incidentally, there’s also a time limit for this place too. You have to reach this maze by one hour and forty minutes mark. Of course, the timer has stopped when I stepped into this dungeon. If you arrived later than that you will be sent to the hobgoblin boss room instead. I control my breathing while continuing on a straight path. The first branch I encounter is a T junction. I head east without hesitation. This time I encounter a crossroads. I proceed north and faced with another crossroad. Great, it’s pattern D. If it’s this pattern then from this point the route should be east, south, west, south, south, east and north. I ran through all the branch paths without making a single mistake. What appears at my destination is a transfer magic circle. “Jackpot, huh.” I check the time and step inside the magic circle. At the transfer destination, there’s a wooden golem. It’s taller than me with a height of around three meters. Its body is made from many logs that gathered together to form a human shape. If a child made a human with wooden sticks it would like this. Moreover, thanks to the brown leaves on its head, it looks like the golem has brown hair which made its appearance closer to a human. Now, how will I take care of this? Of course, I will use an item to defeat him. I take out two fire magic stones and use it against the wood golem. I got one from the time I captured the place with Ludi and another one from this run, so I will use it generously. The two magic stones shine and create two magic circles. Two fireballs fly toward the wood golem, once the fireballs hit, flames ignited all over its body. There are three types of wood golem. The dry wood golem with brown hair, green leaves wood golem, and bald wood golem. This time it is the brown wood golem. It is very vulnerable to fire damage and you can easily beat it by simple fire magic. Of course, I can’t use such magic, and I can’t rely on the protagonist to do the RTA with me. However, since there’s a magic stone that can be used against the hidden boss in this dungeon, there’s no reason not to use it. I smashed the burning wood golem with the earth element enchanted third hand. The wood golem fell to the ground with one blow. I keep punching it with third and fourth hands until the fires are extinguished. All in all, it took less than a minute to defeat it. I collect the dropped magic stone and advance further inside. There stood a statue of a winged woman. When I stand in front of the statue, a voice echoed inside my head. -Thee did well reaching this place, As thy reward, I shalt grant thee a skill.- My body gradually glows brighter. -t’s thought acceleration skill. Farewell, I hope thee wilt keep on striving forward- As the voice faded away, a magic circle emerges from under my feet. When I noticed, I am already returned to the entrance of the dungeon. “ALRIGHT!!” I clenched my fist and raise it up to the sky. I got one of the skills that I set my eyes for. I am now one step closer to my goal. I took out my smartphone from my bag and look at the time. I entered dungeon around eight o’clock and it is now nine forty. Meaning, it took around one hundred minutes for me to capture the dungeon. It’s a good record. “Now then.” Since I already captured the eleventh floor...;...;. “Let’s do it again!” According to the game, five skills can be obtained from this dungeon. Out of five, three are useful to me. One of those is the thought acceleration skill I just obtained. It is a god-tier skill that boosts every stat’s growth. It is considered one of the necessary skills to raise your character to their maximum potential. There’s no character that can’t learn this skill. It is no exaggeration to say that this skill is the one skill every character in the party you will be using to face the final boss have. Now then, the skill I got from the second run of the RTA is Stamina Enhancement (Small). In the game, this skill shows almost no effect in combat since it just slightly boosts your physical strength. To be honest, there’s no need for this skill in combat at all. It is super useful for a particular night scenario with the heroines though. There was a heroine that you can’t capture no matter what unless you have a certain level of stamina too. Thus this is a skill that a lot of gentlemen sought after. However, since the game becomes a reality. I think that this skill will be quite useful to me. “I have to find out how much farther I can run.” When I checked the time, about a hundred minutes had passed. Maybe because I am a little tired since this is the second run, I am a bit later from my previous run. “It’s almost noon already huh, guess I will head back for a meal for now...;...;..Let’s dive in again after that!” Since I got two of the skills I wanted I head to the cafeteria in high spirits. When she is not busy (which is rarely the case), Marino-san would always prepare a lunch box for me. However, today I have to purchase my lunch at the cafeteria. Since the Majin appeared, Marino-san is getting busier than usual. Nee-san is the same too. “Where did you go this morning, Takioto?” “Where? C’ mon don’t make me say it, you are making me blush.” I joined up with Iori who was diligently taking the morning class and show my reservation via Tsukuyomi traveler (The general info terminal) to receive the pre-ordered set-meal at the cafeteria. Iori seems to have made a reservation too since he immediately received his. “Haa...;.” Iori looked a little perplexed at my dirty joke. I don’t know whether the information regarding the eleventh floor is common knowledge or not so I will not touch on that subject. Well, if someone were to ask I would just evade the topic anyway, it doesn’t seem like he is going to pursue the subject though. When I take a look at his lunch, I noticed that it is more luxurious than usual (Just a little more expensive). “Oh, you raised your standard eh?” “Yeah, I got a lot of Tsukuyomi points from subjugating that Majin. It was mostly thanks to president Monica though.” Tsukuyomi point is something like a currency that can be used instead of money inside this academy. This point can be obtained from selling the items and magic stones that you obtained from the dungeon to the academy. It will also be given to those who captured a dungeon for the first time, breaking records or making a breakthrough in your research. I also got a lot of points from being the first to capture beginner dungeon among the first year students. “So you are treating yourselves huh.” It kinda felt wasteful to me but the point needed for a set meal should me within the error margin. Right? By the way, I didn’t use the points to pay for my meal but used the money Marino-san charged into my Tsukuyomi traveler instead (Money is being managed separately from the points) The amount charged is enough to order thousands of the most expensive set-meal. She said that it is for an entire year but there is no way I can use this up, right? Of course, you can’t directly convert money into Tsukuyomi point or vice versa. You can purchase a magic tool with money and sell it for Tsukuyomi point though. I basically use Tsukuyomi point all the time so when I found out that I can convert the money into the point like that, it blew my mind. “Yours are always look quite luxurious though Takioto-kun...;...;..” Well, I want you to give up. People are born differently after all. Thinking about it the system clearly favors those who possessed money and power. I can say that the parents of our academy top students are mostly aristocrats or big-shot entrepreneurs. “I’m still growing after all.” I gave him a vague answer. I can just say that I got the money from Marino-san (My guardian) but explaining about the circumstance regarding my parents would only kill the mood. The main reason is that it seems troublesome though. Let’s just change the subject. “So how was your class?” “Unnn how should I describe it...;? Normal? Ah, that’s right!” “What?” Iori stopped his hand and make a difficult expression. “Well, you see...;. Some people were bad-mouthing you this morning.” “Aah, I can guess the reason. It’s about Ludi, right?” It’s the thing that can’t be felt from the game but you can feel it in reality. The gazes and hostility. Since Ludi has her so-called imperial knights (Fanclub), the LLL and her own tremendous popularity. Just by being a friend of hers already made me into an enemy in their eyes. It might be due to the fact that Ludi who doesn’t often open herself to other people (especially men) and always behave prim and proper only act casually around me. Welp, if that was the case then it certainly can’t be helped. That’s why, regardless of whether you’re a freshman or an upperclassman, you will end up as a target of the envious gazes, you might even get hit by some stray magic too. “There’s that too...;. But some just complain about you skipping classes this morning, you don’t usually show up at the afternoon classes too...;..some even said that you are a delinquent...;..” If it’s about that then I can’t deny it. “Well, it’s true after all.” There are no excuses. Even my performance in the normal classes is miserable. Especially the history class. I got something I wanted to say after the teacher asked: “Why do you think that Oda Nobunaga and Uesugi Kenshin is a man!?” I couldn’t say it then but I think I can say it now. GODDAMN EROGE!! “There’s some guy that said a guy who only deteriorates the moral of other students should just drop out already too...;..from what I saw...;. He seemed to be a member of LLL though.” I see. they want to get rid of me because I am close to Ludi huh? Well, even if I got expelled, I don’t think Ludi will ever pay any attention to a guy like him though...;...;. Should I be considered lucky since they haven’t attacked me directly yet? “Is that so, sorry. It was unpleasant hearing those things right?” “No, isn’t it you who should be feeling unpleasant...;...;?” This kind of nuisance could be prevented if I am one of the tops of the school’s caste...;.. Since this time I can’t deny that I acted like a delinquent, I even skipped class and I still haven’t bonded with everyone in the class yet. I am on speaking terms with all the girls though. Rather, why are there so many cute girls among the mobs? Some of them even rival the heroines you know? In the first place, the problem stemmed from Ludi’s popularity did not limit to the class but the entire academy. Unless I hold on to some authority it would be impossible to counter it. “What about it. I don’t mind that one bit. I am the man who will become the strongest you know. This level of problem won’t faze me at all.” “I see...;...; Well, you are strong aren’t you, Takioto-kun.” “Yeah, I am the strongest after all. “The heck you are saying hahaha.” He said that and laugh. It seems like he is seriously worried about me. I was thinking this since I was playing the game but this guy is really a good person. If he is a woman, I would totally add him to my waifu regardless of the looks. Ludi’s POV ——————— I’ve always had a faint feeling that bad rumors are circulating around Kousuke. There are probably some who took care not to let such rumors reach my ear but since there’s also someone who told me the truth, their efforts become meaningless. I wonder if it is just their consideration? I can only think of their actions as their effort to not be the target of my wrath though. Kousuke himself is also in the wrong. Even though he is not good at studying, he still skips classes and rarely shows up at the afternoon lessons. Certainly, it should be normal for serious students to get annoyed by his usual carefree attitude. However, even when you understood Kousuke’s reason, it would still be difficult to solve this problem. “I don’t have a reason to attend the afternoon class in the first place, right? Isn’t it normal for people who focus themselves on close-quarter combat to skip afternoon classes and go to a dojo or join some circle inside the campus? I just use that time for dungeon diving. Sometimes I just go visit a sweets shop though. And the only classes I skipped are all the classes I am good at. There shouldn’t be a problem if I used that time to train right?” That’s certainly true. There are more students who skipped the afternoon classes than I thought. And he only skips the classes that he is good at like mathematics and physical education. But if you are so smart at difficult subjects like math, why are you an idiot enough to think that Yoshitsune and Benkei were a man? No, let’s leave it at that. The current problem is his reputation. “The problem is that he is too conspicuous.” Kousuke’s friend, Hijiri Iori said so. “I don’t want to offend Trefle-san but I think the problem stemmed from the L L L (Love Love Ludivine), those the imperial knight order (Fanclub).” “Yeah, I think so too.” Katou Rina agreed with Iori-kun’s words. “Basically, it just jealousy, you know, jealousy! If there’s a guy that you are jealous of, of course, you will want to find out about him. There are people like that right? Those who are just being a sore loser. There are even those who judge people whether they are good enough to be around the person they like you know?” Her words gave me quite a mixed feeling. “Takioto-kun doesn’t seem to care much about it as usual but it seems our classmates that are on good terms with him got angry instead.” Isn’t that like, “Like we are feeling now, right?” Didn’t he think about the people that are worried about him? No, does he aware that we are worried about him in the first place? He can be so dense at times after all. “If people know even a fraction of the training he has been doing, other people wouldn’t even dare to argue with him though.” Rina-san frowned at my words. “I don’t know Kousuke that well but is he really working so hard?” “Yeah, our acquaintance in the public moral committee even said that he is working so hard that it felt abnormal. A hard worker among hard workers. He never complains about the basic training and keeps repeating it like a mad man. He focused on producing the result to the extent that she felt uncomfortable with. According to her praise, that is.” “It sounded like you are pulling my leg though...;..” “He said something like [It’s much better than doing an RTA in a shitty game] or so.” He used some words I don’t understand, so I don’t know what he meant by that but it seems Rina-san and Iori-kun do not understand him either. “Well, if even us don’t understand his reason then there’s no way people who don’t know him would ever understand right?” “Right. I only know the usual Takioto-kun after all.” Iori-kun agrees with Rina-san’s words. I don’t know why he is like that at school, even though he is always seriously training and diligently studying at home too. “At home, he is always—–” “At home?” “Home?” I clear my throat. “He seems like the type to act like that at home too, right?” I forgot that I was keeping the part where we are living together a secret. “?” Iori has a question mark popping out if his head but Rina-san raised her brows. “Be careful around Katrina because she had a sharp intuition”, or so Kousuke warned me but it seems like I don’t really have to worry about her. “I wonder what he thinks about all these rumors?” I intentionally change the subject and the first person to jump on it is Iori-kun. “Ah, you see. He looked like he doesn’t care about it one bit. I told him about this at lunch but he just carefreely eating his parfait deliciously. He even said [Sorry, I made you worried.] and bought a parfait for me, you know. It was so delicious.” Why did the topic shift to the parfait instead of Kousuke? I thought as I watch Iori-kun speaking with sparkling eyes. Rather than the fact that He appreciated his concern, isn’t it more like he couldn’t stand Iori-kun’s glutton eyes? ...;...;...;...;It’s not like that, right? Ludi’s POV ———————– “Hmm, there’s no need to worry, right?” The one who said that is the person Kousuke considered his master, Mizumori Yukine, the vice president of the public moral committee. “Takioto is not an idiot. He must have seen this coming already. Isn’t that why he is still casually diving into the dungeon right now?” I nod along. “I have been keeping an eye on them but it seems like I will have to pay more attention huh. It might just be my personal opinion but a person can be easily influenced by words and gazes received from other people.” I agree. I once got a chance to visit the library in this town. There was a noisy group of women but after they noticed the gazes of the people around them, they gradually break-up. “Yes, I think so too.” They lost to the pressure of the surrounding gazes but they were the one in the wrong in the first place. “Certainly, we can’t praise his action either. In the first place, as the vice president of the public moral committee, I will have to be careful about my stance on this.” “But...;” Yukine-san raises her voice. “If it is strength that he sought after, then his action is only reasonable. Regardless of people’s opinion of him, shouldn’t he be praised for his training efficiency? He didn’t bother anyone in the first place, right?” It was as Yukine-san said. He didn’t show up at the class but he also didn’t interfere with the class itself. “Should I have a word with the L L L?” Sempai shakes her head at my words. “No, it’s better to leave them alone until something happens. It’s the same when we were dealing with MMM and SSS. It will just fan the flame of jealousy and their actions will just become more radical. Captain Steph once intentionally fan the flame and suppressed them herself to serve as an example. That time she went quite overboard too.” Umm, well...;. Those two must have it hard too huh. “I understand it too well, I wanted to sigh. Well, I can sympathize with President Monika but in Captain Steph’s case, I can’t even begin...;...;...;I said too much. Please forget what I said earlier.” The current generation saint, Stefania-sama has a lot of good rumors circulating around her. Rather, I hear nothing but good rumors about her. However, despite all that, I still can remember the sense of wrongness coming from her. Sometimes I can only see the smile that is always on her face as a mask. “Let’s wrap this up. Does Takioto know of this?” “A friend of Kousuke already told him.” “Fumu, It is Takioto’s problem. Let’s not be impatient and act as normal. Rather, we should focus on our training to ensure that we are not left behind, right?” “Surely, since he started going to the dungeon, he has become abnormally stronger...;. I have to keep up too.” No, we are already left behind. I can see it with the result of his training with Claris. Claris was on her knee while Kousuke was still standing. I think Claris also think so too. Ever since her win-rate keep decreasing, she has been increasing her training time as well. I understand your feelings but if it is going to interfere with your normal work then you will get scolded by Papa, you know? “I am also frustrated about that, I’ve never seen a person that can grow so much in such a short time.” Yukine-san happily said so. Then, as if she just remembered something, she suddenly speaks to me. “...;.Ludi is living with Takioto at the headmaster’s house, right? How enviable.” “Eh?” I stopped breathing. Does sempai want to live with Kousuke too? “You would have a lot of motivation to train if you are living with him right? You can even consult about magic with Marino-san and Hatsumi-san. It’s the best environment to train yourself.” I let out a sigh in relief. Come to think of it, this person is no less a training idiot than Kousuke, huh. “Back to our conversation, if you can’t stand the difference in ability, why not try asking him directly? Why did he want to become stronger so bad? Unexpectedly, I think he might casually just answer. Rather, I want to know his reason too. Why don’t we try asking him together?” I imagine myself and sempai asking him together...;.. “No, I will ask him myself.” I answered so. Sempai responded with: “I see” and nod. “...;..in the future, Takioto might become the target of jealousy more than ever before, huh.” Speaking of that. I cut in. “The situation might become even worse. But that is still just a possibility. If he plays it well then something like that won’t happen.” But “If it for his goal then he doesn’t seem to care about his own reputation.” That’s my thoughts. Rather, isn’t that what’s happening right now? “It is as you said. However, he is not alone. That’s the one thing I can say for sure.” Yukine-san stands in front of me with an expression that’s more serious than before. “No matter how Takioto is hated by the other students, I will never give up being his ally.” “I don’t think he is a bad person after all” she said that and laugh. Then it came to me, the reason why Kousuke trusted her so much despite the short time he knows her. “That’s my intention but, Ludivine Marie-Ange de la Trefle-dono. What about you?” When she asked me, I try thinking about Kousuke. The only thing that came up to my mind is the incident at Hanamura hotel. Betrayed by a person that served the Trefle house for over ten years, in that situation that can only bring me despair, he became my shield despite the danger to his life. And despite knowing my true personality, he did not pull away from me. Rather, it has become easier for us to get along since I can talk to him without minding myself. Was there anyone outside my family beside Claris that I can put my trust in and just be myself? “I will continue being Kousuke’s ally too.” . . “I would be lonely without a ramen friend, right?” After I said that, Yukine-san let out a laugh. “Then it’s fine. If something happens I will be there to support you. Well, he doesn’t look like he needed our help in the first place though. This time the incident looks like it would resolve itself even if we don’t do anything too. I don’t know how it will turn out in the end though. “Hahaha” Yukine-san laughed. There are a lot of people that know how hard Kousuke worked like Marino-san, Hatsumi-san, myself and Claris. But, I felt that the one who knows it best is Yukine-san. “Alright, I will get back to my training then. Do you want to join me, Ludi?” Yukine-san refreshingly said so. I give her a big smile and...; Give her a firm refusal with a shake of my head. Yukine-san and Kousuke’s training is already bordering a masochist territory. It’s impossible for me. They often said something like “it’s just a light running” and do a full marathon. I felt a little guilty when I saw sempai’s depressed expression though. — Ludi’s POV ————— “Aah, so delicious.” Said Marino-san after she drank Kousuke’s coffee. Since the Majin incident, she has been quite busy and when she finally has time to have dinner with us after a long time, Kousuke just brewed them some coffee and left for his training. “Truly delicious.” Said Hatsumi-san after she drank her coffee with a mountain of sugars. “Kuh” Claris is bitterly drinking her tea. Yes, not just coffee, even his tea is delicious. When I asked him how he could brew such delicious coffee and tea he said “Oh, I thought it might be a good idea to quit school and open my own cafe.” or so he said. Leaving the place I want to retort aside, it looks like he is trying to evade the subject. He said that part about quitting is a joke but I wonder about the real reason. Is it because of his love for his deceased parents? Then it can’t be helped that he find it difficult to say. If it’s Kousuke, he might be afraid that the talk would turn the mood heavy and change the subject out of his consideration. “I thought about having a word with him if he is playing around too much but it seems like he calculates his attendance and properly attended the classes he’s not good at too...;” As Marino-san said, Kousuke has been attending the classes that he is poor at. If he is a delinquent like the rumor said then he wouldn’t attend such classes. “Rather, his growth is quite remarkable.” Hatsumi-san indifferently speaks. Claris also let out a dry laugh, since she has been losing a lot recently she is probably the one who felt his growth the most. “His growth is so fast to the extent that I thought he tried some dangerous drugs.” “I want one too.” I understand Hatsumi-san’s feeling but such a drug doesn’t exist in reality, right? “As expected, He was doing something while skipping all those classes, huh?” Marino-san nodded in agreement with Claris’s words. “Yes, he did. He even leaves behind an academy record. And that record...;. it’s quite abnormal too.” “Umm...;.abnormal?” Marino-san nodded to my words. “Yeah, it’s weird. It shows that Kou-chan has been repeatedly challenging the beginner dungeon...;. That I can understand. Tsukuyomi Dungeon is still not open for the first year students after all.” Tsukuyomi dungeon is a dungeon that incomparably much more difficult than the beginner dungeon. For this reason, only those who beat the beginner dungeon and received a certain amount of dungeon education are allowed to enter. The mandatory education is scheduled to end around the beginning of the next month but since you still have to take the test, you can only enter that dungeon after the test is over. Marino-san follows up and said “Since it is a personal record, this is actually classified information.” as a preface. “You see, Kou-chan has been diving into the dungeon multiple times a day you know? Normally it would be enough to enter once a day right? Leaving the lunch break aside, he only has two hours to work with. That in itself is quite unusual already but what’s even more unusual is that he completely captured the dungeon within that time frame too.” “Haa..” Marino-san sighed. “He completely captured it multiple times a day? Excuse me Marino-sama, if memory serves me right I remember that the beginner dungeon consisted of ten floors?” Claris who never challenged the beginner dungeon asked. “Yes, that’s right. Ten floors...; I haven’t checked with the other record but there’s no mistake that his record is the fastest recorded captured time in the academy.” “Just what exactly Takioto-sama has been doing in that dungeon?” Claris’s question is the one that is on everyone’s mind. “If we know that then it would help us understand Kou-chan’s rapid growth rate right? He has been running, swinging sword, and doing continuous enchantment (Third and Fourth Hands) even so, that still hardly explains how he could grow so fast. Well, I understand that the things I listed are already odd enough on its own though...;.” Marino-san said so while smiling bitterly. Even the Witch of Tsukuyomi, Marino-san can’t maintain that kind of enchant magic. It is only due to his rare magic constitution that made it possible for him. Seriously, what’s up with the Hanamura house. Even for the Hanamuras, the lineage that produced magicians that leave their name in history, this generation might be their most blessed one. In this generation alone, they have Marino-san, Hatsumi-san who ruled over space-time magic and Kousuke. Before Marino-san’s appearance, some people said that the Hanamuras has changed from the family of magicians to those of merchants. There’s no one saying that anymore. “The strongest point of Kousuke...;...;.. Might be his farsightedness.” Certainly, Kousuke gave off the feeling as if he lived a lot longer than he looked. He might have looked like a fool to the students at the academy but inside he is a firm person. He always switches which side he would show according to the situation. He has something like a core that the other students don’t have. The sorrowful expression that he sometimes shows and the mysterious words that he sometimes speaks made his impression like he has cheated his age. However, given the thing he has been through, it may have been unavoidable. “...;To me, it looks like he is rushing.” Marino-san muttered so. Everyone in the room went silent. Surely, it looked like that if we think about it. Normally, a person wouldn’t madly train himself like that. “I’m sorry, it’s not my place to say this.” Marino-san said so while looking at me. So it was like that...; But I don’t want her to tell me either. I want to see with my own eyes and get to know him by myself then, if possible, help him. “Somehow, I’m jealous of Kou-chan...;” Marino-san looked at us and muttered. “I will ask him why he keeps diving into the dungeon. Since it’s him he might just be enjoying his growth and dive in for fun after all.” When I said so, Marino-san bitterly smiles and nod. “Anything goes if it comes to Kou-chan, right?” We agreed on that. *PAN* Marino-san claps her hands. “Anyway, Kou-chan has been trying his best to improve himself. Let’s give him something as a reward for his hard work. The thing at the academy might make him depressed after all.” She said so and wink. The first one to nod along with her is Hasumi-san. However, since the LLL has been bothering him, the one who has to make up for him the most might be me. I wanted to say that it’s not my fault though. “What should I do for him?” I tried asking. “Right, for example [praising him], [give him a massage], [give him something he likes], [sleeping together], [pat his head], [sleeping together], [picking his ear], [sleeping together], or [sleeping together] How about it?” Why is she recommending sleeping together so much? Did she try to lighten the mood with a joke? Speaking of which, that guy is a pervert though. “That sounds fun” I answered with a bitter smile Realistically speaking, a massage might be good. He just went out for his katana practice too, it might be a good opportunity. I have to ask Claris to teach me first. Thinking so I sip the royal milk tea he brewed for me. Then I turn my gaze toward Claris and I have to frown. She is a maid in name only, her main job is to act as a knight on my protective detail. However, as a maid stationed at the Hanamura house, serving tea is still her job. She is originally a lady from a good family so knowledge about tea was already drilled into her, the tea she brews is also delicious. However, his tea is more fragrant than that of Claris. The balance of milk, sugar, and honey is also exquisite. It felt like it was brewed exclusively for me. Claris’ tea was also brewed differently than mine so I think that he also brewed it to suit her taste too. “Kuh” Was it delicious? I understand that you are bitter about it but you don’t have to drink it so vexingly. Come to think of it, after Hatsumi-san left the room, Marino-san said something like “With this the future of the Hanamura house is safe”. I wonder what she is talking about. ———– Author Note: Since they know what happened to the Takioto family, a lot of misunderstandings stemmed from it. Next up will be the result of such misunderstandings. After washing my sweat-soaked body in the bath, I return to my room and take out the coffee-flavored milk from the refrigerator. I am contemplating how convenient it is to have a refrigerator in your own room while sitting on a high-chair and reach for a book on the table. At the moment I was about to turn the page, I heard a knock from the door. I know who it is from the sound of knocking. If it is Ludi or Claris, they would call out to me after they knocked on the door and Marino-san would come in immediately after the knock. What would you do if I was doing something naughty? I call out to the person at the door while inserting the bookmark inside the magic book. “What is it, Nee-san?” When I call out, Nee-san opens the door and enters the room. She sat on the bed without saying anything and *Pon pon* slap the bed as to beckon me to sit next to her. I don’t know what she wanted to do but I sat down at the place she beckoned. Okay, what now? “Umm, Nee-san. What are you doing?” *Pon Pon* She lightly pat my head. “Like this?” She then pressed her hand and start stroking my head. “Umm, what’s wrong?” Well, how should I put this? If you suddenly entered the room and start stroking my head, I can’t help but get embarrassed, right? When her scent comes in through my nose at such close distance there’s no way I am not gonna be embarrassed. “Kousuke is working hard.” Is Nee-san praising me? Or did she tried to cheer me up? I don’t remember doing something worth being praised or cheering though. “Cheered up?” “Y, yes” Rather than that, it’s more like I have to hold myself down now. Of course, since I am a gentleman, I can keep it from showing on my face. However, since she is so close that pent up energy ended up concentrating at that part instead. Shit. “Muu..” She looked at me and let out such a voice. Did she realize how stimulated I am right now? Or did she noticed that my bottom part is in a bad state right now?. “Do you want me to stroke your thigh?” Maybe it is because I was facing down. Nee-san suddenly suggested so. Is this a cabaret club? Did I wander off to a cabaret club when I was reading? Since I suddenly got myself stuck in the world of eroge, I won’t even be surprised if I suddenly find myself in a cabaret club though. Maybe she took my silence as the confirmation, she started stroking my thigh. “How is it?” It felt so good I’m gonna go crazy. “N, Nee-san wait a minute.” Nee-san stopped her hand and I start speaking in a hurry. “It, it was very satisfying! I am super cheered up! I am so full of energy right now I can even use GenkiDama!” (TLN: DBZ: Spirit bomb = Genki Dama/ Genki = Cheerful, energetic) “Energetic Balls?” Seems like there’s no Dragonball manga in this world. “I, I’m fine now. Let’s leave it at that! That’s why, Thank you Nee-san!” I grabbed Nee-san hand and put it back on her thigh. “Is that so...;...;...;...;.” But Nee-san didn’t let go of my hand. “Alright...;...;...;...;...;.” She said so and open the futon with her other hand. It’s no exaggeration to say that I am extremely confused right now. What is she trying to do in the first place? Even if you said “Alright” there are many kinds of “Alright”, the kind that permits me to enter the bed or the kind where you permit your pet to eat its food like “Alright, Dig in! No, let’s calm down. Let’s try directly asking her intention first. “N, Nee-san, what exactly are you trying to do here?” “When you are tired, sleeping is the best.” So it was “it’s OK to enter the bed” kind of alright. Looking at the situation right now it can’t be anything else. However, what Nee-san said is true, nothing can refute that. Sleeping is effective in healing both mental and physical exhaustion. But you know, why did you say that while holding my hand, Nee-san? “R, Right. Then, I will change and go to bed...;.” I turn my gaze toward the door. I was about to say “Since I’m going to change my clothes please leave the room” then...; “Understood.” It seems like she didn’t understand what I tried to say at all. There’s no sign that she will leave the room, her body didn’t even move a millimeter from her spot. “N, Nee-san. I think that Umm, wouldn’t it be embarrassing if you see me changing clothes so...;..” To what I said, she looked down and blushed. “I am embarrassed too...;...;..” THEN GET OUUUUUUUUUUUT. Ah, she showed no sign of leaving at all. “Don’t worry, I will cover my eyes.” She said so and release my hand. She then covers her face with her both hands. There are gaps between her fingers though. It’s the same as Marino-san when I have that near-miss incident with Hatsumi-san at the bathroom! Seriously, like parent like child! Let’s leave that aside. “Un, understood.” I’m not sure what I understood but let’s change for now. I will try not to mind the gazes that coming through the gaps between her fingers. If I start taking off my clothes she might shut her eyes after all. I took out my sleepwear from the closet. I glanced at Nee-san, I felt the room temperature drops below freezing point like It was in the middle of winter. FINE. I stopped thinking and take off my clothes under Nee-san’s gaze. Nee-san, Hand, Hand, the gap is widening. You are literally staring at me. “Umm, Nee-san” “I don’t see any green pants at all.” YOU ARE TOTALLY STARING! After I’m done changing, I head toward Nee-san and enter the futon. When I thought that the shame play is finally over, she started taking off her clothes. “N, Nee-san. W, What are you doing?” Nee-san maintains her usual expression while her cheek is blushing a little. “Sleep together.” She whispered so and put her Jacket on the side. Was there any part of sleeping together that require taking your clothes off? As I was still confused, Nee-san keeps taking off her clothes. She pulled out a negligee from who knows where and change into it. It was huge. Nee-san flips open the futon and insert herself next to me. Our bodies are in close contact. My head is about to boil over. Umm, seriously, what is this? Why am I sleeping together with Nee-san? Is she being manipulated by a demon? “Kousuke.” “Hm?” “Turn over” When I turn to look over my shoulder under the futon, I was hugged by Nee-san. Is this Eden? Wonderful. It felt like all the happiness I experience so far condensed into one and wrap around my head. I am so happy I’m gonna go crazy, It’s like someone directly injected drugs into my brain. What war? What religion? What eroge!? The paradise is already here!!! LOVE AND PEACE! No, wait a minute...; let’s calm down and face reality. What’s going on exactly? At first, it was just head patting. Then it was thigh stroking. When I noticed it these bouncy things are already in front of me. It’s no use...; I can only think using onomatopoeia. But no matter how much I think, I can only think that she is inviting me. No, but, I’m not in love with Nee-san or anything. If I turned into a beast here, what if she reports it to Marino-san then? What will happen to my life? It’s the line I mustn’t cross. Think about the RTA. A stable strategy is always better than a dangerous one. Alright, calm down. Remember the strategy I used against her in Magiero. There might be a way to escape this situation there. Capturing Nee-san. Nee-san was Umm.. the character that taught the protagonist the space-time magic...;.. Umm, she gave the cheat acceleration spell to the protagonist and...;.. Umm. (NEE-SAN IS NOT EVEN ONE OF THE CAPTURE TARGEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEET). I screamed in my heart. What now? What should I do? The demon inside me whispers. Demon: Oi oi, Nee-san has already invited you to this extent right? Don’t mind your standing within the Hanamura house and JUST DO IT. This is not good. Angel inside me please stop this Demon. I beg you, please stop him. Angel: Let’s do it gently while caring for Hatsumi-san here. There’s no such thing as an Angel. The voices are unanimous. Alright, to hell with warrior enduring his hunger to maintain dignity. It’s a man’s shame do deny an advance from a woman. (TLN: Real JP proverb is a warrior used a toothpick even when he didn’t eat anything. Its meaning is that the warrior always keeps his dignity even when he got nothing to eat.) My heart is set. I squeeze Nee-san’s hand that is currently embracing me. “N, Nee-san...;” I finally raised my voice but there was no response. I raise my face and finally notice. “Z...;...;Zzz...;...;...;...;...;z” “Sh, She’s slee...;ping.” Then what should I do about this tent? “...;...;...;...;...;...;...;.Let’s sleep.” I said so and close my eyes but...;...; “Nnn” Nee-san slightly moves and put more power into her arm that is currently wrapped around me and start breathing normally. “You know...;.” I can’t help feeling her scent and the soft touch of her skin with her every breath. “...;...;...;...;...;I can’t sleep.” ———————- Author Note: Since Takioto overslept the next day, he got into a quarrel with Ludi who come wake him up. “Gunununu” Katrina let out a word that can’t likely be heard from someone besides an anime character after comparing my test results to her. Certainly, there are subjects that I’m not good at. However, since I have taken the classes seriously (When I’m attending), my score is not so bad. In Ludi’s words [The test this time is very easy, if you listened to the lecture seriously you can even get a full score.] A guy like me who got only half has nothing else to say. Katrina seems to be in more danger than me though. Iori shows his face from behind Katrina and peeks at my and Katrina’s score. As if seeing a guy with a telephone card from an eroge store in the age of the smartphone, He made a surprised expression and look at Katrina then turned his gaze back at her score again. You have to look twice, huh...;...;.. Katrina looks frustrated, she brings the test result over to my desk. Oi, That’s my test, you know. “You heartless bastard! What happened when you said that we were soul friend!!” I can only scratch my cheek. I mean, it was that easy right? I don’t think I can get a score that low. Ludi who put on her Ojou-sama appearance at school (She’s an actual princess though) is currently showing off her beautiful smile. She has been doing that but the moment she saw Katrina’s test, I will never forget that shocked expression on her face. “What, I just lost because I have been worried about this guy! My score is even in the safety zone right!” She said so and sit down then sulkily flopped down on the table. “Eh, you were?” I said to Katrina with my pure surprise. In the game. Katrina was not a character that got along with Takioto in the first place. By the way, the reason they didn’t get along was that Takioto in the game is a genuine Ero devil, so it was entirely on him. Ludi was supposed to treat me like an insect too but that also changed. As I said that she raised her face. She grinds her teeth and *puff* turned away from me. “It’s not like I was worried about you, I was just annoyed at those small-minded fools that keep making fun of you.” How should I put this, isn’t her excuse sounded a bit ridiculous? “Sorry’ bout that, since I made you worried about me I’m giving you this. Thanks.” I grinningly said so and put her favorite chocolate on her desk. She snatched it up and bitterly looking at me. Maybe her face is red because of the embarrassment? Katrina immediately peeled off the seal and put the chocolate into her mouth. I take out the chocolates for myself and hand some of them to Iori and Ludi. Then, when I was about to eat it, an Orange head appeared from behind Katrina. “Yo! Iori, Kousuke. How was the test?” Said Orange head who is making his way toward us. “Well, better than you.” I haven’t seen the score yet but I think that was the case. I can’t say that my score is good but I’m confident that I am doing better than Orange. He might even be worse off than Katrina and got himself exile ( to the academic training camp (TLN: AKA Supplement classes)) Additionally, Takioto also got exiled in the game. He’s a regular there in the first place. I threw one of the chocolate at Orange and he dexterously catches it with his mouth. “Oi oi, what are you saying man? You haven’t even seen the score yet right?.” He then showed me his score. Yup, as I thought, my score is higher than him. “Kousuke-kun’s score isn’t so bad...;...;It’s not good too though. Iori said so and confirm Orange’s score. This guy, since he got the highest score among the three of us, he’s looking down on us a bit, huh. “Well, I did listen to the class seriously.” Even If I said that take it seriously, my starting point for some of the subjects is minus instead of zero. If you have the knowledge from Japan then, of course, you would make some mistakes. “Damn, my score is the worst, huh.” Orange dropped his shoulders and said so after he looked at Iori’s score. Then after he revived, he heads over to attack Katrina. “Yo, Katou. Show me your score.” “What.” Her sharp gaze directed at Orange but he didn’t retreat. Orange shows her his score. Judging from the bitter look on Katrina, It’s clear who got the lowest score among us. Looking at her trembling hand, Orange burst into laughter. “You, the s, s score, seriously. Sooooo Pfft, Ugyeh-” His laughter doesn’t last. Taking Katrina’s merciless Russian hook, he kissed the ground. He took it in the chin though, is he okay? Recently, I feel like Orange has been playing Takioto Kousuke’s role but...;.. Well, must have been my imagination, let’s put it like that. After releasing her professional boxer move, “This doesn’t feel like my victory at all...;..” She left that parting word and return to her seat. I think it’s your win in a lot of ways though. Iori watched Orange who is spasming on the ground and...; “Come to think of it...;.. The afternoon class will start soon, let’s move guys.” It seems like he decided to leave it alone. Since it would be troublesome if he comes back and haunt us I will at least pray for him, Amen. I gently brushed away the hand that looks like it is seeking for help and left the room with the other. ———— To me, who can’t find any meaning in the afternoon classes, my only choices are to head home or to head to the dungeon. For now, there’s no need for me to rush through the beginner dungeon to meet the minimum times either. Rather than doing that, it is better to challenge other dungeons outside the academy. With that being the case, the first dungeons I want to challenge first are the DLC dungeon that you got from the first limited edition and the store limited DLC dungeon [Delicious looking Books]. The time I can challenge the dungeon outside of the academy will depend on that dungeon’s difficulty. The first edition dungeon and the store limited dungeon can be accessed relatively quickly. On the other hand, some dungeons can’t be entered in the first lap and only available from the second playthrough on. “Aah~ but it just...;...;...;...;.” I spoke to myself and realized that I am still inside the academy, so I look around. Due to it being the time for the afternoon classes, the library is basically empty. Seems like no one heard when I was talking to myself. If it’s lunch break or after the afternoon classes are over then it might be quite embarrassing. I return my gaze to the document. As far as my simple research goes, there’s almost no information on the first edition dungeon, store limited dungeon, or other easily exploitable DLC dungeons. I might need to confirm with Nee-san or Marino-san but it is possible that these dungeons haven’t been discovered yet. There are a lot of DLC dungeons that are necessary for me to get stronger. That being the case, search and verification are necessary. I need to look at materials related to the dungeons so I ask the librarian where I can find it. I found a good looking map (with simple dungeon locations) and got permission to make a copy of it so I bring it to the photocopier. A woman entered my sight. I have to endure not letting out any voice. She’s a woman with fox ears. Two ears popped out from her golden hair and two soft tails appeared from her waist. At first glance, you can tell that she is of the race that didn’t exist on earth, a beastman. Wearing a floral pattern cardigan over her well-worn uniform, she is unmistakably one of the sub-heroines. (She finishes already!?) Trying not to show my shaken self, I head toward the photocopier. By coming to the library it is possible to encounter this fox eared sub-heroine. According to the setting of Magiero, Most Beastmen are not good at magic so it’s rare for you to encounter one at Tsukuyomi magic academy. Thanks to the Susanou martial arts school patch, which is well-known as a god patch, the encounter of these beastmen go up explosively. However, there are some beastmen that are good at magic. The typical examples are the fox-tribe and the raccoon-tribe. She is one of the fox-tribe, a character that good at both hallucination magic and curses. In the game, when you are underleveled, you need to rely on status effects (paralysis, poison, burning, etc.) to power level. The curse that can lower the opponent’s status is especially useful so there are a lot of gentlemen that recruit her into their party. Moreover, she is CUTE. Her cuteness is probably the most important reason to have her in the party. She also helped me out in a lot of ways. Nonetheless, to get along with her, you need a certain food. I was thinking about preparing some but I don’t have time to ferment since the test was just over. Can Takioto trigger an event in the first place? I can also have Iori hold on to some and let him trigger it too. Her ability is so useful for dungeon diving so I will have her carry me after we get along better. If we get along I will try touching her tails too. You don’t have to come to the dungeon with me but at least let me touch your tail, please. (My honest wish.) No, wait a minute. I thought as I pick up the copy from the machine. Isn’t it fine if I proceed while ignoring the game’s scenario? I have been taking action that deviated from the game too. There will be more cases where it will not go according to the game in the future. It’s not like I am doing anything bad so should I try calling out to her? But I don’t know what to talk about. Is there any topic I can...;...;...; When I was contemplating how I should talk with her, this happened. “Ah, Found you!” As I heard the sweetened honey-like voice, I turn back to look. “Mou, why won’t you come to my class?!” (TLN: forgive me, I can’t find anything that sounds natural to replace Mou.) Standing there is a petite woman with strawberry-blond hair. “Lu, Luijya-sensei.” A very cute woman who has drooping eyes with a mole under it, along with the supreme voice, it’s aromatherapy-sensei. I think I did something bad. Once we moved to the third magic laboratory, She explains the detail to me. Apparently, Luijya-sensei did a lot of research on my constitution ever since the [Ei Ei OH] in her class that day. However, since I no longer attend her afternoon class, she complained about it to Nee-san and somehow realize that I am her relative and is currently living with her. “Hatsumi is my junior, you know! We often dive into the dungeon together too.” Sensei said so while lowering her eyes, looking nostalgic. A private lesson with this KAWAII-sensei...;...; wait, private lesson...;...;.isn’t that kinda sound erotic? “So that is the case.” “It is! Eh, Hatsumi didn’t tell you?” Speaking of which, I never heard anything about her having a friend at the academy. It might be rude of me but Nee-san doesn’t strike me like the type that has a lot of friends so...;...;I was afraid of the landmine so I didn’t ask. I almost never have seen her go out with a friend too. “She doesn’t talk much in the first place.” Yeah, she said with a bitter smile. “But Hatsumi talk about you a lot you know?” I can’t imagine my Nee-san who rarely talks about anything like that at all. “It’s true!” Apparently, the thought was showed on my face. More importantly, you can talk to Nee-san? That fact was what curious me the most. “Umm, Can you explain this soon?” A sucker is attached to an elongated tube. It looks like some kind of measuring device with an electrocardiogram. But, how should I put this, I am worried about the machine that it is attached too. “This? You should know just by looking right? It’s the magic measuring device.” Nope, I’ve seen a lot of things at the Hanamura house but I am completely clueless about this thing. “Then what is this?” I point at the thing that protrudes from the side of the machine, there’s something that looks like a winding handle that looks like it should be protruding out from a sheep’s head instead. “That’s a horn.” That’s not it, I know that already. I am not acting out an English textbook. I just want to know what it is for. “And why is a horn attached to this machine?” “I don’t know.” I crouch down and hold my head. I stood up with the will of steel to leave the previous question aside and decided to ask the next question. “I know that this thing is the machine’s display but what I am curious about is the input device underneath it (Like a keyboard). On top of having a lot of skull marks on it, why are a lot of switches are turned on?” “I don’t know either.” “I just remembered that I have a business to attend to.” As I was about to turn away, Luijya-sensei firmly grabbed my shoulder. “Please waiiit! I already confirmed with Hatsumi that you have nothing planned for today.” NEE-SAN! “It’s okay. I was nervous the first time I see it too but It’s safe. Ee, I borrowed it from a genius inventor that the academy even set their eyes on so it must be safe. Since I told you that it’s fine, everything will be fine. Probably.” I can hear nothing but a self-affirmation though. But I heard something I couldn’t miss at the end. “Luijya-sensei, have you test this device before?” Can you not blatantly avert your eyes. “...;.By the way, who was the person that invented this?” “You probably don’t know her but...;...;it’s from Anemone-san.” I involuntarily frown. I put both my hands on her shoulder and shook her head. “Sensei, I won’t say anything bad but let’s return this.” Anemone is a companion and a sub-heroine that you will definitely encounter after advancing through the game. She is one of the characters in Magiero that possessed a top-level tragic past. She is certainly a genius. That is an unchangeable fact. She is a character that got nicknamed Mad Scientist by the gentlemen. Some even called her [Ero-Scientist] or [Mazo-Scientist] too. (Don’t get me wrong. We, gentlemen, have been in the care of a lot of her inventions, The nicknames were used with respect attached.) She ranked highly in the popular vote. The game’s Takioto described this Ero-Scientist as “A genius but a weird person. A beauty unmatched even among the elf with a moderate chest.” and gave her an A rating. But in reality, the gentlemen will raise her rating by several levels. She is certainly cute but what’s more important is how wonderful she will develop. However, her invention won’t be of any help if the user is a man (Some men might consider it a reward though). As expected this is. “Please use it first, Sensei.” Honestly speaking, I want to see. Sensei muttered “No way” and pulled away from me a little. “Somehow I can only feel a bad vibe from this thing...;. In the first place, I borrowed this thing after I consult with her about your constitution. That’s why this machine is made for you. It’s not something I can use. And she even said that if I report the result to her she won’t tell anyone about that too...;..” Now now, did I just hear something disturbing? “Hou, something that you can’t let other people hear?” “Haeee” She averted her eyes and fidgeting while her body keeps getting smaller and smaller. You’re a teacher, right? Why did you easily let your own student grab hold of your own weakness? I wanted to say that but I remember that she has that kind of setting. Rather, the one who holds on to her secret in the game was the protagonist. “...;..Understood. Let’s do it...;.but please tell me everything.” “Eh, Umm, that’s a bit...;..” “I swear, I won’t do anything bad.” “Th, Then...;..” “DON’T GIVE IT UP SO EASILY!” I involuntarily hold my head. “You’ve been fooled again Sensei. From the looks on your face, you do understand right?” In the game, in order to develop a relationship with Luijya-sensei, the place that you will be visiting to meet up with her is not her classroom. (You have to attend once to get flag though.) The place you will be meeting her is at a naughty establishment. When Takioto just throws a straight ball at Iori with “Dude, let’s visit an ero-shop together”, they went to a certain establishment together (You can refuse but a gentleman always chooses to go without hesitation) There, you will be able to talk with her who work there for the first time. Incidentally, Takioto did something rude to the employee and got thrown out of the store so he didn’t meet with sensei. I think that his action is almost perfect as a friend character of an eroge protagonist. If he got caught by a Gay employee and got offered his service then he would get a full 100 point from me. “Yes...;.” In the game, Luijya-sensei started that part-time job because she was short on money. Although it was not stated in detail but to help her out of her debt, the protagonist has to hand her the amount of money that can’t be earned even if you save up the entire first playthrough. At the same time, Sensei who got her financial secret exposed to the protagonist was something like his gofer. Resolving her financial problem is like a power move. If she was more popular with the gentlemen then there might be a story patch to reveal the reason she ended up like this. Unfortunately, that was not the case. Since I was a fan of the person who voiced her, I liked her a lot but 30s is still a no go huh? “I am sympathized with you somehow so please spill everything out to me.” “Eeh, for my sake...;?” ISN’T IT BECAUSE I CAN’T LEAVE YOU ALONE!? When I glared at her, her body keeps getting smaller. “S, shorry.” “Oh, well. For now, let’s use Anemone-sempai’s machine and be done with it. After that..” You understand right?, I sent her such a look. “Y, Yes...;Eh, can we really use this machine?” “Anemone-sempai is the one who you must not let her know your secret the most, you know” Especially for a woman. Some men want to be treated like a dog so I won’t say anything. “Is it really okay?” She looked at me with the eyes that’s like she is looking at something unbelievable. If you are so nervous about it then don’t talk about using this machine in the first place. It can’t be helped then. I took off my stole and clothes to put on the suckers. When I took off my white shirt, she let out a sigh out of astonishment. “Haeeee, wow...;.” It’s not to the extent of a bodybuilder but I do have a firm body. Sensei reaches her hand out to touch my body. At first, she was nervous but now she’s quite bold. But, you know. It tickles. “Sensei, the preparation...;...;” “Y, YES, IMMEDIATELY!” Then she took out what seems to be a manual and read it while preparing the machine. Though, when I peeked at its content a sigh escaped me. “...;. So I have to take off my pants too?” “Pl, Please.” I loosened the belt and pull the pants down in one go. Sensei who was watching put both her hands up to cover her eyes. There’s a gap between her fingers though. Is it a trend or something? Was it a fashion for teachers in this academy to peek at their student from the gap between their fingers? In the first place though, aren’t you already in your thirties? Can you not be so nervous around a man’s naked body? Maybe there’s a one in a million chance that I am categorized as an Ikemen? “Sensei, can you hurry up...;...;..” “S, Sorry...;.Kyaa.” She tripped over empty air and dive full force toward me. I caught her but her hand is now located at my important place...;...; “Hawa, Hawawawawa.” “Oouf.” Somehow, this reward. It will be bad in a lot of ways so please, hurry and let it go. “I’m, I’m SORRYY.” When we return to our senses, I attached the suckers on my body and ask sensei to start up the device. —————- Author note: A little behind the scene story. In Magiero Luijya-sensei will not participate in the combat. In return, she can develop items, magics since her combat power was below a threshold. Anemone-sempai, on the other hand, can play both the roles of developer and dive into the dungeon with you as a combatant. However, it has been evaluated that she is better off developing items and magics. But it doesn’t matter whether you use her as a developer or not, in the end, it will depend on the player’s preference. Well, in RTA whether the character is strong or you like her or not doesn’t matter. All that matters is can you use them? Also, because RTA is usually done in a low-level dungeon since you have to deal with trash mobs, there are situations that some characters are better for the job than a strong one. For example, the voucher in dragon quest 6 on super Famicom. While a character looked so strong, you tried to recruit them as your companion only to be met with despair. In the event, they always used something like [Radiant], [Aura] or [Dragon Slash] but the moment you got them into your party, they seem to forget all of that. A character with a class like Gladiator (TLN: Battlemaster in JP version) that have to master warrior and martial artist classes before you can become one would turn back to being just a warrior, match-fixing bastard (They unlearned all the useful skills from the martial artist class). Moreover, their level will be too low so it was hard to use them, Drango (TLN: Lizzie in English version) was practically naked when she joined the party. (I think there’s a lot of demand there) But it is different when it comes to the RTA. The members you will be using will be the highest from the start and they will be of use until the end of the game. Well, he was called [The Blue Flash] or [ Wandering swordsman] but in the end, he’s just a tool specialist cum healer though. Warrior (Healer). I don’t know anymore “...;...;.Are, are you okay?” Sensei calls out from a few meters away. “If you are asking me whether I’m safe or not, then I am physically fine but mentally, I think I’m not...;...;” “I’m, I’m sorry. B, but we got some data...;...;.” “We broke the machine though.” I sigh while looking at the machine that is currently spilling out smoke at the corner of the room. As expected the Ero-Scientist’s invention can not be taken lightly. If Luijya-sensei were to use it, not only the machine, my crotch might be exploding too. “Even so...;as expected it seems like you really can’t expel magic power outside...;..” “Even when with that much absorption power, only a little came out. It doesn’t seem like it’s gonna be useful even if we try to force it out huh.” I sighed. On the other hand, Sensei put her hand under her chin and start talking. “Even though you usually don’t release it much but you always have that much magic power stored inside right?” “Yes, it’s to the extent that I am surprised that my body can contain such amount.” “If we assume that the amount inside is the same as a normal person then maybe it was originating from a different place? If that is the case then Hatsumi’s different dimension conservatory theory will be proven. But there’s also the theory that Faust and other researchers have proposed about how magic is formed from small magic particle too...;..” Or so she muttered to herself. “Unexpectedly, it might be possible that both theories might be right.” To what I muttered to myself. “If we can prove that then it will become a great historical discovery, you know...;..” She responds with a serious expression. Well, that area is not my expertise so I can’t say anything more. Anyway, I will think about it later. I place my hand on Sensei’s shoulder. “Then sensei. It’s time to honor our promise right?” I speak with a smile on my face. She turned her head shakily like a machine that was not well-oiled. “Do I really have to talk about it?” She asked. “Yes.” She performs an ideal Seiza on the ground (I didn’t say anything, she did that on her own) and began to speak while grasping the hem of her clothes. It was as I thought, the cause of it all is money. According to sensei, she lost her money paying off debt and taxes. Then the Ero-Scientist came to know that she is currently working part-time at a naughty establishment to pay off her debt. In exchange for her silence, she has to do everything she says, take the disaster this time for an example. (Seems like she was the one who said that she would do anything herself.) Well, the only one who falls victim to the Ero-Scientist this time is me though. “Rather, you were actually deceived to pay all of those right?” I can’t confirm since I just heard the story from her, but in Japan, I know that she is paying for something that should be exempted. Is this world really that different from Japan? But I think what she has to pay is still too much. “Umm, but the person from the trader said...;...;” “Did you properly confirm the contract’s content?” The more I listen to her, the more things I think that she is paying for something that she doesn’t have to. Moreover, I think that someone is tricking her to pay all that. A person who easily trust other people like sensei would be easy to fool. The amount of money is too inflated after all. “Why did you leave it alone until it becomes like this?” “Umm...;., you see.” “...;...;...;.How old are you? How many years have you been in society?” “Hii” Looking at her half-crying face, I let out a sigh. If I were in her shoes then I would want to cry too. A student is lecturing her about money after all. “I’, I’m shoory.” Seeing her hanging her head while performing seiza, I sigh again. This problem requires a lot of money to solve in the game. Since I have already come so far, I should take the responsibility until the end, huh. “Sensei, please guide me to your house.” “M, my house...;..d, don’t tell me you are trying to blackmail me to do that!?” “...;..It seems there’s a big misunderstanding here.” “Hawa, Hawawawa, but...;...;” WHAT A PAIN! “...;...;Please show me all your bankbooks and debt contracts at your house!!” I took out my smartphone and call the first person on my contact list in this world. She’s a woman who is also a widow with a child. “Ah, Marino-san? I have a request, can you please introduce me to a tax accountant and a lawyer...;..?” As expected, Marino-san was surprised. She goes [HoEeeee] in surprise. Just how old are you? — In the end, Luijya-sensei’s debt was not paid off but it was able to be reduced considerably. The total amount was really surprising. It was to the extent that the tax accountant introduced by Marino-san had a hard time about it. For me, it is to the extent that I have to endure not to vomit my inside out. Luijya-sensei said “He made a safe monthly repayment plan for me.” but that monthly amount was also terrible, she was deceived to pay this in the first place. It was an amount that I would fail to pay if I didn’t win a lottery. “It’s a relief that she doesn’t have to sell her organs.” The lawyer said that with a serious expression before he left. By the way, it seems that a magician’s organs do sell really well. I wonder what they are used for. There were a lot of terrible problems but most of it was resolved by the lawyer. I even needed to visit some scary looking Nii-sans place (It was really terrifying) but I just said [I’m Hanamura Kousuke, the Hanamura clan is ready to go to war with you (Legally and Physically)]. As expected of the peerless Hanamura clan. By the way, the scene was so funny because both my and the opponent’s legs are shaking. Marino-san and I who received the report from the lawyers let out a huge sigh after they left the room. “About the remaining debt, the Hanamura clan will be buying the full amount.” Marino-san sinks her body into the expensive-looking leather chair and put the coffee that has already gone cold into her mouth. “Now we can rest assured without worrying about the debtor any more right?...;.” According to Marino-san, this aromatherapy human (Debtful Arasaa (TLN: 30s)) is considered as a talented magician. “Seriously...; if she’s just a normal teacher then I would have to expel her before any damage was done to the academy.” “Of course...;...;” It’s the natural course of action from the academy perspective. Thinking about the possibility of Luijya-sensei losing her job at this academy while having to pay off her debt...;...;...; I can’t imagine her future at all. Even so, seeing Marino-san taking this matter seriously without her usual playfulness only tells me how serious this matter really is. She can’t even force herself to play the fool here like when she did with Nee-san’s dinner night view dinner (The meal itself was the night view). “I finally understand why she is living in that rundown apartment. I immediately moved her to a condominium under my name so that she doesn’t take a step in a strange direction anymore. The living fee will be deducted from her salary. I plan to offer it to her at a low price and if everything goes smoothly then her debt should be paid off in ten years.” “Well, of course.” I wonder if it was really a good thing to pay off her debt in ten years. And regarding her old apartment, I don’t think that it was that rundown like Marino-san says. If put to her standard, then the place I stayed at when I was living in Tokyo is the same. Well, considering her salary, it would be a cheap apartment. “So you see, I think she still needs someone to supervise her.” “Well, of course.” Since she left her problem alone until it becomes like that, I would be worried too unless she has someone to take care of her. She is that easy to deceive after all. It would be better to give her pocket money instead of a salary. If she wants something then borrows money and save up to buy it instead. Marino-san who has a sour face until now smiled and put her hand on my shoulder. “Then, Kou-chan. I will leave the debt collection and her supervision to you.” “Of cour...;...;...;..” Right. The person who should take care of her should be close to her, as her student and a gentleman that she has taken care of in the past, I should...;...;.wait? “...;...;...;..se” “Yeah? since I thought that it might turn out like this, I already transfer a lot of things to your name.” “Wait wait, please wait a minute.” I can’t catch up. Eh, me being her supervisor? I am a student and she is a teacher at the academy, you know? “It’s fine, I already transfer the condominium to Kou-chan? And of course, I gave you the whole building.” “I see, then it’s fine! THERE’S NO WAY I WOULD SAY THAT RIGHT!?” Not only her room, she gave me the whole luxury condominium building!! Isn’t that building worth hundreds of millions!? I can’t earn that amount of money even if I spend my lifetime! Whatever, let’s leave it at that for now. “It’s fine, she’s very useful as a magician. I don’t plan to fire her and she will properly pay her debt too.” “You know, I’m not worrying about her debt, the ethical concerns are a lot more concerning here!” “There’s no problem with that too. I already made sure that she will be absolutely obedient to Kou-chan too. Since she said that she is already made up her mind, everything will be fine.” “Hou, that’s a relief...;.NOT! AREN’T YOU JUST MADE IT WORSE!?” Did she threaten to drive her out of the place? Or was she using the money to corner her? “Well, jokes aside, I will leave the debt collection and her supervision to you.” “I want that part to be the joke too though.” The most important detail seems to be true. I let my body sink into the sofa and let out a sigh while taking the coffee to my mouth. I did a lot of shouting so my throat is dry. “Come to think of it, you will be diving in the beginner dungeon with everyone this Saturday right?” “Aah, yes that’s right.” Ludi asked me “Why are you getting so stronger all of the sudden?” with a serious face, so I tell her that I was training in the beginner dungeon and said “Do you want to come too, Ludi?” or so I invited her, which she responded with a nod while making a silly look on her face. Incidentally, I was surprised that Mizumori-sempai, Nee-san, and even Claris-san will also accompany us. Well, I don’t mind though. “I have something to ask you about that.” “What is it?” “You know about the secrets inside the beginner dungeon right, Kousuke? I want you to not share that to anyone else.” I involuntarily frown. “Marino-san, did you know about the eleventh floor?” “No, I didn’t. In the first place, I just heard about the eleventh floor from you just now. It seems that place doesn’t only have ten floors right?” I don’t know how to respond to Marino-san who put on a serious face.  Does Marino-san really didn’t know about the eleventh floor? I don’t know. When there’s something you don’t understand you have to change your perspective. So is there a need to conceal this knowledge? What’s the benefit of that? I don’t think that it is a personal reason. “...;.I don’t plan to blabber about it but I don’t plan to withhold it either when someone asks me. If you don’t want me to talk about it then I won’t but...;...; may I know why?” When I asked her reason, Marino-san made a troubled smile. “I’m sorry but I can’t tell you the reason right now, Soon, the time I will be able to tell you and Hatsumi will come. I want you to wait until then.” ...;...;.I don’t understand. Why can’t Marino-san, the top person of this academy talk about it? Do I have to find out from somewhere else? Should I ask the Hanamura main house? No, wouldn’t it be fine if I indirectly ask Nee-san? “...;...;...;Understood.” There were so many questions in my head but that was the only word that came out from my mouth. “Sorry.” She said so while looking really apologetic. After I left the headmaster’s office, the questions are still flying around inside my head. “Oi” When I press the sugar-free coffee button at the top right of the vending machine, I took out Tsukuyomi Traveller and put my magic power into it. Then it took one second to finish the payment process and the drinks dropped from the vending machines. Umu, I still have a lot of money left. Rather, I got too much pocket money...;.. “OI!” Looking at the opened can of coffee, I suddenly think. Even after I become Takito Kousuke, when something is troubling me I would rely on caffeine like when I was a working adult. “I’M TALKING TO YOU, TAKIOTO KOUSUKE!” Hm, I turn back to look at the person who has been calling out to me. There is a male student with green hair swept to the side, his forehead is welcoming the open air. “What’s wrong?” Judging from his face and uniform, this guy is probably a mob character. Looking at his tie pin, it seems he is in the same year as me. “You are being a nuisance to Lidivine-sama.” What is he saying all of a sudden? It looked like he was scowling at me but since it is so sudden I don’t know what to make of it. “What on earth are you talking about?” “Your existent. Just stop clinging to her already.” This guy is probably a member of LLL, Love Love Ludivine. These guy has been increasing in number ever since the start of this week but a guy that came to complain about me directly to my face is only this guy. “I am just her classmate though...;..” I said that but of course, that was a lie★ We are living together! I can’t tell him something like that though. If I was in his shoes then I might just outright puke out of jealousy. “Aren’t you usually hanging around her? Ludivine-sama is a gentle person. She might not put it into words but she must be troubled by you.” I involuntarily cover my face (TLN: Facepalm?) If it’s Ludi then she would just say that herself...;.. No, since she’s an ojou-sama at the academy she might not say it outright. If it was me I would just drop the opponent right there but it seems her ojou-sama act was somehow a success huh. “Is that right, I will do my best then.” What am I doing my best about though? I said that without thinking so I got no clue at all. “That’s right. Relay that your friend, Hijiri Iori as well. Tell him that it’s from Lanfranco Nekki.” (TLN: This guy name didn’t show up at the character introduction page so tell me if you find a better name for him ランフランコ?ニェッキ) Saying so he turns his back and walks away. Judging from his attitude, how he walks and the shoes he is wearing, he is probably a noble. Anyway...; “There’s a person that would complain about something like that to my face after all huh.” My existence alone is a nuisance? I can’t hear something like this anywhere else besides an eroge, you know? Leaving aside the fact that he came and said that to my face, there’s a possibility that someone is saying that about me, in an eroge you might consider it as a reward though. Since tomorrow is a holiday, I won’t be able to meet with Iori. Well, I can just mail him later. No, I don’t really have to let him know in the first place, right? ...;..Nah, I will tell him just in case. Was there a scene where the protagonist is the target of jealousy? Yup, there is. Once he starts to get along with a heroine that has her own Fanclub, the Fanclub would get real jealous at him. I remembered that it was described with no more than ten lines of text in the game though. In this world, if he starts getting along with the heroines that have her own Fanclub, their jealousy seems like pretty bad news. Just like the game, he might not be able to show up at the academy for a while after all. “...;..Speaking of which, what was his name again? It was something that sounded like a caterpillar’s name...;No, was it the name of some Italian cuisine?” I’m still young in this world but I already started to forget things huh...;. Nah, I don’t want to think about it like that. Well, I probably won’t meet him again anyway, there’s no need to mind it huh. Let’s just tell Iori that some annoying guy said that. Sempai’s POV ———————- What on earth is she? That was what I used to associate with the out of norm President Monika. But Takioto has already taken that phrase from her. It hasn’t been long since we know each other but there were many times that I was left dumbfounded by him already. “If it’s a crossroad like this then the path you will have to take will be north, west, west, south, south, south, east, south, east and then north. If it’s the T junction then it will be different though. Ah, I will put together a calculation table for you later, so please check that out.” I don’t understand. To assemble this much information, just how much effort he put into this? Normally, you would keep this kind of information to yourselves or sell it for a huge amount of reward but he easily reveals all of that to us. To get hold of this kind of information it would need a considerable amount of effort. Just remember the pattern and mapping the entire area would take a lot of time already. Not only that, but he also researched the method to reduce the capture time too. He was willing to lower his reputation within the academy to continue diving into this dungeon and when he finally gained this information, he simply tells all of it to us without hesitation. I was anxious because of how willing he is to give us the information so I try asking him why he would tell us so easily. “Well, I’m telling because it’s you all, right?” Takioto lightly said that while smiling. Because it is us...;...;..Did you trust me that much...;...;.? Marino-san said “I want you to not spread the secret of the beginner dungeon” but who would spread around the information that Takioto obtained with so much difficulty? How can I bring myself to tell it to anyone when I am benefiting from the information he put together with so much effort. Ludi and Claris-dono must feel the same way. Hatsumi-sensei on the other hand...;...;...;.. I don’t really understand but since she cared about Takioto, she would never do something that puts him at a disadvantage. Seeing us who obtained a skill after capturing the eleventh floor, Takioto looks so happy like something truly joyful happened to him. Yes. He looked truly happy. That look has never changed even after he lost against me or Claris-dono in battle. He certainly looked bitter but he seems more happy about our growth. Who would be able to hate him? I let out a small sigh to Takioto who discuss the cause of his defeat with Claris-dono, his opponent. Normally, I wouldn’t care about the rumor of the first year students but at the center of that, he is there. Before people just referred to him as someone who always hangs around Ludi but now the rumors are getting more malicious. Second and Third-year students don’t seem to care much about him but among the first-year students, he seems to be hated no less than the Shikibu-kai. (TLN: Reminder: Ceremony dept.) Among those that are malicious toward him, there are also some nobles. From what he said, someone said “Just realize that you are being a nuisance to Ludivine-sama, stop relying on her generosity and stop troubling her already” to his face. But I am wondering who exactly is relying on whose generosity right now? Take the case of this beginner dungeon for example, it is us who have been in the care of his generosity. There’s no denying that I and Ludi have been given a lot of things by Takioto. I who have taken care of him is now on the receiving end. Yes, it was we who have been given so much already. I’m still feeling okay since I can still give him the close-quarter combat lesson. However, that’s not the case for Ludi. On top of that, her own existence is the main reason that people are troubling him. It’s unavoidable for the LLL to be hated by Ludi now. Additionally, since a part of the LLL said “Just realize that you are being a nuisance to Ludivine-sama, stop relying on her generosity and stop troubling her already”, the fact that they did not realize that those words applied to themselves would be amusing from a third-person perspective. However, from the perspective of the concerning party like Ludi and Takioto, I think that’s not something to laugh about, It shouldn’t be something that should be tolerated but...; With a little tired expression, Ludi is looking at Takioto and Claris-dono who started their rematch. “Takioto, the biggest victim of it all doesn’t care about it one bit. And Ludi turned out to be only one who one-sidedly worries about it...;...;” I will do a follow up for her later, but more importantly...;. “It’s fine, I am watching too.” The presence that I felt behind me was indeed Hatsumi-sensei. She came to my side and look over Takioto’s group, I noticed that she lowered her eyes a little bit. “I will leave them to you, Sensei. I have to train myself more in order to not get left behind.” When I said that to her with a bitter smile, she turned toward me and stared at me with her emotionless eyes. “Kousuke is looking up to you Yukine. “Surpassing Yukine might be my final goal”, is what Kousuke said.” It’s strange. Why does he hold me in such high regard? I asked him before, to achieve his goal to become the strongest, who would be the biggest wall for him to surpass? “The person to surpass to become the strongest? Well, if it’s within the same year then I think it’s Ludi but the final one would be President Monika Mercedez von Mobius and you, Mizumori-sempai. If it is someone who is not a student then there’s the final weapon level person but...;. Ah, that’s right, there’s one of my classmates that would definitely become a monster later.” If it’s president Monika I can understand. Her power is on a different dimension. Someday she might be able to become a magician that can even rival Hanamura Marino after all. But why does he put me in the same category as her? Even if I say that I am not such a strong person, Takioto never gives up. It’s already close to worship already. As I was arguing with him, the face of my sister came up in my mind. Since I was born, the only person who appreciated me to that extent was only her. Certainly, other people also said that I have the talent too. However, they never said that I can become the strongest. The only people who said that is my sister and Takioto. “Kousuke is strange, but his words are also strangely persuasive. Even if it sounded emotional or irrational, his words still seem credible.” His words really are strangely persuasive. they sounded like an unchangeable fact that came from the long years of his experience. That too might be the influence of the harsh things he has been through. And when he said some unbelievable things, it turned out to be true. Like what he told us about this dungeon. His persuasiveness might be the result of his action so far. Whatever he does, the result will always be alright in the end. On the contrary, the third party who only saw him at the academy might take him as arrogant and irrational. “Surpassing Yukine might be his final goal but Kousuke said that he is aiming to become the strongest.” Sensei repeats her words. “That’s why I will be watching you, Mizumori Yukine.” Being stared at by her emotionless eyes, I involuntarily avert my eyes. “...;...;...;I don’t know what you expected of me but, I will continue training (Unnn, somehow the atmosphere is kinda bad.) I know the cause but it can’t be helped since Ludi who can act as their stopper isn’t here. Visiting the cafeteria alone after a long time, I take in the atmosphere and walk inside. If it was me from the time I was in Japan I would be busy worrying about the meal price before ordering and head to a vacant seat. Of course, there are a lot of people who are not interested in me, but there are also those who throw a glance at me. I would welcome the gazes of beautiful girls but spare me the resentful gazes of men. (On the contrary, Iori’s impression seems to be favorable though.) For Iori who got featured in the Tsukuyomi newspaper a function that was built-in with the Tsukuyomi Traveller (The academy distributed portable information terminal), his impression is soaring through the roof. It seems they described him as [That normal looking guy who helped president Monika driven off the Majin”. Was the normal part really necessary? Well, I think this development is pretty good. If it continues on like this, he should be able to enter the student council or the public moral committee. If he got the recommendation from the president or the saint and join their respective sub-organization he should be able to become a full member in no time. Rather, if he doesn’t become a member there will be some troublesome events so I will have him join even if I have to force it. When I put the mushroom potage in my mouth, several male students sit down at the nearby seats They clicked their tongues after they saw me eating the most expensive dish from the cafeteria’s menu and put their tablewares down on the table. Our order is the same. “Speaking of which, you, I heard you lost against a girl in the mock battle right?” He said so and laugh which was followed by the laughter of his entourage. I doubted my ears. In the first place though, aside from general games, most of the strong characters in eroge are women. Normally thinking, it’s obvious. The gentlemen who play eroge are all aiming for the cute girls, it’s normal that female characters would be stronger. An eroge that only featured some muscular old man like the western games or unadorable female characters would never survive in Japan. Magiero was not an exception. Male characters were not treated well. Except for some, most of them are small fries, they served as losers to complement the heroines. These guys probably never fought against a talented person. The imaginary opponents in my road to becoming the strongest were mostly women in the first place, it’s only natural that I would lose to a woman. Of course, no matter who you lose to, it would be emotionally frustrating. It’s completely normal for you to want to be the winner next time. Oh well. “I forgot when, but It was true that I lost to Katrina. But I don’t know about how you talked like you are making fun of her too though?” “Fu” I smile cheek to cheek and start eating again. Looking closely, I think I met this guy before, Ummm. “Umm, Gnocchi-san right?” “It’s Gnecci! I am not a pasta!!” Right, Gnocchi was an Italian dango-like pasta. was it? So it was considered a pasta even if it shaped like that. I never eat one from this world but I remembered that it was delicious. The one with tomato sauce and the one that has white asparagus and mushroom sauce was delicious too. “Gnocchi sounded delicious right? I want to eat one now.” “Drop the food talk already! My name is Lanfranco Gnecci!!” Come to think of it, that was the case huh. “Ah, sorry.” “You bastard, you are talking with me like that despite knowing who I am...;..?” Gnecci-san glare at me. Speaking of which, he’s a noble, isn’t he? According to the academy’s rule, there shouldn’t be any privilege given to aristocrats though. Well, there might be damage to Marino-san if he complained about me to his parents, let’s play an adult here. “Okay okay, calm down. The food will get cold you know?” Hmph, he takes his eyes away from me and starts eating. “Looking at your face only made the meal taste terrible.” What are you saying when you are sitting next to me? I think it’s fine if you don’t sit next to me though...;. Looking closely, the cafeteria is packed. I wonder why only the seats around me are empty. Somehow a big shock came to me. I am feeling that loneliness like when I was sitting on the train and people wouldn’t sit on the seats next to mine and sit down somewhere else instead. I am not fat though...;...;then is it my body odor? My middle-aged man’s odor didn’t come along with my memory right? “...;...;...;...;...;” Gnecci’s entourages are grinning while looking at me, some looked at me with annoyed gazes too. It felt like I became a bullied child. No, am I being bullied right now? I don’t remember doing anything to them though. “You missed most of the morning class, you never show up at any afternoon classes. Just what are you trying to do huh?” As he continued his meal, Gnecci said that to me. “Well, I want to become stronger.” Gnecci and his entourage gave me a [Stop joking around] looks. “You are such an eyesore! You are lowering the evaluation of people around you just by existing.” He said that with a voice loud enough to make the people around us looking our way. His words must be the consensus of his group. No one challenged what he said and give me irritated gazes, look down on me while pinching their nose and some just continue with their meal like nothing happen. Feeling that the atmosphere is getting worse and worse, I- “Right, sorry ’bout that.” I said that and left the cafeteria. Personally, I have worked in a lot more stressful places before, if you asked me whether am I used to things like this, then yes I am used to it. Moreover, I don’t care about it in the first place. It just that, there was no need to disturb the people who want to have their meal in peace. It’s easy to be the center of attention when you are fighting, it wouldn’t do to disturb the surrounding people. This time is not a fight but some false accusation though. After I apologize to the surrounding people, I put away the tableware and left the cafeteria. I planned to have a coffee at the cafeteria at first but I have to change my plan and buy it from a vending machine. I sat down on a nearby bench and open the lid. Summarizing the things that I have to do today, I throw away the can after I drank its content. Later, I join Ludi for her second time capturing the beginner dungeon. “Everybody assembled?” “Seems like Yukine-san is not here yet.” Ludi said so while she is operating the Tsukuyomi Traveller to confirm some message. “I see...;...;...; Well, since it’s sempai, she should be here soon.” Sempai who is always right on time would never be late. If she is, then she would definitely contact us first. I look at Ludi who is operating Tsukuyomi Traveller and thought. “Speaking of which, should we visit a drugstore on the way back?” “I don’t mind but why?” “Well, I was thinking about buying an antiperspirant spray that contained silver.” I don’t know whether that will help with my middle-aged man smell though. Ludi tilted her neck and approached me, the distance between us is close enough that our skin can touch. There was no time to avoid her. Without hesitation, she moves her face toward my chest. She raises up her bang and puts it on her pointed elf ear. Her trivial action was so bewitching, I ended up staring at her. She has a lively fine white skin. Her beautiful nape draws a beautiful curve, stirring up my lust. I can’t think about anything besides the feminine scent that is coming from her. When I desperately holding myself down, she looked down and sniffed me. Although I was a little numb because I was always with her but Ludi is a very beautiful woman. It can’t be helped that a lot of people would be jealous because I am close to her. “I don’t think you smelled though?” She said while moving her face away. “Is that so.” Well, it seems like the middle-aged man smell didn’t come along with my memory. Honestly, I’m relieved. However, I will still buy the spray. She might have said that out of consideration after all. So, just in case. —— For the girls to capture the beginner dungeon without me, I made them a simple guide and gave them some combat advise. Afterward, they left to capture the beginner dungeon again by themselves, since they are aiming to get all the skills they can get there, they will probably dive in three more times Later, I pondered about the dungeons that I would want to dive into first before I challenge the Tsukuyomi dungeon and came up with three candidates. The three dungeons are the place that you can challenge after you beat the beginner dungeon in Magiero. They are places that I think even the current me can capture. Considering what I want to do in the future and its difficulty being the easiest, the place I want to capture first is……gotta be this one. “It’s here right…..? No, there’s a mark that looked like a magic circle here too, This should be the place right?” I can’t help but get anxious. Comparing the field map from my memory and the map from this world, the place that I found is a stone altar covered in grasses and two stone pillars. Placed on top of one of the pillars is a stone imitating the shape of the sun, while the pillar itself is being entwined with ivies. “But everything was covered in dirt and there’s no other suspicious place around here, the only possible place is this one.” I found something like a magic circle on the altar but I don’t know whether it will be able to activate or not. Using body strengthening I remove the ivies to take a look at the altar as a whole. One part is missing from this magic circle, is it gonna be alright if I activate it? I am a little anxious but for the time being, I prepare to activate the magic circle. To activate it, you have to place a sunstone on one pillar and moonstone on another. One stone has already been placed, after removing the ivies, the other stone seemed to be missing. In the game, Iori trip on it and fall down but of course, I didn’t (I stopped myself in time (barely).) I lift the moonstone with third hand and move toward the pillar. At the top of the pillar, there’s a hollowed-out place that shaped like you can put it there. A change came the moment I put the stone on the pillar. A bluish-white light shines through the outline of the stone. The light then moves from the pillar toward the magic circle on the altar. After that, the whole magic circle shines lightly and the damaged part of the magic circle was repaired using the surrounding soil and stone, making a new magic circle. It seems like this magic circle has an auto repair function. “…….It moved.” Fuh, after I let out a small voice, the center of the magic circle shines a pale light. I checked my baggage and walked towards it. — The destination of the transfer magic circle is not a temple like the one from beginner dungeon, it is a cave that I can’t feel any sense of artistry from. The content of this store’s exclusive DLC dungeon [Twilight Grotto] is as the name suggests, pretty gloomy. Like a cave, the walls are covered with hard stones. If a powerful monster were to smash you against these walls then it will cause a lot of damage to you. “Well, I collect a lot of magic elements and my body has gotten stronger ever since I came to this world……It feels like I should be fine.” While hitting the rock wall I recall the practice I had with Claris-san and the others. Looking at Claris-san or Yukine-sempai normally, they would look like any normal girls (with their particular part that overflowing with femininity.) However, their strength is on a gorilla level. If you are deceived by their appearance and blindly charge in, you would be in for a world of pain. But recently, since I challenged a lot of dungeons, experience a lot of combat and acquiring Mind Eye, I have been able to estimate the strength of my opponents from their appearance. “Comparing to them, that guy is just a small fry.” I take my hand away from the wall and increase the magic power in my stole a level. Then smack a kid with height around 130 cm with fourth hand. “Gubehhh, w, wait a……..Bugyaah.” I hit it before it can say anything. Its appearance may be close to a goblin but this guy was not one. This guy has a horn that goblins don’t possess, a hair that looks like an army deserter and on top of it all, it can talk. “You have to kill an Amanojaku before it can say anything. They will mostly be lying and try to confuse you, was that right?” Gathering the information about the monsters that will appear in the dungeon is very important when you are trying to capture one. In the book for dungeon beginner that Takioto has, it said that it is a rule to investigate the dungeon structure and monsters that will appear inside in detail before entering the dungeon. However, that was only in the case of the dungeon that has been captured already. In an unexplored place such as this, there’s no way to get such information. That’s why you have to be prepared to handle anything that may appear and be more vigilant than usual. But I have the knowledge from Magiero. This place might be unexplored to others but to me, it is as good as naked. It is me who is weak so there’s not a lot of places where I can challenge yet. “If I am a character that can use long-range magic then will I be able to challenge more places? No, I won’t have enough magic power then, since I specialize in close-quarter combat now, I may be better off as I am now. I retrieved a small magic stone that dropped from the amanojaku and moves deeper inside. After that, I defeat a lot more amanojakus and when I was thinking about proceeding deeper, a new monster appeared. “A Nopperabou, huh.” (TLN: Do you guys prefer faceless ghosts?) Among the famous Japanese Youkai (TLN: Ghost/Demon), Nopperabou was one of them. The nopperabou that was well-known in Japan had a strong image related to the summer specialty [Ghost Story]. That’s why when you are talking about nopperabou people often think that nopperabou = scary youkai. However, nopperabous in this world are more disgusting than scary. (TLN: In Japan, people said that if you tell ghost stories in summer it would give you the chill to fight off the heat) Nopperabou’s face doesn’t possess an eye, nose, or mouth. They always have smooth skin in Japanese illustration but here, their faces are full of pimples and wrinkles, there are also some blood vessels visible which made its appearance so graphic and disgusting. Additionally, since their faces are always expanding and contracting, it made you think that their heart is on their face which plays a role in increasing the discomfort feeling you felt from them. “At least they are weak.” I block the nopperabou that tried to rugby tackle me with fourth hand and smack it down with third hand from above. The nopperabou was forced to kiss the ground violently. Since it got no mouth Isn’t the expression “kissing” wrong though? I immediately try to do a follow-up attack but it already turned into magic elements. I stop my attack and retract the fourth hand. Oh, almost miss it. I turn back to pick up the dropped magic stone and keep going in deeper. “Come to think of it, why can I see despite this place having no light source?” I can strangely see so well despite the lack of light sources. Well, it’s a little dim though. Are the walls themselves the light sources? Well, since even the scholars are still clueless about the dungeons, it’s useless to think about it. “The map of this place is the same as the one from beginner dungeon but…I don’t remember this place.” The Twilight Grotto is a dungeon that you can skip in an additional playthrough. The reason being, after you cleared it, you would already obtain everything you can from this place, its rewards can even be used after you have finished your playthrough. You can get strong immediately after you start a new game. “The earning from this dungeon is bad too….” The monsters that appear here are weak and easy to hunt but in return, the exp point they give is also low. It might be on the same level as the beginner dungeon but there’s nothing good that you can get here. You should challenge a different dungeon instead of diving into this one again, that being said, it can’t be helped, huh. Later, I dive deeper inside after I defeated more amanojakus and nopperabous. —- After I descend the stairs, I was met with another stone cave no different than the previous floor. I already descended four times, so I already expected this kind of environment. But, can you come out already, monster?…… Rather, there’s only Japanese Youkai here but there’s not much of a variety. Going deeper inside while defeating only these amanojakus became such a chore. An Enenra (TLN: Smoke monster) appeared after I reach the fifth floor. Their appearance is the same as the game’s illustration, a white smoke a little bigger than a human head with a face like a Haniwa. Enenra Haniwa I enchant the stole with water attribute and taking a stance with third and fourth hands. At the same time. A magic circle the size of its body emerge from in front of the Enenra’s eyes. The magic that flew out from that magic circle is an elementary magic [Fear Ball]. Since I had prepared in advance I received it with the water enchanted third hand and swung down the fourth hand on its face as I approached. Contrary to its appearance, the impact I felt was big. I thought that since it was called Enenra their body would be made up of smoke. However, it received a critical hit from fourth hand and fly away like a drunk salaryman. “Is it okay?” Since it shows no sign of attacking me, I tried experimenting with them for a bit. I take a wooden sword out of my baggage and swung it down. But there was little respond when I attacked its face. It yields the same result when I cut off then enchantment for one end of the stole and try attacking it with no element strengthening. It did some damage to its face but the attacks slipped through its body. However, after I enchant it with a simple water attribute, its body also got damaged from the attack. When I keep attacking it with the wooden sword several more times, it eventually turned into magic elements and magic stone. After that, I experimented a lot with the enenras as I keep diving deeper. In conclusion, attacking the enenras with attribute less physical attack is not effective. But if I enchant the attack with attributes, especially water, it will become very effective. And if you hit its face, there’s a high probability that you will stagger it. “To stagger it, I felt like hitting its jaw is the most effective. It’s like they are human, are they also possessed brain?….. And hitting it with fire attribute attack wasn’t effective as well.” Its characteristic was going according to the game for the most part. But annoying difference they have from Magiero is… “They are hard to hit since they are always flying around….” It might be good to throw a rock at its face but it will take a lot of time. The question remaining is that, is it a monster that worth using a battle magic stone to defeat? It would be better to flee while being careful not to get surrounded and pincer attack by them. Decided so, I erase my presence and run through the nopperabous and enenras without getting noticed. When I arrived at the eighth floor, I was greeted by not a nopperabou nor an enenra but a Shoukera. (TLN: A mole cricket spirit) It’s the first time I saw one in reality but compared to goblins this guy might look cute in comparison. Shokera, a youkai that made sure you report your evil deed to the God. “It looked like a Komainu with the wart of a tree frog though, I have to defeat it quickly or it will become troublesome.” The Komainu, you will surely see one if you go to a shrine. I punched the shokera that was trying to howl with third hand. Since it was already close to the wall, I immediately crash it into the wall and sandwich it with third hand. When I tried to do a follow-up attack, the shokera already turned into magic elements and leave behind a magic stone. “Other enemy’s presence...;..none, huh. Let’s keep going.” Since I immediately defeated it this time, I don’t know all the detail but in Magiero the shokera was treated as a weak but troublesome monster. “Letting it call its friend sound troublesome after all.” A lone shokera is weak. But once it called its friend it might surround me, that would be bad. But since the only things that can be called in this area are nopperabou and enenra, it wouldn’t turn out so bad though. “I thought about making a level-raising chart (A manual for RTA run) for this dungeon for a while but since there are too many monsters that can be called by the Shokera, It would be better to capture the beginner dungeon while using the chart to get the fire battle magic stone.” Moreover, even if you considered only the magic elements you can farm, the beginner dungeon is still better. Some dungeons are a better hunting ground because it has a higher-species of Shokera though. While I was thinking so, I detected a monster’s presence when I was about to turn the corner. I stick to the wall and peek at them, it was a shokera and an enenra. It looked troublesome since this enenra is floating near the ceiling, outside of my attack range. I let out a small sigh. “Fighting that enenra seems troublesome, should I just breakthrough and run?” After deciding so, I immediately moved to action. I put my hand on the sword that was on my belt and start running when the shokera turn the other way. The shokera was like an old lady on the countryside’s road since it just stood in the middle of the passage. The enenra was the first to notice my charge but it was already too late. Single drawing slash. Was the shokera surprised that it got beautifully bisected? I wonder. I ignore the floating enenra and keep running. I think it was fortunate that the enenra was slow to react. Thanks to that my chance to escape raised considerably. Normally, there would be a fireball flying at my back but...;. this time there’s no such thing. It should be fine since I already made it this far...;. Even so, this dungeon sure is bad. Both its appearance and its treasure chest. In a normal dungeon, there would at least be a treasure chest for each floor but there’s not even one treasure chest in this Twilight Grotto. That’s one of the reasons the gentlemen chose not to farm in this dungeon. If there’s a useful treasure here then it might deserve a chance. I keep escaping the monsters and keep proceeding deeper and deeper. Then I finally reached the stairs that head toward the ninth floor. The ninth floor is the floor just before the boss room but the monsters that appear there are the same old monster you encountered before, it was only to the level that the encounter rate of shokera is slightly higher than the previous floor. There’s no treasure chest nor any delicious loot so it’s natural to just run through all of it. Additionally, the floor is a little wider than the previous one so it’s one of the reasons to just rush through the place. “Why bothered yourselves fighting these joke monsters. I don’t understand.” Although, it is not completely useless since you will get magic elements and magic stones by defeating monsters but if you know of the place that you can farm with more than double efficiency, it would only seem like a fool’s errand to farm here. I killed the shokera with one slash while ignoring the nopperabou and keep running through the floor. The ninth floor might be the fastest floor I cleared in this dungeon. Then, I finally reached the tenth floor. — The tenth floor is different from all the previous floors, it only consisted of a single road that leads to a single room (Boss room) and the dungeon core room as the final room. I descend the stairs and head toward the boss room while preparing for combat. “Water battle magic stone, recovery potion, and finally water element enchanted stole.” I exchanged the battle magic stone (fire) for battle magic stone (water) but the exchange rate was two fire for one water, the rate was almost overcharging. Well, let’s put it as a necessary expense (I don’t know whether I will use it though). “Alright, Let’s go-!” I charge into the room while having both third and fourth hands make a fighting pose. Although it is still the same old cave, this room is the widest within this dungeon. A monster stood alone at the center of the room. Anyone who saw it would think of a black cat. That ears, eyes, and tail. It’s a cat no matter how you look at it. However, it was not a tiny, cute cat that always lazes around with you. Firstly, it’s huge. It’s twice my size, its size was already close to a tiger. Moreover, its cry is low. Although it also cries [Nyaaaaa] but its unusually low voice made it sounded a little scary. The growling cat stood up slowly and head toward me. Then, it created two burning wheels on its side. “Bu NyaaaaaaaAAa-!” As it cries, it approached me with the burning wheels. I received one of the burning wheels with third hand while dodging the other. The wheel keeps going and crashed into the wall then disappeared. After seeing that, it irritatedly cries out and creates the two wheels again. The boss of Twilight Grotto, the [Kasha], a monster in the guise of a cat. It was originated from the story of the Japanese Youkai, Kasha. It was revealed so from the game staff’s blog. Kasha, a type of Bake-Neko or monster cat equipped with fiery wheels. I defend against the flying wheels again and keep approaching the Kasha. Maybe it was due to the water enchantment, I can easily intercept the flying wheels. When I closed the distance, I punch the Kasha in the head with fourth hand. However, it easily evades such a straightforward attack. No, it did not just evade the attack. It tried to take a bite at me with its widen jaw. The Kasha showed its prided fangs and lunged at me. To the Kasha that violently charged at me, I punched it in the gut with the prepared third hand. “Gyaun” “S, Scary.” To be able to counter-attack in time when it lunged at me like that, I’m confident that this thing is slower than sempai. However, since the monsters I encountered inside this dungeon were so slow...;it made the Kasha looked faster. The difference between the Kasha and the other monsters up until now is probably that it still firmly keep its consciousness after I counter-attack and sent it flying against the wall. Up to now, the monsters were mostly died instantly or lost consciousness. As I stare at the Kasha that tried to regain its balance in the air, I inject magic power into the katana’s scabbard and prepare to unleash it. The Kasha successfully landed kicked the ground and jumps toward me. This time it is not using its fangs. It popped out its claws that looked like the claw weapons ninja usually used from its uncute oversized paw and lunge at me. I activated Mind Eye while intercepting the approaching claws with third hand. Then, the Kasha turned and come back to attack me with its left paw. I firmly defended it with fourth hand and release the magic power stored inside the scabbard while drawing the katana. At that point, my victory was confirmed. There are a lot of people who said this in the past. You can’t confirm the results yet, why are you so sure of it? I think it’s often the case when I was shooting a basketball or soccer. Even though the ball just left your limbs, you still know how it will fly along the path you imagined and enter the goal. It seemed to be the same as archery. When you nock the arrow and release it from your hand, you will somehow know that [Ah, this will hit.] or something like that. These sensations are probably the same. Your body will remember the feeling when you repeat something countless times. I can feel only gratitude toward Yukine-sempai. At first, I was shocked when she told me “Sorry Takioto, you don’t have the talent to wield a katana.” But immediately after, she told me “But you have another talent.” I remembered she was quite ecstatic when she told me that. After that, I have been practicing just one move every day. It finally takes shape after so many days of practice. Battoujutsu – Matataki (TLN: Drawing technique – Blink.) The most accurate depiction? I return the katana to its scabbard and set the magic power I sent into the stole to a minimum. “Niigya” The Kasha let out such a voice and at the same time, its body split into two. It turned into a huge amount of magic elements and leave behind the biggest magic stone I’ve ever seen. I think that Kasha was the most powerful monster I’ve fought so far. It’s speed and attack power was overwhelmingly different and it can even use fire magic. Although there’s a but. Its fire magic can be countered with water enchantment, its speed and weight behind each of its attacks, when compared to the people who fight on a daily basis, was like heaven and earth. Moreover, the tactic it used was like any normal monster, it didn’t manage to took me by surprise at all. “Well, it was an obvious result.” I look at the magic stone I picked up. If the kasha can “repop” (Object like a monster that will respawn after a certain amount of time after its demise) it would be useful to farm this but in this place, it won’t repop. It won’t work even if you left and enter the dungeon again. I take the magic stone and head deeper inside where my targeted “Person” is supposed to be. After I continued heading further inside, there’s a door that a person could easily go through. I touch the corner part of the door. Then a blue light shines from the place I touch and ran through all four sides. The door then slides sideways while making a [Pushuuu] noise. When I was thinking about heading inside, what I found was...; “It’s an entrance area.” (TLN: Japanese style) There’s a place where you can take off your shoes, shoe cabinet, and a big locker. There are several doors that I can see from here, she must be here somewhere. I took off my shoes in the neat entrance area, I put my feet on the flooring. “You gotta be kidding me...;...;” The place I stepped on leave behind a footprint. It seems like the place wasn’t in use for some time and the dust has accumulated quite a bit. I was a little worried but I decided to keep going while holding the shoes in my hand. “Yeah, this is quite a room...;..” For the time being, I look at the room I entered. It was overflowing with signs of life The walls are wallpapered, the bed was there but it was covered in dust, there’s even a magic stone powered light. I picked up a book that was placed on the side of the bed. I don’t know what it says so I put the book into my storage bag (pseudo item box) and look around. Then I take a look at the garbage can beside the bed. Don’t tell me, I thought so and take a look under the bed. It was a wishful guess. It’s the usual place you would store your entertainment goods. Therefore, the possibility that someone will discover it here is high, that’s why people usually hide it elsewhere, especially the case if you have a sister. I treated the item as an object with historical and cultural value and take it out slowly, then I have to hold my breath. A scantily clad, black-haired woman with sensual expression. There’s no doubt about it. It’s a porn mag. I desperately suppress myself and turn the pages. “Fumu...; this is bad, real bad.” Don’t look and steel your mind. Chant the Heart sutra in your heart and calm down. I put the book inside the storage bag, take a deep breath and open the door to head to the next room. What I found in the next room is a television-like device, a transparent pillar, and a frisbee-like machine. They are things that I never saw before even from Japan or this world. I collected some suitable items and open the door to the next room. “Wow, this is amazing...;...;” What lies beyond the door was otherworldly. “A cave, a house...;...; now it’s a meadow huh.” There’s a word I found when I was learning about the dungeons. “To guess what the dungeon is thinking is like to ponder what death is.” At first, my reaction was “Hmmm” but since I was shown a common sense breaking, supernatural world like this, Of course, I will have to agree with that sentence. The spreading grassland, the wide sky and the sun that began to rise. A slightly dry wind touches my skin and I can smell the earthy scent of grass. When I look back, I was surprised again. “Are you the Anywhere door!!” (TLN: Doraemon’s door.) It was the door I just passed through. It was there, but it was the only man-made object in the entire grassland. Actually, it was not just the door. There was also the familiar dusty hallway that lies beyond it. I tried putting my hand in and out of the door frame but the only conclusion is that it was an unknown phenomenon. “It really is the Anywhere door...;..” I stop analyzing the door and start looking around the place. Countless clouds were floating through the light blue sky. Through the gap between the clouds, the rising sun shines its twilight ray of light on the ground. “It’s beautiful...;. I understand why the twilight sun was called [Angel’s ladder] or [Pipeorgan of light] n— Nn?” Looking at the place the twilight ray shone at I stopped talking. “That place is...;. Not a meadow? There’s something there.” Don’t tell me, I started running. At the end of the light are a magic circle engraved on a stone pavement and an oval-shaped something. I don’t know what it is but it made me think of a huge egg. An egg doesn’t float in the air though? That egg-like something’s size was around my height, looking closely it also has something like furs growing on it. Looking at the fallen feathers under the egg-like thing, the things that grow on it are probably feathers. “Somehow it looked different from Magiero but...;. Maybe this is it?” I tried gently touching the egg-like thing that was illuminated by the twilight sun. It’s felt fluffy like I was touching a rabbit but I felt its elasticity when I put more force into my hand. I tried injecting my magic power inside the egg-like thing like the protagonist did in the game. I was a little worried at first but I increased my magic output mid-way through. However, there’s not much change to it. “It’s the first time I spent this much magic power...;...;?” Maybe because of my daily training, the growth of my magic power was remarkable. After I managed to keep my enchant magic up all day, every day, I keep it up except when I go to sleep, I even spend a lot of time in mock battles with Claris-san and the other. However, it’s been quite some time since I exhausted this much magic power. Even so, the egg-like thing is still sucking in my magic power. The change came when my magic power was exhausted to the extent that it would affect my basic activity and I was pondering about why I didn’t magic recovery items with me. 『×□▲○- Magic Power Registration Completed-｜＊”＃＄％＆’（』 “Whoa.” I released my hand since I suddenly heard a voice in my head, I observe the change in the egg’s appearance. However, its shape didn’t change, instead, a transparent display appears from a shining magic circle that showed up since who knows when. I stared at the display confusingly. “I can’t read it...;...;” When I said that the letters on the display disappeared. When I was panicking, the letters appear on the display again, this time in Japanese. — Please Select The Type. &#8211; Spring Type &#8211; Summer Type &#8211; Autumn Type &#8211; Winter Type &#8211; Heaven Type — I tilted my neck at the displayed words. If I remember correctly, I am sure that this only has four options. Moreover, it should be written in English with Type-1, Type-2, Type-3, and Type-4. If I follow the game setting then spring, summer, autumn, and winter should be 1, 2, 3 and 4 accordingly. However, “Heaven Type...;..there’s one option too many, right?” When I played as the protagonist, I chose Type-4 which should be Winter Type though. “Normally thinking, I would choose the Winter Type but...; my heart tells me that I should pick the Heaven type.” When you see something new you would just want to try it out. I’m weak to sweets, especially when I know that it was a new product. I would buy it even when it sounds questionable most of the time. I touch the [Heaven Type] option with my finger. Then a pop-up window asked [Are you sure?] I chose [Yes] as my answer. Then, feathers fell off the egg. all the feathers shine when they touched the ground. They turn into small particles and disappeared. the light begins to shine from the place that the feathers fell off, the light was like a laser beam you would see at the live concert venue, illuminating the surroundings. The feathers keep falling off faster and faster which caused the light intensity to increase. Unable to look at the light directly anymore, I protect my face with third hand and wait for the light to settle. The time that the light shines so bright I can’t open my eyes didn’t last a minute. From the shadow of third hand, I judge that the light has settled down and looked at the egg. However, the egg was not there. Instead, there is a woman in a maid outfit standing in its place. “Visibility checked. Confirming the possession of the AA terminal. Acquiring time and date.” Brushing her platinum blond hair that closed to a silver color, she put something inside a machine that she takes out from her pocket. Then, a transparent display appears in front of her and something that looked like letters are flowing on it. “Confirming connection to A&amp;A corporation...; ...;Failure. Connecting to Local Network...; ...;Failure. Completely Disappearance of the Dungeon Network. Estimating time from the situation outside the dungeon.” The transparent display that was floating in front of her disappeared and her purple eyes turn toward me. “Good Afternoon, Contractor-sama. I am A&amp;A Corporation’s MKS73 (Maid Knight Shiki Edition 73)” MKS73 (Maid Knight Shiki Edition 73) was a popular companion character in Magiero’s stored limited bonus. MKS73 was her ID name so the player can decide her name after she joined your party. However, the majority of Gentlemen named her Nanami derived from the number 73 (TLN: Nana = 7, Mi = 3) in her ID name. Additionally, her personality and hair color are varied depending on the type you choose. She will have sakura hair color that reminds you of the spring if you chose Type-1, Green for the lushness of summer for Type-2, Red for the autumn leaves in Type-3 and Indigo blue of winter from Type-4. Then what about the appearance of the woman in front of my eyes? Her hair is a beautiful platinum blond, if Ludi is gold then she is silver. She doesn’t look artistically beautiful like Ludi. Instead, she possessed a face that you can somehow feel the cuteness from. Her chest was not as big as Nee-san but her maid outfit does emphasize its existent, it must be moderately big. There’s no point comparing her to Katrina’s. “May I know your name?” Not caring about my heated (Ero) gazes, she said so indifferently like a machine. “Takioto...;..Kousuke.” “Takioto Kousuke-sama, Registered...;...;.. Thank you for making a contract with Maid Knight Series, Takioto Kousuke-sama. Now then, I am sorry but the connection to the Dungeon Network was blocked so I would like to confirm the current situation...;...;...;..” Even if you say that I still don’t understand. What I don’t understand? Everything. In the first place. “Umm, What is a dungeon network?” There was no such conversation in Magiero. In the game she said [My fated partner finally appeared in front of me” and she would usually sit in the protagonist’s small room and take care of him. Her loyalty point has exceeded the limit from the start. You can ask her why she held so much loyalty toward you and she would answer “If no one activates me, I might get left behind in this dungeon forever”. Well, after you have gotten close to her she would confess in the sub-event that “What I said back then was only a cover...;I was programmed to pretend to swear my loyalty to the person that registered their magic power”. But afterward, she also said “But right now I am...;...;.”, there’s a lot of people that fall for her because of that line (me included). “The Dungeon Network...;..?” She said with a little anxiety in her voice. Honestly speaking, there was a sense of wrongness about her. In the first place, the place that she was sealed in Magiero was a magic-stone-like Crystal made by Ancient Magic (Overtechnology) and what was sealed in the Sealing Crystal was a homunculus that was made thousands of years ago with the best technology of its time, The [Maid Knight]. But, what was the thing I saw? She was sealed in a feathered egg, not a crystal. And this place. There was no such meadow in Magiero. Moreover, I don’t know why there was the fifth type in the options. “The Dungeon Network is the Dungeon Network, righ-...;...;eh? Excuse me, Takioto Kousuke-sama.” She approached me as she floats in the air and takes my hand. From her slightly cold hand, something started to flow through. It was not unpleasant even when I don’t know what is flowing through me. Rather, it felt like something that was already there was being returned to its place, a strange feeling but it made me feel safe and comfortable. “...;...;...;...;..” “Um, Are you okay?” I called out to her who has her mouth half-open. “M, my apologies. Could you give me some time to organize my thoughts?” Apparently, the person that needs some time to calmly think was not only me. — After we both have time to calm down and exchange our information, the thing that we understand was. “In other words, Something is fundamentally wrong.” That was the thing we understood. “That seems to be the case.” Originally, [the Maid Knight Series] was supposed to establish a contract with an overseer of the dungeon, the Dungeon Master. What she said that she doesn’t understand was how I, a normal human no matter how you looked, was able to establish a contract with her. Additionally, another thing that she couldn’t understand was the amount of my magic power. Now then, here’s the question. What the heck is a dungeon master? “Dungeon Master is an overseer of the dungeon from the Dungeon World. Some people on the surface called a person who captured a lot of dungeons with that name but the one I am talking about was the former.” It still troublesome after she explained it. In Magiero, the word [Dungeon Master] doesn’t appear in the first place. The only role for the dungeons in Magiero was to be captured. There wasn’t supposed to be such a thing as an overseer. “I understand that you are confused but due to personal reasons I would not like to talk in detail regarding this subject.” “Umm, what do you mean?” “The information regarding the Dungeon Master was actually open to the people within the Dungeon Society but it was not something that can be shared to the general public.” Well, that.. “If you think about the world’s level of understanding of dungeons then I can understand. There was even a phrase [To guess what the dungeon is thinking is like to ponder what death is] after all.” After coming to this world, I read about dungeons in the books. However, there are still many unknown aspects of the dungeons which made that phrase came to be. “Basically, because the contacting attempt has been refused, the information was not circulating around. It was very rare for Dungeon Manager or Overseer to make contact with the sixth class.” A word that I don’t understand came out again. I can kinda guess the meaning though. “What’s the sixth class?” When I asked so, she turned her mouth into a badly shaped X mark. “Umm, that part also contained a secret that shouldn’t be shared to normal people that I talked about earlier so Umm if my luck was bad then I might get disposed of by the company.” “So in other words, it’s classified information huh...;...; okay, you don’t have to talk about it.” I don’t know what she meant about the disposal but I’m sure that it’s a bad thing for her. Her expression is still bad but she hesitantly opened her mouth to say something. “You would notice this in time but, Umm. I have something to tell you in advance. The magical path between myself and Takioto Kousuke-sama has already been opened. Right now, my employer has been set as Kousuke-sama” Umm, “In other words?” “Since I can’t go against your command, if you were to order me to spill everything out then I would have to tell you everything.” I see, so the contract holds that much weight huh. If I want to know about the dungeon, I can just give her an order. But. “No, it’s not the information I want to that extent. It’s fine if you just tell me what you can talk to about to a normal person.” I answered. “My deepest apologies.” She apologized to me. She (Maid Knight Shiki Edition 73) raised her face. “Now then, with that settled...;..” She started talking. She put her hand inside her cleavage and took out a familiar deep blue cloth. Why did you put that thing in such a place? “I think it’s time for you to give such an overflowingly mischievous character and explosively popular, Maid Knight Series like myself a suitable name.” “Overflowingly mischievous huh...;...;..” Just now, she was rather serious and have a machine-like image though. You can choose her personality from the type in Magiero but there was nothing like the personality I witnessed just now. “Yes, I’m proud of being overflowing without spilling anything out.” I don’t really understand but well, whatever. “Hmm, Naming huh. Unnn, How should I call you...;...; you are something like a homunculus right?” I was certain that she would nod but she shook her head. “No, I am not a Homunculus. Sorry in advance but are you familiar with Android, Bioroid or a Replicant?” “Eeh?” “In the first place, I am not something that was made by humans, I am an Angel.” “A, Angel!?” I involuntarily shouted back. The companion character her in Magiero was not an Angel. She was supposed to be a homunculus. “Angels are generally fundamentally different from humans. Unlike the elves or the beastmen, Angels are a completely different life form.” Well, there was a sub-heroine that was an angel in Magiero so I kind of understand that but...;...; “There’s no need to worry as our reproductive activity is the same and pregnancy is also possible. However, the child will not be an angel but will take the race of the other party instead.” “No, I don’t really worried about that.” I was not worried but it was interesting cough– cough. “Is that so...;..Fufu.” “Why are you making such a full-faced smile while looking at my crotch?” “Well, let’s change the topic.” “So you are changing the topic...;..Okay, how do I get out of this place...;..” Why do I feel like she holds all the pace of our conversation? “My apologies but, as my contractor, there’s no need for you to use such a polite language with me.” Certainly, I have never seen anyone in anime using polite language to a servant like a maid before. But there were a lot of people that treated their employees politely in Japan you know? “Well, it’s a habit you see...;. Is it okay for me to continue like this?” “Tsk...;..” “Eh, did I just heard a tongue clicked...;..” “No way, that must be your imagination.” “U, understood. So I will be using polit—-” “Tsk...;...;” “Go, got it.” A forced correction?...;...;. I don’t know who is the master anymore. “Yes, I will be in your care.” She said so and graciously express her gratitude with that familiar blue cloth in hand. I have been curious for a while but. “Umm...;...;What’s that thing in your hand? “This? It’s the school swimsuit.” She spread out the blue cloth she was holding. That’s certainly a school swimsuit. The name tag was blank though, no, never mind that. “It was included as a bonus costume.” Did she guess my question? However, the question inside my heart will not be answered by just that alone. “Why...;...;school swimsuit?” “According to my knowledge, we were originally sold with the maid outfit but when they add in the school swimsuit as a package the sales increased so much that it has become like this ever since. There were some places that removed the school swimsuit from the package but rather than a drop in sales, the company received a complaint instead.” The customers are making claim!? “I can change into it right now if you want.” Eh, seriously? You are fine changing here? [Please don’t look at me like that]. Is she gonna say something like that? “No thank you.” “I see. So you are the type that wants to use their imagination. Then I will wear it on top of my clothes, please feel free to take a look.” She said so and put the school swimsuit on top of her maid outfit...;. Unn, it’s erotic but the pose is a little...;...;..No, that’s not it. “You, the part you said about showing your loyalty to the contractor, you actually only want to make fun of me right?” “Fufu, I would never do such a thing. More importantly, can you give me a name?” That’s right I forgot. She said that she wanted me to give her a name right?. Now, I can give her whatever name I want in the game, but I think most people named her [Nanami]. People on the Bulletin board site also said that “MKS73 was a mouthful, let’s just call her Nanami”, Because of that the name Nanami was established in the community. I am also one of the [Nanami] faction though. “Right, then...;.. How about Nanami?” Listened to what I said, she responded with “Haa?” and frowned. “What an unbelievable naming sense. To think that you would use my serial number as it is. It was like you are naming your child San (TLN: San mean Three) just because he was born as the third child. He would be called San-san you know? That’s like a panda’s nickname. I heard that the name was a part that decided how hard your child can find a job. Is it okay for you to simply decide your child’s future like that?” ...;...;...;.. That’s certainly so. What she said was correct. In the game, she would be happy no matter what name you gave her but this is not a game. It’s a reality. The game’s knowledge will not always work. She is a human being (Angel). What I have to consider was a person’s name, not a pet’s. My thoughts were too shallow. “S, Sorry, I will think of another nam–...;...;Nn.” I look at her and stopped talking. “Seriously, what a troublesome Goshujin-sama (TLN: master).” She said so while holding her school swimsuit and write the word [Nanami] on it with an oil pen she took out from who knows where. Then after she finished writing, this time she writes a small Nanami on her hand and let out a small smile. She immediately returned to her usual fed up expression but she certainly smiled for a moment. She tightly hugs the school swimsuit that she written the name on and say, “Well, it would be a waste of time to think of another name so Nanami is fine as it is.” “...;...;...;.You actually like it right?” “Haa, what are you saying Goshujin-sama...;. Now then, the nickname was decided as Nanami, what should we do with the Kanji? There are a lot of candidates though.” “You actually like Nanami quite a lot right?” She ignores my word and writes a lot of Nanami’s Kanjis on the ground. But there’s also a big [Nanami] written in Hiragana on the ground while others like [Nanami (Seven Sea)] or [Nanami (Green Beauty)] were written with small letters. Moreover, she even writes the second [Nanami] in hiragana again somehow. Am I supposed to choose from this? “U, Unn, How about the Nanami written in Hiragana?” “Haaa— Hiragana?...;...;..” She sighs exaggeratedly and put a heart mark at the end of [Nanami] on the ground. She even adds three more heart marks there. “You seriously like that right? You can’t possibly like it more than this right?” “It’s not You. It’s Nanami. Now then, I will be in your care, Goshujin-sama.” She even wants me to call her by name...;.she absolutely likes it. Rather, isn’t this place held a lot of value for both for academic and dungeon study field? Why did you write your name on the ground with an oil pen? If this place was a sightseeing spot you will get reported on social media you know? Come to think of it since it’s a dungeon and the land the dungeon located on was owned by the Hanamura family, let’s not mind about that. “Now, please confirm the title for Contractor-sama.” “Title?” “Yes, please tell me how I should be addressing you Takioto Kousuke-sama. The options are [ -sama], [Master], [Goshujin-sama], [Shishou (Teacher)], [Oyakata (Boss)], [Meijin (Expert)], [Tatsujin (Expert)], [Kaichou (President)], [Buchou (Club president)], [Kanpaku (Advisor)], [Seitaishougun (Commander in Chief)], [-noboshi], and [-chi (Familiar name calling)], I have prepared a lot of options for you.” “Did you get the name from a train board game? (TLN: Try google Densha Sugoroku) What’s the default setting?” “It was set as Goshujin-sama.” Well, being called that would felt kinda itchy but it was the same as the game. “...;.Well, that’s reasonable enough.” Moreover, I want to try having a maid calling me like that at least once. A maid cafe? I want a real maid to call me that. “Then I will call you Goshujin-sama from now on. Now, how do you want me to address other people besides Goshujin-sama? [Lower Life Form] is set as the default at the moment.” “That default setting is too cruel! Why the master treatment is normal and the other’s treatment is so cruel!? Change it, Change it now! Rather, what timing did you plan to use that word on?” “Yaaa! It’s a good day right you lower life form!” “You dressed it up nicely but isn’t the follow up lower than a trash!?” “That’s a good idea. let set it up as [Lower Than a Trash].” “You are using that!? That’s no longer how you call a living creature right? At least use a word that pays respect toward the other party!” “Tsk, Understood.” “...;..Someone, please retort her for meeeeee.” ——- The reason why I want to capture this dungeon first no matter what was to recruit Nanami. There are a lot of benefits when you got her as a comrade. The most important one was if you have her you can quickly rush through some of the dungeons. With her knowledge of ancient magic (overtechnology) she possessed the know-how to break through the dungeon and she can remove the magic circles that you normally can’t remove which was the requirement to capture some of the dungeons which originally was a role of the other party members that should join you around the midway point of the game. Well, even if that doesn’t exist, recruiting her was something I firmly decided on. In the first place, the character that I used to most in Magiero was not Mizumori Yukine-sempai but Nanami. It can’t be helped that I use her more than sempai. Since Yukine-sempai was always busy with the public moral committee she would leave the party every once in a while and would join you permanently after you officially joined the three committees. Well, from the second lap on you can use the Shikigami substitute system to get her to help you capture the dungeon from the start though. On the contrary, Nanami was available almost immediately after you cleared the beginner dungeon. Moreover, besides the special dungeons that only allow the protagonist to enter alone, she can be there with you in every dungeon. And the reason why I use her the most out of all the characters was because of her universally usefulness. She is decent in long range attack, close range attack, magic and close quarter combat, She’s the same type as Yukine-sempai and President Monika. Moreover, Unlike Yukine-sempai and President Monika, Nanami can learn non-combat skills such as collection skills and scout skills. Her combat prowess was certainly below the Strongest Three but her power wouldn’t lose to any of the main heroines aside from Monika. On top of that, she can learn to collect ore and herb, disarm traps, and even lockpicking. It was inevitable that I would use her so much. Of course, it was not just me, there’s no doubt that most of the gentlemen used her regardless of the time of the day. I even bought one additional copy of the game to get her hug pillow (like a madman.) Well, the most important reason was her CUTENESS. On top of the fact that you can choose her appearance and personality, she’s cute and can do anything, she even swore her life-long loyalty to you. There’s no way I wouldn’t use her. Well then, there’s one problem with the universally useful Nanami. It was a problem that didn’t present itself in Magiero but it is a social problem for me. “Now then, how should I explain this to Marino-san and the other?” It’s a big problem. Better yet, I was thinking about having her live at the condominium Marino-san gave me but she would eventually find out from the manager and Luijya-sensei who is currently under observation Not to mention the flow of money. Moreover. “Living separately? Fu, please stop joking. The time I leave Goshujin-sama’s side would be the day I die. I will obey if you order me but please prepare to handle the rumors like [Takioto Kousuke is a Masochist pervert] or [He’s a degenerate that even go after small girls or women in their 40s] afterward.” Nanami was against the idea. “I’m not really sure whether your loyalty-level is high or low.” Additionally, I can’t really deny being called a pervert or a degenerate. If there’s a rumor then I can only say that there’s no smoke without fire. “Then what about Goshujin-sama and I moving into the condominium together?” “That’s certainly an option. But they should find out sooner or later anyway, so it’s better to tell them from the start. They can block me from using the Hanamura family’s facility whenever they want after all.” Luijya-sensei is especially the one that seems like she would confess immediately. “Then, that’s right…….I am good at imitating a cat….” “I can guess what you want to say but that’s too reckless no matter how you think about it.” “If you say that you found me trembling inside a rain-soaked cardboard box, there’s no doubt that it would be made into a blockbuster movie.” If there was a maid abandoned in a cardboard box in the rain then I wouldn’t be surprised if they found a Nessie in the Loch Ness Lake. “That’s quite a surreal picture.” “Well, leaving the joke aside, I have a good idea.” “I feel like it’s gonna be some useless idea but…..let’s hear it.” “How about saying that you want to hire a maid? According to what I heard, the Hanamura Family is quite a wealthy family. It wouldn’t be weird for you to hire a maid.” I was preparing to retort but it was unexpectedly a normal proposal. “Well, certainly…. Speaking of maids, there’s Claris-san at my house too.” That was actually a knight but, she’s supposed to be a maid at least. Moreover, although they are not the resident, Ludi sometime has her own elf servants too. “They wouldn’t mind hiring one or two more maids.” “Right, –but that’s still difficult…..” There’s no live-in maid in the house besides Claris-san. The reason being Nee-san’s stranger anxiety. In the first place, there’s no way a student like me can suddenly say that they want to hire a maid. Even in Japan….. Eh, come to think of it, students might be able to hire a maid in this world right? But. “If I’m hiring you then there would be the salary problem to worry about huh…..” Thinking about it now, I don’t remember seeing any scene where the protagonist paying Nanami a salary……..I even bring her to the dungeon every day, isn’t that ultimately a black company? “Can I manage if I sell the items I got from the dungeon? No, before that, I can even support myself on the pocket money I received alone right?…..” She gave me too much in the first place. If I was born and raised in this house my sense of money would already be numbed. Rather, that sentence should be in the present progressive form. Well, I will be grateful to them and allocate that money to Nanami’s salary for now. Now then, keeping the minimum to myself, how much can I pay Nanami? When I was calculating the money that can be allocated for Nanami’s salary each month, “Eh.” Nanami let out a surprised voice. “What are you surprised about now?….” As expected, hiring a person would take more than just pocket money after all huh. “….No, I didn’t expect any salary from the start so….” “Ha? What did you say?” I ask back without thinking. Nanami answer sounding puzzled. “AA-MKS (Maid Knight Shiki Edition) Angel model is a little special so I don’t require any salary.” “…..What do you mean?” “It’s difficult to explain but I think the lowest class angel doesn’t require [Monetary reward]. Since I am also in that position, please don’t think too deeply about it and accept that I will not be needing any salary.” No no no no no, that’s crazy. What sort of motivation are you working on then? Even if Nanami said that, if someone is working for you, you would give them something in return right? If that’s not the case then it’s just slavery. What I want is a comrade, not a slave. Even if I have to hire that comrade with money. “…..No, I will give you something for your service. That’s my decision.” Is that so, Nanami said while taking a breath. “Even if I received it, there wouldn’t be much opportunity I can use it on though.” “Just thinking about it as your Goshujin-sama’s self-satisfaction. You can just use it whenever you have a day off.” “Eh. there’s a day off too?” Nanami seems like she was surprised from the bottom of her heart, her tone of voice was mixed in with a little excitement. Then as if she can’t believe it, she shook her head left and right. “Eh, you think that I wouldn’t give you days off?” “Yes, the lowest class angel doesn’t receive any vacation. If you keep replenishing energy such as magical power for me then I can keep working forever.” “Just what exactly are you living for…..” Let’s advocate for Angel Labor improvements. Is there any labor union out there? Let’s do a strike to wake them up. If they don’t do it I will wake them up myself. “For the energy source, if Goshujin-sama gives me your magical power or feeds me with normal food then vacation days will not be necessary for me either…..” “….I will seriously think about Nanami’s treatment later.” “Thank you for your consideration.” I see. I had a good image about the angels but now there’s some black image attached to it. As I give Nanami a pitiful gaze, She starts the conversation with Come to think about it. “I am sorry for suddenly change the subject but it should be getting dark around this time. Wouldn’t it be better to return now?” Hearing her words, I take out Tsukuyomi Traveller to check the time. Certainly, it’s almost dinner time. I told them that I might not make it to dinner but it’s better to hurry home to not worry them. “That’s right, let’s head back. Rather, how should I do that?” When I said that, Nanami clench her hand and bring it to her head. “Nyaa, Nyaaaa, Fushu–” “…..The sound was exactly alike but that cat act was a no go.” I give a simple explanation about the Hanamura family on our way back. I immediately head to the living room where everyone is likely to be to introduce her. “Welcome back.” Ludi is sitting on the sofa while flipping through what seems to be a magic book. Claris and Nee-san are not in the room but Marino-san should be back home soon. “I’m back.” “Please excuse me.” Maybe because she heard a woman’s voice, Ludi raise her head and look at Nanami with suspicious eyes. Nanami’s expression didn’t falter though. “Kousuke-san, come here for a bit….” When I was worried about how I should explain this to her, Ludi pulled my arm and take me to the hallway. The pull was pretty strong and my arm almost bends the other way. “What are you trying to do? Who is that?” Ludi’s unusual low voice made my hip almost gave out. “It’s a long story, but not actually…….” “What? Was that a maid? What are you hiring her for?” Ludi’s eyes changed, they tell me that she is getting irritated. Why is she so angry? “I wouldn’t say hire, but I did pick her up in a dungeon so…” “Enough.” Talking alone is useless, she said so and leave. I flusteredly follow behind her. “Good day, well, may I know who you are?” Ludi said so while giving Nanami a sharp gaze as if trying to threaten her. I want to cut in but because Ludi turns toward me with those eyes for a moment, my legs did not move. She has the eyes of a carnivore itself. “Pleased to meet you for the first time. As of today, I have become Takioto Kousuke-sama’s maid. Please call me Nanami.” “Nanami-san right? My name is Ludivine. Now then, for what purpose did you get close to [This].” You are calling me [This]? I’m too scared I can’t say anything back though. However, Nanami who was the target is making a cheerful smile. “I understand Madam’s concern, please rest assured as that is not the case.” (TLN: It was Oku-sama in the raw so yeah, it’s the wife kind of Madam) “Hee….no, huh……M, m, M, Madam!?” Ludi is flustered. I see, so it was a strategy to confuse her huh. Nanami keeps talking to Ludi whose eyes already turned rounded. If she keeps this up she might be able to talk Ludi down. “As Goshujin-sama’s maid I will serve him in all sincerity, Of course, I will not take any action that will be disadvantageous to him. Naturally, that is the same for Madam too.” “Wait a minute, who’s the Madam!?” Ludi’s tone went back to normal. She must be quite surprised that she was called Madam. I was surprised too though. “Goshujin-sama said that you are the person he trusted the most in the world and you two look very affectionately together so……” I’m thinking about the meaning of her words. “Well, she’s certainly the one that I trusted the most huh.” That also included Nee-san and Sempai but she is one of the people I trust the most. “N, No way.” She starts panicky looking around while her face slightly got redder. When she met my eyes, her face turned red as an octopus that was soaked in hot water. Then she turned her face and walked away. “Why is she getting so red?…..” When I muttered so, Nanami responded with an “Eh” and let out a sigh. Nanami looked like she wanted to say something but she was interrupted by the sound of the door opening. It’s the usually listless Nee-san but once she looked at Nanami, her eyes open up and stare at her. Then she turns toward me. “……Frustrated?” (TLN: Sexually) “I think there are other things you should be saying though.” That’s the first thing you thought of after you saw Nanami? Did you misunderstand that she’s cosplaying call-girl? In the first place, I wouldn’t get a call-girl when everyone in my house is a woman beside me. “I can wear a maid outfit for you, you know?” That’s not it. But I do want to see Nee-san in a maid outfit. It should be quite big. As the conversation between Nee-san and I are getting weird, Nanami cut in. “Pleased to meet you for the first time. As of today, I have become Takioto Kousuke-sama’s maid. Please call me Nanami.” Nee-san turned toward Nanami for a moment and immediately turn back toward me. “I can do a maid play too, you know?” “Absolu–….No, that’s not it. I am trying to hire a normal maid here.” Eh, she frowned because she didn’t believe me. As I am already used to Nee-san, I can detect her change in expression. It’s only a small change though. “Rejected.” “N, Nee-san, you see.” “Rejected, there’s no need.” Nee-san immediately rejected. Then she grabbed my arm and pull me toward her. When I got pulled toward her, her arm wrapped around my head. Her hands are a little chilly, the scent of her favorite body soap enters through my nose. She also pats my head which was dirtied after I spent the day capturing the dungeon. Nanami who was watching is making an even more cheerful smile. “Please rest assured, Madam.” She said so while lifting the helms of her skirt and perform an elegant curtsy. “As Goshujin-sama’s maid I will serve him in all sincerity, Of course, I will not take any action that will be disadvantageous to him. Naturally, that is the same for Madam too.” It’s the exact same word I just heard. Well, it seemed to be working on Ludi but since Nee-san has a severe case of stranger anxiety, the only maid in this house is Claris-san, I don’t think that Nee-san will permit another Mai—…… “Kousuke.” She took her hand off my head, put it on my shoulder and exhale. “Finding such a fine maid. You did a good job. Hire her by all means.” “Recently, I am finding it hard to understand you, Nee-san.” And I thought that she would never give me her permission. To think that the problem would be solved at such a sudden turn. “Madam, may I know your name?” “Hanamura Hatsumi.” “I will be in your care, Madam Hatsumi.” Now then, Nanami takes hold of the conversation. “Goshujin-sama. Let’s have dinner soon. Will Madam also join us? If there are ingredients I can any kind of food, For example, I can make French, Italian, Japanese or Chinese cuisine for you.” “Everyone hasn’t eaten yet. But today I already ordered sushi.” It looks like I will be eating sushi today. “Understood. Until then I would like to secure the place I will be sleeping in first….” “There is plenty of rooms here.” Nanami shook her head. “No, you don’t have to prepare such a big place for me. I will be comfortable enough in Gohshujin-sama’s closet.” Are you a cat-shaped robot? “That’s such an attractive place.” Your sense is strange Nee-san. If it were the past me then I would like to question ‘what are you finding so fascinating in a closet when you are living in such an extravagant room.’ for about an hour. “Then the upper half will be Madam Hatsumi’s and the lower half will be mine…..” “Can I insert the retort here? There’s not such a big closet in my room in the first place. It’s just a normal one.” The big one was designed to put away the futon while the normal one was for clothes, was it? It wasn’t designed for a person to sleep in you know. (TLN: In the raw, the big closet was the Oshiire or Japanese style closet while the normal one was the closet you would normally think of.) “Haa, It can’t be helped. Then Madam can take the right side on Goshujin-sama’s bed and I will be taking the left.” “Ha Ha Ha, you are saying something interesting huh Nanami.” “Un, very good idea.” “You are seriously agreeing?! We are talking about finding her a room here right!?” Seeing my reaction, Nanami smile. “Of course I was joking Goshujin-sama.” That was not a joke, right? Since she is nearby, I was thinking about retorting with [Seriously, what are you saying] and slap her in the back then… “Eh?” Nee-san’s expression was ridden with despair as if her life has come to an end. “ “ ……!! “ “ Mine and Nanami’s voice overlapped. We don’t understand what Nee-san was thinking and don’t know what to say. “Kousuke, Umm, about the thing you said earlier…..” Ludi whose face is still red returned to the living room. “I’m Homeeee, I finally returned. Today’s dinner is sushi you know!” Marino-san returns home in a good mood. Then this place is heading toward pure chaos. The beauties that are gathered inside the living room of Hanamura house are making a lot of different expressions. This must be what people called the calm before the storm. Everyone kept their mouth shut and didn’t say anything. It might be because there’s the finest sushi in front of her, Marino-san is making a cheerful smile. Nee-san whose expression usually never changes is a little down. Ludi who keeps looking at me with her reddened face. Nanami whose natural act made me unable to guess what she is thinking. And Claris-san who just got back and met with this these various expressions and chaos atmosphere is making a confused expression to the extent that I almost feel sorry for her. For a person (elf) that is weak to unexpected situations like her, this situation must be difficult. “...;..So, what is all this about?” Marino-san opens the conversation. I thought about how I should explain it to them for a while but it’s better that I explain it to them from the beginning. The fact that I coincidentally found her in a dungeon. “...;.So I was capturing this dungeon and found her inside...;I formed a contract with her and decided to hire her as a maid at our house.” “I see Fufu. I wonder why you did such a dangerous thing?” Her reproachful gazes are piercing me. It’s not just Marino-san, Everyone except Nanami also has the same eyes. I don’t really think about it when I enter the dungeon because I already take the safety measure for myself. However, everyone doesn’t know that. They don’t know that I have the complete knowledge of the dungeon and that I already prepared all that I can in order to capture it. Looking from the other’s point of view, it can’t be helped that they saw my action as reckless. I happen to find an undiscovered dungeon and enter it alone without contacting anyone. Yeah, If I was in their position I would be furious too. I might be angrier than everyone here. Report Contact Consult is important. Let’s be more careful from now on. Not just Marino-san, Ludi and Nee-san also severely squeezing out the reflection out of me. After I apologize to them, we finally enter the main subject. “Well, Umm, about Nanami-san...;..” When Marino-san looks at Nanami, She stares back at her without saying anything. Nanami is strangely well behaved. She doesn’t cut into the conversation, joke around or even open her mouth at all. As there was no response from Nanami, the room fell into a brief silence. The one who breaks that silence was Claris-san. “I am against it.” Everyone gazes point toward Claris-san. “It, it might be harsh of me but I don’t know who she is. I have the duty to protect Ludivine-sama. It would be too late if something were to happens to her.” Certainly, I understand that she would feel uneasy if I bring in an unknown person into the house. Tentatively, Ludi is still a real royal. ...;...;.since I only see how she usually acts at home, I don’t really feel much sense of a royal from her. Well, Claris-san’s concern is unnecessary. “Unn. Isn’t it fine since this angel was already under contract? I can guarantee that the angel contract is safe you know? If there’s a problem then it would be from Kou-chan, the contractor.” Well, since it’s Kou-chan then it will be fine. Marino-san indifferently follows up. The contract made to angels or demons is absolute. That was the game setting. Well, this setting was only used with that sub-heroine’s event, it was practically a setting that everyone forgets about. Anyway, I think there’s no doubt that setting also carries over to this world. That’s why Nanami said that if I were to order her to tell me all the secret information she would tell me even if it means her own demise. I don’t plan to actually make her do it so I can’t confirm whether she speaks the truth or whether will she be destroyed or not. “...;..As you said, there’s no doubt that the contract was already established. I can never go against Goshujin-sama.” Nanami said. Can’t go against me huh. Even though she clicked her tongue when I tried to use polite language with her and planning to start a bad rumor about me when we can’t live together. Eh, does that mean I just got duped? If that’s the case then I can’t say anything to that debtful-sensei (Luijya). This is bad, I’m getting anxious...;...; “B, But...; t, That’s right. What do you think Hatsumi-sama? She might be obedience but you will have a complete stranger living under the same roof you know?” She must be thinking that Nee-san will be against the idea. Well, that was what I thought too. “I don’t mind.” “Haeeeeee!?” She was shocked. I understand your feeling well. That was the same reaction I had just now after all. “Lu, Ludivine-sama! If it’s Ludivine-sama then...;...;.” Hearing so, Ludi look my way, “M, my most trusted person is Kousuke too...;...;!” She said so with an upward glance. As expected of Ludi, I know she would have my back. Claris-san was quite surprised, She couldn’t say anything as her eyes are wide open and her mouth is keep opening and shutting. If she knew about the event that happened before she arrives then she might be able to react to this situation but her timing was just too bad, she’s rather pitiful...;...; Since I am usually in her care, let’s throw her a lifeboat...;..! “Alright, since it’s already been decided, let’s dig in.” It’s sushi you know, sushi?. Marino-san happily said so while preparing the chopsticks and started eating. She doesn’t seem to care about this at all, it seems this is her favorite food. After we finished eating, I took a bath and head to Nanami’s place. Apparently, Nanami was assigned to a guest room. It seemed like she had a talk with Marino-san and decided on a lot of things. I don’t know the details though. “Tomorrow? I understand.” I tell her about my plan for tomorrow. I will not be visiting “Twilight Grotto” but a different dungeon. I part ways with Nanami and head toward my room. Based on this matter, I decided to make various preparations before entering a dungeon. First, I will take Nanami with me to do a survey and invite everyone to capture the dungeon together. Well, I can’t enter that dungeon with only myself and Nanami alone in the first place. “Haa.” I involuntarily sighed. “It has to be that dungeon huuuuuuuhhhh.” The time has finally come when I have to enter that dungeon...;...;! In a lot of ways, it’s one of the dungeons that I don’t want to enter. It was fine in the game but it also because it was a game that it was the dungeon that I want to visit. I would even load the save file and repeated that dungeon many times too. But this time it’s reality...;...;...; Damn it. The person who thought of the way to unlock that dungeon must really have a screw loose somewhere. But it’s a dungeon that was necessary for me to become stronger, there’s no choice but to capture it...;...; Well, more importantly. Did I leave the light on? I can see the light from the small opening at the door. “...;...;.Umu. Okay. Suuuuuuuhaaaaaaa.” I open the door and take a look inside while taking a deep breath. Good. I wasn’t the one who leaves the light on. In front of my eyes my bed and pieces of clothes that have been taken off in its surroundings. The clothes that were scattered around the room are a brown sweater, a red skirt, and black leggings. Yeah, I remember the person who has been wearing these clothes. Her back is facing me. I can’t say for sure but it seems like she is sleeping well judging from her body rhythm. Well then, why is Nee-san sleeping on my bed? Fuu, I took a deep breath again and fold the clothes that were scattered around. After that, I turned off the light and quietly left the room. My destination is the sofa in the living room. I change the setting on the air conditioner, stretched my body and lie down. Alright. I captured a dungeon today so it’s a good day. Let’s do my best again tomorrow, Goodnight. —– Author Notes: since he has to do a dungeon survey tomorrow, he gotta sleep in the place that he can actually sleep. It was because I remembered the field map and acquired the map from this world that I was able to discover the Twilight Grotto yesterday. However, there’s no need to go to such length for the dungeon I will be capturing this time. The place was already discovered but it was not considered as a dungeon but as a small ruin with no value. I couldn’t find anything on this dungeon from the dungeon documents, so I thought that it was still undiscovered but it was marked as a ruin in the normal map. And according to my findings, this place has already been explored even before Marino-san was born. However, they couldn’t find anything with historical value. Moreover, on top of walking through the forest path to reach this dungeon, this place is also located inside the Hanamura family’s land. It can’t be helped that no one come to such a place. Un, Hanamura’s land is too big!! Now then, even though that place has been discovered, I can guess why it wasn’t categorized as a dungeon. It was because of the miserable nature of its entry condition. “Seems like this is the place.” Nanami said so while folding the map. Maybe it was because this place was made by cutting into a cliff. There are two pillars carved into the wall and the center was like an ellipse cut in half, It’s an inverted U shaped hole. “This place huh……” I tried looking inside but since there’s no light, I can’t see further inside. “Is there really a dungeon in such a place? Excuse me, but did you really read a document on this place? Even the map doesn’t mark this place as a dungeon too…” Nanami looks at me with suspicious eyes. “I really read it. The document that describes this place as a dungeon.” Or so I say but of course, I didn’t. It was a lie that I made up on the spot so it can’t be helped that she will get suspicious. There’s actually a document but you have to get it from an old book store by exchanging it with several magic stones. But since it was only a casual conversation in the game, I don’t know where that bookstore actually is. I thought that Iori might have found it so I sent him a message to confirm but it seemed like he hasn’t found the bookstore either. That old bookstore also provides you with the materials about the other expansion pack dungeons so I really want him to find it. Let me visit it too. Well, even if he doesn’t find it, I can rely on my memory and the map to search for it. At least there’s still a way for me to discover them. “Isn’t there’s something wrong with Goshujin-sama’s existent itself?” “Can you not casually denying my whole existent?” I inserted a retort, I strengthen the stole with magic power and enter the hole. The path is wide enough for four people though. I and Nanami used Light magic while we keep doing deeper inside. Then we found an open space around eighty meters inside. “What is that I wonder?” There are three statues at the place that Nanami pointed at. They are the statue of a woman holding a sword and wand. The statues were arranged in a triangle shape and at the center are three T shaped pedestals. Additionally, the statues are holding a sword in their right hand while holding the wand on their left hand. I immediately went straight to the pedestals but Nanami seemed to be curious about the statues and start examining them. On top of each pedestal is an indentation with an inverted triangle shape. This must be the place to offer [THAT], or so I guess. Additionally, there are unknown letters written around the pedestal but some of the heroines like Nanami should be able to read it. But I already know what was written there. After she finished examining the statues and head toward me. She read the written letters on the pedestal for me. [ [Thou, Off’r us three final shields used by the Warmaidens.] is it?] Nanami looks back at the stone statues. “Final shield?… I wonder what it is. And three of them at that……Is it okay if we just offer 3 shields used by women?” I certainly understand why she interpreted it like that. Rather, if there are people who can read what written here then they must also have the same misunderstanding. Even in the general gaming sense hearing [Thou, Off’r us three final shields used by the Warmaidens.], you would imagine something like a shield made by the goddess or the shield that was used by a legendary hero. If it’s a reality then all the more. However, Magiero was an eroge. You can’t interpret such a thing like that. “Umm, right, it’s hard to say….. But in the document I read…..the shields that we are looking for are more like a cloth….so uhh. About the part that says the thing about final protection…….” “Ha?” “HIEE” Nanami guessed what I wanted to say and give me a stinging gaze. “You see, Uhh…it’s a woman’s…..you know. The last piece of cloth that’s left when you take your clothes off, so you need to offer that…… Ee, I didn’t come up with it on my own okay. I would never think about it. It’s really what the document said. It really says to offer three panties… to pass through.” The place froze. Nanami is expressionless. That expressionlessness also transmitting her disgust and anger toward me, I’m going to wet myself. Moreover, she also keeps staring at me without blinking. “Are you ordering me…to offer mine?” “It’s a misunderstanding! Please listen to me!!” It’s not actually a misunderstanding but I rather want to ask for her consent. It’s not my fault in the first place but I somehow being attacked by this mysterious guilt. Suppressing that emotion, I perform a dogeza without thinking and beg for her forgiveness. No matter who I come to visit this place with I thought that something like this would happen. That’s why I don’t want to capture this dungeon in the first place. In the game, when the protagonist unlocks this dungeon, I just do it without any guilt, dept or sense of reality. It was to the extent that I want to hang my head. Offering their panties, normally the heroines would want to avoid that right? Well, I can’t say for sure because they’re eroge’s heroines, some of them don’t wear one in the first place. However, normally they would want to avoid such a situation. [But it was a necessary condition to enter this dungeon so it can’t be helped right?] it was the excuse in the setting that made the heroines, no matter which one offers their panty, it was an absolute setting in the game. I would immediately bring my favorite characters to this dungeon in the past. And when the game asked you [Which one of you will offer their panty] it will show you the choices with the name of the heroines you brought along. It can’t be helped that my hand that was holding the mouse was shaking when I saw the result of my choice. Depending on the heroines you selected, you will be given a cold eye (reward), showered with insults (also reward) like [Baka, or Hentai]. Then they would say something like [You understand what will happen if nothing happens right?] and they would angrily take off their panties and offer it, they actually do it, they seriously did it. Just how many times did I load the save files to see that conversation……! Moreover, depending on the combination of the characters you brought along, you will be able to get a special event. So together with the gentlemen from the game wiki we tried all the possible combinations and determined all the patterns. It was really fun at that time. Surprisingly, all the expansion pack heroines also offer their panty and have their own special combinations and patterns for special dialogue. I thought they were genius. But It’s actually a disaster. The one who came up with this setting must really be an idiot. Just how do you think people can just casually ask a girl for their panty? There’s no way I can do that right, you stupid idiot? It’s a silly eroge setting so it can be forgiven in the game but in real life, it’s just insane. The guy who came up with this setting seriously must only have ero in their head, no doubt about that. The offering can be a sword or a jewel, there are other things you can use right? The craziest thing about this is that it has to be a used one too. You just brought a pervert to a new height. If it is a new one then you can just buy it at a department store at the convenience store and offer it. “…That’s why, you see. It’s the dungeon that’s bad.” For the time being, I gave her a lot of excuses and keep performing dogeza. Haa, Nanami let out a small sigh and offer me a hand to pull me up. “My deepest apologies, it’s not Goshujin-sama’s fault but I still can’t calm myself down.” At her words, I raise my face. Nanami’s smile kindly like an angel. No, she’s actually an angel, right? “I don’t mind offering mine…… but.” “But?” “Isn’t it fine if…….Goshujin-sama offer yours too?” !? “Goshujin-sama has a slightly neutral face in the first place. If we just change your eyes, nose, ears, mouth and face outline then arrange your hair for a bit it then you would look like a cute man.” Isn’t that a completely different person? Eyes, nose, ears, mouth and face outline, If I change all that then there wouldn’t be any part of me left right? “Well, but there’s that condition….it must come from a war maiden right…….” “Have you try testing it out?” “I haven’t…..” Then, let’s get naked. She said so and I was forced to put my hands on my pants. How did it come to this? At least she won’t be looking at me like Nee-san, right? It felt a little unsatisfied but I take off my pants, get my boxer shorts and put on my pants. Then I put the boxer on the pedestal. A reaction came immediately after. Each of the statues emitted a bright light, it gathered together to form a single line of light that shines on the boxer. “N, No way.” The boxer that the light shone on float up a little and emitting light. It would be fantastic if it’s a panty instead. Then my boxer keeps shining brighter and brighter…..until it catch on fire. “EEEEEHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH! ! ! ! !!” It flutters down to the ground. But the fire won’t disappear. As I was still confused, water shoot out from my side. It seems like Nanami used her water magic. The water impacts on the burning boxer and extinguishes the fire. What’s left behind is a big hole in the place that should be protecting my hidden place. It seems like I can’t use it anymore. “M, My deepest apologies.” As expected, Nanami also making an upset face ridden with guilt. However, maybe it is a response of having my boxers burned or the fact that I am not wearing any underpants right now, my heart was calm. “No, it’s fine. The thing I tried to make you do probably yield a result close to this…. Right. When we capture this dungeon with everyone let’s have they carry another spare for the way back.” I ended up with no underpants but I was able to learn from this. Let’s have the people who will be coming with me to carry a spare panty. It’s decided. “D, Do you have a change of clothes, Goshujin-sama….?” “Nah, I didn’t bring any because I didn’t think this would happen. But is there something I can use to replace it?” I check my bag. Then I found something like a black string in the deepest part of my bag……string? “What’s this?” A thin fabric is attached to the center of the strong. It’s the thing that protects the most important part of a human, a panty. It is a familiar naughty panty. It’s was the one I got when I helped Claris-san move into the house. “N, No. Y, you’re wrong!! This isn’t mine!!” Nanami’s sympathetic expression went back to expressionless again. “Then who does it belong to?” “It, it’s Claris-san’s, It’s certainly not mine.” “……So why do you have Claris-sama panty, I wonder?” “AAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA!!” It doesn’t like I want to steal it in the first place. Certainly, a panty is a supreme item no less than any kind of jewel, Even more so if it came from a beautiful elf then it can’t be helped that I wouldn’t mind paying a huge sum of money to get it. However, it doesn’t mean that us gentlemen want to become a criminal. We rather hate the criminals that would do such a thing. Eroge and reality are two different things. That’s why I say YES to Loli No Touch, I say yes to Eroge Loli (18 Years Old+) and Yes (self-restraint (TLN: Them censorship i.e. fog, rays of light)). I have seen people used such excuses and got treated like a pervert so of course, I wouldn’t say such a thing, I just missed the timing to return it. But it’s unclear how Nanami felt about this. After that, due to the strong pleading from my part, Nanami agreed that we should return immediately. On the way back I felt the discomfort between my legs every time I took a step. I immediately put on underpants when we arrived back at home and think about who I should bring along to the dungeon this time. Personally, I want to get Ludi, Claris-san, and Mizumori-sempai. Since they are familiar with each other, they know each other’s movements which makes it easier for them to cooperate. However, this dungeon’s most important problem is that ero idiot’s setting. What should we do about the panties? This might be the most troubled time of my life. Well then, is there anyone I know that is willing to give me their panties? Thinking about that, the only one who will offer her panties for sure in the party is Nanami. Due to the technicality of our relationship, she will definitely come through for me. The problem lies with the other members. Will Ludi and Sempai offer theirs? If it’s just the panties then there’s an option to get it from Debtful (Luijya)-sensei who should give it to me if I order her. However, If I say [Please give me your used panties.], it would make me become something like a debt collector, that situation comes straight out of an Eroge. Of course, if it’s a game I can try it out but I don’t want to do such a pitiful thing to her in real life. If I have no options left, I still have the option to lower my head and beg for it though. Come to think of it, sometimes you can get a panty from an Ero Magazine right? Can I use that? There’s even that certain eroge magazine that included scented panties as a bonus. No, it seems like it will get burned again. “Hey, Nanami. How should I go about this? Is it dogeza after all?” “….Firstly, it’s best to confirm everyone’s schedule first then invite them, the dogeza will be after that.” “So it has to be done after all huh…….” It seemed like me performing a dogeza is already set in stone. I immediately took out the Tsukuyomi Traveller and sent a message out to several people. ———— The people that gathered are, Mizumori-sempai, Ludi, Nanami, and Nee-san while Claris-san, Marino-san, and Luijya-sensei couldn’t come because they are busy. Rather, I can understand that Marino-san and Luijya-sensei are busy with work but how come Nee-san is here?……………Is this really fine? I bring everyone to the three statues. After that, I immediately rubbed my forehead on the ground and beg for their panties. I thought about telling them in the mail but I can’t say it. I couldn’t say it. It was only after we arrive at this place that my heart is ready. [Since we’re already here, I will offer mine even if it sounds unbelievable.] I hope the situation would turn out like that. My request sounded like a confession and an excuse at the same time. The story reached its climax. I was about to give my everything to ask them for their panties but I felt a hand touched my shoulder. “Raise your head, Takioto.” The one who offers me such a kind word was Sempai. Ludi is looking at me with a difficult face while Nee-san looked at me with her usual expression and makes her way over to the war maiden statues. I don’t know what Nanami is thinking but she is standing right next to me. Sempai offered me her hand and help me up. Then she showed me a cheerful smile while blushing a little. “I might not know Takioto for long but I know that you are not someone who would lie about something like that…..that’s why.” Sempai must be embarrassed, normally she would look at me right in the eyes but today she is fidgeting and avoiding eye contact. “Se, Sempai…..” Sempai opens her mouth a little like she was trying to say something but she ends up doesn’t say anything and even her ears are blushing now. Then she played with her loosened strand of hair. After that, she started to speak but it was a voice that I would never imagine hearing from sempai. “That’s why Umm….it’s a little embarrassing but if it’s okay to use something unsightly as mine then…… P, please use it.” Then sempai said [Don’t look] and turn to hide her blushing face. But since her ears are red like a tomato, she couldn’t completely hide it. Now, if it’s time to say ALRIGHT then it’s fine to say ALRIGHT, right? I hereby declare the birth of the YYY. Let’s make the YYY stand for Yukine Yabai Yukine. Since sempai is something like a god, the name could mean Yukine Yabai God, The Kanji looked good to me. Yes Yes Yukine sounds good too. It seems easy to use if we plan to expand it overseas. (TLN: These fanclubs names are gonna be the death of me.) “Takioto.” When I was thinking about how to share the Fanclub to the world, Ludi looks at me while she looked like she had made up her mind. “I also don’t think that Kousuke would make a weird joke at a time like this. That’s why it’s embarrassing but…..you see.” “I, I’m always helped by Kousuke. I want to become your power, I want to help you. From now on, if something happened I want you to consult with me. Like this time.” Saying so, Ludi takes her eyes off me. “Un, this is a bit embarrassing after all….. But if it’s for Kousuke then, something like a panty…..I will give you as much as you want.” Ludi lowered her face as soon as she says all she wanted to say. Then Ludi turns her back toward me too. I was very happy. Honestly speaking, I thought that she would give me a harsh scold. Even if we are close, if I told someone to give up their panties then I wouldn’t mind getting beat up to a pulp. “……..Thank you, Ludi.” “Un.” She responds with a small voice while her back is still faced toward me. “Kousuke.” This time it is Nee-san. “Yes?” She hands something to me, I unfold the piece of cloth to determine what it is. It’s a pink cloth decorated with black laces, the cloth that protects the most important part. Additionally, the butt part was so thin that I can see my hand through the fabric. If she wears it then I might be able to see them. It’s a pink-black panty. ……………!? I understand that I am completely excited right now. It’s time for a deep breath to calm myself down. It’s her spare one that she brought here to change with right? She just hands it over to have me confirm it right? See, it’s important to have an expert confirm that it can be used right? Nn, wait a minute. Even if you want to confirm, there’s no need to hand it to me right? Was there a need for me to look at it in the first place? Did she mistake me for an expert? Eh? Don’t tell me, she already takes it off? No, there’s not enough time for that right? But I can feel the warmth from this panties, I want to think that it’s just my imagination though. Ummmm. “N, Nee-san. Th, this is that right? The spare that you will change into right……” “It’s somehow felt kinda breezy. It’s fresh.” “YOU SERIOUSLY TOOK IT OFF! JUST PUT ON THE SPARE ONE NOW!!” After that, I return the panties to Nee-san and head outside the cave, as a gentleman would. But. Honestly speaking, I want to see. I want to see them change if I can. However, to the three who offer me their panties...;.. To the two people that willingly offer their panties while enduring the embarrassment, I can’t do that to them. That’s why I can’t allow myself to look. Then what should I do? Can you imagine it? If it’s me who already played more than a hundred eroges, it should be something easy for me to do. “Goshujin-sama.” When I was thinking about Sempai and Ludi taking off their panties, I heard a voice from behind. I turned back to look and found Nanami. Nanami lowers her face with a sorry look on her face. “My deepest apologies. Originally, it should be me who offered the panties. But why everyone is willing to offer their panties? Even though they knew that I have an absolute loyalty toward you, why are they still willing to offer theirs?” There’s no need to apologize in particular though. Rather, isn’t that misplaced? “Goshujin-sama made too many Madams.” Umm, in the first place though. “I don’t remember having a wife yet...;...;.” “Well, let’s set that aside. You see, I am very frustrated right now.” “What exactly are you frustrated about...;...;..” Was there anything to be frustrated about? “When Goshujin-sama was spilling out nonsense and everyone finally give up on you, I planned to gallantly show up to heal Goshujin-sama’s wounded heart. Then I will make Goshujin-sama a captive of my charm by cheering you up with gentle words. I even thought up the words to cheer you up but everything ended up wasted.” I see so she frustrated that she didn’t the chance to captivate me huh. “So you have been planning such a thing? I’m surprised. By the way, how did you planned to cheer me up?” “It’s okay, Goshujin-sama! Even if no one is going to offer it, I will! My panties belong to Goshujin-sama’s alone? And if Goshujin-sama dresses up as a girl and offers your panties the dungeon might mistake it for a genuine one and accept it, it’s too early to abandon hope!” “Rather than comforting, aren’t you cornering me instead? Can you stop trying to make me crossdress?” Who’s going to crossdress? Leave something like that to the protagonist. Rather, why are you so obsessed about this? “Aah, and I was planning to pat your head while pushing your face onto my chest too. What a shame.” What a shame indeed. Isn’t that interesting? Will she do it if I pretended to be shocked right now? But I won’t ever crossdress you know. “With that being said...;...;” She said so and hand me something. It’s a light blue cloth with white stripes. What Nanami gave me was not a handkerchief. A handkerchief doesn’t have a cute ribbon like this. Then, I can immediately guess what she handed to me. “N, no we won’t need another one you know.” I said so but Nanami walks toward me and put it inside my breast pocket. She patted the pocket that she put her panties inside while making an expression like she did something good and back away. I quickly tried to return it but Nanami won’t take it back. “It’s fine. I just want to show my sincerity to Goshujin-sama no matter what. That’s all.” “I, I understand. I already got your sincerity so I don’t need this. Rather, what should I do with this in the first place!?” Hearing so, Nanami approaches me and whisper into my ear. “You still have Claris-sama’s right?” I swallowed my saliva. How did she know that? I want to make excuses but the words didn’t come up...;...; When I was desperately thinking about what to do, Nanami stole the march and speak first. “You want it right? Mine is especially good you know. Your defense will increase if you wear it too.” “I don’t want a panty to increase my defensive power. I have no idea how to put it on in the first place, normally that is. No, that’s not a good picture to imagine too.” “So, please think about it as an amulet, it’s like you always carrying me with you. You can say something like [You alone I will never hand over] too. Moreover...;..it somehow felt like I lost.” There’s nothing to win or lose about though. Nanami back away while making a satisfied expression and return inside the cave. I decided to cherish the panties and hurriedly follow her. Apparently, the preparation was almost ready and they were about to call us in. I hide the panties while avoiding sempai’s gaze and head toward the war maiden statues with everyone follow along. The three who will be offering their panties are standing in front of the pedestals and prepare their panties. They must have folded it and carry it in their hands. Sempai and Ludi are holding it with both hands while sneaking a glance at me with their face still a little blushed. Then there’s Nee-san who is stretching her back while still having her usual expression on her face with her panties on top of her open palms. Why is she looking so dignified? “Okay, let’s start.” With Nee-san single word, the three of them put their panties on the pedestals. The reaction started right away like the time I offered my boxer pants. Dazzling light was emitted from the three statues. The light gathered into a line for each statue and shine on the respective panties. Sempai’s neatly folded blue panty is slowly unfolding in the light. For sempai who doesn’t want to show me her panty, this is the same as a public execution. It was a blue panty with snowflakes patterns. It was well designed as it matched Yukine-sempai’s name. If I see her wearing it I might just faint right then and there. Ludi’s pure white panties also unfolded like sempai’s. It shows her noble image since it’s pure white but the one I am seeing right now is much more risque than I expected. When I look at such offensive power, my heart started to beat faster. Noticing my gaze. Sempai and Ludi turn back and give me the [Please don’t look] face. I was about to puke blood. As if her neck was a machine that hadn’t been oiled for a hundred years, Ludi covers her face with both her hands and crackingly turns her face away from that blissful sight. And while I screamed inside my heart, I engraved the picture of the two jewels I saw earlier inside my memory. It was about a minute after that Nanami gave me permission to raise my face. When I opened my eyes, Sempai, Ludi, and Nanami are making a serious expression while Nee-san still making her usual expression. At the center of the three pedestals, a magic circle appeared. I took a deep breath and put magic power inside my stole and swing it a few times. Sempai took out her naginata, Ludi and Nee-san readied their wands and Nanami took out a bow and dagger. Everyone started preparing for battle. I also took the sword out from the storage bag. After confirming that everyone is ready, we step on the magic circle. When you heard the word dungeon, most people would think about [Traps]. including me, a lot of people who played Rogue-like games before had been a victim to such traps. Literally speaking. There would be a landmine explode under your feet, some sort of seals, and pitfalls with monster’s nest at the bottom. Personally though, I considered all the unreasonable death as a trap. When you progress so smoothly through the game, you suddenly fell into a crisis and die just like that. I hate it. I seriously hate it. Up until my high school years that is. In the world of Eroge and Galge or even in the world of recent manga and anime, Traps are the best thing that could happen. What’s so good about the traps inside Eroge and Galge you asked? The traps would often drench you in some unknown liquid or entangle you with tentacles and force you into a very sensational posing and there would be the monster that only dissolves clothes at the bottom of the pitfalls. You can no longer make sense of the situation using common sense. Magiero was no exception. There are a lot of Eroge-like traps in the game, when you activated a trap you would always get a picture (CG) and you would want to pause the game to enjoy the scenery while burning that image into your brain. But unfortunately, as this is a reality, I can’t do that. In the game, the emotion like [Aah I failed, I’ve done it now] didn’t even exist. Rather, I would desperately seek the traps out myself and purposely sent in my favorite heroine. Well, I can’t do that right now anyway, I don’t want to do such a terrible thing to these girls in the first place. However, deep inside my heart, the feeling of [Just a little bit...;...;...;...;.] would spring up and I have to desperately hold that feeling down. Well then, the dungeon that we entered this time, the [Shadow Ruin] is, depending on the route, would be the first dungeon that you would encounter those traps. However, because you can’t capture this dungeon unless you activate the store exclusive patch and the fact that capturing this dungeon was not a necessary step to make your characters into the strongest, many gentlemen skipped this dungeon. However, even if I say that it was not necessary, in the early game (New game with no previous playthrough), this dungeon was the place that you can get the items that will make capturing later dungeons a lot easier. Among those items, there’s an item that I want no matter the cost, I am even willing to get branded as a pervert to get it. That’s why. “I have to get it no matter what...;...;” I punched the [Mummy] with third hand and let out a small sigh. When the mummy hit the ground, its body starts shrinking and turn into magic elements and magic stone. Now, If you asked me what kind of monster a mummy is, it is a monster with the appearance of a dried-up human wrapped inside bandage with the only gap for their eyes. It’s the thing that got buried inside an Egyptian pyramid, the mummy you can find even in other fantasy games. The first thing that came up in my mind when I look at them was that they are simply disgusting. Looking at their darken face with no sign of life was already made me mentally repulsed already. Additionally, it will become much more troublesome fighting with the zombie-kind monsters in the later dungeons. Since the mummies are dry corpses. The smell wasn’t so bad. However, the zombies emitted their foul smell from their entire body. The characters in the game even have a line that said [The smell is too much.] Honestly, I don’t want to fight them. But since they appear in the dungeons that I have to visit, I will most certainly have to fight with them. We have been fighting with the human-type mummy so far but in the future, the dungeon I have to capture also have animal-type appearing like Goat-mummy, Gazelle-mummy, Lion-mummy and so on. There is no strong monster inside this dungeon so I don’t have to be so on guard though. Nanami approaches me when I was picking up a magic stone. “It was a wonderful battle, Goshujin-sama.” “What, it’s thanks to your support Nanami. You even detect the traps for us right?” Her support with the bow was really helpful, some monsters were defeated even before I can approach it. “It’s not much but I’m glad that I can be of help. However, I’m not confident in trap detection so please don’t be overconfidence...;...;” Nanami said apologetically. But Nanami’s trap detection rate in the game was already god-tier. There’s a skill for trap detection in Magiero in the first place, if you level it up it would become much easier to detect traps. Nanami’s trap detection skill can be easily leveled up but her initial skill level was zero. The scout type character like Katrina will have a higher skill level from the start. They also possess some levels in skills like lockpicking and trap disarming. I expected Nanami’s trap detection rate to be around eighty to ninety percent. However, looking at her one hundred percent detection rate on the first three floors, it seems like the Maid Knight Shiki Edition Angel-Model also equipped with some kind of special abilities. I don’t know what it is though. There’s still the possibility that it wasn’t just her luck as well. Well, it’s good that we didn’t get caught in a trap but it was also very unfortunate as well. We didn’t get trapped at all. I thought that if Ludi and Sempai got caught in a trap we missed then it can’t be helped, but that never happened. If they are going to be trapped then I want it to be inside this dungeon since the traps here are not dangerous. But that wish won’t come true. Since Nanami has been detecting traps left and right, her detection skill level should have gone up quite a bit too. As this dungeon was aimed toward beginner, the traps here are only the low-grade ones. Well, it seems like that side battle has ended as well. Sempai and Ludi are making their way toward my direction. —— “Nn suuu...;haaa, haaa...;..” As I stopped sending my magic power over, Ludi exhales a deep sigh and take a breath while leaning on me. Her fevered gazes and sweat-soaked hair sticking on her cheeks and forehead were bad for me in a lot of ways. Not [were], this should be a present progressive sentence. I let go of Ludi’s warm and slightly wet hand. “Ah” She let out a small voice. Now then, just how weird is my gift magic? From what Claris-san said, it felt like receiving a strange massage though. The gift magic Claris-san used on me doesn’t yield the same result too. It would be fine in the game but since it’s a reality, I’m troubled. Especially right before battle. I can’t find the cause even when I tried thinking about it. So I decided to let it be. But there’s still a problem. Why are Nee-san and Nanami lining up while looking this way like they are craving something? Including Nanami, angels are basically operating with magic power so I can understand what she wants. I tried using it on her once as an experiment and since she used magic power in combat, it’s not weird for her to be needing some. But why is Nee-san also lined up? You didn’t use much magic power in the first place, right? Please look at Sempai. Sempai is already properly resting...;.. Eh, she is looking at Ludi and making a languishing expression...;...;.It, it’s just my imagination, right? I promised Nanami and Nee-san that I will use gift magic on them when we get back and continue exploring the dungeon. (TLN: ( ?° ?? ?°) ( ?° ?? ?°) ( ?° ?? ?°)) ————— After that, we go down several floors and reached the sixth floor. The only thing that changes from the battle up until now is that Sempai is now actively participating in the battle. It seemed like she wants to move her body after watching us so she is now fighting using only her magic. Doing so, she provided a lot to our fighting force. The reason being, we encountered the [Sand Golem] which has poor compatibility with Ludi. As the name suggests, the sand golem is made up of sand. My physical attack was ineffective as the sand just scattered and the impact absorbed. Even if I keep hitting it with Third and Fourth hand, there is no sign that it did any damage at all. The same applied to Ludi as well. Even if they were hit by the wind generated by Storm Hammer and sent flying to the wall, they just get back up and come back at you as if nothing happened. However, due to its slow movement, we won’t get hit unless something goes wrong. At the same time though, it also limited the attack method of our side as well. That’s where Sempai comes in. Sempai’s specialty water magic was very effective against sand golems. When exposed to water those sand golems will harden and become like soil. As they are hardened, it is very easy to smash them to pieces. When it becomes like that, these sand golems just turned into sandbags. With that as the case, we just repeating the process of Sempai drenching them with water while myself and Ludi keep smashing them to bits. However, the impact base attack of Nanami who learned the magic [Explode Arrow] was an exception. She can defeat the sand golems before Sempai uses water magic to hardened them so she was very helpful when we are facing multiple sand golems at once. If sempai doesn’t lend her hand then Nanami’s burden would be increased considerably. Rather, aren’t you learn a new move too fast? Must have been my imagination. Thanks to that, the battle became much easier. If I came here solo then I might have some trouble with these guys. If it’s Ludi then she can use water magic too but not as well as Sempai. If she wanted to she can also learn explosion magic as well so there’s no problem for her to solo this dungeon. However, right now it seems like she is focusing on wind magic so her water magic is not so useful. Well, if we fight as a party then rather than a jack of all trades, a specialist is better. The same was true when it was a game. You would normally make a character that can do everything after you made them specialized in one thing and have time left to spare (second playthrough on). If the character has something they specialized in you would definitely use them. However, in my case, the sand golem proved to be extremely troublesome. I can shoot water at them but it’s strangely inefficient. It won’t reach the place I aim for and since the water is so little, I don’t know how much time or magic power I have to spend to drench its entire body. The water enchantment is also ineffective, the sand golems don’t harden when I hit it and the impact will just get absorbed. When it comes to this, my only option is to use battle magic stone. However, is it worth spending battle magic stones for? When I think about that, the answer is that it’s better to run away and only fight when I am surrounded. But since these guys provide good experience points, it might be better to fight them if the conditions are met. “That’s why fighting in a party is so efficient huh.” Since there are better places to farm, this place doesn’t seem efficient to me though. I smashed the sand golem that sempai drenched with water and look at it as it turns into magic elements and magic stone. As I was staring absentmindedly someone calls out to me from behind. “Why do you want to become stronger so much, Takioto?” That person was sempai. “I just want to become the strongest though...;..?” It felt like I talked about this with sempai before, no, we definitely talked about it. “Is that so...; it just felt like you are in a hurry to me...;...;.” Is it because I dive into a dungeon like this every day? Normally there wouldn’t be a person who dive into the dungeons as much as me. But I think the amount of training sempai has been doing is a lot more than mine though. “There’s no such thing, if I am going to become the strongest then it’s no good if I don’t get my act together now right?” My goal, Hijiri Iori is without a doubt, a cheat. He seriously studying in the classroom and even capturing another dungeon right now. He said it himself that he is challenging another dungeon at the moment. Well, since this place is a store exclusive dungeon, it’s not strange that he doesn’t know about this place. Well, his action was like a player on his first playthrough with no prior knowledge about the game. I am probably stronger than him right now, no doubt about it. However, exactly because he is proceeding normally, he would get stronger normally like a protagonist normally would too. And in the case that he is too weak I planned to lend him a hand as well. That’s why from now on Iori will keep learning more useful unique skills and keep growing his strength using his cheat. If you planned to catch up with him then a normal route won’t cut it. I have to use the thing I can from the start, I think that it’s better to become as strong as I can. Fortunately, I have a weapon, the fruit of the gentlemen’s research, the [Knowledge]. And the unique ability of Takioto Kousuke, the character that was by no means considered weak in the game. Depending on how I fight I think I can win, I will definitely make it happen. Also, the person that I have to surpass wasn’t just Iori alone. There is still the monsters called the Three Strongest. I stare at Sempai. Today Sempai is wearing a deep blue hakama. Her hair is gathered together into a ponytail that flows behind her back. Her nape is the best. It’s so good to the extent that if her nape was a bowl of rice I can eat three full bowls without seasoning. She was always beautiful but today she is even more beautiful. “Don’t Sempai want to become stronger too?” “I do...;...;...;..” She doesn’t say much but I understand what she wants to convey. “Then let’s become stronger together. Let’s invite Ludi and capture the hundredth floor of Tsukuyomi dungeon together.” Well, there’s actually one hundred and one floors in total though...;...; let’s leave that aside. The remaining problem would be the dungeon that appears after we beat Tsukuyomi dungeon. Well, I might have to leave that to Iori though. “Fufu, what are you saying. The highest floor ever recorded was eighty-seventh you know?” Sempai laughingly said so. Yes, there are only eighty-seven floors recorded. “I’m pretty serious about this you know...; but is it really impossible to capture it together in the end?” Considering sempai’s position in this world, she is the vice-captain (vice president) of the public moral committee, she is only the second from the top, and she was even praised for how hard she worked in the original game. There’s no way I can form a party with her. In the game, she would join the party if you asked her but normally thinking she would prioritize the party she had before right? There’s no way she would prioritize a party that came out of nowhere like mine. “Fufu.” As I was thinking about being denied by her, sempai let out a laugh. “It’s fine, I don’t mind going with you if I am free. I give you my word, I will capture it with you.” She hit my back and walks toward where everyone is. I follow after her swaying ponytail, white nape, and well-shaped butt. ———- After breaking through seventh, eighth and ninth floors filled with sand golems, we finally arrived at the final tenth floor. The map of this floor is not randomly generated like the previous floors, as it is only a straight path that leads toward the boss room. It was constructed like any dungeon final floor would have. We took a short break to prepare ourselves and enter the boss room. The boss that appeared is a Lion mummy. As the name suggests it is a mummy of lion with the appearance of a lioness with a blackened and morbidly thin body. Its speed and force behind each of its attacks are a little faster than the Kasha I fought inside the [Twilight Grotto]. However, we didn’t have a hard time with it. In the first place, this Shadow Ruin and the Twilight Grotto are the dungeons of the same level. Despite fighting the boss monster with the same level I didn’t have a hard time dealing with it as I am not alone this time. I can react to its attack and using my stole to guard with enough room to spare. As I was guarding its second attack, Ludi cut it up with WindCutter. I punch it into the wall while Nanami follows up with exploding arrow and Ludi finish it off with Storm Hammer. It got so messed up that I almost feel sorry for it. “…….That was fast.” “…….Right.” That was really too fast. I can’t describe it with anything more than an elementary school kid’s impression, Its claw was a little scary. I did prepare a fire magic stone which was a common weakness of mummy-type monsters but I didn’t get the chance to use it since our fighting power was too overwhelming. Originally, our power was enough to challenge a higher level dungeon. Well, I planned to capture another dungeon but it’s not a higher-level one though. After Ludi collected the magic stone we continue making our way inside. What lies ahead after the boss room was a single treasure chest. That treasure chest which was made from wood and steel are undoubtedly holding the treasure I am looking for. Seeing the treasure chest, Ludi and Sempai let out a small smile with Nanami and Nee-san follow from behind. I tilted my head. Come to think about it, I remember that I reset the game a lot of time when I open this chest. Just why did I do that? Was there any reason I would reset the game besides collecting the CGs? After the four assembled the image of Ludi drenched appearance suddenly pops up in my head. “Ah” I remembered. There was a trap here. And it’s the SRPG (Simulation RPG) part trap. It was the Adventure part trap. If memory serves me right, there’s a pitfall in front of the chest. It was a trap that will activate no matter how high your trap detection skill is and the bottom is filled with the sticky liquid that will make you feel aroused. It’s another eroge theme trap and it will only affect women. It seems that Nanami’s detection doesn’t function properly due to the effect of this event trap. Ludi and others seem like they didn’t notice it either. Is it fine to let things go like this? The drenched image of Sempai and Ludi came to my mind. If I let them fall then I get to see a beautiful sight. But is it fine to deliberately letting such a thing happen when I know beforehand? If I let them fall this time I would engrave their figure in my heart with all my being and I will make two backups in the deepest part of my memory but will I be able to interact with them normally from now on? As I thought, I can’t do it. “LUDI, SEMPAI, STOP!!” It was the same moment I shouted out. The floor beneath Ludi and Sempai split open with a *Gatan* sound. I try to grab the falling Ludi and Sempai with Third and Fourth hand but I can’t reach them. I was too late. However, if there’s still a chance I can still save them, no matter how small, then….. I jumped into the pitfall. I grabbed Ludi and Sempai in mid-air with Third and Fourth hands and lift them up. After that, I prepared for the fall. There was almost no impact. Should I say I just diving into a pond rather than a hard floor? What I fell on was that Liquid. But as it isn’t that deep I am only drenched to my knees. This liquid must have absorbed all the impact. I don’t feel any pain at all. Even if an egg drop in here it probably wouldn’t break. Since it splashed up to my butt, I am plentily wet though. “Ludi, Sempai, you okay?” “I, I’m fine.” “Me too……” I hold them up as to not let them touch the liquid and look around. As I examine the area I found a staircase on my right-hand side. I confirm that there’s no liquid in the area and let them down there. Thinking about it normally, there shouldn’t be any way out inside a trap though…….is it because it’s an ero trap? We meet up with Nanami who came down for us and head back up. After I reach the top, Nee-san immediately checked my body. “I get a bad feeling from this liquid, Yukine.” Sempai nodded to Nee-san’s word and immediately use her water magic to wash the liquid away. Nee-san also uses her detoxification magic on me. “Kousuke…..” Ludi muttered while watching worriedly as Sempai washing me with water magic and let out a sigh. “I’m glad……Ludi and Sempai are safe.” I’m truly glad that they are safe. If I let them drenched in that liquid then my conscience would torture me while I am turned on at the same time, I might have open the door to a new world after that. “I, I’m sorry. Because of my carelessness…..” “Sorry, I was careless too.” The two apologized but, “You two, Please don’t apologize.” It was all my fault in the first place. If I acted a little faster then such a disaster wouldn’t have happened. Moreover, I even thought about staying silent on purpose to see their drenched figure too. “Kousuke……” Ludi tried to wipe me with a towel but she stopped her hand. She grasped tightly on the towel and make an expression like she was overcome with emotions. Sempai also stopped using water magic and look at me absentmindedly. “Goshujin-sama.” Nanami called out while looking sideways at me with an extremely worried expression and bowed deeply. “I am extremely sorry.” Just what is this about? I thought so. “I couldn’t detect that trap.” Hearing so I thought, What? Just that? And shook my head. “There’s no need to apologize. You helped me plenty enough detecting the traps and battling today. “But……..” “No but.” No maaaaaaaatter how I thought about it, this time it’s entirely my fault. “Don’t make such a worried face and just get back to normal. Quarreling with your poison tongue is fun, I can’t help it.” She knows that it’s a joke right?…… She knows that right? “Goshujin-sama.” Seriously, don’t look at me like that, I am already felt guilty enough. —– After the liquid was wiped away to some extent, we started to move out. We head toward our objective and arrive in front of the treasure chest. It might be because she just got caught in a trap but Ludi is trying to cautiously open the treasure chest. However, the chest didn’t open. Instead, letters are emerging in front of the chest. [Please Enter The Password.] Password? Everyone tilted their head, but be at ease because I know the password. “It’s okay. It was written in the document.” I provided them with an appropriate excuse and switch places with them to enter the password. [Ano onna no House] (TLN: あの女のハ○ス White album? I’m not too familiar with niconico meme lol) I pressed the OK button and the chest automatically open with an unlocking sound. Everyone looks inside the chest. There are five rings inside. A ring adorned with a red gem, A ring adorned with a blue gem, A ring adorned with a green gem, A ring adorned with a yellow gem and a shabby looking ring. It’s just like the game. The four rings with gems embedded on them are rings that boost the power of fire, water, wind and earth attribute. Their power is rather...;.. “...;..it’s powerful.” “I have challenged many dungeons before but I have never seen such a thing before.” Weak...;...;...;.eh? Nee-san, Sempai, are you joking? “I can feel a really strong power coming from them.” ...;.if you think about the fact that the highest recorded captured floor of Academy (Tsukuyomi) dungeon was eighty-seventh floor then that might be reasonable. These four rings are strong until the mid-game after all. It will become quite insufficient in the end game though. “I can’t say much with my low-level appraisal skill.” Nee-san said so as a preface and give us a simple appraisal result. Of course, I already know how these rings work. As Nee-san explained it, the red gem held the power of fire, the blue gem held the power of water, the green gem held the power of wind and the yellow ring held the power of earth while she doesn’t know much about the shabby one, when compared it to the other rings, there’s not much hidden magical power inside it. I confirmed that the explanation was over and take the four attributed rings in my hand. Then I hand them over to the girls according to their forte attribute. I give the ring with a deep red ruby-like gem to Nanami. Well, she can use any attribute anyway but I will give it to her since there are a lot of occasions to use fire on. I give the ring with a deep blue sapphire-like gem to Sempai. It’s ideal for sempai because water magic is her specialty. The emerald ring that reminded you of the deep forest was given to Ludi. If you are speaking about wind then it has to be Ludi. I think I will be in her care in the future too. Finally, I give the ring with citrine-like gems to Nee-san. I don’t know whether she uses any earth element magic but...;..just in case. “I will take this.” The one I picked up for myself was the leftover shabby looking ring. “Eh, is that really okay with you, Kousuke?” “...;.is it really okay to give these rings to us?” Sempai and Ludi protested in surprise. “Comparing to the others, that ring doesn’t have that much power.” It is as Nee-san says, compared to the four elemental rings this ring has little to offer both in terms of rarity and power. However, this ring can do something that I can’t, it has the power of trap detection. Well, since its power is pretty weak it won’t be of any use after we pass the mid way point and rather than this ring Nanami is also quite compatible with scout skill too. But I still want this. In the first place, it depended on the user to exhibit the full power of an item. As I rarely use elemental magic, those items would be a waste on me. After I received everyone’s assent I take the ring for myself. Then, Nee-san reaches her hand out to me. “I won’t go to any dungeon anyway.” She returns the ring I gave her and pat my head. ...;...;Why are you stroking my hair I wonder? “...;...;Let’s head back.” We nod to Nee-san’s word and enter the return magic circle. ————— Using the magic circle, we arrive back at the war maiden statues. When I was about to head out of the cave, I noticed. “Oops, my shoelaces are untied. Everyone, go ahead without me.” There’s no reason to stay in such a dark, narrow and eerie place. Sempai and the others acknowledge and head outside the cave first. After I tie the shoelaces and thought about hurrying after them...; I noticed that there’s a shadow in front of me. There’s some kind of light source behind me. I put magic power into my stole and look back at the war maiden statues. At the center of the three war maiden statues, a ball of light is floating. It was emitting a dazzling light but the light eventually fades away and split into three, each forms a shape of a triangle. It floats on top of the pedestals in front of each statue. The lights slowly descend on the pedestal and disappear. One of them was pure white. The triangle that hides the important part is slightly reflecting light as they are made of synthetic fibers like polyester with white lace adorned its rim. Moreover, it’s not an exaggeration to say that the back is almost like a string, it’s questionable whether it can hide anything. Well, according to my memory, that’s Ludi’s risque panty. Another one is light blue. Its base materials are cotton and it was properly made. No risque feeling can be felt from it as it protects all the important parts. On top of the base cotton, it is decorated with laces that resemble a snowflake and white frills around the waist. Now, according to my memory, that’s Sempai’s high-sense panty. The last one is the pink-black panty. I already touched that one with my own hand. Well, I can recall it from my warmth memory, that’s Nee-san’s naughty panty. “Fuuuu” Calm down, let’s organize the current situation. There is a panty on top of each pedestal. I swallow my saliva. My heart is beating faster than an engine after you accelerated it to its limit. I tell myself to calm down and slowly turn my head toward the exit. There was no one there. —– Takioto Kousuke is different. As a Maid Knight, I am not in the position to choose my contractor. Among the angels, there are those with a position that has the right to choose their contractor but for those within the lowest caste like myself, I basically don’t have such a right. Be that as it may, the fact that I had formed a contract with Takioto Kousuke, in a certain sense could be considered both a good and a bad thing. Originally, I should be forming a contract with a dungeon master or someone with a similar position so there shouldn’t be any connection between myself and a normal person. However, I had contracted myself with Takioto Kousuke. In a certain sense, that might just be my bad luck. Originally, a maid knight has built-in knowledge of dungeon management and how to serve their master via knowledge transcription magic. But Takioto Kousuke is not on the side of dungeon management. Instead, he is on the side of the conqueror, the type of person that denies the meaning of my existence itself. But a contract is a contract. To me, once I made a contract with someone, that contract is absolute. There’s no mistake that a path had formed between myself and Goshujin-sama. Thus, I have become Goshujin-sama faithful maid knight. I was worried about how it will turn out. According to the transcribed knowledge, the Maid Knight Series is considered as a disposable tool and basically wouldn’t be taken good care of by most people. But aren’t you treated me as you equal, Goshujin-sama? As to test him, I intentionally act rudely toward him and tried his patience in a lot of ways. But somehow he never gets angry at me. Well, there are times that he joke around to hide his embarrassment though. Anyway, Goshujin-sama never gets angry at me. Instead, the amount of retort he inserted wouldn’t lose to a comedian. If I am allowed to say it frankly, that was very enjoyable for me. To exchange such meaningless banter was to show how much trust people held in each other, or so the knowledge inside me said. Moreover, the fact that he placed so much trust in me when we just recently met is already a mystery in and of itself. Instead, I am worried for him. So I told him something that I shouldn’t. I told him how I should be treated originally and even told him things that will become inconvenient for me in the future. Well, he would notice them anyway without me telling. It seems like Goshujin-sama has his own illusion of what angels are like. The lowest caste angels, in the words of humans, are something that should be treated similarly to a slave. The moment I told him that, I felt a little regret inside me. How will he treat me after this? Why did I have to go and dig my own grave? Still, Goshujin-sama surprisingly planned to treat me preciously. Rather, he was quite sympathetic toward me. Let me say it clearly. Compared to the other maid knight from my knowledge, his treatment toward me is the best. Above all, Goshujin-sama said that I am needed. In a certain meaning, for a created being like myself, there’s no greater word I could have received. There’s no happier thing than being contracted to Goshujin-sama. Another thing that surprised me was the amount of Madam candidates. I intended to call them that as a joke but everyone seems to be serious about it, I don’t know what to say. However, there are not just good things. I can think of several basic problems as well. One of them was the dungeon that he recruited me to capture. Goshujin-sama said that he read a document about this dungeon, the [Shadow Ruin]. But if there’s such a document then why doesn’t this place discovered as a dungeon and why he didn’t bring said document with him in the first place, there are many points I can use to corner him. However, since he doesn’t want to talk about it, I didn’t ask him anything. He will tell me when he feels like it, I will wait for him until then. I want to hear it from him. Also, please forgive me for getting stuck on the dungeon entrance but I have something to say about it. Just what is with the entry condition that you have to sacrifice used panty? The dungeon master who created this dungeon must have a screw loose in his head. And why does it need three panties for that matter? Well, that was one problem down, we somehow managed to enter the dungeon, we defeated the boss and found a treasure chest, that’s where another problem surfaced. With the *Gatan* sound the floor beneath Ludi-sama and Yukine-sama split into two. As I was still surprised, Goshujin-sama jumped into the pitfall himself. Goshujin-sama lift both of them up by switching places with them he managed to save both of them. However, he got drenched in the liquid in their stead. I was relieved from the bottom of my heart that it was not a fatal trap. Then I reflected on my own worthlessness. Apparently, Ludi-sama and Yukine-sama were speechless about how Goshujin-sama saved them at the cost of himself. If I was put in the same situation I would feel the same way as well. It took ten minutes to wipe Goshujin-sama clean. It was due to my mistake that Goshujin-sama had to experience such a thing, I have to thoroughly reflect on myself. Normally, a master should already punish me for such a mistake. But still, Goshujin-sama said that it wasn’t my fault, he even praised me about how reliable I am. And above all, he said that quarreling with me was fun for him too. Knowing that I wasn’t the only one who had fun, it made me even more happier. Now, it’s no good to just be happy. Someday something like this will happen again, in preparation for that day, I will continue to improve my trap detection skill. Thinking so, we made our way to the front of the treasure chest. Ludi-sama carefully tried to open it but it was apparently locked by password. However, it seems like Goshujin-sama knows that password so he proceeded to open the chest. But just how did he knows the password? Anyway, there are five rings inside the chest. As far as the gems and magical power concern, four of them hold the power to enhance attributed magic at an intermediate level while the other one only has the ability at the elementary level. As poor as my ability is, I still can’t appraise the elementary level ring. But it seems like Goshujin-sama was after its ability, let’s cut down the sleeping time and do more training. It’s great that I trained with the bow all night and it turned out well, there shouldn’t be any loss with this. Well, according to Hatsumi-sama, it seems like mine and Goshujin-sama’s values are different from everyone else. He made a face like those four rings aren’t probably worth that much. I thought about confirming it with him later but I think that I am not mistaken. I might be stirring a hornet’s nest so I decided against asking him but a dungeon like this can’t produce such high-quality items. My knowledge says so. These rings are probably intermediate class items. Therefore, you can only think that mine and Goshujin-sama’s common sense are the abnormal ones while Ludi-sama and the other’s commonsense are the normal commonsense for this world. With that as the case, the only conclusion that can be drawn is...;...;...;...;...;. When I was thinking so, Goshujin-sama handed me the fire attribute ring. Apparently, Gohshujin-sama will take the ring with the lowest rarity for himself and give the rest to us. I understand that because Ludi-sama and others sacrificed their panties to enter this dungeon while Goshujin-sama discovered the dungeon and solve its puzzles. That’s why I was surprised about why I am receiving such a great thing. Does this box have a recognition misalignment ability that could yield such a result? That incongruity has also led to a new impression of Goshujin-sama. Did he aim for this or was he just doing unconsciously? You actually aimed for this right? Either way, as expected of Goshujin-sama. Whether he intentionally did it or unconsciously did it, giving rings to four people at once was not a feat any playboy could do. Well, I understand that he wasn’t proposing though. However, as I saw Ludi-sama secretly trying to put it on her ring finger, it wouldn’t be a mistake for anyone to say that it was a proposal. The same goes for Yukine-sama who took a glance at Ludi-sama and was considering doing the same herself. Well, both of them changed their minds and put the ring on their right-hand ring finger though. Of course, I grandly put it on my left hand. It’s a matter of course. If you wanted to appeal to Goshujin-sama, you have to be more direct about it, I will advise them about this later. Please follow Hatsumi-sama’s example...;...; No, Hatsumi-sama is too straightforward. I was surprised about her at first too. Come to think of it, I wonder why Goshujin-sama acted so suspiciously after we left the cave? Especially when he speaks to Hatsumi-sama, Ludi-sama, and Yukine-sama. ————————————————————————— That night after we got back, Goshujin-sama called me. Is it service time? I asked, but it seems like that’s not the case. I told him that I am ready any time and listen to the main subject. “You are going to another dungeon?” “I want you to come with me.” I don’t mind if you just said ‘come’ instead of ‘want me to come’ though. Seems like Goshujin-sama told the Hanamura family that he already took measure to guarantee the safety margin and received the permission to challenge the dungeon with only the two of us. I see, tomorrow is a school day huh. That’s why Hatsumi-sama and the others won’t be coming along this time. “There’s something that I need to do right now...;...;.” “I understand but isn’t it better to take a break first? All you do is challenging the dungeons lately.” Hearing so, Goshujin-sama scratches his neck with his right hand. “That’s true but I have a goal that I want to achieve...;..I want to do my best now.” “A goal you want to achieve?” “Aa, actually I want to take over the world.” He said so embarrassingly so I decided to tease him for now. “Don’t tell me, so you want to become a comedian?” “How did it comes to that! I’m not trying to take over the world with a joke, It’s magic, Magic.” “Ah, I see...;..” “Why are you so unmotivated!!” “I thought that you were going to become a comedian, I even thought up a name for our duo.” “Well prepared aren’t you! By the way, what’s the name?” “Yes, I took mine and Goshujin-sama’s name into consideration and came up with the name [Nanami Revolution].” “There’s not even a [T] from Takioto in there. Just where did you put in my name.” “No helping it then. Let’s agree on a compromise and go with [Nanami Extreme...;...;...;...;...;.!” “My name wasn’t included after all huh?” I smile widely. Talking with Goshujin-sama is really fun. He’s gentle, treated me well, and I am happy just by being with him. Just what can I hope for more than this? Apparently, his goal was to become the strongest. And he said that he wanted me to help him. This, I told him many times before but Goshujin-sama doesn’t understand how our contract work. Even though I have to do everything as he ordered, he always put it as a request. You see, according to my maid knight knowledge, there’s no one like you, you know? If you ask me with such a humble attitude...;.. Then I have no choice but to help you with all my power right? “Can’t be helped then. After you become the strongest, do keep practicing your comedy routine properly okay?” “You still want me to become a comedian?” Goshujin-sama returns to his room with a cramped smile. For a moment I thought about getting in his futon to warm it up for him but decided against it. Tomorrow is a dungeon again. I want to train a little more. Well, there are a lot of people who will be a great backup for him and Goshujin-sama is capable enough for the battle himself if there’s one person that I should watch out for, then it’s her. I think it’s nothing but I will be on my guard. If something were done to Goshujin-sama then he would probably say [Well, it can’t be helped.] so I can’t help but do it. However, as far as our conversation goes, it seems like she isn’t an enemy. she already swore that [I will become Goshujin-sama’s ally] and [to never do anything that will disadvantage him] after all. In the first place, she told me that she likes Goshujin-sama. That’s why I think that it’s safe. However, her existence is separated from the ordinary. I wonder why she is here? No, this area is already strange in the first place. Seriously what’s this place. I have never seen anything like it before. Apparently, she planned to have a talk with Goshujin-sama one day, but that’s still not today. However, I will not take any chances. That’s why I will be careful of her. The headmaster of Tsukuyomi Magical Academy, Hanamura Marino. If you asked who is the weakest among us when Ludi and the others received those store bonus rings, the answer would be me. Well, let’s make it clear. When compare Ludi’s power to the ordinary first-year students, she is absurdly far above them. It’s to the extent that I thought that isn’t she has a higher chance of defeating the protagonist more than me? With that said, I can’t keep losing like this. What must be done is to strengthen myself, for that sake, I have already made a preparation. I even prepared an item and an accomplice (Nanami). With that as the case, the first action I must take was decided. Skipping school and go to a dungeon. Ludi said [It is almost time for the test, is it fine?], She worried about me but honestly, I don’t care about the test...;...;...; No, I’m actually a little worried but if I can’t take it then I don’t mind not taking it. At least I won’t fail...;...;..I think. At worst I should still be better off than Katrina or Orange, probably. Well, the dungeon I will be diving into this time is a store exclusive dungeon that was included as a bonus for purchasing an expansion pack from a major company’s [store with its name sounded like a soft map.] (TLN: not sure which company, tried searching for it but the closest one was Kojak) There’s no weird entry condition like the Shadow Ruin that we captured before. Although we were messing with each other right before entering the dungeon we were able to enter it without any problem. This [Death Soil Pool] and [Twilight Grotto (The place I found Nanami)] and [Shadow Ruin (Panties Ruin) were at the same level as a dungeon. However, this dungeon will spawn higher-level monsters. But they will not be spawning normally. Then how can we get it to spawn? The answer is the trap. “Goshujin-sama, I’m ready.” “OH.” Nanami activates the trap, making the monster fall from the sky. Dropping down, It rolled up the dust while making a heavy impact sound and stood up. This thing was called Gidiao, Simply looking at it, it appeared like a big turtle. Its size is twice that of a big bike. It may look like a turtle but it is a relative of the dragons. Looking closely, you will see its sharp claws on its legs with some part of its body covered in scale. When I first played the game, I don’t know how strong it is so I just attack it head-on and got my party member wiped out. The reason I managed to survive was due to its slow walking speed. I bit my lip and said [Don’t you think you have won with this!!] as a parting word and ran away. I came to know this later but it seems running away from it was a normal way to capture this dungeon. That Gidao wasn’t a monster that has an appropriate level for this dungeon. It was a monster several levels higher that only spawn through a trap. Thus, if you don’t have the right level you couldn’t win against it. If you want to defeat it normally then you have to raise your level first. Then what should I do if I accidentally stepped on the trap and the Gidao appears? Since it is very slow, the right option was to run away from it. However. Running away was definitely the right choice but is it right to think that you are in a crisis just because you encounter a strong monster from a trap? Isn’t it said in a lot of business books that [Let’s change the crisis into an opportunity] or [The crisis itself is the opportunity to grow] or something like that? That is exactly the case here. We have to change our mindset. Certainly, the trap was malicious. But if we use it well then it will become terribly useful. In this case, you can spawn a monster that gives you decent experience points in a low-level dungeon. One of the reasons I started to like traps when I became an adult was because I learned how to utilize them like this. Well, there are many who hold grudges against it though. Now, how will I use it effectively? The first thing I have to think about is whether I can defeat it or not. Speaking from the result, I can defeat it even if I am underleveled. One of the reasons why the eroge, [Magical★Explorer] has become so popular was because it has a properly balanced weakness system. Well, some bosses don’t have those weaknesses though. But this Turtle (Gidao) has a certain weak point, if you properly exploited it you can defeat it even if you are underleveled. Yes, it can be defeated. If we can lower the risk when we are defeating it then we can easily get a great number of experience points. (TLN: Killing Capra demon with a firebomb flashback) But it was much of a pain more than I imagined. I flipped the fallen Gidiao upside down with Third and Fourth hand. When it flapping its legs around, Nanami activated the trap again. I immediately flipped it upside down, rendering it helpless and line them up. After we line them up nicely, Nanami blasted its belly with Explode Arrow while I punch it in the gut until it dies then proceed to the next one. In the game we would use earth magic to flip them and do an all-out attack to destroy its belly with high damage strategy, This place was where you can easily earn magic elements (experience points). I exploited it this time as well and it was very to do so but...;.. It’s too monotonous. I know that it will get boring like this. If I was at home doing this I can just watch Douga (TLN: JP youtube) or livestream it and interact with viewers using the comments though. “Nanami, do you know what am I thinking?” Nanami is professionally doing her part without any expression. “Of course, if it’s Goshujin-sama then I know you like the back of my hand. You want two more of Nanami’s used panties right?” “Not even a millimeter close.” There’s no way I am thinking about that right? Well, if you asked whether I want one or not, then the answer was already decided though. “As I thought, you want three for preservation, one as an ornamental and another for practical use right.” “Not even a micro closer.” Speaking of which, having three sure is convenient huh...;...;. Wait, what am I thinking. “Then it was one to put at the bottom, one for the head and another for holding in your hand right?” “Not even by the nano closer.” Why do you think I will be equipping it like three sacred treasures? Isn’t that just a pervert? “Don’t tell me, you are going to use it on a missionary mission!?” “Where could a missionary propagate a thing like that!? I won’t do it!!” “I’m glad, it would only be painful to give it to anyone other than Goshujin-sama after all.” “I’m good...;...;..” Somehow, I’m a little happy. We were properly working while having such an idiotic conversation. But a boring thing is boring after all. Dropping turtle. Flipping turtle. Dropping turtle. Flipping turtle. Punch them in the gut. Do I have to keep doing this...;...;...;...;. “We get a lot of magic elements so let’s keep doing our best.” I nodded to Nanami. “Yeah, that’s right.” ————————- Author Notes: It isn’t related to the story but, the turtle shell was made of bones and skin. Since it is a part of its body you can’t remove it. Eh? But, there are guys that come out when you step on them or those that can detach and attach it at will. Just what are those things...;...; I can feel my status raising after I collected the magic elements. It feels like each punch I dished out is getting stronger and more precise. If it’s now I think I can go solo without Nanami explode arrow but considering the efficiency of activating the trap and lining the turtles up, it is definitely better to do this with the two of us. We take a break here and there and after several hours of hunting, we decided to stop hunting the turtle. “What should we do after this?” Nanami asked but our course of action was already decided. Deep inside this dungeon, there’s a boss monster lying in wait. There is also a treasure waiting after the boss. Its content might be good for Iori but it is unnecessary for the current me. Moreover, the boss might have a high amount of HP but it is still weaker than the turtles we’ve been grinding so far. Knowing that, the conclusion I arrived at was...;...;...;. “Alright, let’s ignore the boss and head back!” Nanami was stunned but I don’t have the motivation to go deeper. There’s no meaning to do that in the first place. If this dungeon has a clear bonus then I might consider it but I did not intend to have a complete mark on my map, if I captured it then there isn’t much to gain both in terms of experience points and practicality. Can I afford to waste such time? In a certain game’s RTA run, a town was attacked by monsters and turned into a sea of flame but to shorten the clear time it would be fine to just ignore the monster (event) and loot the town of its item and gold then head to the next town. Compared to that, there is so much time I can shorten peacefully here. Moreover, I already have a plan for today. After I got home I will take a shower then use the free time to play some games with Ludi and the others or watching something funny on Douga. Since it also doubled as a change of mood, that option is a hundred times better. I don’t feel like going out of my way to capture this dungeon. Well, Nanami was surprised by my decision so she doesn’t make her usual quip. But I know what is inside this dungeon, it would be a waste of time even if I keep delving in deeper. Then I thought. Since I’m planning to bring Nanami along to various places in the future, I might have to reveal some of my secrets to her. But that time is not now. After all, she also has things that she is hiding from me, so we are even in that regard. “Well, let’s head back.” Hearing so, Nanami took out a circular device from the pocket on her maid outfit and activate it using magic power. That device made the sound *Kashari* twice and cracked open. It floated in the air while the cracked area emitting a dazzling light. I grab Nanami’s hand and close my eyes. In Magical★Explorer, there are several ways to leave the dungeon. The one we used so far was the return magic circle located on the final floor. However, I might not be able to use such a method that often in the future. The reason is simple, the number of floors for each dungeon will keep increasing. In the future, the dungeon I will capture will not only have ten floors. There will be dungeons that have dozens of floors some might be close to a hundred. I can’t afford to make it the final floors in one go. Large dungeons have return magic circles set up at some intervals as a good breakpoint so you can use those to return. Moreover, once you registered at said magic circles you can use it to travel back to that floor in an instant. But for a dungeon that has only ten floors like this one, there’s no such magic circle. With that as the case, we used a return magic item this time. “Oh, Goshujin-sama...;..fufu.” Nanami looked at my hand and pleasantly smiling. “Um, you know, it was scary right?” Telling the truth, this is the first time I used a return item. Using something like this for the first time is a little scary right? I was shaking when I used the return magic circle for the first time too. Thinking back, it might be better to grab on to her clothes instead of her hand. “Mou, you are so hopeless. This is going to cost you, you know?” Saying so, Nanami released her hand for a moment and hold it again like a lover holding each other’s hand. Umm, we already transferred so I’m fine now though...;. But since she seems to be in a good mood, I will leave it like this for now. ————— If I think about it, it is only natural. I couldn’t find the figure of Ludi relaxing in the room. The only one there is Claris-san who is drinking tea in her free time. When I asked her, it seems like Ludi is studying in her room. It’s the first proper exam after we entered the academy so she must be studying for that. A normal student wouldn’t play games or watch Douga before the exam. Since I am a stupid kind of student, I don’t feel like studying one bit. I already skipped school in the first place so I completely forgot about the exam. This academy is special so as long as you can clear the dungeon you can still advance and graduate. That’s why some students skip classes from the beginning. However, Ludi is a normal sensible honor student. Rather, normal students would seriously take the exam, the rare one is those that skip it. If I were to ask her [Skip school and come to the dungeon with me please!] she might just do it. However, I don’t plan to ask her to do that. Ludi is Ludi, I want her to enjoy her school life to the fullest. If she says that she wants to come then I will happily welcome her while crying though. On top of that, the dungeon that I plan to challenge after grinding with the turtles a little more is the one that I intend to do it solo. After I had my practice swing and a mock battle with Claris-san, I take a shower while summarizing my course of action. I want to avoid disturbing Ludi. Since the exam is almost here Nee-san should be busy? I can’t read her action sometimes so she might not be that busy though. Well, since the person with the highest authority within the academy is at home with me, let’s lay some groundwork with her first. She seems to be busy all the time so let’s have a talk with her now that she’s free. Deciding so, I immediately moved to action. I wash my body, change my clothes, head to Marino-san’s room and knocked on the door several times. “Come in~” I entered after I heard her extended voice and found Marino-san and Nanami inside. Marino-san looks at me and beckons me to sit while smiling. “You came at a good time.” Nn? I tilted my head then Marino-san handed me a paper. I immediately take it while Nanami takes her seat on a sofa next to me. “Hmm, what’s this, a marriage registration form...;..Nn?” “Ara, I handed you the wrong one!” “There’s no way you did that as a mistake!” I hand the paper back to her and receive a new one. Why do you have that thing in a place like this? I don’t think I can get one unless I deliberately ask the city hall or get it as a store bonus of an Eroge though. Rather, that one from the Eroge, seems so legit, if a stranger saw it then there will surely be some misunderstandings. Moreover, they even have different handwriting for each heroine too. Well, let’s leave that aside. I thought I saw my name and Nee-san’s name on the marriage registration just now...;...;...;..must be my imagination. “Here, here.” “Eeee, academy application form...;...;?” From my side, Nanami said ‘please prepare one for everyone’ but I don’t know what she is talking about. I look over the academy application form and found the name of the applicant. She is saying something to Marino-san but when she noticed my gaze, she turns toward me. Then she sweeps her silver hair that is obstructing her eyes to the side and looks at me with her beautiful purple eyes. Her eyes have sharpness like a knife and give off a cold impression but I like them. Moreover, when she smiles that severe feeling will disappear and her expression will soften, That gap is the thing I like. Perhaps it depends on the person but there are those who said that she is even more of a beauty than Ludi. Meeting her eyes, Nanami suddenly holds her cheeks and started fidgeting around. “No way, doing it here is embarrassing...;..!” “Can you not say something that will invite misunderstanding?” I didn’t say anything in the first place. Just what am I doing to her in her delusion? “It’s okay, I will pretend not to see it?” No, you don’t need to be considerate about that. I turned back and found Nanami who nonchalantly return to her usual expression. “So...;..can we get back to the main subject please?” “Yeah, we decided on it just now.” “With this, I can go to the academy with Goshujin-sama. Mou, you don’t have to be that happy.” Even if you say that. “If you asked me whether I am happy or not, then I am happy but right now my standing at the academy is kinda delicate so...;.” Well, I’m happy that I have more people to spend my free time with. But since I have the matter with Ludi and me skipping school lately, my standing there is quite delicate. Rather, considering what I am about to do, I can’t deny the possibility that the animosity I received will keep increasing from now on. “It’s because you don’t go to class properly.” Marino-san said while staring at me. I can’t say anything back to that but I think I will skip even more classes from now on. Especially, until the end of the first exam. Moreover. “Considering my future action, I think I will attract more hostility toward myself, I am thinking if it’s okay to involve Nanami with that as well...;...;...;. Speaking of which, I can’t even imagine how this situation will settle down in the end.” “Future action huh...;are you planning to join the three committees?” Marino-san’s eyes glow with suspicion. She’s sharp. That was exactly what I had in mind. “Well, no matter. I will never leave Goshujin-sama’s side anyway, like a mosquito I will never leave his side no matter what anyone says, their only option is to completely destroy me.” “I’m really worried about that destroying you part though.” “Well, let’s set the joke aside, I don’t mind it at all.” It seems like she will still accompanying me no matter what I say. “Well, since you seem like you are gonna enjoy the situation anyway, it’s fine.” “Goshujin-sama understand me well.” She said that and we laughed together. “Nee nee.” Marino-san called out to me. “Kou-chan, Kou-chan. If you are fine with it, can you tell me what you are planning to do?” Right, I came here to do some [groundworks] if by any chance something were to happen. “That’s what I came here to talk to you about. The thing I want to do is very simple you know?” Well, in fact, I only intend to do it to strengthen myself so the thing it is just a by-product. However, its impact will be quite strong so it’s better to tell her beforehand. It’s is something that I can boast about anyway. I raised my index finger and broadly grin. “I will skip the exam and take first place in the school year.” Ludi’s POV ———————- It was when I finished dinner and was about to compile a note to tutor Rina-san (Katrina). I received a message from Marinosan. It seems she has something that she wants to talk about. It is unusual for Marino-san to call out to me so I immediately put away the notes and head to the living room. Several people are already assembled, among them is a person that is not a resident of Hanamura house. “Yukine-san.” When I muttered so, Yukine-san smiles at me. “Good evening, Ludi.” “You were called as well, Yukine-san?” When I take a seat next to her, she turns toward me and nodded. “Aa, that’s right. The headmaster suddenly messaged me, Right?” Yukine-san turns her face toward Marino-san. She was talking with Nanami but when she noticed our gaze, she looked back at us. “Alright everyone is here?” I look around the room. There are six people here including myself, Marino-san. Hatsumi-san, Yukine-san, Nanami, and Claris. Then if you think about the reason why he isn’t here then I can guess the topic of our meeting. It was about Kousuke. “Now then, some of you might have already guessed it but we are here to talk about Kou-chan.“ As I thought. The people gathered here are the one that held some kind of feelings toward him. Myself included. “Actually, Kou-chan wasn’t just planning to do something crazy but he is going to do something very dangerous and out of the norm as well?” Listening to Marino-san’s words I frowned. “Is it true...;...;?” “Yes, with that said, Nanami-chan...;...;...;. Nn, what? You don’t want me to add chan? Eh, use san instead? That would make us a stranger right...;...;. You don’t have to look at me with such scary eyes.” Why is Nanami get angry when she wouldn’t mind if I call her without honorific and want Marino-san to add san when she calls her name? “Ahem, after consulting with Nanami-san, we decided to support Kou-chan’s action.” I stared wide-eyed at Marino-san and Nanami then I eventually returned to sanity. It seems like that guy is planning to do something. Moreover, that something is dangerous too. “Headmaster, just what is he planning to do?” Asked by Yukine-san, Marino-san smiled and nodded. “Yeah, it seems like he is planning to skip the exam and take the first place and he will leave behind a record that is on a completely different dimension than the previous one too.” I tilt my head to Marino-san’s words. “Skipping the exam and taking first place...;..Is something like that even possible?” Then “...;..as expected.” “I see, skipping...;so that’s also a hand to play huh.” Said Hatsumi-san and Yukine-san. I couldn’t read Hatsumi-san’s expression but Yukine-san seems to be convinced of something and nodded. “It can actually be done huh.” Claris seems to be interested too, she grabbed onto the table and leaned her body a little forward. “Just, how exactly is he going to do it...;...;..?” I asked. “Since he won’t be taking the exam, we wouldn’t know how he did it if we look at the scoreboard too. We can’t imagine how he will do it as well. If he took the exam at least once then it is a different story though.” “Right, if he takes it at least once then we will be able to know but Ludi-chan, you know the conditions for graduating from our academy, right?” “Yes, you must have enough credits in the required subjects or break through the sixtieth floor of Tsukuyomi dungeon...;...;.Don’t tell me.” Suddenly it came to me. If all you need to do is to break through the sixtieth floor of the Academy (Tsukuyomi) dungeon then. “Yes, it is probably as you imagined. The grade of Tsukuyomi Magic Academy is determined by the score of the exam and the dungeon capturing score.” I see, that’s how he can take the first place while skipping the exam. It’s because he can just dive into the Academy dungeon. “Headmaster, I have a question.” It was Yukine-san who said that. “The scoring for the Academy dungeon is quite high so if you can capture ten or more floors you should be able to easily take the first place right? Then why did you say that his action is very dangerous or on a different dimension?” “I have the same question as well. If it’s the current Kousuke then ten floors is a piece of cake for him.” Hearing so Marino-san nod with the *Un un* sound. “Yeah, I think that it should be easy for him up until the first year ceiling of the twentieth floor as well. But you see, the floor that he is aiming for is even deeper than that...;...;” Saying so, Marino-san takes a small breath. The person that took over is Nanami. “Goshujin-sama extremely lightly said that He is going to solo the fortieth floor.” *Gatan*, Yukine-san stood up. “NO WAY!? THE FORTIETH FLOOR!?” “...;.Unbelievable.” Hatsumi-san’s face which was always expressionless is now dyed in wonder. “Umm, is the fortieth floor something so amazing?” Claris asked the question instead of me. Yukine-san slowly opens her mouth after taking a deep breath. “The fortieth floor is the target for us, second-year students. Certainly, a lot of people including myself already captured it but it wasn’t our first time inside that dungeon. More importantly, he is planning to do it solo too...;...;” “That’s unreasonable and reckless. Does Kousuke not know about this?” “I chuckled and told him that it was impossible at first but Kou-chan ended up laughing together with me you know...;..” The smile that is always on Marino-san’s face disappears. “But his eyes were serious.” “Absolutely, Goshujin-sama will definitely try to challenge it.” Marino-san nodded to Nanami’s words. “Yes, that’s right. Well, I thought that it would be fine for him to face a big failure at least once but you see, it seems like Kou-chan doesn’t intend to lose at all.” “Currently, Goshujin-sama has been going to a certain dungeon. And he is getting stronger at an extremely fast rate. Thanks to that, I was growing stronger as a by-product as well.” “It is as Nanami said. Kou-chan is gradually growing stronger and stronger. Then you know, I’ve been thinking...;.” Marino-san didn’t continue her words. But I understand what she was trying to say. “However, there’s another problem to the thing that Kou-chan is trying to do.” “...;...;Right. the period.” Hearing Hatsumi-san, Yukine-san let out an *Ah* voice. “I see, there’s only one week before the academy announces the test result...;! The entry to the Academy dungeon will be banned on the first day of the exam. The exam will take place for five days, the total days left until the announcement will be three days, it’s absolutely impossible. Does Takioto know about this? One floor in that dungeon is bigger than the one in the dungeon we captured before you know!?” I guessed it somehow. To take the first place by taking the fortieth floor, he has to capture it before the tests are scored and the results were announced. “Yeah, that’s right. The fastest record in the academy belongs to Mizumori Yukine and Himemiya Shion backed up by student council president Monika and the current generation saint. Moreover, it took them six months to reach that floor counting from their first entry. It’s the record that I never thought that anyone could break in the first place.” “H, he’s going to capture that dungeon within a week!?” Hearing Marino-san, Claris raised her voice in surprise. “Since we have to attend the classes, we went in and get back every now and then, we take on the dungeon a few days at a time and proceeded little by little and it took us six months. Even so, we still shortened the previous record by three months. If you simply count the time we were inside the dungeon then it would still be weeks. But he is going to do it in a week? And solo too?” “Unbe,lievable...;...;...;.” To make Yukine-san and Hatsumi-san surprised to such an extent, this must be quite something. “I suggested that he should bring someone with him you know. I told him that Ludi-chan, Yukine-chan or Nanami-cha-...;.Ouch, don’t kick me!...;...;.. Nanami-san would happily go with him but he said that he has to do it solo this time no matter what. He won’t tell me the reason too.” “Goshujin-sama’s thoughts are in a higher dimension than myself or Marino-sama can grasp...; No, it could be said that they are already in a different dimension than ours. That’s why I believe.” Saying so Nanami looks at everyone with a serious expression. “That Goshujin-sama will definitely accomplish it.” “That’s why I and Nanami-san decided to support him. I am technically a teacher so there’s a limit to what I can do though...;...;” Saying so, Marino-san looks at me and Yukine-san. “So that’s why I want everyone cooperation. I know that the exam is almost here but I want you to lend Kou-chan your power.” Finishing what she wanted to say, Marino-san lowered her head. But there’s no need for her to lower her head in the first place. “Please raise your head. I will lend him my power even without anyone telling me to.” Hearing what I said, Yukine-san let out a *Fufu* laugh. “That applied to me as well.” Hearing our words, Marino-san raises her head and stands up. Then she shows us a wide smile. “Sorry Ludi-chan, it’s right before your first exam too. Yukine-chan as well.” Marino-san walks over and places her hand on Yukine-san’s shoulder. “Right, if you find it hard to travel all the way here you can live here too you know? You will visit again soon after all.” Ha. visit again? What is she talking about? I and Sempai look at each other and tilt our heads. “Ah, right right, Yukine-chan. About that.” “ ? What is it” “Maybe Kou-chan already guessed your real duty that’s why he has been gathering the hatred to himself.” Hearing so, Yukine-san was confused at first but she eventually understood the meaning and let out a bitter smile. “I see, if I think about it that way then it makes sense, it is a little disappointing though.” “As I thought...;...; but” “Yes, the relationship between me and Takioto will not change. Rather, we might be involved with each other a lot more from now on.” I have no clue about what they are talking about. Since it seems like I was left behind, I was about to ask them to explain but, “Sorry, Ludi-chan. We can’t talk about it right now. But I think it is the thing that you will eventually come to know soon.” I was turned down before I can ask. “Right. I guarantee it too. They will surely let you know after the test. No, if it’s Ludi then they might contact you directly huh.” I am curious but if she put it like that, then it can’t be helped. “Understood, then I will ask you when the time comes.” “Now then, the talk is over. You should stay here today, Yukine-chan. Claris-san, can I ask you to prepare a room?” “Yes, I understand.” Then we left the room. Let’s go to the room that Claris is preparing for Yukine-san once, I have something to think about. “Eh, it’s a lie right, Nee-san? Oi, Nanami, stop!? Wai, Ne, Nee-san Nee-san! Na, Nanami too? ~~!?” Eh, did I just heard Kousuke’s scream? Well, it must be my imagination. ———————————————- Author Notes: It’s the talk about how dangerous the thing that Takioto-kun trying to do is. He said that like it was nothing like he said [Fortieth floor huh...;. Fufu] in the second playthrough but in reality, it turned out like this. Then I will leave it to your imagination regarding what happened to him at the end. In the game Magical★Explorer, if you asked me who stood out the most inside the academy then I will nominate two people without any hesitation. The reason is simple, the way they wore their uniforms inside the academy is clearly strange. I still haven’t met all of them but I already found one. The senior assistant (Vice president) of the Shikibukai, Himemiya Shion. If I have to say what’s strange about her then it would be the part that she always wears her pure Japanese-style dress even though she has the academy uniform. No rule restricts you to only wear the uniform inside the academy but it was like she rejected the idea of the uniform that everyone is wearing itself, you can’t help but admire the way she walks her own path. Additionally, looking at her bearing and elegance attitude, you can tell that she lived her life gracefully from a young age. Moreover, the fact that she is considered taller than an average woman also helped in making her standout. It was like a single chrysanthemum stood tall in the field of dandelions. Even if you are far away you would always find her with the feeling of ‘Ah, it’s Shion-san’. Also, because she is a part of the Shikibukai which is much hated among the students, people tend to move to avoid her themselves, enhancing her presence even more. However, if you asked whether she is presently the most stood out student then that might not be the case. Certainly, Shion-san is conspicuous. It might be because of her strong character and that she easily leave behind an impression in people’s mind. But in reality, that can’t make her the most conspicuous person inside the academy. The thing that hit me that Magiero really became a reality was the fact that Ludi stood out among the academy more than I expected. On top of being a part of the imperial family of the Trefle empire, she is unworldly beautiful. There’s no way to dispute that, the forming of the Fanclub called LLL might be inevitable. However, the LLL (Ludi’s fanclub) decided that [Let’s act behind the scene to let Ludi-sama lead a healthy and peaceful school life]. That’s why it seems like the Fanclub members are unnecessarily taking distance from Ludi. Then coupled with her too high a social status, no people approach her besides her close friends. That’s why there is always a sanctuary-like mysterious space around her surroundings. The same also applied to the student council president, Monika-sempai, that’s why she is very noticeable. But recently, a new face has emerged that attracted much attention without losing to them. That’s a group of two, one of which is a man. That guy has a lot of bad rumors going about him. Additionally, that man also wears a stupidly long stole and can talk on a friendly term with her highness Ludi as well. However, he is being looked down on since he been skipping classes recently. And after he came to the academy after a long time, he brought along a silver-haired transcendent beautiful girl in a maid uniform with him. Now he has a beautiful maid gallantly taking care of him. Just who are they? Yep, that’s us. “Hora, everyone is taking their distance and looking our way, we are starting to become a rumor too.” It’s as Iori said, the people inside the cafeteria are pouring their gazes our way. It’s almost like a zoo. Of course, it’s an open one. Perhaps the transcendent beauty Nanami is being glanced upon more than me. Rather, she is enjoying the situation. She even took care of me like she is putting on a show. But you know, can you not say something like [Do you want a lap pillow!] out loud, please? You are definitely playing here, right? The astonishing expression on the student’s faces directed our way are quite enjoyable though. Later, if possible I will have that laps pillow and have her clean my ear at home...;. No, that’s too embarrassing I can’t say it out loud. Well, if it’s like this then it’s not weird that we became the center of attention. If I am in their position I would stare too. Hell, I will even start the rumor myself. Like, switch places with me damn it. “...;...;.Sorry, Iori. you can take some distance away from me too you know?” When I said so, a cup of coffee is placed in front of me. Apparently, Nanami seemed to prepare it for me with care. After that, she continues to place the coffee in front of Iori and set aside the cube sugar shaped like star and moon. 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10. Iori smiles broadly and says [Thank you] then picks up the sugar. I wanted to say [Haha, you took out too much right?] but Iori puts every single one of it inside his coffee. And enjoyably drink it. “Taking distance?...;...;...;.what are you saying Kousuke-kun?” There is only heart-shaped sugar on my plate, I want the star and moon shape too you know? Well, never mind about that, these sugar look so cute so I want one though. “I know that you are a very good person Kousuke-kun. Moreover, you are my friend right? If Kousuke-kun says that you don’t want to be with me then...;..umm, I can leave...;...;..” What is this guy? “Iori, order as much as you like. It doesn’t matter if you ordered the entire menu. I will pay for it.” Seriously, what a good guy...;..! He lends me his note when I skipped class, and the noted point wasn’t the point that will be on the test, it was the point where I was struggling at. E, even if you do this, I won’t hand you the seat of the strongest you know! “Th, that’s something a friend would do! Moreover, you even introduced the dungeons to me via the message right!?” I calm the panicked Iori down and order parfaits for him and Nanami. He is still holding back so I forcefully told him that it was for the note he lent me while Nanami is eating it as a matter of course. No, it’s not like I want to see her say A~hn or anything alright? She just held it in front of her mouth when she tried to eat it. Not bad. “Come to think of it, are you going to be fine with the exam Takioto-kun? There are only two days left you know?” I tried to forcefully eat Nanami’s parfait when Iori asked me with a bitter smile. “It’s not fine but perhaps it will be.” I won’t take it in the first place though. I already told Marino-san so I haven’t flip open any notes or textbooks for the past few days. If it is about flipping then I have been flipping the turtles though. Rather, I don’t want everyone to worry about me so I asked her not to tell Ludi and the others. Just why did she told them the very next day I wonder. “ ? Katou-san and the others are having Ludivine-san tutor them while desperately study inside the library you know? But...;.Un, you see...;...;.” It’s fine. I can guess it without you telling me. So that’s the reason Ludi was holding her head at the breakfast this morning huh. “Well, it’s fine. I will take first place in the school year anyway.” “Really?” Iori said so while lowering his eyebrows. However, the parfait stuffed inside his mouth immediately any trace of his serious expression. Then he raised his voice. “Speaking of which I remembered, at the library, there’s a librarian that is a beauty no less than Ludivine-san or Nanami-san you know.” “Hee, is it Sakura-san?” “Ah, so you do know her. Yes, that’s her. You know, I didn’t plan to borrow any book but she told me that it’s better to register if I planned to use the library later. Since she was super beautiful, I unintentionally stared at her.” “I see, she is certainly a beauty huh.” Well, I never met her since I came to this world though. “Then what about the thing beside the exam? Like the dungeon for example.” “It’s smooth sailing. It’s not president Monika but I have been capturing dungeons with the people from the student council you know.” “Hmm, that’s great isn’t it.” I am relieved. It seems that he is properly progressing on the student council route. If he keeps this up and progresses through a little more event he should be able to join the student council soon. “It’s all thanks to you, Takioto-kun. You gave me lots of advice too.” Well, I certainly gave him advice but...; “Nah, I didn’t do anything. If it’s going well then it’s the result of your action and the effort you put in.” Actually, the only thing I did was introduce him to suitable dungeons. “R, really?” “Yes, really.” “I’m glad to hear that. I have been working very hard lately. Moreover, it’s going so well recently, I have a feeling like I am getting stronger too.” His talent is blooming. If this is the case then he will become absurdly strong when he enters the student council. That’s why. “Well, I am not going to lose.” “Mou, then I won’t lose to you either.” Hahaha, we laughed together. I’m not kidding though. —————————- Author Notes: I’ve said this before but Iori X Monika is not a thing. Author Notes: Please savor all the heroine moments because after we enter the dungeon we won’t see them for a while. He is soloing it after all. ——————————- I part ways with Iori after we finish our meals. Now then, let’s go meet Sempai! or I was supposed to. A fluffy pink hair entered my sight. I was on my way to meet sempai but since I saw her for the first time in a while, I called out to her. “Good afternoon, Luigia-sensei.” She jumped in surprise and slowly turns to look my way. “U, Uuu.” She was making a stiff smile but it seems she gave up halfway and shows me a depressed expression. “Um, what is it? Umm, I already made up my resolve...;...;” What should I talk to her again? When I turned silent, Sensei continues to speak. “Um, it’s my first time so...;” “Just what are you talking about all of a sudden?” Can you not suddenly reveal something like that? I know all that is to know about the heroines in the first place. In sensei’s case, if I remember correctly, since the first person she liked turned out to have a boyfriend, she was pulled back by stuff like this. It must be shocking in many ways for her...;...; I can guess that much. “Luigia-sama, Goshujin-sama likes to take things slow so you can start with a lap pillow first.” Nanami suddenly gets in front of me and said so. “Eh, Um, if it’s just that then...;...;.” You are fine with that? There’s no one around anyway so I will not refuse that offer! “Um, Nee, Takioto-kun...;. I’ve never seen this child before.” Sensei confusingly asked while looking at Nanami. Right, I’ve never seen anyone walking around in the academy with a maid uniform too. There are some that wear Japanese clothes though. Just what is up with this academy...;...;.. “Aah, she just recently enrolled.” “Eeh, recently? Eh, I haven’t heard anything though...;...;?” The person with the highest authority (Marino-san) gave her permission so I think it should be fine, probably. Well, this might become a long story. “I haven’t seen you in a while, how are you doing since then?” Sensei became visibly more cheerful. “About that, I have been able to live my life with a little more leeway now, I don’t have to answer the calls from the loan sharks too. Speaking of which, I have something to request of you.” Sensei holds down her peach-colored hair and fidgeting bashfully. “A request?” “Umm...;I want you to increase my pocket money...;...;” I understand why Nanami’s face twitched. It’s normally something to be surprised about anyway. A teacher asking her student for pocket money. “I don’t mind but what are you going to use it for?” Currently, Luigia-sensei is living under the pocket money system. Her salary from the academy didn’t enter her bank account but mine instead. From there, I separate the amount that will be used to repay her debt and the amount necessary for her basic utilities then allocate only the amount that would be fine if she spent it into her bank account. When I transferred the money to her using internet banking, I was wondering to myself why do I have to do such a thing. “Umm you see, there’s this comfortable-looking sleep pillow so...;...;” “Alright, dismissed. Nanami, let’s go.” “Wait a minute, where are you going!?” I just thought it would be useless even if I keep listening. “Please, a little is fine, they said that I can only buy it now you know!?” “Aa fine, fine. A sleep pillow huh. It’s fine since it’s cheap. I will transfer you the money later.” I can order it online and send it to her later too. “That’s no good! You can only buy it now!” That’s clearly a scam right!? “It’s no good at all, and I just gave you your pocket money right?” Sensei plays with her hair while sticking her tongue out. “There’s this really good futon so...;...;I bought it...;...;.” That’s cute but it’s out of the question. “Let’s set your bank account on cooling off.” (TLN: JP bank system – It is a special system to protect consumers, by cancelling contract unilaterally and unconditionally, for more detail Click Here. ) I shook off the swaying sensei and head to meet sempai at the meeting place. It seems like Sempai already arrived, she stayed in her seat while stared at us in shock. “Ah, Sempai, sorry...;...;...;I’m late.” “A, Aah. I was just too early. You are just in time.” Sempai seemed a little restless. Well, I know the reason, just how long do you plan to stick yourselves to me?! “Sempai, how is the situation look like from your perspective?” “It’s like you caught your wife cheating and she is clinging to you while saying [Please, I don’t want to break up.]” Is that a melodrama? This will definitely become a rumor tomorrow. “I see, if I do it like this then it might be better right.” Saying so, Nanami clings onto my arm on the opposite side of sensei. It’s complete the image of women fighting for a man. This is that right? The thing you often see in those Whitish Album series or sakul Days? (TLN: It was Gakkou days in the raw...;..) Like a scene from the melodrama, Nanami and Luigia-sensei are pushing (pressing) themselves on each of my arms. I bow my head to sempai. “I’m really sorry. I brought you something strange.” “I, it’s fine, I was surprised but it’s okay.” Looking at Nanami, it seems like she is discussing something with Luigia-sensei. “Ahem, the exam will start tomorrow but you will challenge the dungeon right?” “Yes, I will. Well, I didn’t intend to talk with anyone about this other than Marino-san and Nanami though...;..” I even told her that I don’t want to make them worry but Marino-san ended up spilling the beans the very next day...;...; “I see, Fufu. So you are really going.” “Yes, I am. I come to the academy to prepare for just that.” I got what I wanted. There’s only a little more I need to do to enter the Academy dungeon. That’s why I came to prepare today. Hahaha, sempai laughed like she finds something funny. “The reason I laughed at you before has changed from when you said you would surpass me but it is because I admire the current you, you know?” Saying so, Sempai pulls out a green pouch from her uniform and put it on her hand. Then she walked toward me. Taking another step closer, Sempai bashfully wipes up her beautiful black hair on to her ear, Exposing her moistened white cheeks and her crescent-shaped ear. Then, she directed her gentle eyes like she was watching a newborn animal at me while letting out a smile. “Give me your hand.” When I stretched out my hand, Sempai put a pouch-like something on my palm. Then she wrapped both her hands around mine. “You said it lightly but the thing that you are trying to do has never been done before and it is an extremely difficult task.” “Is that so?” “Look here, you are still taking this lightly. That dungeon is not such an easy place, it will be very difficult, you know that right?” “No no, I expected that it will be difficult. But at the same time, I think I can do it. I was thinking, if I can’t even do this much then it would be impossible for me to become the strongest.” “This much, huh. This is hard. If it’s just the battle then I might be able to do it but considering the time frame, it would be impossible for me. Perhaps president Monika might be able to do it.” Sempai erased the smile from her face and look at me with a serious expression. “To tell you the truth, I want to go with you. I want you to take me with you, you know?” Even I want to take you with me. Sempai, Ludi and Nanami, I want to take everyone with me. But just this time I can’t do that. “Hey, don’t make such a face. You have your reason right? I understand.” Sempai slowly releases her hand like she was parting with something precious. What’s left in my hand is an amulet with a familiar landscape sewed on it. In case you are not familiar with Omamori or Japanese Amulet. What was sewed on it was the image of a waterfall. It’s a picture of a small waterfall and a small stream. That beautiful landscape. That waterfall where we first met. That waterfall is private property. There are only a few people who know about that place and the people who actually visit it are even fewer. That’s why you can’t find something like this in a store. It’s a handmade amulet. “It isn’t worth as much as the ring you gave me but...;” Sempai said with a smile. I tightly squeeze the amulet inside my hand. “Sempai...;...;That’s not true at all. If I was told to choose between those five rings and your amulet then I will throw those rings into an incinerator without hesitation.” Those rings might be valuable but this amulet that Sempai took her precious time to make for me is much more valuable to me. “Haha, that would be a waste right, you fool. But, thank you.” I slowly open my hand and look at the amulet. “Sempai, seriously what are you doing when the exam is so near...;.you even accompany me in my training too, I wonder which of us is the fool here. I am really happy” This amulet is quite well made. It’s not something simple that you can make in one or two hours. It’s an important time before the exam but not only she accompanied me in my training she even took her time making this for me. “Takioto...;.I wish for your success.” —————– Since when have I been unable to calm down if I don’t do a thorough preparation? When I was in elementary school I was fine even if I just barely made it in time for school. In middle school and high school, I was completely neglecting the lessons so there are only mangas, games or snacks in my bag. It might be after I became an adult that I always prepare everything in advance. “I’m mostly done huh.” All that is left to prepare is food. Even though I already put everything else inside the multidimensional item box, it doesn’t bulge nor can I feel any weight added to it, it is astonishingly capable. This is not just a logistics reform but a revolution. If you take a look at the price for such performance your eyeballs might pop out though. In the game, I have to desperately gather the money for the entire first lap to buy one but in this world, all I have to do is ask Marino-san. Isn’t this family’s sense of money strange? It was when I put all my luggage on top of the table. *Knock Knock Knock* someone is knocking at my door. Come in, I call out and it was Ludi who enters the room. It is my room but it had already turned into a room that everyone tends to make themselves at home. She entered the room and sit on the bed. She then places the guardian deity of my room, the orca hug pillow, Marianne on her lap and hugged it tightly. Hey, Marianne. How does it feel like? Comfortable? Can you tell me your impression? Rather, change places with me. “Nee, tomorrow is an exam right?” “Aa, that’s right.” “You are going after all?” “Of course, I’ve been preparing for that.” I have been doing special training in order to capture the fortieth floor, I even prepare the items for that. In the first place, that’s the reason I went to the academy today. Well, another reason was to meet with sempai though. Even so, Nanami made a big success huh. Thanks to her, we are able to cancel Luigia-sensei ordered futon before its delivery. After that, I will have to change her telephone number too...;...; “Fuun, I see. That’s right huh...;..” She saying so while playing with Marianne’s fin. “Are you leaving right away?” “No, I think I will take it slow until tomorrow morning. I will properly check my luggage and head out after that.” “I see.” “...;.Hey, what’s wrong? Ludi?” Ludi is acting somewhat strange today. “Recently you know...;...;I have been in your care a lot right, Kousuke?” “You have?” I can’t remember it at all. “I HAVE.” Saying so, she grabbed Marianne’s dorsal fin and push it on her lap. I want you to give me a lap pillow too. “That’s why, when you said that you want my help in that dungeon, I was happy. I thought, with this, I can repay my debt even a little.” [but, it also made me remember something embarrassing too], she added with a small voice and hid her face behind Marianne. That Dungeon, the panties...;...;.Uu. “DON’T REMEMBER IT.” “M, my bad.” “...;...;.And then, when we captured that dungeon, there’s an idiot that gave the most valuable things to us. When I thought I that I can finally repay you, you ended up giving me even more.” She stared at me from the upper half of her face that peeked out from behind Marianne. “I’m not an idiot alright, it’s a matter of course. If there are people who can use them better than me then it would be best to let that person have it right?” “That’s no reason to just give them up, right?” Saying so, she turned her eyes downward. On Ludi’s right hand, there’s a ring firmly equipped on her finger “I wanted to. There’s not even a speck of regret giving you that ring. You seem to be using it well right? Above all, the color green look good on you Ludi.” “Mou...;.” Ludi whose face turned a little red throw Marianne at me. I catch it and stroke the warmth on Marianne’s head while sitting myself beside Ludi. “...;..Nee, Kousuke. I, am I a person that you are fine without?” “What are you asking all of a sudden...;. of course, you are someone that I can’t go on without.” “Even at the Academy dungeon?” “...;.There’s something I must do alone. That’s why let me do it alone just this time. But you know, it would be impossible for me to do it alone after that.” If it’s the second lap Iori, sempai or the president then they can do it with room to spare. But that would be impossible for someone with a specialized ability like me. That’s exactly why. “That’s why, when that time comes, will you come with me?” “That’s, Naturally I will...;..” Saying so, Ludi puts her hand inside her pocket and pokes me. “Kousuke, Hand.” “Nn?” “Hand, give me yours.” Letting go of Marianne, I put my hand in front of Ludi. Doing so, Ludi put something on top of my palm. It was an amulet with the same shape as the one sempai gave me. It was made of simple fabric with a picture of four-leaf clover depicted on it. “When I asked Yukine-san she said that she is going to give you an eastern amulet so...;. I asked her to teach me how to make one.” “...;...;so that’s why sempai stayed here a lot recently.” I kinda thought that the frequency of her stay has increased recently. She has been staying here once every three days after all. That room has to turn into sempai’s room already. Well, I’m happy that she came by, she also helped with my training as well. “Sorry, compared to Yukine-san’s, mine is just terrible right?” When she said that to me, I take a look at the amulet. “...;..Certainly, compared to the one sempai gave me it might not look that good but I don’t care how well made it is. Both of them are equally important to me. Ludi learned how to make it for me, that alone already made this a treasure. “Un...;.” She replied and turned quiet for a while but eventually...; “Aah, Mou. Why do you have to go there alone...;...;..” She grumbled. “It’s only this time.” “I know. I know but, I don’t understand. Aa, Mou. Seriously, you can do something dangerous like this alone only this once alright?” “I know. Next time I will invite you.” Looking at the boiling Ludi, I made a bitter smile. It seems like she’s still irritated. However, I have to convince her here. “...;.Nee, Kousuke, Can you stand and turn your back?” Wh, Why? Thinking so, I stand up and turn away. After that, something soft and warm was pressed against my back. Ludi hugged me from behind. Her delicate hands wrap around my stomach and hug me tight. “...;...;Kousuke.” “What.” “There’s a new ramen shop open near the train station...;...;. treat me.” “Ou, leave it to me.” If that can calm her anger then it is a cheap price to pay. I put my hand on top of her hands that are wrapping around me. “...;...;Kousuke.” “What?” “Good Luck.” “...;...;Aa.” —————————– The exam begins today which means the ban on the Academy dungeon had been lifted. From today on it should be four days of academic test and one day of practical skills test a five-days exam in total. After that, it will be the scoring period of two days. Seven days in total. All that is left is the scoreboard which will be posted on the eighth day. If I want to take first place, then I will have to capture the fortieth floor by the seventh day. I have until the morning of the eighth day to be exact. I confirmed with Marino-san beforehand that I can take the first place if I can do it. By the way, in Magiero, when I dive into this dungeon solo using Iori, it would take me four in-game days to beat it while defeating some of the monsters on the way. But that was a first lap RTA Iori. Not Takioto Kousuke. Based on this, my goal this time is to beat it within six days. I won’t be cutting it close on the seventh day but I will finish it on the sixth day with time to spare. If I can do that then there’s no doubt that I will get the first place. However, even if it exceeds seven days, I will not just give up and head to capture the fortieth floor anyway. I can’t get the first place if I do that but it’s still better to prioritize the fortieth floor. Of course, there are benefits of placing first in the first year as well. Firstly, you will get Tsukuyomi points and special items If it is the same as the game, when you perform great in the exam you will receive the item with an equivalently good item from the academy as well as a huge amount of Tsukuyomi points. However, from my point of view, those items and points are just by-products compared to the things I can otherwise get. Secondly, you can enter the three committees (Student Council, Public Moral Committee, Shkibukai). The fastest way to enter the three committees is to ace this first exam. Doing so, they will call out to you on their own...;. They will right? They really will right? It’s very important to enter the three committees. On top of being to progress through various events, I can also capture that dungeon and above all, I will get the chance to interact with the heroines of the three committees. I guess the events will keep progressing on their own but I planned to have Iori handle them. Well, if something bad happened, I am always willing to help...;..if he relies on me, I...;.I want to halp him. (TLN: It’s a JP meme I can’t explain it...;.Sorry.) However, comparing joining the three committees and the bonus I will get for being the first one to solo capture that floor, the bonus easily overshadowed it. Well, since it’s something with such a high rarity it can’t be helped. After all, it is not something you would normally aim for in your first playthrough anyway. I punched the nearby Gyoblin and I kept heading deeper and deeper inside without bothering checking whether I defeated it or not. The second floor is already in front of my eyes. Since It’s the floor that I visit only once, I don’t really remember its map but it is unexpectedly easy to navigate. “I already made it to the next floor huh, this’s a good pace.” I already talked with Marino-san so no one is gonna disturb me while I capturing this dungeon and the map so far is the same as I remembered. It is smooth sailing for me. “The thing that I have to worry about...;..is the next floor, huh.” One of the reasons I can fail to capture the fortieth floor is the accuracy of the map. If the map I remembered is correct then using the shortest route would save me a lot of time to get to the next floor. On the contrary, if the map deviated from the game or if I remembered it wrong, I am ready to run around to map the place myself. It has been the same as I remember it so far. However, the other worry I have was resolved the moment I went through the magic circle that leads to the next floor. Passing through the magic circle, I found a brick room similar to the previous one. I started running right away. I ran through a wide hallway that is wide enough for seven to eight people to walk through side by side and found the thing I was looking for. “Whoaaaaaaaaa! It’s a goblin, Aaaa, this is the best! I love you.” “Go, Gobu?” I don’t know whether because I suddenly confessed or because I suddenly jumped out but the goblin is very confused. I relentlessly punched its stomach and move forward, stepping on its body. I was so happy, I ended up confessing to it. Apparently, the monsters that appear here also matched my memory. The biggest concern I had about this was whether the monsters that appear here will be the same or not. “So from floor one to ten will be just like a running course huh.” Enemy, weak, experience points, bad, drop items, trash. I don’t know if there is any treasure chest here but even if there’s one, it would be unnecessary for me. Then what should I do with these floors? Obviously, I will ignore all the monsters and run to the tenth-floor boss. “At this pace, I should be able to capture the tenth floor by day one...;...;.I will have plenty of time to sleep too. Rather, should I just push through the place?” As I am thinking so, I ran through the floor and found a goblin looking at me. It looked like it really wanted to have a go with me but since it is far away, I decided to ignore it and keep running. ————– “That was tiring...;.. But, I made it to the tenth floor...;..!” The boss of the tenth floor is a monster that I had fought before, the brown wood golem. However, unlike a few weeks ago, this wood golem is just a wooden doll to me. Without exploiting its weakness using the fire magic stone, I defeated it one-sidedly. Rather than the boss, I find the distance I have to travel a lot harsher. It might be because I have been running every day but I would never have thought that it would show its result here. I was just running to train my stamina enhancement after all. Now then, there’s still time left today but there aren’t that many safe zones I can rest in. Should I keep going? No, let’s stop here. In the first place, I already planned to have some leeway on the first day of my schedule. If I recklessly diving in deeper and make a mistake I might have to retreat and I would fail to capture the fortieth floor. That’s something I want to avoid no matter what. “I would push on if I can reset it like when I’m doing the RTA run on the game though.” I muttered to myself and start preparing the place to sleep. Even if I said that all I have to do is just pulling out a sleeping bag though. According to what I heard, even if there are people who camped inside the Academy (Tsukuyomi) dungeon for a day, there’s no one who camps inside for a week. Well, of course. Why would you deliberately staying inside the dungeon when there’s a return magic circle on the tenth floor. Going back home and sleeping in my bed while hugging Marianne is naturally better...;...; Recently I only found Nee-san or Nanami instead of Marianne when I woke up though, seriously, that was freaky. If I spend six-seven days inside the dungeon will I be called a Lord? Nah, they wouldn’t call me that after six or seven days here. Well, I made a simple bed. Now it’s time to eat. Since I skipped lunch today and keep running I’m already starving. Let’s just eat and go to sleep to preserve my tension. I took out Bentos I got from Nanami and Nee-san. I was troubled to reply when Nanami gave it to me while saying [I made this for Goshujin-sama, it’s not a misunderstanding.] Nee-san only said [Nn] when she gave it to me though. It seems both of them woke up early to make these Bentos for me. The two boxes I received both contained sandwiches. I planned to eat it at lunch. They even made me something that is easy to eat like a sandwich too. However, I wasn’t hungry at the time so I skip it and they ended up as my dinner instead. I grabbed the box with the delicious-looking simple egg sandwich. This is the one I got from Nanami. Visual aid She must time it precisely when she boiled these eggs. The bread with soft-boiled egg is cut into four pieces with egg salad spread inside along with fresh and juicy lettuces. What a gorgeous egg sandwich. Isn’t this look incredibly delicious!? I open the one I got from Nee-san with a refreshing feeling. And was taken aback by it. Its look is...;.. well, it looked delicious. It has a stinging crimson color sauce spread on fresh lettuce. simply put, it’s a sandwich with hot chili pepper sauce. That’s only as far as its appearance goes. Visual aid I haven’t eaten it yet so it’s just a prediction but these don’t look like such an easy to digest sauce. I tremblingly put the sandwich up to my mouth. ...;...;No, you are kidding, right? Why? Why can I smell an energy drink from it? It’s not the sharp smell of something spicy but the pungent smell of an energy drink. For now, I picked up Nanami’s egg sandwich. “Un, delicious.” Fluffy egg salad, exquisite salted soft-boiled eggs, and fresh vegetables mixed in my mouth and create a wonderful harmony. I eat it one after another an emptied the box. Fuu, I took a deep breath and look at the mysterious sandwich that gives off a terrible odor of energy drink. If there’s a choice floating in front of me then it would say Eat, Savour, and Yes. There’s no option not to eat it. It’s the sandwich that Nee-san who is always weak in the morning woke up early like a miracle to make. Of course, I will eat it, I will but...;...;.. I pick up the sandwich with trembling hands. The bread is oddly softer than Nanami’s egg sandwich. Its appearance isn’t bad. Looking at it normally, the pepper sauce looks delicious. But it’s the energy drink smell. The thing that I am afraid of is the gap between its appearance and its smell. Gap...;...; Gap. Why am I afraid of the gap? If a Yankee-like Nee-chan turned out to be homely and quite a tsundere of if the always dignified and reliable Nee-san who turn soft like a marshmallow when she fell in love, I would normally get done in by such a gap right? It’s the same as this sandwich. I have no idea how they are the same but If I don’t think about it like that I can’t do it. I bit into Nee-san’s sandwich filled with her feelings. —- What a wonderful morning. No sky, no window with the terrible atmosphere of the dungeon as a bonus but somehow I feel incredibly refreshed. Looking at myself, my clothes are in disarrayed, it was like I was attacked by something. My clothes were bare and the chest area is fully open. I spin around and look at myself. My clothes looked like that of an IKEMEN actor on a magazine cover with the rough sexy look. Did I made you doubt your masculinity? Why did I put this here? Because I can!! I glance around while I put my clothes back in order and found two empty boxes. Just what was in those boxes. There’s this smell of energy drink from one of them though. What exactly happened yesterday? One thing I can say for sure is that I was extremely tired but somehow my body is now filled with energy. I can’t remember what happened though. Well, whatever. Now, let’s go. Today’s target is the twentieth floor! Let’s go straight to that floor with this energy! There’s no better time to advance than this. ...;..It will become more and more difficult after the twentieth floor after all. ———————- Author Note: Only one night passed because of Nee-san’s sandwich, please rest assured. ————— I don’t think the journey between the tenth floor and the twentieth floor will be that hard. The monsters that will appear should have the same level of strength from the Shadow Ruin (Panties Dungeon ) and the one that I hunted the turtle. However, there’s something that you can’t avoid no matter what you do which requires me to come up with a countermeasure against it. That thing is. “Finally found it...;...;.I’m glad that I got that ring from the Shadow Ruin.” I jump over the trap in front of me and throw a stone at it. Then when I heard something activating with *Gachi* sound, a log swung sideways pass my face. It was like there’s no wall on the side at all. It was a paranormal phenomenon that would be unthinkable back on earth. However, from what Nanami said, this kind of trap is normal. Abnormal things happen in the dungeons, that logic applied to its trap as well, it would be bad if I don’t keep that in mind. For those who want ambient sound. I put my hand on the shabby ring on my finger. Well, it is something that I willingly lowered my reputation to acquire. Without this ring, capturing the fortieth floor alone would still be a dream within a dream. However, this ring will only be effective until the fortieth floor. From the forty-first floor on the traps that will appear are intermediate level so this ring’s power will become insufficient. It’s fine this time because I will only go down to the fortieth floor but later I will have to rely on Nanami for this kind of thing. The ero traps are fine though...;...;...;what a contradicting train of thoughts. The monster that appeared on the eleventh floor has the same level of the monsters from the tenth floor, the change will come after the fifteenth floor. But one among them is difficult to deal with. Moreover, it happened to be in front of me right now. Its head appeared to be that of a dog. Its tongue hung from its open mouth and sharp fangs are visible from below. It is also holding a club like the one that the cavemen carried but judging from its thin body I don’t think it will hurt that much even if I am hit by it. Visual aid? It’s the first time I see one in this world but this guy is probably the monster that you often found in fantasy games, the kobold. They are basically treated like a trash mob, that held true in Magiero as well. Then what is so troublesome about it? The answer is its speed. It is quite fast. As the tradeoff for their weak power, its status is specialized in speed. Defeating it is easy. I can block the place that it will try to hit with third hand while counterattack by punching it with fourth-hand or use the Iai technique to defeat it. I might have said that it’s fast but when compared to Claris-san or Sempai then it’s nothing to write home about. However, the story is different if it chooses to run away. Because it’s fast on its feet, has sharp ears and a good sense of smell a kobold is a creature that specializes in running away. But going out of my way to hunt it is troublesome...;...; The kobold in front of me tightens its grip on its club while observing me. Kobolds are creatures that possessed intelligent so it will not attack indiscriminately. It will observe you for a chance to attack. Moreover, if I engage it first it might just choose to run away too. If it ran away then I will have to look over my shoulder to watch for its attack all the time. What a nasty monster. Well, it’s the first time I actually met one and I only know about it from sempai so I can’t really comment about its habit of attacking people from the back. However, I believe every word that sempai said so it must be true. With that said though. Just how long is it gonna look at me for? It’s a waste of time just staring at each other. I immediately put my hand inside my pocket, grabbed a battle magic stone I prepared beforehand and channel magic power into it. Then I throw it at the kobold. The kobold easily avoided it. However, since I already channeled magic power into it, the magic stone activated next to the kobold. “————————-!” High-Pitched sounds echo in the surrounding area. Then I smash the kobold that was covering its ears and advance through without minding the magic elements or magic stone. Wonderful. As expected of the sound magic stone. Although it is categorized as a cheap magic stone, it is very effective. Depending on how you use it, I think it is more versatile than the four basic attributes (Fire, Water, Earth, Wind). If you asked me how effective it is then it is effective to the extent that I can use it to defeat Claris-san. After that, she beat me to a pulp though. “Haa, This magic stone sure is convenient.” It is useful and effective but it still has a price attached to it. It may be cheap but normally battle magic stones are quite pricey and I need other attributed magic stones to advance further too. It’s a pity that I don’t have that much on hand. If I am not in a family that would buy a foreign car for me to celebrate me getting into school then I would have to give up solo capturing the fortieth floor or put the turtle hunting on hold to make some money. Seriously, as expected of Marino-sama. From now on more troublesome enemies will keep appearing, and there will be enemies that are simply strong, it would be bad for me to spend too much battle magic stones (Money). However, after I captured this place, I would be receiving more money and items than I could wish for and I would be able to get the three committee events as well. It would be bad if I fail but I won’t fall to the extent of a certain teacher (Luigia) though. I ran through the eleventh floor and get to the next floor. Of course, I am running through this floor as well. Personally, the battle from the eleventh floor to the twentieth floor should be cut entirely to save time. Rather, I should say that I won’t be able to make it if I don’t cut down the time here. Regarding the battle, the most troublesome opponent between these floors is the bloody bat that will appear from the thirteenth floor. As the name suggests, they are red bats that suck blood. What is so troublesome about it? On top of the fact that multiple instances of them always appear at once, they can also fly. From what I heard from Sempai, they appear as a pack eighty percent of the time. If I have Ludi with me then I would have her defeating them using magic or if it’s Nanami I can have her knock them down with explosion but all I can do is throwing stones at them like a caveman. Using battle magic stone is also a waste and most important of all it would be a waste of time to hunt them. The conclusion is to just run away from them. If I have time left I can spare some to hunt them though. *Uwaa* The moment I turn the corner I involuntarily let out a sound. In front of me are three kobolds. Putting it appropriately, there are three troublesome things in front of me. I immediately reach into my pocket to activate the sound magic stone. I cover my ears and run passed them when they are still covering theirs. Then it came to me. Eh. since I entered this dungeon, haven’t I ran away from almost everything except the boss battle? ———————- Author Notes: he wouldn’t be able to make it in time if he didn’t do that. Speaking of which, some sites are still advertising panties on my page, (TLN: A while back when he posted the panties dungeon the underwear ads were advertising on his page.) won’t they learn already that I won’t buy it?...;..It must be an accident when I clicked on the ten percent off garter belt deal. It was quite Erotic (Didn’t buy it though) I was able to capture the twentieth floor within two days just as planned, all the running away has shown its result. The orc, boss of the twentieth floor is just a pig so there’s nothing special about it either. In the first place, a pig that can’t fly is just a pig, like the pig bastard that hasn’t reached its adolescent is just a pig bastard (TLN: Seishun Buta Yarou joke alert, to find out more click here) After that, I immediately ate dinner and go to bed to finish the second day just like that. Then although it is not a pleasant wake-up, I did a big stretch and pour the coffee directly into my stomach. Now then, let’s head to the twenty-first floor! I sounded like I was in a rush but it would be more correct to say that the time has finally come. The twenty-first floor is completely different from the first twenty floors. The obvious change is that the previously stone constructed conventional dungeon has turned into a jungle ruin eroded by plants. The walls and floor are crawling with tree roots and mosses so if you are not careful you might slip and fall. Well, I don’t really care about all that. The problem is the thing that is in front of me right now. Should I say that it finally appeared huh? It is something that you can’t avoid in an eroge like Magical★Explorer. Its body is small. Probably around one meter in height. A pair of small wings fluttering behind its back. It is looking at me with a forked spear in its hand. In a sense, it is one of the monsters that are stronger than a normal boss monster. However, it is rare for this thing to not appear in an Eroge with RPG setting. It’s to the level that you would ask *So it actually exist?* Now, the thing that is staring at me is wearing something that shouldn’t be in this kind of place. It’s wearing a competition swimsuit. Not visual aid, I just like my Kouhai. It would be reasonable if this is a swimming pool but we are inside a dungeon. From the perspective of a normal person, that thing is simply a pervert. Well, it’s normal in eroge though. Seriously, what is it doing wearing a swimsuit inside a stone dungeon? And I don’t know whether that is its waist or buttocks but there’s a long narrow tail protruding from it with a tip shaped like a spade. Thick thighs, brown skin, a pair of underdeveloped breasts. A perfectly healthy body that isn’t too thin or too thick. (TLN: for accurate image please try google “608570 hitomi” I advise using incognito mode first.) With the expression that said *Hey I’m gonna kill you!* it is looking my way but let’s give an honest impression here. It’s super cute. “Fuu. You finally came out, you ero monster. On top of that, it’s a loli too.” The imps that start appearing from the twenty-first floor and beyond have an appearance that is different from the imp from your conventional game. They are the erotically cute imp transformed to fit the concept of eroge. Moreover, they are all older than eighteen years old too. If I tame a monster then it’s not hard to imagine that I would tame this one immediately. Even if it’s weak, it can still compete with the late-game bosses with enough items spent on it. Well, if it comes to that, it might grow into an Ero Onee-san as well. Depending on the method, you can make a legal loli for yourself too. I have been avoiding these kinds of monsters. Leaving Nanami aside, I don’t know how I will react to them in front of sempai and Ludi. The most worrying concern about this is how I will react after all. However, even if it’s not an imp there should be ero monsters appearing inside the dungeon I introduced to Iori too. I wonder how he reacted to these monsters in front of the girls? I will ask him later for a reference. Sorry that I used you as a guinea pig, it should be a place that easies for you to level in though...;.. Well, the ero monsters are considered normal in this world so he might unexpectedly be used to it already. There’s an imp-chan that looks like it is going to fly at me at any time in front of me but my course of action has already been decided. “Here!” I immediately took out a sound magic stone from my pocket and throw it at the imp. Of course. It would be troublesome to fight it while it is flying, its costume is quite revealing after all. In the first place, might not be able to attack it if it keeps flying in that costume. Fighting it normally would take me too much time. Not to mention the mental damage...;...;..Should I take a picture before I run away? But it’s not that I will run away from all the monsters in this floor. If I don’t defeat some then I might have a problem in terms of experience points (Magic elements). From the Turtle grinding, I now understand the importance of collecting magic elements. To increase your physical strength, it would be better to hunt the monsters in a dungeon. That doesn’t mean that the running and practice swing I have been doing was meaningless. It might just be because of all the running away I have been doing but my running shown its result here and The Battou-jutsu is now an indispensable technique for me. “So it’s here.” The thing that changed on the twenty-first floor is not just its atmosphere but also the monsters that appear in it. It was true for the imp I encountered before and so is the treant that is now in front of me. A treant is a close relative of the wood golem but it’s more fitting to say that they are both something like a tree. Speaking of the Treant’s characteristic then it would be its high attack power and its slow-wit, to put it simply they are muscle brain type monsters. Additionally, the treant’s weakness is fire so you can use fire magic to defeat it from far away. That being said, you can still defeat it without using fire magic. Visual aid The treant swings its log-like arm at me while walking slowly toward me. When I repelled its attack, I finally understood how abnormal the strength of Claris-san and Sempai is. After that, I defeat the treant with Battou-jutsu. On top of its slow speed, it also possessed a physical body so if I don’t lose in the contest of power then it is just a wooden doll. If it’s like this then I can defeat it however much I want. I cleanly bisected it then look at its grain. Come to think of it, you can tell a tree’s age by looking at its ring right? When I was thinking so, the treant already turned into magic elements and magic stone. “The magic stone is getting bigger huh...;..” Is it the size of a pigeon food? I thought. The magic stone in my hand is the size of my pinky fingertip. ...;...;..Still so small. Well, Luigia-sensei said that rather than its size it’s better to look at its component, density, and condensation so it seems that I shouldn’t worry about the size that much. She is very competent in her work and magic-related stuff. She would make me cheerful just by looking at her but I want to have her to start learning something about money though. Well, the treant is quite easy to hunt and like the game, it has a lot of magic power as well. Leaving the magic stone aside, I was thinking about grinding here for magic elements but there’s a problem with this place. “Why is there a poison monster here.” I haven’t seen one before but on the floor that the treants are spawning, there are the monsters called poison toad appearing as well. If I make some mistakes and got poisoned then how will I cure it? I can only use an item for that. I prepared some just in case but the poison in this floor is not that strong and the price for antidote wasn’t that expensive compared to battle magic stones. That being said, I haven’t brought that much with me. Moreover, the battle magic stones are so useful that’s why I didn’t bring a lot of the antidote with me. “Still, it’s my fail huh...;..” Even if I don’t hunt them, I should get poisoned at least once. In the game, there was a method to keep hunting while you are poisoned. Since the poison on this floor is weak I shouldn’t take much damage. should I just bare the poison damage and hunt? it was what they do inside the game after all. I can do that too but my biggest concern is the side effect. For example, in battle, you can fight without anything affecting you whenever you moved to the battle screen. But in this world, you would get tired if you move around and you would be out of breath if you run. There are negative effects that don’t exist inside the game. I wonder what the effect does the poison has here? I should have investigated it before I enter this dungeon. In the schedule, I planned to run away from everything besides the treants but there’s a possibility that I might get poisoned by mistake later so it should be better to try it out now. Should I eat it as a test? No, I don’t know what will happen so let’s not do that now. If I am gonna do it anyway then it’s better to do it when there’s someone else with me and no time limit to worry about. Nee-san or Luigia-sensei probably has some sort of poisons with them and that elf ero scientist will definitely have some. Yup, I can swear to the eroge god that she has some. I’m more afraid of the thing that she will ask in return though. The first point I have to reflect on has come out. Try everything you can before diving inside a dungeon. There are a lot of dungeons that I have to dive into after this. At that time, I will have to reflect on this. Now then, it can’t be helped this time so let’s hunt if the only monster that appears is the Treants and run away from everything else. For now, let’s defeat this treant first. As is often the case with online games, I personally believe that the most important aspect to raise your level efficiently is[The time required]. The time it took for one battle, the time until you encounter a monster, the time for your character to recover after the battle. You have to take everything into your calculation and go to the most efficient place accordingly. Well, depending on the drop items you can change your hunting ground too. However, there’s a little different when you are doing RTA. Since you already knew the route you have to take to get to the end, you have to take the most optimal action to get there. In reality, this method of RTA was also used in places like factories. Since you know what your finished product is, the rest is just to think about how to increase your efficiency. Well, there are so many uncertainties so you will have to take measures to ensure your safety margin though. My goal this time is to beat the fortieth floor within a week and join the three committees. I considered that as my top priority so I put in a lot of money to prepare for this and done all the special training that I can think of to capture this place. Above all, it was for this dungeon that I sacrificed all those panties for. One of the things I must do while capturing the fortieth floor is to gather the magic elements. Since the treants started to appear after the twenty-first floor I seriously want to hunt them! Or so I thought but there are also poison toads there. With that said, I can just start hunting on the twenty-fourth floor where the toad doesn’t spawn. That is the place I want to go but there’s no treant spawning after the twenty-fourth floor either. The monster that spawning there are the imps so the developer must have known that this would happen. If you can shoot them down with light attribute magic or sniping them like Nanami then the imps are also a good source of income but if they fled to the sky then my only option is to use battle magic stone, it’s bad for my heart. I can also lure them to fight in the hallway as well but that would take too much time. “So I basically have to run away after all...;...;.” There is also a new type of goblin spawning on this floor, it is a higher species called [Hobgoblin]. They wield weapons like clubs, swords, bow, and wand. Depending on its weapon, its attack pattern will change but they are still easy to deal with. Like in the game, they are trash mobs. Visual aid However, even if they’re easy to defeat, unfortunately, the experience points they provide are poor when compared to the treants. Well, it can’t be helped since they are weak. The Hobgoblin that appeared just now is wielding a bow. However, its power is very different when compared to Nanami. Seriously, it’s like I got punched by a child. Aside from the fear of the arrow flying at me like a bullet, there’s nothing to it. If they come out as a group then they will be more troublesome than the treants but they are not usually grouping up like that and if there are many of them then there might be some accidents happening too (Hitting each other with missed attack). I have a relatively large number of spare recovery items but I don’t want to use them now since I planned to use it after the thirtieth floor. I ran after I knocked down a hobgoblin. If there are two hobgoblins then I will fight, if there are three or more or if there’s an imp among them then I will run. With luck, I will keep going like this until I reach the twenty-seventh floor. ————————- “I just thought about it but I already made it to the twenty-seventh floor huh.” Since I rushed through it faster than I did on the previous floors I arrived here in a blink of an eye. But it can’t be helped After all, this floor is one of the most important places that can decide my future. This floor is the floor that the spawning monster started to change again and it is the floor that I can earn more experience points than all the previous floors Also, it can be said that the dungeon’s atmosphere has changed a little on this floor, it is this floor specific feature. Rather, since the atmosphere has changed, you could say that the monsters also changed accordingly. “But from this point on I will have to be careful of surprise attacks.” I sigh at the sight of the waterway on the side. The changes that occur on this floor are the addition of waterways and ponds to the jungle ruin. As a result, the water type monster will start appearing from now on. As I move in a little further, a monster appeared from a big pool of water. It has an eye-catching huge pincer. On its back is a huge shell with two feelers. Even so, it’s so big. Its height should be around that of an elementary schooles or a middle schooler? However, its width is around that of six to seven people, and that pincer is abnormally huge. Rather, the pincer itself is so big that it destroyed its balance. “But its bad balance is as expected of the Kariyado huh.” Visual aid Kariyado is a monster with its base design of Yadokari (Hermit Crab) equipped with a huge pincer. Its name is just a play on Yadokari so the gentlemen immediately made that connection, it’s even called a Yadokari officially too. There were a lot of wordplay and puns in Magiero huh. Now, I think that Kariyados have the best compatibility with me. It’s not that fast, it’s strong against slash damage but weak to blunt. Moreover, as Mizumori-sempai said [You can cut its joints easily enough, and with Takioto’s arm then you would have enough strength to cut its shell in the first place, right?] if she says that then I should be able to do it. Come to think of it, when I perform a critical hit with a bladed weapon in the game, the damage also go through right? Was it because I cut the joints? Well, my best weapon is still my stole so I can just punch it. I don’t really have to stick to slashing them. However, there are some points to note. The Kariyado is walking toward me while making *GagiGagi* sound. It is moving a little faster than I expected. The Kariyado swing its pincer down toward me. Aren’t you going to snap it at me? I used third-hand to parry while thinking so. The thing that you have to be careful against the kariyado is its huge pincer. It doesn’t possess the sharpness to cut things but if you are caught inside that ridiculous pincer then it will break your bones for sure. I kicked the pincer away from me after I used body enhancement on my leg, the kariyado tilted greatly to the side. I immediately followed up with a blow to its face. *Bagin*, the kariyado turns over with the sound of something broken. However, since it still doesn’t turn into magic elements so I tried to do immediately follow up with another attack but that doesn’t connect. No, it’s better to say that I couldn’t do it. *BubBubBub* bubbles are overflowing from the kariyado. Its face is now full of bubbles, it’s like the kariyado has grown a beard. Since it is not a poison monster, I don’t think there will be any problem if I am bathed in it but.. “It’s hard to close the distance...;...;” It might be because of its small size or simply its large number but it looks so gross. With that said, I still have to fight it. In the first place, leaving aside the twenty-seventh floor, I planned to finish running from the twenty-first floor to the thirtieth floor within only a few hours and spend one whole day on the twenty-seventh floor. I planned to stay here and hunt for a long time so just by considering its grossness I already waste my precious time. “Alright, Hmph.” I shut off my mind and punched its face. Then more bubbles spill from its mouth, it started to convulse, its legs collapse making its shell touch the ground. Then it slowly turns into magic elements. The hermit crab has the image of the sea but can it live on with freshwater alone? I think about such meaningless things while picking up the magic stone but I have to immediately raise my body and kick the magic stone away as not to let it interfere with the battle. “Like a moth flying to a flame huh.” The thing that appeared was the target monster that I plan to spend one whole day to hunt on this floor. It is a monster that has a figure of a child wielding a big hammer. It has an androgynous body and a very cute appearance. However, it is walking while dragging along a hammer that’s taller than its height, its appearance is obviously strange. It is a fairy type monster called the Knocker. Visual aid The knocker may look like a child but its strength doesn’t match its appearance. Above all, the thing that I have to be careful about is not its big hammer. “So you finally appeared!?” I directed third-hand at the magic circle that appeared in front of the knocker. Then besides the usual reinforcement I gave to the stole, I add in a water enchantment as well. At the same time, a fireball flew toward me from the magic circle. The most troublesome thing about this fairy monster is its fire attack using fire magic stone. I immediately close the distance while parrying the attack with my stole. However, as if it was expecting me to charge in, it swung down its hammer at me. I guard it with fourth hand and tried to use Iai to finish it off but the attack doesn’t connect. The knocker used the impact from its hammer to widen the distance. I almost said *What!?* There. It is very acrobatic. If I add this to a video-sharing site it would definitely garner a lot of popularity from the Shota category. Immediately after it widened the distance, it activates the magic stone again. Then at the same time, it also readied its hammer and approach me. But unfortunately...;...; I had asked sempai, Ludi and Claris-san to help me train against the two-way attacks already. Since I knew that there would be multiple instances of enemies in the dungeons so I trained as much as possible to counter it. That choice seems to be correct. I parry the attack with third hand and used fourth hand to block the hammer. However, this time there’s something different about the fourth hand. The moment the fourth hand touched the hammer, *puff* the sounds that rang out was like the hammer hitting the cloth, the hammer is now wrapped inside fourth hand. Just how long it took me to master this delicate hardening technique. (TLN: ( ° ?? °)) “Now, strengthen it then harden.” The knocker was unable to pull out its hammer that is currently wrapped inside the hardened stole leaving its stomach defenseless. Using Iai, I bisected the knocker. It soon turned into magic elements, magic stone, and a red jewel. I was surprised to see it. “Ha? Y, you are kidding, right? How? And I only defeated one too!?” I ended up looking at it twice. Rather than rejoicing, I am more puzzled. It was not only because of the experience points that the knockers provided. Actually, they are hard to hunt down and there are better places I can grind but the reason I decided to hunt here was the drop item. Unfortunately, that item has a very low chance to drop; Even the drop rate from those shitty gacha in smartphone games is better. But as long as you have money, you can still get it. That’s not the case with this thing. With that said, if I can buy it then I will. However, it would be too expensive even for my pocket money (New salaryman’s annual income class). Since it would make me unable to buy other things I would have to cut it. As I already obtained it, I might be able to cut down the total capture time by one day. Well, my family seems like the one that will give me extra money if I asked for it though. Now then, there’s an additional magic stone that dropped from the knocker. When I was streaming my RTA, someone said that I have a [Trash luck] but I ended up getting it to drop after one try. What a happy thing! I pick it up and take a close look at its shape. Yup, it’s like when you appreciate the value of products in a store. This is the same, I’m sure of it. It is a [fire battle magic stone, intermediate] Even so, it’s still strange. Why is it that the knocker which usually uses low-level magic stones dropped an intermediate-level one? Well, they do drop the low-level one too though. It should use the intermediate-level magic stone without holding back. Even if the opponents looked weak it shouldn’t underestimate them. Well, whatever. “Well, since I already got the magic stone.” Saying so, I put the magic stone I from the kariyado I kicked away into my bag. I can’t stop smiling. “Let’s hunt four more!” The targeted (ambition) time is twelve hours. Let’s hunt as much as I can! ...;...;...;...;.It’s the beginning of hell. “Knocka Knocka Knocka Kno Kno Kno Knocka Knon ?” Dear, Ludi-san. How are you? I am almost broken. No, I am already broke. It’s the result of such tedious tasks one after another. There are times that I have to use sound magic stone and imp-chan’s innocent looks don’t heal me at me all. There’s only imp-chan that poke me with a spear. No imp-chan says [What’s this, you are hard here? What a hopeless fellow.] nor does there’s any imp-chan that I want to rub my back. The monsters that appeared in this place are hobgoblin twenty percent of the time, while forty percent of the time the hermit crab and the Loli Shota Knocker appearing. I still don’t know whether it is a male or female so I will add [-tan] as its suffix from now on. At first, I thought that knocker-tan was cute because of its cool and stylish movement. However, since Knocker-tan stubbornly doesn’t want to drop the magic stones I want, I am angry at it and I don’t feel anything toward it anymore. Sometimes I do want to just grab their body and search through all of their belongings too. “KnoockaKnokaKno–...;...;...;...;.Haaaa.” What am I writing I wonder? I immediately tore the letter up and throw it away inside the dungeon. I felt kind of guilty so I pick it back up though. Seriously, what am I doing? I managed to hold onto my sanity until I get the third one. I even close one eye and said [the probability is ...;converging!]. Thinking about it, I may have already been broken at that point. I felt so relieved after the fourth one dropped. The gap between the third and the fourth one dropping was so long that I was crushed by the thought that I would have to make do with only three. But “Just another one, just one more.” Since I decided that I will spend more than a day here, it is still within the schedule but seriously, you really don’t want to drop it huh. “I should start hunting again soon...;..” I continue to hunt after a break and lost my sanity again after two hours. ———- Once I got all the battle magic stones, all that is left is to run to the thirtieth floor. From the twenty-eighth floor onward, the hobgoblins disappear and they are replaced with a flying deer monster called [Peryton]. Visual aid Of course, I immediately tried to run away from it. But. “Escaping and fighting is getting harder...;.” The reason is simple, the monster’s ability including its speed is getting higher. However, the main reason is that the monsters are becoming more sly. For example, a peryton would attack me while I am fighting with a knocker. I managed to defend against it with fourth-hand but it was still extremely dangerous. The knocker that appeared just now didn’t chase after me when I was running away. When I thought that it was strange there is a trapdoor in the direction I am heading to. The monsters are still relatively easy to deal with but from the thirty-first floor onward then it might get worse. After that floor, the strength of the monsters will be equal or even higher than me after all. For now, I used a light magic stone on the peryton in front of me. “I am spending them like hot water...;.. But it would be bad if I have too much leftover too huh.” Having too much leftover shown that you haven’t done enough to prepare for your adventure. It probably the result of a poor preliminary survey. Well, in this case, I never conduct the survey in the first place. I just asked Sempai for her knowledge and establish my hypothesis on that. It can’t be helped that I am too naive here. I used the light magic stone to rush to the thirtieth floor, as all the previous floor that was a good breakpoint, there’s a boss on this floor. Well, that’s natural. Should I describe this floor as an oval field? It is like a small sports stadium with the seats replaced with waterways. I walk to the center of the floor and heard the sound of splashing water from the waterway in front of me. What appeared there was a dark brown shell. The uneven shell slowly rises through the water and approaches me. The next thing that came out of the water was a big pincer. However, it is not the hermit crab I have been fighting with for the past ten hours. Its pincer is way bigger and thicker than that. Its shell isn’t that of the hermit crab, its whole body is covered with a shell. “Finally come out huh, Clambon.” A Clambon is a crab monster. Its appearance is that of a crab but its size is totally different. In the first place, it could easily pick me up with its pincer...;..no, it wouldn’t be weird if that thing can cut me in two, it was that big. It raises both of its pincers as if to intimidate me...;.. “It’s so full of opening...;...;.” I take out the intermediate-level fire magic stone I prepared and use it on the clambon. The fire with high temperature incomparable to that of the low-level magic stone fly toward the clambon that is currently raising its pincers while making a smug face. At the moment of impact, a terribly loud explosion echoed through the surroundings. I think that it is even more powerful than Nanami’s explode arrow. Nanami also absorbed the magic elements and done her own training too so she should be able to do this much. Rather, the most unusual thing here is Nanami’s growth rate...;...; The orange fire spread all around, there’s a sweet fragrance blowing along with the blast. I’m hungry so I want to have dinner a little early but unfortunately, the clambon wasn’t defeated with only one magic stone. There are embers in the surrounding area but I run toward the crab that is still raised its pincers then draw my katana and tried to cut its joint but it was blocked by its pincer. I immediately get away from the clambon and return my katana to its sheath to prepare for the next attack. Then I use third hand and fourth hand to guard my left and right sides while looking at the clambon. Apparently, it seems angry. Its shell turned red and run toward me like its legs are a high-speed sewing machine. Its redness must be because I heated it with fire though. The clambon that is stomping towards me vertically swing its pincer at me. After that it releases a large number of bubbles toward me, I thought that it would keep charging at me like that but it suddenly disappeared. “Ha?” I wipe away the bubbles while trying to locate the clambon. It’s too fast that have to let out a dry laugh. It was like a big sand crab (Ocypode). However, the power behind its pincer that is coming toward me is nothing to laugh at. I received it with fourth-hand but it made quite a strong impact. Unable to kill the momentum, I was almost blown away but I managed to use third-hand as a brake in time. But that was not the end of its assault. It tried to crush my body with its rapidly moving feet. I protect myself with fourth-hand while escaping from that spot. Then the clambon stomped past where I was and make semi-circle to get in front of me. Now it is repeatedly trying to crush me with its pincer. I took a defensive stance with third and fourth hands while readying my katana. After it tried to smash me with its pincer four-five times it started to move. This time it widely opens its pincer and rushes toward me. My intuition tells me that it would be bad to get caught so decided to jump right away. The clambon passed where I was and stopped a little further ahead while raising its arm to intimidate me again. It’s a chance. I ran toward it while using a fire magic stone. The fire hit the clambon and explode. I jump at it without minding the flame. My body is so hot like it is burning. No, I think I am actually burning. However, I will ignore that for now. As its shell is getting crunchy by the heat, I have to use this time to break its legs. As the heat is too strong I have to close my eyes so my field of vision is limited. However, as the effect of mind eye, the more I concentrated, the more I can clearly see the clambon. At the same time, the clambon’s movement looks slower than usual. I draw my katana and slash at its joint. It was fast because it has a lot of legs but it was easy to cut off its leg one by one when it already lost its balance. It tried to retaliate with its pincers but because its legs have already gone, I easily guard against its attacks as it is now full of opening, the result was already decided. I let out a small sigh while drinking a recovery potion. “If I don’t have the intermediate level magic stones, I would have struggled quite a bit...;...;.will I be fine on the next floor, I wonder” It will be a difficult battle. From this point onward, the monsters are rapidly getting stronger. “The monster should be getting stronger on Thirty-first to fortieth, fifty-first to sixtieth, and the from sixty-fifth floor onward.” That being said, even if the monsters are rapidly getting stronger, it doesn’t mean that it can’t be defeated. I have been coming up with countermeasures against that too so it shouldn’t be a problem. “Alright, let’s keep running away while praying that I will not meet any monster along the way.” ———————- Author Note: The final and also basic technique of RTA [Praying]. The first thing I think of when I arrive at the thirty-first floor was *so it’s not a cave or a ruin, huh?* Well, since I have already experienced the same phenomenon before, I wasn’t surprised that much. “Warm sunshine, pleasant breeze, clear sky, the clear stream that reflecting the sun Just where is this place?” Visual aid There was no need to ask. This is a dungeon. It’s not a place you can spread a leisure sheet in a shade to sit down and eat sandwiches...;...;.sandwiches? I somehow felt like my heart is screaming but that must be my imagination. Now then, the troublesome new monster that starts appearing on this floor is...;...; “Everything is troublesome!” Bird-type, horse-type, sheep-type, or serpent-type It will be troublesome no matter what appears. I do think that I have enough power to capture up until the fortieth floor. But that was only in the case that I have a party. If it’s a one on one then I will never lose. But what if there are multiple enemies or that I have to battle consecutively or if I run out of recovery items? There’s no doubt that I will get overwhelmed. If I have Ludi or Nanami with me then I think we should be able to breakthrough without using that much consumable items eighty percent of the time. If both of them are with me then we can definitely do it. However, this time I have to break through it solo in a limited time. All I need to join the three committees is my grade which takes both academic ability and dungeon score into consideration. But I doubt that I can get a high score in the exam. If I desperately study then I might get a good score. However, there is also the practical skills test. In the game, the practical skills test was omitted and the score was automatically assigned according to your ability point. That’s why I don’t know the content of the practical skills test. Well, I can’t even think that a guy who skipped morning classes, as well as the afternoon classes like me, would be able to get a good score. My long-range magic is so poor in the first place. If I take too long I might miss my chance to join the three committees as well. In the game, no matter what route you choose, there’s no route that Takioto joins the three committees after all. Different characters will join in his stead. For the organizations that limit the number of its members, I want to join them as soon as possible and I want to join them before Iori does too. After I got in...;...;should I progress through the library event first? Well, let’s give priority to the monster in front of me first. Comparing its body to an animal then this thing is a mix between a horse and a human. It has a lower half of a horse and that of a human on the upper half, it’s a classic fantasy monster as famous as the goblins, the centaur. I was shocked in a lot of ways when I saw a centaur for the first time in Magiero. I couldn’t believe my eyes. I understand the horse lower half. The fine muscles in its lower half should be able to kick the ground and run at a speed that a human can’t. Their weapon is also understandable. A bow fits perfectly with its image. But why is the upper half looks like an old man? Visual aid? If it’s eroge RPG then, the centaurs are the first species that I want to see its female form. The lower body of a strong horse will enhance the size of the breast on the upper half, I saw that in a lot of pictures. However, there’s none on this centaur. It’s just a bitter oldman. Is this really Magiero? It is to the extent that it made that question popped inside my head. I thought that I bought a fake game at first. I was so worried that I sent a message to ask my friend and went to check on the bulletin site. Unfortunately, I was among the first to capture the dungeon at the time. Well, the female centaurs will appear after a few dozen floors with a different species name, I remembered that I was so relieved when I found them. An eroge without a female centaur is like strawberry milk without strawberry. Additional visual aid to wash your eyes Now, speaking of the centaur, “Its speed is more troublesome than its weapon huh...;..” The centaur took a stance with its bow and create a jet black arrow with magic. Then it takes aim at me...;...;...;.and release the arrow. “Fuh.” As soon as it released the arrow I spread out the third hand. It’s slower than Nanami. It was easy to parry but the centaur prepared its next arrow and release it immediately after. While avoiding that, I decided to conduct an experiment so I started running. Fortunately, this guy is the only monster that appeared. “...;...;as expected, it’s fast.” Its normal movement speed should be higher than me. I haven’t tested it yet but its stamina must be higher than me as well. After that, I defend against its attacks while getting away, it’s a little troublesome. Its speed and stamina were within my expectation but the thing that surprises me is. “I can’t escape...;...;!” In the end, I was able to escape by using sound magic stone and use the chance to widen the distance. It was so easy to escape from them in the game. I wonder why I can’t do the same here? The possibility that I can think of was...; “Is it related to the floor?” I was able to escape when I was inside the in-door floor up until now so I guess that was the reason? Until now, if you left the floor after aggroing the monster they would stop following you. Well, there are some that keep following me but if I keep running they wouldn’t be able to follow after me. “The view here is the best.” If I were to play hide and seek here then the hiding place would be too few it won’t even be a game. These guys must have something like a territory so if I don’t leave its territory then it wouldn’t stop chasing me. That’s likely to be the case. Well, let’s put that as one of the possibilities. Another possibility is that I am too weak. In Magiero the thing that determines whether you can escape or not is the character’s speed. The centaur was certainly fast but it was not impossible to escape from. But what if I can’t escape? It might be my fundamentally mistake to think of it as a game. If we are talking about the game then it would take [the opponent’s speed] against [my speed] and calculate the outcome using that. However, that’s one of the creatures called a monster. They only move according to their instinct and they might only chase me according to their instinct too, right? Well, if that’s the case then it’s just a matter of course. “Aaah, I want to experiment on a lot of things...;..!” Be that as it may, there’s no time. Even for basic experimentation, you would need a lot of time to collect and scrutinize the data from various angles. For now, I should move immediately according to the available data in my hand. It would only be a waste of time to stay here. Since it has become difficult to escape, I should move toward the next floor as soon as possible. I look around and see a vast grassland spreads out. I can see a figure of something like a monster further away. “The situation is pretty bad right now huh.” The problem is not just escaping from the monsters. “I don’t know if I should keep running further in or not.” If it’s a hallway then I could understand the cardinal direction like North, South, East, West. However, when it becomes such a vast flat surface, I can’t apply the 2D map from my memory to the 3D scenery in front of me. I wish I had a landmark or something. “If the transition gate to the next floor is the same as the one I came in then would it serve as a landmark?” Surely, when I entered this floor, the ground was made of cobblestones. And since there’s a magic circle on top of it, wouldn’t it be better to look for a cobblestone platform? Then, where is it? It was only the first floor after the thirtieth floor but it made me worry about the future. For the time being, let’s pray that I will find it soon. ————— I will omit the details from the thirty-first to thirty-third floor and tell you what I understand from that experience. “If you see an enemy, don’t approach them.” If I carelessly approached them then it would turn into a battle. On the contrary, if I don’t get close to them, most of the time they will not come to attack me. Unfortunately, there are a lot of enemies. “Aah, this is really tough...;..” I’m fine with one on one fight. It takes some time but I can win. However, if there are more than one then, it won’t be as hard as fighting Claris-san and the other but it will still be tough. I still have my tension but if it keeps getting harder like this then I don’t know what will happen. Also, it took me more time than I expected and I have to take a break. The warm sunshine is good and all but this place is a dungeon. When I check the time with my clock, it is already well past noon, dinner time is only a few hours away. I planned to have gone up to the thirty-fifth floor already at this point. If I can capture the thirty-third floor today then I think I will take a break. It will be later than I planned but it would still be okay since I included an extra day in my schedule. If I put the extra day into calculation then I think it would be good to stop here today. Additionally, the thing that is weighing down on my mind is not just that. There’s also the fact that I used more consumable items than expected. I bought them thinking that I have plenty of room to spare but considering the future, I don’t think that will be the case. I might spend it all before I even get to the fortieth floor at this rate. But I can’t run away if I don’t use it so I can’t afford to use them sparingly. Sometimes it is even hard to escape. And since this guy starts spawning after the thirty-third floor, I think the rate I will have to use the items will keep increasing. The monster that appears in front of me is staring my way while fluttering its wings, each of its wings has the size of my arm. It’s a glamorous monster called [Harpia.] Monet-san, Onegaishimasu. Harpia is the monster that I want to avoid the most on my way to the fortieth floor. One of the reasons I want to avoid them is the same as why I want to avoid the imps. If the imp is a tiny cutie then Harpia is a big cutie. Since its facial features are somewhat youthful, it has a baby-face but its fully developed body will give you the feeling of an adult. If a harpia goes to a bar then it might be asked to show its ID. The imp and knocker? Those guys are out of the question. Now then, there are a lot of points that I have to beware of when fighting a harpia. First of all, its clothes that its huge pair of breasts are spilling out from, the chestnut color bra...;...;...;not. There’s nothing wrong there. The thing that I have to watch out for is its sharp claws that extend from its bird-like feet. According to what I heard from sempai, it will point its claws at me while descending and that it will sometimes use wind magic as well. The harpia countermeasure was...;. “Running away, of course.” But there’s a problem. The magic stones. I will have some leeway with them if I use fire or sound magic stone but since they spawn from the thirty-third floors to the fortieth floors, it is quite a distance to cover. Should I use a magic stone if only one appears? Even though the rate I have to use them against the horse and snake has been increasing rapidly, should I still use it on them? Well, considering the harpia strength then the conclusion is that [I won’t use it if there’s only one of them.] This time I want to find out the magic stone effectiveness so I will use it. If you want to experiment, you better do it when it is alone. I don’t know what will happen so I take as much safety margin as possible. I take out a low-level magic stone and use it on the harpia. First is fire. It might be because I saw what the intermediate-level one can do, the fireball looks small and unreliable. However, it seems the harpia doesn’t like that and immediately move to avoid it. It’s fast. The harpia might be the most mobile monster I have encountered so far. It came to counter-attack by descending at me with its sharp claws immediately after it avoided the fireball. It was like an arrow cutting through the wind. It is descending at me with tremendous speed but its attack is too straight forward. I can easily avoid it but I decided to catch it instead. I received the attack with third hand and catch it with fourth hand. *Gakin* the sound of metal hitting metal resounded and an impact runs through my body. But that was it. Compared to the clambon, the attack is clearly weaker. But it’s still troublesome in a different meaning. “As expected, it’s fast.” Stepping on fourth hand, the harpia soar to the sky again. Then it widely opens its mouth and let out a loud scream. I clicked my tongue. There’s a lot that I still haven’t experiment on yet but I should start running away soon. No, it’s too late for that. I swat down an arrow that flying at me from the side and look at that direction. At that place, there’s a centaur. The most troublesome part of the Harpia is that it can call for its friends. If I came here with a party to earn the magic elements then it would be a good thing but I am soloing the dungeon right now and I am almost completely useless against flying monster. *Swoosh* An arrow struck near my feet. It must be constructed with magic since it soon disappears, leaving only a hole in the ground. That arrow was precisely aimed at my body but if I am distracted by the centaur then the harpia will come to attack me. It might call more of its friends too. It’s clearly disadvantageous to fight them. Should I run? To defeat them, I must do something about the harpia first. But since it is flying in the sky, I can only throw a stone or use other consumable items on it. No choice but to escape huh. It took me thirty minutes to escape from them. “That harpia is too annoying.” After eating my dinner, I drink a cup of freshly brewed coffee and think back about today. Originally, I planned to capture the thirty-fifth floor today. But what happened? I am on the thirty-forth floor right now. Even though I didn’t make any progress at all, I am preparing to go to bed. It will be bad if I keep going like this. I need to come up with a countermeasure against the harpies and fast. The thing I know is that they are very cautious. It is difficult to snipe them down. It is easy to deal with them if there’s only one of them. And the most troublesome thing is...;. “I have to do something to prevent it from calling more of its friends...;...;” It is an ideal monster when you want to grind for experience points in the game but it is the worst monster when I want to run away. And not just the same species, annoyingly, it can call the centaur too. Fortunately, the centaur stop appearing after the thirty-seventh floor but that is still far away. Besides, considering that there will be other troublesome guys appearing at the later floor it would turn into a zero-sum game. If they are spawning together then it will be very hard to break through. ...;.I thought that it would be easy to escape from them at first but I was wrong. Keep fighting to the minimum and keep running away. That was certainly effective until the thirtieth floor. Since the map got bigger, it should take me two days to run through it. That was what I thought. However, getting here earlier than this might turn out to be more difficult. I will have to run with only a few breaks in between. If I keep the break time to the bare minimum then it would save me one or two hours...;. No, was one or two hours make that big a difference in the first place? The most effective countermeasure is probably the sound magic stone. Since hitting it directly proved to be difficult, if I can hit it indirectly then I should be able to create an opening. but unfortunately. “There’s only a few left...;...;” If I can change it with other magic stones then I would. Besides the fire magic stones, I still have a lot of other attribute magic stones left. Was it better to forsake them to get more sound magic stone? No, that’s not possible. I can’t make an optimal item loadout without doing a test run. Instead, I should be glad that I was able to make it here without doing one in the first place. Did I use the sound magic stones too much because they are cheap? Yup, let’s sleep for now. I will think about it more tomorrow. Breaking through 34th and 35th floors was relatively easier, I think? It was inevitable that I have to deal with the harpies but since I ran away the moment I saw them, it was easier to some extent. Though There are fewer harpies spawning on the 36th floor, they will be replaced by another troublesome enemy. The first thing I encountered on the 36th floor was the harpia. Enduring not to beat up the harpia that is leaning on a tree while sunbathing, I get a little away from it and start running away. I can relieve my stress by beating it up but if it notices my presence and calls its friend then it would turn out to be a disaster. Then a little after I ran away, the troublesome monster that started spawning after the 36th floor, the Toutetsu appeared. Most of the toutetsu’s body looked like a sheep but its head is that of a Komainu or a Shisa with sharp fangs in its mouth. If it bit me then it would leave behind a large wound and at worst I would end up as its food. Additionally, there’s a twisted horn on its head. You could say that it is Chimera that mixed sheep and komainu together. This? There are a lot of troublesome things about the toutetsu but the most troublesome thing is its speed. In Magiero, its speed was as high as the centaur. I’m impressed that it can dish out such a speed when half of its body is that of a sheep. Unluckily, it seems like it would take some time to escape from this guy. The toutetsu noticed my presence, it is side-stepping while making a *guruguru* sound with its throat to intimidate me (TLN: Basically growling). I approach it while putting my magic power inside third hand. Then the toutetsu react by spit fire at me. The annoying part about the toutetsu was not only its speed, but it also can attack you from a long distance. I used third hand to protect myself and immediately run away. Following my movement, the toutetsu spit its fire after me. The power of its flame is higher than that of the low-level magic stones but it is still far apart from the intimidate-level one. However. “It would be bad if the centaur and harpy show up too.” Presuming that I take on the toutetsu who is good at both close-quarter combats and long-range fire attacks alone, if a centaur or a harpia show up then I might have to take on attacks from all directions. Putting that into consideration, I must break through this and the next floor as soon as possible. So let’s decide. Whether should I use most of my battle magic stones on these floors that troublesome monsters are overlapping? I enchant third hand with water attribute and use it to defend against the flame while continuing forward. Stopping its fire attacks, the toutetsu jump at me while trying to scratch me with its claws. I smack it down with fourth hand and finish it off with my sword-draw technique. If there’s only one toutetsu then I will hunt them. The same goes for the centaur. If there are two I will look around and decide whether should I hunt them or not. If there’s a harpia then I will run away even if I have to spend my items like an idiot. While planning out my course of action, I collect its magic elements and magic stone. Then immediately after I start running again, I found another monster. I ended up finding another one. And unfortunately, my next opponent seems to be a harpia. “And it was so easy in the game, well, it was not that easy but I can still normally run away from it back then.” Aren’t there two totetsus with the harpia in front of me? Are they taking a walk together? Annoying monsters taking a walk together huh. If those toutetsu were a pair then it would eventually be difficult to take a walk with such a large family right? I look for a way to avoid them while thinking about those meaningless things. Unfortunately, a centaur is now looking my way. It seems like standing idly to consider my options was a bad idea, the harpia’s group also noticed me and making their way here. The toutetsus stood in their place and beautifully spread its legs apart. They sure know how to corner their prey huh. I immediately grabbed a sound magic stone and prepare to activate it. Before the centaur rush at me, I have to decide whether to escape or to get rid of them. I activated fire and sound magic stone at the harpia that is nose-diving toward me. ————- “Aah, they got me.” I never thought the 36th floor would be this hard. The high-performance school uniform that Marino-san made a special order for me in high spirit is a wreck right now. There were lots of wounds on my body but I can fix them with recovery items. On the other hand, my heart is in the same state as my uniform. “What should I do...;...;.” It’s hard to move my body. I know that I have to move but my body is not listening to me. I know that it is seriously bad but my body still not listening to me. Although I somehow break through the 36th floor, there’s a long way to go from 37th to 40th floor. But rather than my body, my mind is already exhausted. Looking at the time, guess I should have my dinner and go to bed soon. But if I sleep now, I will have to capture the four remaining floors and defeat the boss in one day. Should I speed up tomorrow? It would be possible If I have an infinite number of battle magic stones. But realistically that’s impossible. Since I used a lot of battle magic stones on this floor, it would run out before I reach the 40th floor. And I can throw the idea of saving the magic stones on the 37th floor out of the window. The harpia and toutetsu combo plus the centaur follow-up are extremely disgusting. The only salvation here is that the centaur will be replaced with a monster that moves slower than a turtle from the 38th floor onward. Aah, in a time like this I want to cook something simple for a change of mood. But I don’t feel like doing anything right now. Seriously, what a bad omen. I grab a few cookies and put it in my mouth to fill my stomach. This is simply painful. I’m mentally worn out and my motivation is disappearing. Normally I would try to sing an eroge song to cheer me up but I can’t utter even a single phrase. I don’t have enough leeway for that. I know that it is the most important thing to keep my mood up but I don’t feel like it at all. Only three floors left, even so, it’s still three more floors. Can I really get to the 40th floor in one day? There’s a boss on that floor too. Can I beat the boss the way I am now? I take a look at the cookie I am eating. It was powdery and rustic. It was not delicious at all. The same goes for the coffee, I don’t feel a shred of satisfaction from drinking it. I wanted to take a bath. I want to take a hot shower, I want to soak myself in the luxurious bathtub at Marino-san’s house and slowly stretch my back. Should I head back as it is? Such an idea crossed my mind. I done enough already right? If I head back now I will definitely take the first place and I will be able to join the three committees as well. I may not be able to get the first solo capture bonus but there are other places I can get that item from too. This place is just the fastest way to get it with a relatively simple condition. The more I thought about it, the more comfortable I feel out heading back now. The more you force yourselves the more you put yourselves in danger right. I can try again anytime. The most important thing here is not to die. I put my hand into my pocket, besides the return magic stone, there were two square objects in there. I pull them out of my pocket. It was the amulets. One was very beautifully stitched as if it was done with a machine. There was a small waterfall and a stream sewed on it. Another one has some rough places at the seams. However, it was double sewn to make sure that it doesn’t break. Additionally, a clover sewed on the lower right side. Suddenly, I remembered what happened at the Hanamura house. When I and Nanami came back from the turtle hunt, Sempai, Ludi, and Claris-san hurriedly clean up the room. They were behaving somewhat strangely like they tried to hide something from me. Seeing that, Nanami pouted a little and poke my side while saying [You lucky fellow!]. She also muttered something like [If I have time then I too...;...;.]. “So take a break already, you are working too hard.” “Goshujin-sama, are you going to take the supreme time away from me?” “Why are you having a supreme time on your job!?” I started doing two-person comedy with Nanami after that, Claris-san who was watching was the first person to burst into laughter while preparing tea for Marino-san who got back just got back. Nee-san was silently watching us but sempai and Ludi started to laugh too. The next day. Sempai gave me the amulet with a smile. [I wish for your success.] she said. Ludi looked worried while making a face like she was about to cry. Then...;.she wrapped her arms around me. I tightly hold both amulets in my hand. Let’s try a little harder. —————————— My mood was renewed. I break through the 37th floor by spending the items like hot water, doing that was so easy to the extent that I wonder why I have so much trouble on the 36th floor. No, in fact, it was supposed to be difficult. You can tell by looking at the time it took me. But I somehow don’t think that it was so difficult, it was like I was in a mysterious trance and my thoughts were numbed. After I broke through the 37th floor, the 38th floor was really easy. The appearance rate of Harpia has significantly, on the contrary, the appearance rate of a slow cow-like monster has increased. It was like they were saying [I’m so slow, please run away]. The Harpia also gave me a tailwind when they call on those slow monsters. What are you calling more of them for? They were so slow. I can just deal with you while leaving the cow alone. It was around noon that I reached the 40th floor. It’s good that the harpies are still spawning on this floor since the number of the slow-moving monsters has increased. There’s almost no one that can give me a hard time on this floor. However, I already ran out of sound magic stones. With that said, I don’t have a use for them anymore. I casually had my lunch at the magic circle before the 40th-floor boss. For some reason, the magic stone stove was in a bad condition, so I use a fire magic stone(Low-grade) to forcefully make the fallen tree sticks to burn. Now I can drink warm soup and pour myself a hot coffee. I never use a fire magic stone to create bonfire before. I was panicked when the fire was too strong and made a mess out of the sticks I gathered. But I have a laugh at the sight of the burnt remains. I felt great. Now, there’s only one floor left. What will I do after lunch? I’m going to lay down and take a break. I will challenge the boss with my best physical condition. This 40th floor is not the normal 40th floor that normal students would encounter, it is a hidden boss that only show up only for the first solo capture. —————- The boss room is an arena that looks like the ruin you often see in Europe. Spectator seats surround an elliptical field where you would see the gladiators fighting. No one is sitting on those stone seats, there’s only me in this place. On the opposite side of the field, there’s a ray of light. That light illuminated a single figure. The man slowly descends from the sky. On his back is a pair of gray wings, he landed on the ground without flapping them. He is wearing ancient Roman armor with a sword which is around one meter in length hanging from his waist. On his arm is a circular metal shield. His look my way while folding his wings which looks like an enlarged version of a swan’s wings. His figure is very similar to an angel depicted in paintings. But I know, this guy is not an angel. “Hi, Icarus.” Close enough I guess...;.. Of course, he didn’t say anything in response. He is staring at me without moving his finely crafted face. I place my hand on my sword and increase the volume of magic power inside the stole. Then I walk toward him. Finally, he drew his sword. Moving my body left and right to faint him, I swing third-hand to strike Icarus’s body. I intended to forcefully strike him down but Icarus only lower his center of gravity and received the attack just by moving his shield. He wasn’t even slightly push away from his original spot. Icarus swings his sword to counterattack so I moved fourth hand to the front to receive it. I was considering slashing him with my sword draw technique but...;.. “I don’t think I can move my body...;...;” It would be bad if I haven’t noticed. His single strike was stronger even than that of the clambon. I abandon the idea of attacking immediately and focus myself on evading. Icarus continues to make his second and third attacks. Sometimes he used his sword, sometimes his shield and sometimes he’s even resorted to kicking. Icarus was even faster than the harpies. Compared to the monsters I faced up until now, all of his abilities are far higher. However, that was supposed to be the case. Icarus is not a boss you would normally encounter on the 40th floor. He is an opponent suitable for the strengthened character in the second run of the game, a [Deep Class] monster. If your party has a hard time on the 50th floor then they will definitely lose against him. If I come here without preparation then I’m sure I would lose too. Rather, even if I am well prepared, there’s a chance that I can still lose. Icarus slowly float up to the sky and look down towards me. His sword is reflecting the sunlight and shining brilliantly. I have a bad feeling. The moment I thought so, Icarus points his sword toward me and dive down toward me while steadily accelerating. The speed of a descending falcon was faster than a shinkansen. That thought suddenly popped up in my mind. At the same time, I felt something cold ran on back. I can’t take that attack, my whole body screamed. I immediately started to run, I used both of my legs, third hand and fourth hand to avoid that attack with all my power. Was that a missile? If I take that directly, it seems like I will be blown away and if I’m unlucky then I might turn to pieces on the spot. If I got hit by that even once then it would be my defeat. However, I already prepare a countermeasure for that. “How many Knockers do you think I have to kill to collect all this?” Icarus soar up to the sky again and dive down again. I avoid it with all my power. Maybe Icarus thought that his attack won’t hit, he chases after me while maintaining low altitude flight. As he is following after me, I deliberately received Icarus’s horizontal attack. By using the force behind his attack to send myself flying sideways, I activate the fire magic stone (Intermediate level) and aim at his wings. “————————” Icarus’s weak point is fire. I think the developers were inspired by Greek mythology. The story about the man that got his wings melted after he flies too close to the sun was quite famous. Seriously, I’m glad that this guy has such a weak point. If he doesn’t have one then I might even give up on solo capturing the 40th floor in the first place. (TLN: So it was your fault huh, Icarus.) As his wings are melting he is screaming with indescribable voice while rolling on the ground. Since he directed a sharp gaze at me, I fire another shot at him as a get well gift. I wanted to follow up right away but he rolled away from the spot. There isn’t a shred of his previous angelic image left. His splendid wings melted away into two white lines that ran on his back in place of his wings. His body was burned by the flame and turned red and black, it looks very painful. But he wasn’t broken. He stood up and points his sword at me. He kicks the ground with his feet and swings his sword. His power was a little weaker than before thanks to his burn and the lack of his wings. Seeing that his sword wasn’t effective, he immediately switches up his style and integrates the shield into his attacks while continuing his assault from all sides. He got bolder even after he received a huge amount of damage. Just how strong is he? He is seriously amazing. Even when I took away his wings and burn his body, it wouldn’t be weird if he just crumbling down but he is still standing back up and counterattack with even more creative attacks. Seeing him like that I thought. What is the source of my strength? Takioto Kousuke’s enormous magic power? My knowledge? The power that I gained through my efforts? Maybe it is all of them. But was that really all it was? Can I reach this 40th floor with that alone? I can confidently say that it was impossible. Why wasn’t I beaten? Why my spirit wasn’t crushed? I might not be able to beat the clambon and I might have lost to the harpies pack. The power I got now is all thanks to everyone’s help. If Claris-san didn’t spar with me every day, if Sempai never taught her technique to me, if Ludi didn’t help me with my special training, if Nee-san and Marino-san didn’t provide me with the place, tools and knowledge to capture this place then I would definitely have fallen somewhere along the way. It was a strange feeling. For some reason, I can perfectly evade Icarus’s attack while my mind was occupied with such a thing. The more I concentrate, the more I can see Icarus’s movement in slow motion...;...; How many encounters did I have since then? Fighting with Icarus made me think of the training with Sempai. She patiently helps me with my training. After that, when Nanami saw me soaked in sweat she said [You want a towel? A bath? Or is it M?E?]. I wonder what would happen if I chose the [M?E] choice at that time. After I got out of the bath, Ludi gave me a massage although she was not used to it. Somehow she looked very motivated even though she wasn’t as good at it as Nanami or Sempai. Afterward, she demanded a cup ramen in return but I was cheered up after I saw the smile on her face. I want to see it again. Let’s buy a cup ramen on the way back today. I let out a small laugh while defending against Icarus’s attacks. I don’t know why but I don’t feel like losing at all. Even Icarus has his limit. His attacks are getting faster but it also getting rougher. But those attacks are clearly visible to me. I defended with third hand and pretend to lose my balance. Icarus must have thought that it was an opening. He pressed forward and tried to bash me with his shield. But I deflect it with fourth hand. The me right now must be full of opening from his eyes. He made a big swing to strike me down. The moment that his sword was swung down while reflecting the sunlight, I draw my sword. There’s a sound like something had fallen to the ground next to us. It was Icarus’s sword. I use fire magic stone (Intermediate level) on Icarus who had a shocked expression on his face. As he groans while his whole body is burning, I draw my sword again. ————— At the same time as his body turned into a fist-sized magic stone, a gorgeously decorated treasure chest appeared at the center of the arena. I opened the chest, inside are small seeds that emitting a golden glow. I picked up those seeds and hold it in my hand. I finally got it. The item that absolutely necessary for a sub-character to become the strongest. The growth limit release item [Seed of Possibility]. In the game, the upper limit of all abilities can be removed by swallowing it, it gives you the ability to freely raise your status. By using this item with the items for an underleveled first-time player, you can raise your status to the limit. Not only that, for some characters, including me, it also has an effect of increasing the type of weapons that you can use. It’s not something necessary for Iori or the developers’ favorite heroines. They already have enough possibilities as they are. Iori and the people of three committees can become a monster without something like this. But this thing was absolutely necessary for me. The Seed of Possibility is literally a seed of possibility. I can try to use various weapons from now on. If I were to have a mean of long-range attack, it’s best that I conduct special training for it at this point. However, I also think that it is also fine to remain as I am now. It might be good to refine my attack and defenses on close-quarter combat and remain specialized. If the fight became ugly, when it came to the contest of the amount of magic power then there’s no way I could lose. And I don’t have to challenge alone anymore. “Damn, somehow...;.. I felt like I don’t really care about [The Seed of Possibility] anymore.” Certainly, I am happy that I got the seed of possibility. No, I am really happy that I got it. But there’s now more powerful emotion that welled up from inside my heart. I want to meet them. I want to quickly leave this place and meet them. Then I want to tell them. They might think that I am crazy and think [What are you saying all of a sudden?] But I still want to meet and tell them. I put all of [The Seed of Possibility] into my bag and enter the return magic circle. When I thought that I can finally leave behind the corrupted air of the dungeon, I am faced with a sad reality that the weather on the floor I was before was better than the surface. I took my eye away from the sky and think that I should immediately return home. No, I should message everyone first. Thinking so, when I was about to start walking, I heard a voice calling me from my side. “I have been waiting for you.” It was Nanami. “Eh, why are you here? You don’t know when I will come back right?” Hearing so, Nanami makes a smug face. “Fufu, Predicting the time Goshujin-sama will return is an easy task for an excellent maid as myself.” That’s what she said. The hell is she saying. Nanami sticks out her chest. Since it was emphasized by her maid uniform, I immediately noticed it when looking at her from the side. Looking closely, there’s a wooden stand under the tree shade, and isn’t that a handmade hammock? Next to it was a tall circular table with things like tea sets, cookies, and books on it. Predicted my ass, aren’t you wait here the whole time? What a brute. Nanami shifts her body and tries to hide the hammock but it isn’t something that you can cover with your body. Of course, it’s still completely visible to me. “Seriously, I wonder who was drinking black tea in such a place. What a bother.” It was obviously you. Rather, she was drinking black tea huh. Now then, when I was thinking about how to retort, a voice called out to me from behind. “Are you an acquaintance of this child?” Looking back, I found an old cleaning lady there. “That child didn’t leave that spot since yesterday you know. She is in the way so can you tell her to hurry home?” She left after she heaved a huge sigh. It might be inconsiderate to the old lady but I ended up laughing. I could easily imagine the scene that the old lady described. If I meet her next time I will give her an apology. Nanami made a nonchalant face and looks at the sky. “Ah, it’s flying so high.” “No, just give up already.” “More importantly, Goshujin-sama.” So it’s the return to the topic strategy huh. Well, I don’t really want to corner her that much anyway. Let’s play along. “What?” Nanami does a maid-like bow. “Congratulations on capturing the 40th floor.” Suddenly I realized. Come to think of it, I haven’t confirmed that I captured the floor yet. I already defeated Icarus and obtained those seeds so I think it should be fine though. “Aah, come to think of it I did capture that floor huh.” “...;...;You captured the 40th floor right?” Looking at her suspicious gaze, I smile bitterly. Somehow, the 40th-floor capture doesn’t feel like much to me. The captured floor should be recorded on the student ID card right? I took out my student ID and looked at it. There’s [40th floor] written next to [Tsukuoyomi Academy Dungeon]. I wonder how this thing works. “Yeah, I captured it.” I show it to Nanami. As she looks down at the ID card, she smiles like a blooming flower. “That’s wonderful Goshujin-sama but looking at you, you must be tired right.” Certainly, my clothes are tattered but my body is fine. Recovery items really are amazing. “To make sure let’s commence the hug and pat down.” Nanami grinningly said so. She must be thinking that I would say [The heck are you saying...;..] but the current me won’t do that. “Okay, I won’t hold back then.” I immediately hugged her without waiting for a reply. Then I pat her head. Slowly and gently. Then I buried my face in her beautiful silver hair and slowly inhaled to enjoy her smell. I’m very happy. She waited for me in a place like this since yesterday. “Ah, Go, GoGoshujin-sama.” She shook her body to resist at first but she eventually gave in. In the end, she wrapped her arms around my body. I released her after thoroughly enjoyed her body. She absentmindedly looked at me with her feverish expression. “Thanks to you...;...;.my tiredness was blown away.” It might be because I hugged her in a weird way her hair is a little messed up. Since she doesn’t look like she is going to fix it herself, I approach her and fix it with my hand. Then I pat her head as I finished. Nanami looked like she wanted to say something and look at me with upturned eyes but she didn’t say anything in the end. “Kousuke!!” As I was stroking Nanami’s hair, two women ran over. They are sempai who is wearing her academy uniform while carrying naginata on her back and Ludi who already abandon her princess act and run toward me. Those two come over while giving me a full-faced smile. *Don* I received Ludi by stopping her with a hug. “You two...; why are you here?” I haven’t contact you yet, right? “Nanami contacted us. So...;..what’s wrong with her?” It seems like Nanami contacted them before she called out to me. What an excellent maid. Ludi also tilted her head after she got away from me. She is certainly behaving stranger than usual huh. It’s also my fault though. “It’s fine, don’t mind her. More importantly, isn’t the class still on-going right now?” I can understand if it’s yesterday since there’s no class because it’s a break day after the test. But that’s not the case. According to the time, the afternoon class shouldn’t be over yet...;.. It’s almost over though. “Yeah, I skipped it.” “Me too.” Honestly speaking, happiness is filling my heart. “Is that okay? Sempai is the vice-president of the Public Moral Committee after all.” “Yeah, I just want to give a warning to a student that skipped school even though the test was on-going, that’s all.” If you are gonna say that, “Yes, I have nothing to complain! Please forgive me.” “Well, I just chose a class that would be okay to missed after all.” Saying so, sempai laughs. “And I was worried...;..” “...;..Sorry.” The next person who came over was the one that less likely to come than sempai. The moment I saw her figure carefreely walking toward me, I did a double-take. “Nee-san, what are you doing?” It’s the middle of the class right? Why are you here? It’s one thing if you are a student but Nee-san, you are a teacher right? It’s still in the middle of the afternoon class, right? Even if you don’t have to lecture, you still have the test to score right? “I heard you came back.” Nee-san too!? But why, she only came over but why am I so happy? “I see...;.. Well, can’t help it then. I’m back, Nee-san.” “Nn, welcome home.” “I captured the 40th floor.” “Un, I thought so.” “Nee-san, it is still the middle of the class right?” “I know, I let them self-study.” Ahh, I can’t stop smiling. Well, I will let Marino-san or Luigia-sensei scold her later. More importantly, I have the thing I must do. “Everyone, listen to me. Um, well. I have something to tell you all...;...;” I will tell the people who’re not here later. “Some of you might already know this but actually I captured the 40th floor.” The second half was harder than I expected but somehow I was able to capture it. The reason that I could do that. Is “It’s thanks to everyone that I was able to become this strong.” There was always someone there for my daily training. Everyone’s teaching was alive in each of the moves I performed in battle. Being cornered alone in the dungeon made me realized. I was supported by everyone. The blushing Nanami, Ludi who has a serious expression, the smiling sempai, and Nee-san who is making her usual looks. I look at every one. Then I pulled out the two amulets inside my pocket. Now let me tell you. This overflowing gratitude. To the irreplaceable people who are important to me than the seeds of possibility. “Thank you.” ———————– Fatigue is something that you accumulated before you know it, even if you are feeling fine, it can suddenly come to attack you. In this case, it was the hot shower and a soft futon. The fatigue from the battle against Icarus combined with the fatigue from the anxiety of whether I was able to capture the place or not that accumulated up until that point. Well, there’s no way I am not getting tired because of that. Nee-san is on the bed but I pay her no mind and enter it. I’m too sleepy, I don’t want to keep wandering around the room. Taking half of the pillow space from Nee-san, I immediately close my eyes. She is warm and soft. Looks like she is having a dream, maybe she is seeing something good in there. Because of the warmth from the futon and the person beside me, I fell asleep immediately. Well, that’s good and all but the problem is the time now. It’s not early in the morning. The sun is high in the sky, it looks like it’s brunch time already. I was actually going to get up much earlier. Today I planned to go to the academy and say [What are you slacking off for!] to Orange head while giving him a cold stare. Apparently, Nanami judged that she should let me sleep today and prepared to get scolded by me. I know it from Ludi’s message but it seems like she was worried since I look tired so she let me sleep in on purpose. I can’t find a reason to get mad at her. I have an early lunch with Nanami and Claris-san then messaged Ludi that I am heading to the academy. After that, I left home while Claris-san seeing me off. The score should probably be posted up when I arrive at the academy. I wonder what is my standing in the academy right now? Maybe they already forgot about me since I didn’t go there for a while. However, as long as I am with Ludi then they will remember me immediately. Especially for the LLL. No matter how this will turn out, they will probably see me as an enemy anyway. But I don’t know whether this matter will make their attitude softer or harder than before. I can say for sure that no matter what happens, I will not mind. But. I stare at Nanami who is walking next to me. If any harm comes to her then it’s an all-out war. No, I think Ludi would be enraged before me if that happened. Well, it wouldn’t be weird if there’s already Nanami’s Fanclub though, she’s cute after all. I think there’s not one yet though. I was surprised to see Ludi waiting for me at the school gate. When she spotted me, she corrected her posture and waved her hand at me like an ojou-sama. “That always seems strange to me, I still can’t get used to it.” Said Nanami. Seriously, I couldn’t agree more. Apparently, the score was posted on the magic bulletin board a little before lunchtime. It seems everyone went to take a look together after their meal but Ludi came here alone after she read my message. Well, let’s go have a look together. We group up and head to the scoreboard. ———— I walk side by side with Ludi while Nanami is walking diagonally behind me. There’s no way that we didn’t stand out. But the gazes that I received aren’t the usual stabbing jealousy gazes. It wasn’t gazes filled with envy either. It was like they are looking at something unknown with awe and fear. Each and everyone that we passed by was staring at me. Normally, their gazes would be attracted to Ludi. It seems like they finally recognized me as someone that they should keep an eye on. I turn to look at my side, why is Ludi looked so happy? She muttered [What a great feeling.] with a small voice that I who is immediately next to her almost couldn’t hear. Nanami looked the same as usual but she seems to be somewhat happy. I thought that it was because everyone is looking at me like that but seems like that’s not the case. “Oh, it’s Kousuke!” It was Orange head who called out to me. “I thought that it was unfair of you to skip the test alone like that but you did something amazing eh!? Why won’t you invite me dude.” Not only Orange, my classmates both boys and girls shower me with praises. They talked to me as usual, some say that I skipped too many classes, some asked me to help them get to the 40th floor too. After they left, Ludi told me that they were dumbfounded at first. “You see, Iori was talking with all the classmates for you, you know.” Honestly, I thought that the only people who wouldn’t look at me with prejudice would be the people closed to the Hanamura family. But that’s not true. “I see. Understood, I will definitely thank him.” However, I have a question. Was Iori close to the mob girls? Iori is basically a late-bloomer. He’s always quick when it comes to the heroines though. “Hey Ludi, you actually did something too right?” If she hasn’t then the girls wouldn’t casually talk to me like that. Her silent is enough as the answer. “I see, thank you Ludi.” “...;...;Un.” When I arrived at the magic bulletin board, there was a crowd of people there. There were a hustle and bustle around but the silence spread as soon as the people spotted me. It was like a ripple that formed when you throw a stone into a pond. While I breathe in a few times, I was surrounded by silence. Everyone’s gazes are pointing toward me. We ignore them and move to a place where we can see the displayed score. The people in front open a path for me. It was like Moses parting the red sea. While I walk, I heard a whisper. [[Is he a monster?]] On the bulletin board are the first, second and third place’s scores. The first place of the first year is of course. “I’m first as expected.” ————————- ■ First Year Ranking First place Takioto Kousuke Academic exam 0 points Practical exam 0 points Total score 0 points Captured floor 40th (Solo) Second place Gabriella Evangelista Academic exam 96 points Practical exam 84 points Total score 180 points Captured floor – Third place Ludivine Marie-Ange de La Trèfle Academic exam 84 points Practical exam 92 points Total score 176 points Captured floor – ————————- This is somewhat interesting. Despite the fact that the top-ranking people scored very high on the test, I only got Zero points. If you look at the total score then the top scorers are overwhelmingly higher than the norm. However, I am still standing on top. Beside me, the other top scorers I know are Ludi and Iori. It seems like Iori worked hard and got the 5th place. Isn’t that great for a first-run protagonist. When I was about to head back someone called out to me. “Kousuke-kun!” The person that made his way to me through the crowd was Iori. It seems like he also came to look at the score. “Congratulations on taking first place! You are really amazing, Kousuke-kun.” I was healed by Iori’s smile. Come to think of it, I have been in his care too. But before I give him my thanks...; “Iori, let’s move out of here first.” I don’t want those awe-inspiring gazes on me. I walk with Iori while Ludi walks with Nanami. “You did a lot for me, Thank you.” “But I want you to explain yourself first. I was worried since you didn’t come to the test you know! At first, I thought that you were sick too.” It was important to explain it to Iori too. It’s bad that he has to worry about me. “But I was really surprised you know. You really got the first place even though you rarely ever come to the academy after all.” I laugh without thinking. Certainly, it’s not something that would normally happen. “That’s why I told you right? That I will take the first place.” “Right.” “And you did great too alright, you even got fifth place. If I take the test normally then I would never get that kind of score you know.” I won’t fail but...;...;you see...;...;I would surely get some bizarre score that would make me hesitate to say it out loud. “Unnn, but you know, I have been thinking.” “About what?” “That you are amazing Kousuke-kun, despite people around you always look down on you, you never give up and keep getting stronger. But, I want to surpass you, Kousuke-kun.” He looks at me with a serious expression. My body is trembling. Want to surpass me huh. Yeah, if it’s you then depending on the situation you can surpass me. But. “I see. But I don’t intend to give up you know.” I said so and laugh. Surpass me if you can. I will keep running, so far ahead that you can’t keep up. Until I become the strongest. “Yeah, that’s what I want.” We laugh together. Then it was at that time...; “Ah, Onii-cha–an.” I heard that voice, both I and Iori jumped in surprise. “Eh, Eeeeeeeeh! Wh, why are you here!?” Mine and Iori’s reactions are different. Iori was surprised because he doesn’t know why the owner of that voice is here, I was just surprised that the voice that I heard was the voice that I have been in debt to countless times before. “Un, you know that my grade has always been excellent right? Since I also have magical aptitude I transferred here?” She cutely sticks her tongue out and tilted her head to the side. What a sly girl. Now then. She has finally come. I knew that she would eventually show up. “Eh, are you in the middle of a talk.?” She turns her head towards us and bowed. “I’m sorry!” “Ah, I don’t mind. Raise your head. Nice to meet you. I am Iori’s classmate and his friend, Takioto Kousuke. She is Ludivine, and this is...;” “Kousuke Goshujin-sama’s supreme beauty loyal maid, please call me Nanami.” There is a lot that I can retort but well, whatever. Ah, her face cramped for a second there. She stares at Ludi and confusingly apologizes to her for suddenly appearing out of nowhere. Well, can’t be helped. Nanami’s joke is usually too confusing to understand anyway. “Ah, I am sorry. I haven’t given my name yet.” She does a small bow and looks up toward me with upturned eyes. Her neck inclines to the side while she put her bangs on her ears. Then when she looks at me from below she let out a smile. Yup, as I thought, she’s sly. But her slyness is very like her. On the contrary, I am starting to worry about her now. Well, if I plan to involve myself with Iori from now on then I would be involved with her too. One of the heroines that appeared on the game package of Magical★Explorer, the heroine with strength rival that of Ludi and Iori’s sister in law. “I have recently transferred into this academy. I am Hijiri Iori’s little sister in law, my name is Hijiri Yuika! Please take care of me!” ■ Student Council Attendees. (Seitokai) President Monika Mercedes von Mobius Vice President Franzika Edda von Gneisenau (Abbreviated: Fran) ■ Public Moral Committee Attendees. (Fukikai) Captain (President) Stefania Scaglione (Abbreviated: Steph) Deputy Captain (Vice president) Mizumori Yukine ■ Shikibukai Attendees. Lord (President) Benito Evangelista Senior Assistant (Vice President) Himemiya Shion —————————————————– This must be what the word earth-shattering means. Inside the academy, people are talking about nothing but the rumor about him. This must be the first time such a rumor about someone who is not one of the students that have their own Fanclub spread so much. The source of it all came from the first year ranking board. At first, the people who saw the score spread the rumor but the entire academy came to know of this by the new record announcement that was sent to every student’s Tsukuyomi Traveller around the evening. Even though I knew it beforehand I still doubt my eyes when I look at the number shown on Tsukuyomi Traveller. ————————– ■ First Year Ranking First place Takioto Kousuke Academic exam 0 points Practical exam 0 points Total score 0 points Captured floor 40th (Solo) ————————– ■ Established Record 10th Floor Approximately 1 Day 20th Floor Approximately 2 Days 30th Floor Approximately 4 Days 40th Floor Approximately 7 Days ————————– I check Tsukuyomi newspaper again to make sure because the record was too strange. It made the 40th floor look so easy. In just seven days, and solo too. It was the floor that made us shudder just thinking about it. The second and third-year students must be thinking that it’s a bug or something and misunderstood. But Takioto really did it. It wasn’t just the first year students that were surprised. Rather, it would be even more surprising for us second and third-year students and that also includes the teachers. How harsh the 40th floor is, every third-year student can testify to that. The 40th floor is not a place that you can breakthrough in one go. It was the place I captured with the assistance of president Monika. I know that Takioto should be able to win against the boss but I thought that he might give up on the way there. A woman entered the conference room after knocking a few times. “It seems we are the last one to arrive...;.. No, sensei is still not here right?” Student council president Monika looked at us and said so. Inside the room are me the vice-captain and Steph, the saint and the captain of the public moral committee along with the president of Shikibukai, Benito-kyou (TLN: Kyou = Lord, tell me what you guys prefer) and his vice president, Shion. The people who entered the room just now are the student council president Monika and her vice president, Fran. All of the presidents and vice presidents of the three committees have gathered here. Well, originally there should be one more person here but that person is always late to the meeting. President Monika must also be aware of this. When they take their seats, I served them the coffee I prepared. “Okay, the reason for this emergency meeting...;...;you know it without me saying right?” “The first year case right.” *HaHaHa* Benito-kyou said so and laugh. Everyone must already know today’s agenda. “Takioto Kousuke. He entered the dungeon at the same time the ban was lifted, solo the 40th floor which is the target floor of second-year students and captured it within a week. At this rate, there’s no word to describe him but a monster.” Vice president Fran adjusted her glasses and hand everyone the materials in her hand. What written on it is the personal information of Takioto. But...;. “What is this? Isn’t it mostly unknown? There’s no worth seeing this right?” “If you are going to say that then it also applied to you too right? Saint Stefania.” As president Monika said that to her, captain Steph cast the paper away and leaned back on her chair then sip the coffee that was placed in front of her. Captain Steph who usually behaves gracefully displays the full extent of her thorny attitude here. If someone outside the three committees saw her attitude changes like this then they will definitely be disillusioned. On the other hand, if you look at the most considerate person among the presidents, Benito-kyou then his bad reputation among the student will no doubt disappear. “But it will be easier to notice from seeing the paper rather than saying it verbally right?” Vice president Fran didn’t say anything more but if she were to continue then she would probably say [That he’s special.] The information regarding the students can be accessed by the three committees to some extent. Of course, that information won’t go so deep into their private life. However, there’s one part of the students that you can only look at the bare minimum information about them. If that’s the case, there’s a high probability that that person is a VIP from some countries or their children. The information about an imperial princess like Ludi should be almost as unknown as Takioto. Ahem, president Monika coughed. “Since everyone already got the information, let’s talk about the thing that we have to do first.” “Issue out the warning to the first year right?” Benito-kyou happily said so. “*I can do it too*, we have to squash such nonsense before the fools start to flood in there.” Shion said while looking at her folding fan. If he could do it then I can do it too. There surely will be a lot of people who think like that. But if the worst comes...;...;..it will become a disaster. “If we at the shikibukai are the ones to do that then it will definitely be bad. We will leave that to the student council.” “Yeah, that’s right. If Benito is the one to say it then it seems like more people will challenge it instead.” President Monika said so and laugh. “Well, in the meantime we will exercise a little self-restraint.” “Right.” *HaHaHa*, *HoHoHo* the members of shikibukai laugh. “Do we really have to stop them?” Said, captain Steph. The laughter stopped and the place turns silent. Shion’s and vice president Fran’s sharp gazes pierce Steph. “It’s all good right? Challenging that place will be a good lesson for them anyway.” “If they lose their lives in the process how would you take the responsibility?” “I agree with Shion-san.” Haa, I sigh without thinking. Looking at these exchanges, the most suited person for the shikibukai here is captain Steph. She has the title of the saint so she ended up here though. “Well, calm down everyone, we have good coffee you know. Stefania-sama already has one but please be a little kinder with your words.” “To prevent the first year students from making a rash decision, we at the student council will issue the warnings. In case of emergency, we will ask the public moral committee and shikibukai to cooperate.” Benito-kyou and president Monika immediately defused the situation. After that, president Monika immediately gets us back to the topic. “The next problem is...;...; what should we do with him right?” “Yeah, it’s certain that he will receive an invitation to join us. I heard a few rumors about him before coming here, I think shikibukai would suit him best. And I want to invite him to join us too.” “Well, that will be up to him. Our is a special position after all. Well, even if he doesn’t choose to join the shikibukai I am interested in him. Whichever organization is fine, I want to bring him in.” Saying so, Shion hides her mouth behind her fan and look at me. Since it’s Shion, she knew that I know him, she must be smiling now. No, everyone here probably already investigated and know that I have some kind of relationship with him. “Wouldn’t it be difficult for him to enter the shikibukai? Does he have suitable power and status in the first place?” Captain Steph seems to be a little annoyed since her work will be increasing because of Takioto. “It should be difficult for him to enter the public moral committee too. He hardly attends any classes after all. Should we have him join the student council then?” Vice president Fran said so after she looks at the document. “Then let’s ask the person who’s likely to know.” President Monika turned her sight toward me and everyone followed suit. I was staying silent on purpose but since she already asked me, how should I answer? “Takioto should be fine joining any of the three organizations. He is a serious person.” “But you need high status to join the shikibukai you know? If he doesn’t have one then it will be hard for him.” It is as president Monika said. “If that’s the case then there’s no problem at all. If someone lay a hand on him then it would mean that they would be looking for a fight against multiple countries. Moreover, his guardian is also at this academy as well.” “Hee, is that true? A person who would warrant a fight from multiple countries like that would be as important as saint-sama or Ludivine-sama right? An important person likes that...;...;...;.? No, I see...;..but that’s. don’t tell me.” It seems like Benito-kyou already guessed the answer. “That person should be on her way here so you can confirm the matter about him directly with her.” Vice president Fran stands up with her eyes wide-opened. “The person that is coming here, don’t tell me!?” It was just in time. She entered the room like she perfectly timed it. “Sorry for the wait you guys.” The person that entered the room was the one I have been meeting at home every day recently, the headmaster of this academy, Hanamura Marino. “This emergency meeting, I can guess it but what is the agenda?” I answer that question. “It’s about Takioto.” Marino-san takes a seat while letting out a small laugh. “As expected, I thought that was the case. He’s amazing, right? My child.” She casually said so. The atmosphere in the room froze the moment she said that. Looking at the scene, Marino-san laughs. That’s why I decided to put it into words. “Takioto Kousuke is, a person who inherited the blood of the Hanamura family.” Everyone become speechless, there are people that hung their mouth half-open too. But there is one person who was unfazed by that besides myself and Marino-san. She, president Monika took a small breath and looked at me. Only she reacted the opposite of the atmosphere and remain her calm. “Yukine. I’m asking you. What kind of person is Takioto Kousuke? You know him well right? Tell me what you think.” When she asked me, I think for a moment. Takioto Kousuke huh. What is he like I wonder. He’s a hard worker, a student and he sometimes stares at some indecent places like an idiot but he is honest and always cherishes others. Like me, he also likes matcha, a surprisingly good cook, it’s fun being with him...;.. Fufu. What am I thinking? No matter how I think about it, that’s not the thing that president Monika wants to hear. Seriously, what a strange guy. It’s like he is seeing the world differently. I wonder what kind of world does he see? Even if I stand beside him, will I be able to see the same world as he is? I want to see the world that he sees. Somehow, I think that it is not a world that sparkling with gold and silver. I feel like it is a vast world filled with beautiful flowers. And there would be a beautiful waterfall and a small pond beside it. Suddenly, I remembered what happened at that waterfall. I remembered the words that he half-jokingly said at that time. Come to think of it, he said the same thing before he went to challenge the dungeon as well. That’s right. That’s the perfect word for him isn’t it? Wasn’t that something he said himself in the first place? It might something nonsense he said to make me laugh. If it’s before then I might be laughing at such words. But if it’s now...;...;...; For me to remember his words and think that it would suit him, I think that I too have been poisoned by him. But I don’t feel bad about it at all. Rather, I’m glad that I got poisoned. And to think that I want to further get poison by him, I think that this is already irreversible. Now, let’s say it like how Takioto did. What is important for his delivery was his overflowing confidence and how he said it with a slam. “Takioto Kousuke is...;...;” I look directly at the de facto strongest student inside the academy, student council president Monika’s face and smile. “The person who will become the strongest in this academy.” Second Arc Magiero★Symphony An Irregular at Magic Academy- Finish —————- Author Notes: Finally, the second arc is over. In the next arc, Takioto-kun who has obtained his possibility will become stronger together with the heroines. In addition, the characters of the student council, public moral committee, and shikibukai along with the character that only got introduced by names like Iori’s sister in law and ero-scientist will be deeply entwined together with Takioto’s group and make funny shenanigans while some of the characters will have some ero interaction as well. Of course, not just that, the secret of the Hanamura house and Marino-san will be gradually revealed as well. The events that have been hinted at might occur too. The third arc title has already been decided. Thrid Arc Magiero★Waltz -The Three Committees TLN: Now we are officially finished the second arc. Only about 30 chapters left in the third arc so I probably won’t translate it now since we will have to wait like 3 to 6 months for the author to finish it at this rate. I will put up the synopsis for the potential series that I will pick up tomorrow so tune in for that. If you have any series you want to recommend you can leave that in the comment and I will have a look. Finally, I usually have one week break when I finish the arc but since I will fly to Japan on 30th Oct and stay there for two weeks I will continue to translate some chapters of the series I decide to pick up before I go. Have I ever felt so fulfilled? Is it because of the surrounding’s reaction when I solo captured a dungeon, the experiences I gained, or the feeling they have toward me? I now see my everyday life in this world with more colors. The reason why my world is so colorful right now is that Ludi, Sempai, Nanami, and Nee-san are here. I have something that I must give to the people who have colored...;...;.. my...;...;. World. Wait. “Rather than the academy square I think we should install this at the academy’s gate, it would attract more attention that way right?” “That’s true...;..!” “Wait a minute.” “What’s wrong Goshujin-sama?” “Kousuke?” At that place is Nanami and Nee-san who are discussing something with a serious expression while Ludi looking at them with a tired expression. I am getting anxious about this situation. Since they are talking with such seriousness, I have to properly confirm something with them first. “What exactly are you doing?” In front of Nanami and Nee-san, there is a quotation with a lot of zeros written on it. Nee-san might look the same as always but I can read her expression. She is serious right now. “Well, we are just thinking about building you a bronze statue in commemoration of your unprecedented record.” Oh, it’s just a bronze statue. I’m relieved since I thought that it would be something much more outrageous. “Nah, it would be embarrassing to have my own bronze statue right? It’s a waste of money so I don’t need it ?” Of course, I don’t need it but it made me really happy that I leave behind a record that is worth building a statue for. It’s like you are being rewarded for your hard work. “I am glad that you like it. Does [Nanami Grand Slam] sound like a good name for the statue?” “IT’S YOUR STATUE!? What about mine!?” It was me who established that record right!? Why are they building a statue of Nanami? It would certainly look better than me but that’s mine thing alright? “Nanami is joking. It’s Kousuke’s statue.” That’s good, I’m relieved that it is my statue. “I see, it’s mine huh? I’m happy. But really, I don’t need it.” “But we already got the permission from the academy, the rest is calculating the cost...;...;.” Have they ever listen to me? Speaking of which. “If that’s true then Marino-san had a word with them right?” That person is the dictator of the academy as she is both the headmaster and the director after all. If you want to get permission then it would be her who you have to ask. Wait, why do they need permission to install it? “ [If you have the statue of me as the headmaster standing beside Kou-chan’s statue then I don’t mind covering all the expenses you know...;...;.] She was saying something like that even though the place beside Goshujin-sama should belong to a faithful maid like me. Of course, I already declined her offer.” She was going to pay for it? I will complain to Marino-san later. Absolutely. “Stop it. I don’t need a bronze statue anyway.” Nanami shook her head and say [good grief] while sighing. “...;..even though I have planned so much already...;..that’s unfortunate. Right now, my respect points for Goshujin-sama just dropped by five points.” “Hee, respect points you say. You have something like that too huh...;...;. By the way, how many points is it now?” “Five hundred and sixty million points.” “Isn’t that basically marginally insignificant!?” If you have five hundred sixty million yen, would you even realize it if you lost five yen? There’s absolutely no way you would notice that. “Your wonderful retort just moved my heart, your points just increased by three thousand.” “What is that number, won’t it only be increasing at this rate...;...;” “By the way, hundred is the maximum point on this scale.” “Isn’t it already exceeded the limit?! Rather than respect that’s on worship or a fanatic level already.” “That’s embarrassing.” “I am not praising you...;..” Rather, if I am praising you then the point will just increase, right? “Kousuke, don’t worry” I let out a small sigh. Nee-san...;..your meaning of don’t worry is totally not providing me with any safe and secure feeling at all. “...;.What should I not be worried about, Nee-san?” “Onee-chan points is also exceeded eight hundred million too.” This is bad, I can’t catch up to these two when they are together at all...;..what is Onee-chan points anyway? Moreover, she used [-chan] right, she did use [-chan] just now, right? She also used [-chan] before, I remembered she told me that she wants me to call her with [-chan] a while back. It’s embarrassing but let’s try calling her like that this one time. “I see...;..thank you, Onee-chan.” “ ! ! Onee-chan points increased by one billion points just now.” “You just lost fifty thousand respect points Goshujin-sama.” “WHY ! ?” “That was a joke...;...;.Haa.” It doesn’t sound like a joke though. Well, whatever. Even so...;...;how should I say this? Should I say that my daily life has been sprinting full speed toward this direction? This nostalgic idiotic daily life. I was inside a dungeon for a week after all. “You say something to them too Ludi.” I shake Ludi who was quietly listening to our conversation. “I think a bronze statue would make you look like an attention-seeking man you know.” OH, That’s it. Ludi is so wonderful. I beg you, tell them more. “If you make a deformed doll instead then...;...;.” This “Yes Yes, if it’s a defor-...;...;.I DON’T NEED THAT !” No matter how I think about it I don’t need one! Was she influenced by Nanami? Why are you the one making a joke, please retort them for me. “R, RIGHT. TH-THAT WAS JUST A JOKE!” “Well, never mind about that. By the way, where’s Sempai?” “It seems like something came up with the public moral committee, I think she will come back with Marino-san later. Apparently, they have to do something about the first year students before they can do anything reckless.” Hee, reckless guys huh. Was there a person like that?...;.. I feel like I can think of someone like that though. “Maybe it’s because what Kousuke did?” “Right. I will apologize to them later.” “Yukine-san doesn’t really mind about that. She looked rather happy to do it too.” When we were consulting with each other, Nanami and Nee-san started talking with a serious expression again. “...;.So, what are you guys talking about?” “Honestly speaking, Ludi-sama just opened my eyes. We should make deformed dolls instead.” “I want one, it will sell.” “No, it won’t.” People that want a deformed doll of me...;...;is there one? Rather, “I think it would be better if you make some of Ludi, Nee-san or Nanami though. I want one too.” “M-Mine ! ?” “Onee-chan...;...;” “Is there anyone present that is against the deformed dolls idea?” It was three different reactions. I am seriously don’t know what they want to say anymore. “I think Ludi plush toys will sell like hotcakes you know. Especially to the LLL.” In fact, her photos are being sold at a high price even now. “Aah...;..” Ludi somehow looked very disgusted by the idea. Come to think of it, she hated them huh. When I was talking to Ludi, Nanami and Nee-san whispered something to each other and stand up. Then they left the room. “Speaking of which...;..” When I was looking at the two left the room, Ludi spoke up. “You talked about the points earlier right?” “Yeah, I was.” Ludi looks down while her face is somehow a little redder. She then rises her hair up with her right hand while turning her face away from me and muttered something with a small voice. “You..see. If-if I have some kind of trust points too then–Kousuke already has the, the m-maximum points alright!” Saying so, Ludi stands up. She tried to leave the room but her shoulder knocked into the door. It looked painful but she left the room just like that. Immediately after Marino-san and Sempai came back, we had dinner. Sempai has now become a person that we would find it odd if she isn’t here with us. After we finished eating, I return to my room and take out all the seeds of possibility. I didn’t obtain only one seed of possibility. Depending on the location, you might be able to obtain only one of them. However, for the places that have heightened difficulty for the second run player, you might be able to obtain more. The solo capture that was recommended for the second run players in the Academy Dungeon is a place that you can definitely obtain multiple seeds of possibility. The amount I obtained was five seeds which are enough for a single party. Of course, I will keep one for myself. However, what should I do with the other four? I can get a lot of items by converting it into Tsukuyomi points and depending on the situation, that is also a good option. But is that really okay? “...;...;Alright.” I decided what to do and act immediately. ————– “Is this a nightly visit? Please wait a moment.” That was what Nanami said immediately after I entered her room...;...;..I was thinking about having a serious talk though. “That’s the first thing that came to your mind? It’s not like that alright.” I sit down on the sofa that Nanami urged me to and start talking. “I talked with you about the thing I was aiming for before right?” “Come to think of it, you wanted to become a comedian correct?” “That’s a nostalgic joke.” “Yes, our duo name was decided to be [Nanami Syndrome] was it?” “That didn’t happen and that name would make the fan become infected too so stop it.” If you used the kanji for warrior then the whole town might be filled with zombies after all. But if everyone likes it then it might become interesting too. “Then patient zero will be Goshujin-sama!!” “I’m your partner so...;..well, I would become the first person to get infected huh.” “Then that will become my Fanclub, the NNN (Nanami, Nante, Nanamin TLN: Nanami is so Nanamin.) ...;..Goshujin-sama alone as the member is enough so I can just shut down the application immediately after.” “A Fanclub is a group of people though...;if it’s like that then ain’t I just a fan?” “You don’t have to worry about the small details. Ah, I will issue a member card for you later.” “Ye—ah, I did it. I am in the single-digit member!!” Somehow, the conversation was super derailed...;...;. “Nanami, can I get to the main point now?” “Can’t be helped then, please.” “I wonder who’s the master here. Well, first, look at this.” I said that and took out the seeds. One, two, three, four, five. I show her the five golden seeds I obtained from the dungeon. Seeing that, Nanami took a small breath. Then her carefree expression earlier changed into a serious one. “...;.the reason you stubbornly trying to capture the fortieth floor within a week alone was.” “Yeah, it was for this.” As expected of a Maid Knight that was intended to serve the dungeon masters. Once she saw the seeds, it seems like she was able to understand something immediately. She just guessed the obtain method after all. Well, the one week period was unrelated but it should be fine if I don’t correct her. “You have obtained something truly powerful. Just how much DP this would...;...; This is not something that a simple dungeon master can obtain you know?” “Really?” “Yes. To think that you obtained something like this. As expected of Goshujin-sama. However,...;.can you do a seiza over there please.” Saying so, Nanami gives me a wide smile and point to the floor with her finger. I look at the floor and turn back to look at Nanami again. Nanami withdraws her hand and points at the floor with a smile again. “Wh, Why?” “Please just do it Goshujin-sama.” Nanami seems a little angry so I perform the seiza right away. “Goshujin-sama. I think you know this already but these seeds are quite a rare item. They are rare enough that could make me surprised.” “Ye, Yes.” “Inferring to the fact that you solo the dungeon up to the fortieth floor, you surely know about the acquisition method of this item, correct? I am very curious as to how you knew of such a method but I will not dig further. However.” “However?” “The reason you did such a reckless thing. I cannot overlook that.” Nanami is supposed to be smiling but that is clearly not a smile. No, there are some parts that look like a smile but I can feel her anger exuding from all over her body. “I, I’m not reckless. It, it wasn’t that hard anyway.” Now I know why she has me performing seiza. No matter how I gloss this over, there would be no meaning. “For example, where do you think the bank store their precious money?” “W, well, that would be in a safe and secure box right?” “Dungeon is also operating with the same logic. To increase the value of a dungeon, they would put the [seed of possibility] inside. But the dungeon master’s side wouldn’t want to lose such a precious item as well. Then how would he place it in his dungeon?” So there’s something like a dungeon’s value...;. Well, never poke the sleeping bear huh. I don’t want to hear something that would get me involved in something troublesome anyway. Let’s give up on asking. “Um, Umm you would strengthen the security right?” “That’s right. I have studied a little about the Academy dungeon. To be honest, I thought the first thirty floors will be just right for Goshujin-sama and the floors after that will be a little harsh for you. But...;..” “But?” “At the same time, I thought about the specific way you capture the dungeon.” Nanami stares at me. “There’s no way it would be so easy.” It is as Nanami said. Although I defeated him while under that mysterious trance and exploiting his weakness, Icarus was not someone that should appear on that floor. I made use of fire to defeat him but originally it wouldn’t be weird if he appears on the seventieth or eightieth floor. “Do you understand? It is unthinkable you know, that item is not something that you can obtain without doing something unthinkable. If I am correct then there must have been a high-level maze floor, Traps floor or a floor with high-level boss correct? There absolutely must be something like that. “...;...;” Her description was too accurate, I don’t know what to say. “Why didn’t you come back? Goshujin-sama only has one body you know, please take more care of yourself...;..if you have to go no matter what then at least please take me along...;..I beg you.” “I will have safety in mind and bring everyone with me from now on...;...;” “I am seriously begging you...;..seriously, if you die you will create a widowed maid you know. Please understand that.” I think it would be fine if she becomes another person’s maid but I stopped myself from saying that. I feel like that is something I absolutely must not say. Seeing me turned silent, Nanami sits down on the sofa and lower her head. “Well, Umm, If you understand that already then I will forgive you. And I am truly sorry. I said too much...;..I know that I had offended you. If you have some kind of punishment then I will bear anything.” Seeing Nanami like that, I make a bitter smile. “...;.Why do I have to punish you when you were just worrying about me?” “Even like this, I am still a lowly maid knight. Originally, I wouldn’t be forgiven for doing such a thing you know?” Well, she did make me seiza after all. Seriously, I don’t mind though. “Then I will give you my permission...;..From now on you can tell me frankly what you think.” “...;.Actually, it is a foolish act to running my mouth like that, it wouldn’t be weird for the company to scrap me. Not to mention that is the worst behavior for a maid to do as well” “Okay, let’s put it like this, I am happy that you were worried about me and said those things. Thank you. From that company perspective, that might be a foolish thing to do but you just said the best thing I could ask for, you are the best maid for me. I haven’t had the chance to meet them yet but if I got a chance to meet the company I will tell them so.” Hearing my words, she lowered her eyes a little and shyly let out a soft smile. “Seriously, for Goshujin-sama to increase your points like that. If it’s not me then it might be quite dangerous. That is no doubt a Throbbing Eternal Destiny. Good thing that I just only completely fallen.“ “Then you already fell alright!? Moreover, the points are increasing again...;..? Just how many points is it now?” “Right, it is seventy point two billion points right now.” “I see seventy point two billion points huh, seventy point two billion points !? Isn’t that ten times over? How did it become like that in such a short time?!” “Hatsumi-sama increased her points by one billion so I thought that I can’t afford to lose so I increased my point my several tens of billions of points.” “Eeh...;.you increased it that much...;...;.” Nanami puts her hand on her mouth and laughs impishly. Seeing her like that, I begin to laugh as well. “Well, leaving the points aside. it won’t compensate for the fact that I made you worried about me but, take this.” Saying so, I took out one seed of possibility and hand it to Nanami. At the same time, Nanami’s smile disappeared and her eyes turn sharp. “What are you saying? This is something that is considered valuable even among the dungeon masters you know, and you are giving this to me? Are you insane? Don’t you value yourself? Please calmly think it over again.” She said so and push my hand back. “I am calm. I think it over and over and this is the conclusion.” Of course, I have been thinking about this even before I entered the dungeon. I actually thought about turning them in for Tsukuyomi points and purchase various items with it. However, I want everyone to use it as well, that feeling became stronger when I was in the dungeon. “The fact that I have been able to come this far was because of everyone’s help. It would be impossible for me to take my next step if everyone is not here for me.” In the first place, I think that strengthening everyone’s strength is like increasing my own strength. There will be many places I can’t go alone from now on and there would be monsters that will be difficult for me to defeat alone as well. There are also a lot of events that I can’t overcome alone. However, because they are difficult, those places also have good items and hunting grounds. Moreover, there are places that will have better efficiency if we fight together in a group. “Nanami, it was as you expected. The Academy dungeon was quite difficult for me. I fully understand that it would be very difficult to go on alone like this.” Hearing so, Nanami stares at me. She doesn’t open her mouth but I can understand that she has a lot of things she wants to say. “S, Sorry. you know, I want you to lend me your power from now on as well Nanami. That’s why please accept it.” Saying so, I once again offer the seed to Nanami. Nanami looked at it and shakes her head while saying [Good grief.] “What are you saying? You want my help? The only place where I belong to is Goshujin-sama’s.” She stands up and bows. “No matter when it is I am always Goshujin-sama’s maid. That is the fact that will never be shaken no matter what happens.” Nanami picks up the seed. “If you have said this much then it can’t be helped, you want me to offer you everything right?” Heavy, so Heavy. “Don’t say something stupid, just accept it normally…..” “Well, that’s fine. Come to think of it, are you going to give them to everyone else too?” “No, not yet.” Hearing so, Nanami tilts her head. “Why……..are you giving it to me first?” “From now on, you will be the one that I will consult with the most and the one who will be accompanying me to the dungeon the most after all. If you think about it then it sounds kinda bad huh. I will practically drag you along after all.” Nanami understands the ancient language and although she doesn’t talk much about it, she also possessed the knowledge about the dungeons. There will be a lot I have to consult with her. She also possessed trap detection skills, it is her that I especially want to come along to the dungeon with me. There will be a lot of occasions that I will have to call for her help. Moreover, as Sempai and Ludi are a student, if something came up then they might not be able to go to the dungeon with me as well. “Is that so. So you trusted me so much that you can’t put it into number……!” “Well, if you mean that I trust you so much I can’t quantify it then yes.” The same goes for Ludy and Sempai as well. Nanami widely opens her eyes while her mouth is open and shut repeatedly like a goldfish looking for oxygen. “…I, I told you that my points are at seven point two billion but in fact, I can’t quantify it to a specific number as well so it is actually Eternal Trust…….” “Just what are you trying to compete against?” Moreover, I seriously don’t understand what you are saying right now. “Well, let’s leave the joke aside, have Goshujin-sama used the seed yourself yet?” “Not yet actually. “Then let’s use it together now.” “I took out a seed and tried to put it in my mouth…..but Nanami stopped me.” “Do you know, Goshujin-sama? There is actually a way to eat this seed.” “…….Is there?” “Yes, you can only eat it by having a maid feed you and in return, you have to feed the maid back……you are looking at me quite suspiciously though.” “Well, it’s an obvious lie after all.” “If you believe it enough it will turn into the truth.” “No, didn’t you just admitted that it was a lie?” When I swallowed the seed in my hand, Nanami put the seed into her mouth. The change in my body……is none for now. “It’s okay, it will definitely show its effect. More importantly, what are you planning to do with the other seed?” “Yeah, I allocated them for myself, Nanami, Ludi, and Sempai already. The only one left…..I think I will be giving it to Claris-san or Nee-san.” “Is that so…..that’s reasonable.” “I’m just a little worried over who should I give it to between Nee-san, Claris-san or Marino-san….” “No, Hanamura Marino is the person who needs this seed the least. I will talk with that person myself, Goshujin-sama please give those seeds to Ludi-sama and others.” I have been thinking about this for a while but Marino-san is the only one who Nanami is hostile toward. “Got it, then I will visit their rooms after this.” “If you are going to creep into their bed then please include me as well.” “I won’t, can you not say something that is easy to misunderstand?” Looking at Nanami who looks like she is thinking about something, I ask the thing that has been on my mind. “Come to think of it……” “Come to think of it?” “What’s that paper on your table?” Saying so, I pointed at the paper on top of Nanami’s table. “Aah, that? That’ the defor……” “defor…..?” “….It’s the plan about how to manage Luigia-sensei who is on the verge of defaulting her payment.” “That’s quite tricky.” Aiming for a perfect score on the test would be easier. “But you know, is that really it? I kinda see the words doll on it…..moreover, there’s the size too…..” “! It, it would be better if you hurry. Please go on and hand the seeds to everyone first.” “Ah, Oi……” I got forced out of the room. “What’s wrong Kou-chan, you want creeping advice?” “Why do all the residents of this house have the strange thinking circuit built into their brain?” No, I guess we only have two huh. “I’m kidding. So, what happened?” Nanami said that she would talk to her herself but something like this should be better if I tell her myself. Especially so when I won’t give the seed to her this time. [Ara], she said that immediately after I took three of the seeds of possibility out and shown them to her. “Hee, you’ve got something amazing here.” “Yes, they are.” She looks at them without breaking her smile. Besides that look of understanding something on her face, there’s not even a slight surprise in her bearing. “You understood what this is but you don’t look surprised at all.” “Among all of my predictions, this is the biggest one you know. Even if I looked like this I am plenty surprised here. I don’t have any power left to tell a joke now.” “…..You really don’t look surprised at all.” “I am surprised you know? Well, I was surprised in a lot of meanings though…..” “A lot…..?” “Yes, a lot. I actually want to ask how you get it in detail but it’s not something I should interfere after all.” I don’t feel like answering too. “And? You have something to talk about right?” I gave her a small nod. “I am hesitating who to give this to.” “Hmm, just to be sure but you already used it on yourself right?” “I did. Both me and Nanami.” “Hee…….” Saying so, I finally see the look of surprise on Marino-san. “Nanami-chan huh. What are you planning to do with the rest?” If you call her like that in her face she will get angry you know. “That’s what I want to talk with you about. I am thinking about giving them to everyone after this.” “Hmm, you have only three right?” “Yes, three. No, there’s only three left.” Marino-san’s eyes become narrower. “Let me hear what you are thinking. You actually decided who to give it to already right?” “Well, yes I did…..you know me well. I have been thinking about it for a while.” “But it’s Kou-chan after all. If you didn’t think it through yet you wouldn’t come to consult me right?” Well, I think that you should have some conclusion in mind before consulting someone though. Well, never mind that. “So the people I am thinking about giving it to” “Yup yup.” “I think I will give it to Sempai and Ludi for sure but there are Nee-san and Claris-san left. Since I can’t give it to one of them I am thinking about giving it to that person and Marino-san after I can get more of them.” At those words, Marino-san put her hand on her cheek and look at me with a tired expression. “Wait…..you plan to get more?” “Yes, I am.” There are several ways to obtain those seeds. The easiest way would be the event dungeon at Susanoo Martial Art Academy, I think? I can get one at Amaterasu Academy’s event too but it will be quite a while before I can do that. Of course, there are places that I can get them immediately as well. Marino-san closed and massage her eyes then take a breath. After that, She raises her face a little and smile. “Thank you, Kou-chan? But I don’t need it you know. There’s no meaning even if I use it after all.” Her word circling in my head. Even if she used it there would be no meaning? That….. I try to think about it but Marino-san steps forward and hugs me. After that, the thought in my head disappeared. When she breaks away from me she smiles. That was soft. “I am really happy that you considered giving it to me. You see, they are something so valuable to the extent that I can’t imagine you know.” “…..Is that so.” “Yeah, that’s why it is very hard to accept, it might be a good idea if you have them consume it without knowing you know.” “Without telling them? That would be hard right?” “The seeds are not that big, right? If you slip them into their drink then won’t it somehow work out?” Well, it might but. “If you need a decoy or camouflage then I can create one for you, you know?.” “I will put that on hold for now…..for the time being, I have to think about whether I should give it to Nee-san or Claris -san first…..” “Oh, that’s right. You can give it to Claris. Hatsumi……probably doesn’t need one, I think saying that it’s fine to give it to her later would be more correct.” “…….to Nee-san?” “I think you can leave mine and Hatsumi’s portion for later.” “Why?” “Hatsumi doesn’t seem like she wants to become stronger after all. Well, she recently changed the way she thinks though.” Certainly, I don’t really see Nee-san particularly want to become stronger. “Moreover, Kou-chan still might not know but Hatsumi is very strong you know. Even if Claris, Yukine-chan, Kou-chan, and Ludi-chan fight her together I don’t think you guys would be able to beat the serious Hatsumi you know.” Did I mishear that? We can’t win? Certainly, the current Sempai doesn’ possess the strength of the three strongest in Magiero yet. Unlike president Monika and the weird founder saint, who were ridiculously strong from the start, she is only moderately strong. However, even now I think that she should be quite strong already. That Sempai and Claris-san together would lose against Nee-san? Certainly, I had a mock battle against Nee-san several times already and lost to her rain of magic bombardment. However, can she win against Claris-san, Sempai, me, and Ludi with that? “Hatsumi is really strong you know? It’s not a joke. She still has more to learn if you compared her to me though.” Nee-san was not one of the heroines. That’s why I don’t know her status from the game. No, she played an important role by teaching that magic to Iori in the game. That magic that could only be considered a cheat. If she can teach it then can she use it as well? In the first place, Nee-san was…… “That’s why if you are going to give it to someone then give it to Claris okay? I don’t know whether will she accept it though. If you are worrying about Hatsumi then go and talk with her first.” “Yes……” There are too many things to think about. The thing about Marino-san, the thing about Nee-san, and the thing that those two have in common, the Hanamura family. Moreover, that something might be related to me too. “Ah, that’s right. About the creeping stuff.” “Yes….Wha?” “Recently, Hatsumi often doesn’t sleep in her own room so be careful okay?” I sighed involuntarily. She is smiling like that because she knew where Nee-san is sleeping and deliberately said so right? That’s the only possibility. Nee-san is mostly sleeping in my room after all. After I talked with her a little more, I left the room. As there is a lot of stuff to think about I climb the stairs to get back to my room. It was on the way there that I saw Nee-san exiting Nanami’s room. ………..Nanami’s room? “Ah, Nee-san.” “Nn.” Nee-san is still expressionless but seems sleepier than usual, it looks like she would be immediately asleep as soon as she gets to her room. Then it’s better to talk to her now. “Nee-san, can I talk with you a little before bed?” “I don’t mind.” “Then…..let’s change places and head to the room first.” [Un], Nee-san replied and walk to my room with no hesitation. She picks up the orca doll, Marianne who was sitting on the chair and sit on the bed. I think about pouring her some drink and reach for the kettle. When I was about to do it I stopped my hand and think. Eh, this is my room right? Ludi and Nanami were making themselves home in my room as well. Is my room not my room anymore? Well, it’s fine though….. “What do you want to talk about?” Nee-san said so and turns toward me. “Right.” I pour Nee-san a chamomile tea and take out the seed of potential. “It’s pretty, this is the first time I see one.” “Yeah…..it’s called the seed of possibility.” Nee-san’s expression shook for a moment. “Amazing, you did well. Where did you find it?” “Yeah, at the Academy dungeon…and so I have something that I have to apologize to Nee-san about.” “Apologize? About?” The thing that I want to tell her is that I will surely give her the seed but I want her to wait for now. That was all, that was supposed to be all. However, there is much more I want to tell her. What I want to convey was supposed to be my gratitude. She didn’t help me directly but she always helped and took care of me. When I talk to her, mysteriously, many things that I want to talk about came up to my mind and we ended up talking about a lot of things. Nee-san’s favorite movie, and book. In return, I told her mine as well. After a long talk, it ended with, [ I won’t give the seed to you, Nee-san. If I find another, I will immediately give one to you, I want you to wait for me]. After I told her that, Nee-san slightly lowered her eyes. After she drank her chamomile tea she stands up and slowly moves over to sit beside me. She pulls my ear closer to her and said. “Thank you, but you can leave Onee-chan’s portion for later. It’s not something I particularly want and it would be fine even if you don’t give me one too.” “Eh, but.” “Since I already have Kousuke, I don’t need that” She hugged me and pat my head. Eventually, she said [I’m sleeping] and changes her clothes. She then takes Marianne with her and crawls into bed. I was stunned by how big her chest was but didn’t forget to retort. Nee-san. Both Marianne and that bed are mines you know. “What’s wrong? It’s already late you know.” “Well, a little.” Urged to sit by Ludi, I sit down on the green sofa. Ludi’s room is mostly covered in her favorite green color from her curtains, sofa to her futon. She was probably relaxing in her room, Ludi put a bookmark in the book she was reading and put it on the side. Although it is a simple design, her frilled white negligee is somewhat strangely beautiful and sexy at the same time. “I have something I want to give you.” “To me?” “Yeah, to you.” I took out three golden seeds from the bag in my hand. “What is this?” “Umm, it’s a delicious snack...;...;.sorry.” Even though I said it myself, I think it is still impossible for me. Ludi probably thinks so too because she keeps staring me down. “...;...;It’s not a snack right?” “It’s not.” “So, what is it?” She pinches one of the seeds up and takes a small breath. “It is called the seed of possibility...;..” Looking at the seed that is reflecting off the light, Ludi jumped in surprise, her reaction almost surprises me as well. She gently places the seed on the table like a newborn baby with her eyes still wide open. “Wait, what are you making me hold!?” “No, I didn’t make you though...;..” I’m sure you picked that up on your own. “Is it real? It might be a fake right?” “If it can make Nanami and Marino-san stop joking and take it seriously then I think it has some credibility.” Ludi’s eyes turn even more severe. When I tried to continue the conversation, she stopped me with her hand. “...;..wait a minute. Let me calm down a little.” Saying so, Ludi shut her eyes and takes a deep breath. She moves the book that she placed on the side of her chair away with her eyes still closed and correct her sitting posture. Her every move somehow possessed elegance, it reminds me that she really came from high society. Ludi slowly opens her eyes. “Okay, please continue.” “I want you to have it Ludi.” “Eh?” Her eyes opened wide in surprise. “Wait a minute! Kousuke is not going to sell it or using it on yourself but giving it to me !?” I can hear the words [[What are you thinking? Are you an idiot!?]] coming from her expression. “I already used it on myself. I actually got five of them you see so I thought about giving the rest to the people who took care of me.” “Wait, my brain can’t catch up.” “I want you to have it Ludi.” I repeated the same words to her again. “Please. Wait. How can I accept such a thing ! ? Do you know how much one of this worth? In the first place, a person who has always been on the receiving side like me couldn’t possibly receive something invaluable like this.” “But, you have also given me something invaluable too, Ludi. It was something invaluable to the extent that I will never be able to pay you back as well...;...;” “...;...;...;I have?” “Yes. Moreover, it was really useful...;...; No, it is embarrassing to say it to your face like this but the fortieth floor was really difficult you know...;..” “Of course it is! Yukine-san also said that normally something like that would be impossible to achieve you know.” She said it like I’m not normal but well, I really am not huh. We~ll...;..in fact, when I think about it that place was really harsh huh...;. If I didn’t get that strange powerup from the amulets then I would have to give up halfway through the 30s floors after all. They are the important treasures that supported me in my time of need. With that said, I took out Ludi’s misshapen amulet. Then I dangling it in front of Ludi to show her. “Wa, Wait...;..a minute. Wait wait. Wh-What are you saying? Just put it back. It’s super embarrassing.” Ludi rushes in and tried to take the amulet from me. However, I have no intention to hand over my treasure. I immediately put it out of Ludi’s reach and show it to her once again. “You know, I am quite embarrassed myself too.” “You idiot. If you are embarrassed then put it away already. In the first place, there’s no value in something like that! I got the materials from Yukine-san as well. It doesn’t even worth the price of expensive ramen you know!” “Well, that’s true. Certainly, its monetary value might be cheap but...;...;that’s not the way you decide the value of something like this right? That’s why this amulet is much more important to me than this seed.” Her face turned completely red. But I think the same goes for me as well. “So, it’s my bad that I can only repay you with a seed like this but, can you receive it?” “A seed like this huh, you really are...;...;...;.I can’t even repay you for the ring yet.” The red face Ludi is still reluctant to receive the seed.” “Hey, Ludi?” “What?” “I said this before I went into the Academy dungeon right?” “Said what?” “That I want you to together with me from now on. So you know...;...;without any question, can you listen to my story until the end?” “Now you are making me uneasy about what you are going to say. It’s fine, go on.” “You know, one of my goals is to capture the Academy dungeon in its entirety right?” Ludi nodded without saying anything. “I thought about what would be necessary for me to achieve that and I think that is everyone’s cooperation.” Trap detection, vanguard, long-distance attack, support magics, and recovery magics are a matter of course. However, it is not just that. I need something to help me mentally too. “That’s why, I am sorry but if possible, I want Ludi to always be together with me.” “Don’t– apologize. I will always–be with you.” “Thanks. Well, please listen to me a little more. You see, Ludi is certainly strong even without the seed and I think you will become even more powerful from now on.” When I saw Ludi keep getting stronger, I think that this will definitely be the case. If we are doing a mock battle together, I have no intention to lose though. “But you see, I think that if we are going to capture the dungeon together anyway, I think that it would be better if everyone can get stronger even a little bit more. That also applied to Sempai and Nanami too of course.” The effect of the seed of possibility on Ludi is not just the removal of her abilities value limits. She will also get the aptitudes to use recovery and support magics, more magics will be available to her as well. There’s no doubt that she will become much stronger. “If I put it like this it will become our give-and-take right? And, the most important thing is...;.” “Most important?” “...;...;.I want to grasp on to the possibilities with Ludi and become stronger together. I want you to go to the deepest part of the dungeon with me.” “...;.stupid, I get that already.” Saying so, she picked up the seed and look at me. “It is not to Kousuke’s level but I also want to become stronger. More importantly.” I thought that some sort of magic was cast on me. Ludi narrowed her eyes a little and give me a beautiful gentle smile. However, she is full of mysterious charms that can even make Narcissus who received a curse that made him can only love nothing but himself, fall in love with her. “I want to see it together with you.” Ludi swallowed the seed. My heart couldn’t beat faster than this. But for some reason, I am getting embarrassed. I can only pretend like nothing is wrong and say “I will be in your care from now on.” Ludi must be embarrassed too, she avoids my eyes and turned away with a red face. As I hide my turmoiled heart by feigning my calmness, I look at Ludi who is casting her gaze downward. Then suddenly a thought occurs to me. “...;...;.Ludi.” “...;..What?” “Let’s go eat ramen this weekend. The place in front of the train station.” “...;...;...;Fine, it’s your treat okay, Kousuke?” “And you know, can you give me a massage after tomorrow’s training. For free of course. Since I will treat you to ramen later, it’s okay right?” “Fu fun, my massage huh.” She said that she is confident with her skill and look at me while making a cheerful smile. “I don’t mind doing that for you but that is that and this is this so you must buy me cup ramen too.” Just how much do you love ramen, or so I retorted. Seeing that, Ludi laughed. After that, we laugh together for a while. “Sorry for the cheap tea.” Saying so, Sempai hand me the tea. On top of the saucer is a misshapen but complete teacup with green tea inside. I take a sip. I enjoyed its soft bitterness and take a small breath. When I visit Sempai’s room and told her that I have something to talk about, she happily welcomes me in. Although it was a sudden visit, she serves tea to me even though I didn’t ask for it. “Fufu, you can enjoy it more you know.” She said that but I will have to apologize, I correct my sitting posture on the cushion. Before I went to the dungeon, Sempai’s room was like a barren land. However, it is now giving off the lively feeling as she lives in and brings more stuff into it. There were no tatami mats or the cushion I am currently sitting on when I visited her last time. “This?...;...;Actually, Nanami helped me set it up. Well, I certainly wanted it but when I noticed it she already installed the tatami mats so beautifully...;...;I never told her that I want one though. Sempai said so while patting the tatami. Was it because I once take a look at tatamis and the cushions? She usually does a double piece with a stoic face but she is very competent. Of course, outside the dungeon as well. “You have something to talk about right Takioto. I actually have a business with you so I went to your room earlier too...;.” Ah, I nodded “I’m sorry. No one was inside right? I went to Marino-san’s and Ludi’s room earlier after all.” “Well...;..Umm...;.Hatsumi-san sleepily answered the door so...;” “...;...;...;...;...;” I turned silent and sigh while holding my head down. “Umm...;.what kind of relationship do you have with Hatsumi-san...;...;well, I don’t know if it is appropriate for me to ask but, Umm, I’m still curious...;...;” “Well, have Sempai ever seen me sleeping on the sofa?” Sempai was confused for a moment and it finally came to her. “I, I see. I can guess what happened. That must be hard on you.” “I’m used to it now.” Let’s not tell her that I sleep with Nee-san from time to time too. “If-, if that’s the case then you can use my room you know. I-, I’m used to sleeping on the futon anyway so I can lay one.” “I’m sorry that I made you worried but I’m fi...;...;.” Nn, I can sleep in her bed? “?” “Ah, I don’t mind.” Wai, wait a minute. Can I seriously do that? The futon that Sempai’s amorous, sexy, lascivious, sublime and packed to the brim with charm chest, her white nape that I couldn’t help but follow with my eyes every time we go running together and her elastic well-shaped but has been on. The same one that is filled with the smell of Sempai, can a gentleman like me really wrap myself inside the bed of the supreme being like Sempai...;...;...; “Takioto, Takioto !” “Ah!” “Wh, what’s wrong. Your eyes were already left for another world you know!?” “Ah, no, it’s nothing.” Calm down. Sempai just worried about me like usual. However, if I were to sleep in her futon then I will not be able to sleep in a lot of ways. Rather, if Sempai were to sleep next to me then it wouldn’t be weird if I still can’t sleep after I counted a hundred million sheep. I will definitely experience eternity and worked up until morning. If that happened I will have to go to the dungeon with bloodshot eyes for sure. As expected, that would be bad. “I’m sorry, thank you. But I will be fine. There is something that I want to borrow from you no matter what but...;..I can’t afford to trouble you.” “Just how far have you been cornered?” “It’s nothing, I will be fine.” Rather, it would be bad in a lot of ways if I really borrowed it from her. There is a whole lot that I wanted to borrow but I’m sure that it will turn out badly. Yup, I don’t even know what I am talking about myself. “Well, you can always tell me if something happens. So Takioto. Let’s talk about your business.” “Ah, that’s right. I have something that I want to give you Sempai.” I asked Sempai to give me her hand and put one of the golden seeds on it. “...;...;this is?” “Sempai must have heard about it before, this is something called the seed of possibility...;...;” “Wait!” Sempai hurriedly tried to return the seed to me but I hide my hands behind my back. “What exactly are you trying to do by giving something like this to me?” “Sempai, this is the reason I soloed that dungeon.” “Wait wait, this is something you fought for right? Then use it on yourself.” “I already have. But I got several of them so I want to give them to people who took care of me like Ludi and Sempai no matter what.” “...;..you can build a castle in a prime location with this you know?” Is it that valuable? “Then this thing that I have is much more valuable. To the point that I can’t even put a price on it.” Saying so I took out the amulet I got from Sempai. “yo, you fool...;.that’s not something with such value you know.” Did she really think so? But I don’t think like that. “No, it is for me. If you compared this to the seed then I would throw the seed into the trash can without hesitation.” Hearing what I said, Sempai’s face got redder. Maybe it was because of happiness, embarrassment or maybe both. She hides her mouth with her hand and averts her eyes. “This is not the only invaluable thing you gave me Sempai. Every single move I used to fight with as well. Both Sempai’s and Claris-san’s teaching are living in every single one of them. If it were not because of you two then I wouldn’t be able to capture that dungeon.” “Of course, I already gave it to the people who helped me like Nanami and Ludi as well. Sempai is the same.” “But...;.” “Sempai. The thing that Sempai did for me couldn’t compare to a castle, you gave me strength. That’s why, thank you. It might not even worth all the thing you did for me but please accept it.” Sempai stares at the seed with a serious expression. “You really won’t regret giving this to me?” “Yes, it is something that I want Sempai to have no matter what.” Sempai takes a small breath and looks upward. She then looked at me with a serious expression, with her face still reddened.  “Takioto, you said before that you want to become the strongest right?” “Yes, I did.” “Are you really fine? Giving this to me.” “Yes, of course. I want Sempai to become stronger for me.” Certainly, I might lose too you. But. I think that the strongest of the three strongest, Mizumori Yukine is exactly the best Mizumori Yukine. It is exactly because she is my beloved Sempai...;. “I will surpass you and become the strongest.” I look at Sempai who is thinking about something with a serious face and got the feeling that I have to say something so I open my mouth. “Besides...;..you, you see, I have my motive as well...;.if I give you this then you will accompany me to the dungeon...;and you will help me with my classes too...;...;” “I planned to go with you even if you don’t give me this you know. I will always help you even without you asking. As long as you wish for it.” Sempai stares at the seed. “This is big, I feel like I just created a huge debt of gratitude...;...;.” “Then it is decided. Since I have a huge debt toward you as well.” Saying so, I show her the amulet. “You fool, you can’t compare it to something like this.” “It is certainly incomparable. This amulet is much more valuable. It is my important treasure after all.” “...;..you are always like this.” After saying so with a small voice, Sempai’s cheeks turned crimson. She looks away and hides her smile with her hand. A little later, Sempai swallowed the seed. Then the smile she directed my way turned into the smile of happiness. Her smile fulfilled me, it was that overflowing of a smile. Looking at her happy expression made me happy as well. “I will be in your care from now on as well, Sempai.” “Yeah, I will dive into the dungeon with you even if you don’t want me to. I will not hold back anymore. The rest is...;..” “The rest?” “You might want to surpass me to become the strongest but I will not make it easy for you you know.” That must be her declaration of war. Then, of course, the answer is. “That’s how I want it.” With this, one of the several flags for awakening Sempai should be triggered. If I leave it like this then Sempai should awaken on her own but let’s say that just to be safe. “Moreover, I too...;..have a business with Takioto.” “Come to think of it, you did say that.” We were distracted when we talked about how she met Nee-san earlier though. “Well, you wanted to give me something right? I am the same.” “Give me? What is it?” “Yeah, compared to what you gave me it might worth that much but...;.” “Hey, Sempai.” I show her the amulet again. “I, I know. Um, Umm, it’s embarrassing so put it away already. if, if it is so important then why are you putting it in your breast pocket!” “Of course, it is exactly because it is important.” After a while, Sempai clears her throat but her face is still a little red. She puts her hand into her pocket and takes out an elegant purple cloth. She spreads it open and took out a letter. “This is?” I received the letter and flip it around. Then when I saw a magic circle and the academy emblem written on it, my body started to tremble. Unfortunately, it’s not Sempai’s love letter. Compared to that, it is still frustratingly a good thing. It is exactly what I wanted. I touch the magic circle at the back of the letter and pour magic power into it. In doing so, the symbols of the Student Council, Public Moral Committee, and Shikibukai float up into the air. Then the letter opens by itself. At the same time that a card pops out from it, Sempai opens her mouth. “Congratulations, Takioto Kousuke. You have been chosen.” Don’t tell me, Don’t tell me, I never would have thought that I would be able to hear this in reality. In the game, you would be informed by one of the vice presidents of the three committees but usually, it would be Mizumori Yukine-sempai who did that. I have heard it many times before to the extent that I pressed SKIP on it. Her words signify the beginning of a certain event. I don’t know whether I am happy with her words or the letter. “So I have finally reached this place...;..” There seems to be something written on the card but I know its content without reading it. It’s the love call from the three committees. Since I just recently arrived in this town I don’t really know a good place. The place I was recommended to was a cafe just under ten minutes of walk time away from Hanamura house. Honestly speaking, I didn’t expect this. From my perspective, Yukine-san has the image of a traditional Japanese person. I expected that she would introduce me to a Japanese-style place like the one she introduced to me before. “You sure know various kinds of shop, Yukine-san.” “It’s the place my classmate from the student council introduced to me. I come to this place with her once in a while to talk about dungeon capturing. It’s not that far from the student dorm after all.” Saying so Yukine-san sips her tea. “I see, so Yukine-san is living in a dormitory. What is it like?” “It was built more than ten years ago but its facilities are first class and very comfortable you know. Ludi is living at the Hanamura house now right?” “Yes, Otou-sama said that I will absolutely be safe with Hanamura Family…and I think so too as well. There’s my own maid, Marino-san, Hatsumi-san……..and most importantly, Kousuke is there too.” After I said so, Yukine-san let out a gentle laugh as if she sees through everything. It is kind of embarrassing so I avert my eyes and reach for the tea. “That’s certainly true.” “Yes, he is really reliable.” “……..Takioto was really amazing in the dungeon you know? He exhibits the strength that even I never have seen before when we were training together. That must be because he wholeheartedly wants to save you, Ludi.” Hearing so I can’t stop smiling. I was truly happy when he showed up. When I thought that it was already hopeless, I ended up getting carried by the situation and hugged him. His back was firm and broader than I thought…… “Since it happened in front of my eyes, I saw his figure as well. Umm, he really was very reliable. Well, there are some unforgivable parts as well though.” “Unforgivable?” “………….His pervert gaze when we were wearing the swimsuit was a little…” It might be an inevitable thing for a man. He did try to turn his face away as to not stare at us as much as possible but his gaze was totally glued at us. “C, certainly, Takioto’s gaze was really intense then.” “But there’s a part that he did try to look away as much as possible too….Besides, he stopped doing that when we entered the dungeon as well, I can’t confidently say that though.” “Well, that’s true. Even so, our appearance was quite embarrassing at that time.” Hearing Yukine-san seriously said so, the appearance of the well-worn green swimsuit came to my mind. It was something I often worn. My face gradually growing hotter. When I raise my face, I also saw Yukine-san’s white skin turning a shade of red. “L, let’s forget about that Yukine-san…..there will be no opportunity for us to wear that again anyway.” “That’s true. I pray that we don’t have to wear that again. That thing really has high defensive power though……” Even if you say that it has high defense. “Can Yukine-san swing your naginata while wearing that? Can you really show your peak performance?“ “Ugh, that is.” There are magical equipments that will become half as effective when you equip other items on top of them. Those swimsuits were that type of item so you can’t wear other clothes on top. Their defensive power is certainly high but you surely couldn’t wear them and fight unless you possess the pride of steel. Moreover, Yukine-san’s chest is big. Silence overtook us. We simply sit there with our reddened faces. As I was staring at the teacup while thinking about another topic something came to my mind and I break the silence. “S, speaking of which Yukine-san. Do you often visit this kind of store?” “Ju, Just once in a while. Once a week a most I think. Since I have to dive into the dungeon and taking classes I don’t really come here that often.” “Hee, so that was the case.” “Well, I really want to come here more but I have to consider the time for duty at the committee, the dungeon, and studying for the test you know……Come to think of it, do you also have some special training at the Hanamura house as well, Ludi?” “Yes, Hatsumi-san has taken care of me a lot. Recently, I have become able to shorten my chant as well.” “A training from Hatsumi-san herself huh. That’s amazing.” “Is that so?” “Yeah, among the professors at the academy Hatsumi-san is one of the most recognized for her ability you know.” Even if you say that, I only saw her spaced out all the time though. “That’s a little hard to imagine.” [FuFu] Laughed Sempai. “She certainly always like that. But her ability is the real deal. In the first place, if you don’t have a certain level of ability or some kind of special ability you couldn’t become a professor at the academy anyway. Hatsumi-san possessed both knowledge and ability and moreover…” Saying so Yukine-san uses her magic and creates water in front of me. “She is normally quiet but she will change as soon as it comes to magic?” She stops her magic and the water vanished. “I see, at first I thought that training with her would be dull too.” “Hahaha, that’s really like Hatsumi-san. I can imagine her just indifferently watching you using magic.” However, “But still, I am thankful to her. Hatsumi-san was busy at that time. She looked after me despite the school about to start and there was that matter too…..the part where she made me using magic to the point of exhaustion was a little too harsh though.” “Fumu, but isn’t using your magic to the point of exhaustion make it easier to increase your magic power?” “That seems to be the case. Kousuke also said the same thing. So I started doing it until I feel dizzy then after that Kousuke shows up and uses his magic transfer……Ah.” My words come to a sudden stop and I hug my body. That was bad. Bad bad bad! The feeling like my whole body got gently stimulated, the burning heat and the good feelings that almost make my consciousness fly away….. Just what was that, it was like my entire body was fulfilled and the addictive desire that wants him to do it all over again….. “What about the magic transfer?” But Kousuke’s gift magic wasn’t entirely a bad thing. My body certainly felt hot and it felt good? Also kind of ecchi too. Still, he properly transferred his magic power over to me. “N, no. it’s nothing. Th, that’s right. If you are going to receive magic power from Kousuke then please prepare to steel your mind as well.” “What are you talking about?” “Um, it’s a feeling that is hard to describe with words…..no, umm, anyway please prepare yourself.” “I don’t know what to prepare myself for but I will keep that in mind.” Yukine-san exhales. “Well, it’s Takioto so he wouldn’t do anything bad to us right.” Hearing so, I strongly nod. “There’s no doubt about that. If I or Yukine-san were to be in danger then he would surely come to our side even if his life is on the line after all.” “Me? Speaking of which, he did say something like that.” “No, Kousuke will surely come, absolutely. Of course, that goes for me too. I don’t know where or when you are going to need our help but we will definitely come to you.” Hearing so, Yukine-san was stunned for a moment but immediately after she showed me a gentle smile. “Somehow, it seems like I have a good junior. Umm, how should I say this, when you say it so seriously like that it is kinda embarrassing.” “Is that so?” “It is. Well, it’s already almost noon…. what should we do about lunch?” I almost automatically say ramen but I managed to hold it. Yukine-san surely won’t mind it but it is still embarrassing. “How about pasta?” “Aa, then let’s go to this shop I know. It’s the place that my friend told me about though.” I look at Yukine-san laughing and exhale. Let’s leave the ramen for tomorrow. If I ask him then he will definitely take me with him. If it’s Kousuke then he will definitely do so. Then we would leave the house together, walking down the street together, and enter the ramen shop together. I don’t know, it is like when you find a four-leaf clover, the time that we bought sweets at the convenience store together a small moment of happiness like that mix and combine together and become bigger and bigger. It is a mysterious feeling. After we paid our bill and left the cafe, I look at the sky and take a huge breath. The cloudy sky still looks like it is going to rain. But tomorrow… Tomorrow……..it would be good if it is sunny tomorrow. That went better than I expected. No, maybe she was just too defenseless. After having finished breakfast, I finally sighed in relief at the beginning of this never-changing daily life. The people who have that same perspective weren’t just me and Ludi. Interestingly, Nee-san, Marino-san, and Nanami are also the same. Sempai is a little reluctant but in the end, she was convinced that it can’t be helped. Everyone was making their preparation in high-spirit. Especially Marino-san who unmistakably is half playing around right now. However, the reason that it was such a great success was also that Marino-san perfectly performs the most important role. “When everything goes so well like this it kinda makes me feel anxious……” As I muttered so, Ludi slightly tilts her head to the side. “This is what I anticipated though, Takioto-san.” Yup, I can only feel the sense of wrongness from her tone of voice. Since I haven’t gone to the academy for quite some time, Ludi’s Ojou-sama mode might be the cause of my anxiety. “But what would you think if the same happened to you? won’t you feel frustrating?” “Isn’t it depending on the time and occasion? I think it is finally the time for you to be appreciated.” “I also agree with Ludi-sama.” Said Nanami who is walking diagonally behind us. “According to the information I procured, it seems like they felt restless after they observed Goshujin-sama and Ludi-sama rapid growth rate.” “I haven’t heard anything about that…..” Ludi slightly lowered her eyebrows and make a dissatisfied face. Hmm, if she is seriously worried about that then I think Ludi would never say it out loud. She would keep it hidden inside her heart. Even so, how did Nanami get hold of that kind of information? In Sempai’s case as well, Nanami’s source of information is a mystery. “How did you acquire such information…..?” “I invited the concerned person with a bottle of fruit wine and get them drunk then just extracted everything in one go.” I see. After she got them drunk with the fruit wine huh. I am worried about the part she said [everything] and [extracted] but let’s ignore that as much as possible. “If it just making them talk then it is fine with me but be sure not to overdo it.” Nanami has been doing her job excellently these days but she can do some weird things at times—— “Please be at ease. I have also acquired her preferences in men and her three-sizes as well.” ————I must give her a reward. What a wonderful maid she is. There’s no maid more wonderful than Nanami even if you search for one in the entire wor-………. “Ugh….” “Takioto-san, we will arrive soon you know.” “Yes…….” Ludi-san. It’s a joke so please stop stabbing your elbow into my stomach. ————– “Takioto’s here, I wonder if there will be a snow storm tomorrow.” Orange looked at me with a serious expression and said so. “Hey hey, what does that mean?” “Well, I haven’t seen you attending the class recently right?” “Yeah, I never see you in the classroom at all…..we met up sometimes and had lunch together though…..” Well, it is exactly like that. I have been skipping classes ever since the test started and even before that too. Even when I come to the academy, I arrived at lunch break or just come here to dive into the dungeon. If I don’t have any plans for today’s afternoon, I might just dive into the dungeon without coming here at all. “Well, you guys don’t have to look at me like you saw a ghost though.” I raised my voice intentionally and said it while looking diagonally forward. The bob cut girl shakes her head and waves her hand around while saying sorry sorry. Seriously, I appreciate it. For me to be able to maintain such a mundane boring daily life, there’s no doubt that it is thanks to Ludi and Iori. Other than this place, I am already a center of attention after all. If I walk around the academy, the first years are avoiding me, while the second and third years students are always saying [is that him?] and the people who look like they were part of the LLL are looking at me with a gaze that has a mixture of fear, envy, and jealousy. And besides that….. I stare at Nanami. She expressionlessly standing beside Ludi, when she noticed my gaze she gave me a wink. She is being considerate of me. While I was talking to the boys, she separated and move away from her usual position. Then, I don’t know when they become so cozy with each other but not just Ludi, she can start a conversation with Katrina, Classrep and the other heroines from Magiero like normal. Since she’s like that, I think that recently Nanami also has her own fan as well. On our way here, I saw a male student who sighs in admiration while he looks at Nanami. Certainly, Nanami is beautiful. Some even regard her silky silver hair to be more beautiful than Ludi’s. And although they are not as big as Nee-san’s, her chest is big while her body is firm and tight. She also has an excellent style and a well-shaped hip. And most importantly her maid outfit. Due to her maid uniform, all her charm is raised even further. It can’t be helped that their eyes will be taken away by her. And it is inevitable for them to throw her master AKA me a look of envy. If those troublesome gazes continue into the classroom too then undoubtedly it will have an effect on me. I can ignore it to some extent but I don’t want to think about enduring it further in such a tight space. Ludi said that I will get used to it but I wonder when will I be able to achieve such enlightenment. “Ah, Takioto-kun. Come to think of it……” Said the bob cut girl from earlier. “What is it?” “Takioto-kun, the thing about you being related to Headmaster Hanamura……is it true?” “Ah, I am curious about that too !” I am a little surprised, I stare at the girl who joined the conversation. Iori’s step-sister, Hijiri Yuika. Soft curly brown hair with clear eyes. Her chest is at a moderate size and her cute demeanor is like a small animal. But personally, the most noticeable thing about her is that perfectly crafted smile on her face. The clerks all over the world should take her smile as their model. It is to the level that she could become an actress with it. “Eh, Yuika?” “Nii-san is also curious right?” Well, yeah. Iori said and make a bitter smile. “About Hanamura family huh. I wasn’t hiding it in particular though. Actually, my mother is a cousin of Marino-san. That makes Nee-san, not that, Hatsumi-sensei my cousin.” Yuika who looks excited with both her eyes wide open as if to say seriously?. “Nee-san eh?……you, you really are a young master from a good family huh.” Orange looks at me enviously while Yuika keeps cheering [Amazing Amazing.] After they heard my story it seems like they are thinking that I was brought up wrapped in cotton wool. But unlike Ludi, there’s nothing but turbulent in Takioto’s life. It doesn’t feel real to me at all though. However, I don’t really have to go out of my way to explain that. I don’t have to tell them about the death of my parents nor the fact that Marino-san is now my guardian, depending on how I say this they might find out that I am living together with Ludi after all. “Hey, Takioto. Treat us to something.” To what bob cut said, I shake my head. “Hey hey, just earn something yourself in the dungeon…..I can give you good advice after all.” “Eh really? That’s great, I’m really happy.” She must never think that I would actually give her anything since she said it so surprisingly. “Anyway, if you tell me which direction you want to improve yourself I can even come up with a training menu for you. It will be super harsh though!” “Yeah, I want one too!” Yuika followed up. She cutely smiles while hugging my arm. It is touching, it is really touching, but it is still fine even if it touches more. “That’s fine right?” “Well, yeah.” Of course, it’s fine. But at the same time, a question has been raised. Why is she trying to approach me so hard? Certainly, Yuika treated Takioto better than the other heroines in the game. But was she a character that approached him like this? What is the cause? The difference between the current me and Takioto from the game……? There certainly is a lot of that. Was it because I took first place in the school year and my relationship with the Hanamura family? If I take all of these into account then her action is explainable. “We were already taught a lot by him though……” “Yeah, the dungeon we dived into before was recommended by Kousuke too right?” “Ah, how was it? I think that place is really easy to hunt in….” “It was amazing!” Iori happily said with sparkling eyes. “Is, is that so.” For him to be this happy just because I recommended him a dungeon, he is going to make me blush. I have to introduce him to an even better dungeon next time. “Come to think of it, what are you going to do this afternoon? I want to consult a little something with you.” Said Orange. Perhaps he is worried about his own growth? I don’t mind listening to him though. “Aah, sorry. There’s a place I have to visit this afternoon.” “Really, where are you going?” “The Moon Palace (Gekkyuden).” As expected, Orange knows about that place. Aside from one person, everyone was astonished. She must have guessed it. Looking at this situation…….I think it is better to lay some groundwork while I can. “Eh, what’s the Moon Palace?” The sole person who doesn’t understand the situation, Yuika asked while tilting her head to the side. Her behavior looked like a calculated action. “Yuika. You know, inside this academy there are three groups that held great power. The Student Council, Public Moral Committee, and the Shikibukai.” The person who answered her was Iori. “These three committees, they recruit their members from the especially talented individual inside the student body.” “Hee, so there is something like that.” “Yeah, and you see….” Iori sweeps his eyes over all the gathered classmates. “The Moon Palace is those three committees headquarter. A place that normal students cannot enter.” POSTED ON NOVEMBER 23, 2019BY GRAVEROBBER.KUN The Moon Palace of the Tsukuyomi Academy is basically a place that no one can enter beside the members of the three committees, a special place exclusive for them. Some of the floors are open to the authorized students but only the members and some of the teachers are allowed to delve deeper inside the Moon Palace. Of course, I have never seen or visited before. I used to go their many times in the game though. When they told me to visit them I am not so sure that I can go there without getting lost. That must be why they offered a guide for me. “Thanks for waiting, Sempai.” “Don’t worry, aren’t you arrived five minutes earlier than the appointed time yourself?. I’ve just arrived here too...;..and.” Sempai’s eyes direct toward Nanami. That’s a natural reaction. Even I was surprised after all. “I will absolutely accompany him.” “That’s what she said, and I already got permission from Marino-san as well...;.” As I explain to Sempai, Nanami pulls out a card with the academy crest from between her valley. ...;...;.Why did you put it there? Moreover, when she pulled it out she acted like she intentionally does it to show off said valley to me too. You don’t really have to do that sexy anime move you know? But, it’s super erotic, I approve. “Hahaha...;...;...;there’s no problem then. Well, I will be there too so it should be fine. Well, it is a little early but shall we?” I and Nanami follow after the smiling Sempai into the transfer magic circle. The place could be described as a small palace. It is a rococo style building with white and blue as its base colors equipped with a garden full of beautiful blooming flowers. At the center of the garden is a fountain with a set of white tables and chairs. Rococo style architecture Thanks to the fact that I experienced the Hanamura house before, I am not that taken away by the scene in front of me. If normal students were to come here then they would undoubtedly be overwhelmed. As I was prompted by Sempai, I and Nanami stepped inside the palace. I walk down the glittering decorated hallway while letting out a small breath. Then I clench and open both of my tensed hands to let out the extra power that entered even if it is just a little bit. We walk a little further and Sempai stopped in front of the big door with the academy crest on it. I took a deep breath again but then I felt something hit my shoulder. When I reflectively turned around, a small pain ran through my cheek. Seems like Nanami just poked my cheek with her finger. “FuFun.” Seeing the triumphant smile on her face, I make a bitter smile. “Takioto.” Before I can say anything to Nanami, this time I turn to look at Sempai who called out to me. Then, I wonder why I felt the exact same thing I just felt. It seems like Sempai also poked me with her finger. “Sempai too...;...;..” I can only smile at this. Honestly speaking, I was a little nervous. Both because of the atmosphere of this place and the imagination of the thing that will happen after this. That’s why I am really grateful for their actions. “Sorry, I ended up doing it too.” “It can’t be helped so I will you let you off the hook this time Sempai.” What are you saying when you just wanted to loosen my tension. Hahaha, Sempai and I laugh together. Nanami doesn’t let out a single voice but she has a triumphant smile on her face. [Let’s move on.] Said Sempai, a little while later. Once I gave her a nod, Sempai opens the door. It seems like the main members are already assembled in the room. At my front are the student council president, Monika Mercedes von Mobius and her vice president Franziska Edda von Gneisenau. On my left, is the captain of the public moral committee, the saint. Stefania Scaglione. On my right side is the Lord of Shikibukai Benito Evangelista and his senior assistant Himemiya Shion. Behind them are the crest of the student council, public moral committee, and shikibukai respectively. They stay in their seats and stare at me. Once Sempai took her place next to the saint Steph, president Monika stood up. “Good afternoon, Takioto Kousuke-kun and...;...;” “I am the faithful maid in the employ of Kousuke Ghoshujin-sama, the supreme beautiful maid Nanami.” “...;...;...;Nanami-san.” Nanami takes out the card with the academy crest out from her pocket. Seeing so, Lord Benito whistled. “I see, as expected from a maid of Hanamura family.” “My apologies. However, I am not a maid in the service of the Hanamura house. I am exclusively serving to Takioto Kousuke-sama. I have no loyalty toward an old hag like Hanamura Marino. I was relieved that she didn’t pull that card out from her chest but the thing she said was pretty extreme. Hearing so, Lord Benito and Shion-san laugh. Vice president Gneisenau smiles bitterly while the president and the saint look at us with interest. “HoHo, you sure have an interesting subordinate, Are you perhaps interested in joining the three committees yourself?” “I have no such interest. My place is at Goshujin-sama’s side. That is all my desire.” “Is that right, I understand. Then, if I pull Takioto Kousuke to my side you will also come along, correct? Besides the individual I wanted, I can get another interesting one huh.” Hahaha, Shion-san laughs after she finished what she has to say. Her cheerfulness is unchanging from the game. “How about we leave the talk regarding Nanami at that?” Sempai said to the president and she gives her consent. “You’re right. Let me greet you again. Perhaps it is better if I say nice to meet you? I am the student council president Monika Mercedes von Mobius. You can call me Monika.” When the president said so, her vice president, Fran adjust her glasses. “I am vice president Franziska Edda von Gneisenau. You may call me Fran.” “Next is us right?” I turn my gaze to the left and met eyes with the saint. She stands up with a smile and gives me a small greeting. “Good day, I am the captain of the public moral committee Stefania Scaglione.” “It might be unnecessary but I am Muzumori Yukine, her vice-captain.” After Sempai introduced herself, this time the voice comes from my right-hand side. “Next is my turn. I am serving as the Lord (Shikibukyo) of the Shikibukai, Benito Evangelista. Nice to meet you Takioto-kun.” “Fufu, I am the senior assistant (Shikibutaifu) of the Shikibukai, Himemiya Shion.” “Pleasure to meet you, I am Takioto kousuke and this is Nanami.” “Yes, nice to meet you, Takioto-kun. I can interpret the fact that you are here that you want to join the three committees, correct?” Of course. I nod. It was written in the letter that Sempai handed to me. Should I want to join, give them a visit. The president looked at my affirmation and nod. “I see, I’m glad. I have heard a lot about you from Yukine. The duty of the three committees...;..do I need to explain it? Of course, I don’t mean the duties like the public moral committee protect the moral or the student council take care of the planning of the academy’s event or the Shikibukai’s duty to audit us.” “Of course...;...;there’s no need.” “Is that so, then I will skip the explanation. Yes, each of us at the student council, public moral committee, and the shikibukai all want you to join us. No...;.let me put this frankly.” After she said so, the president takes a small breath and stare at me with a sharp gaze like a carnivorous animal chasing its prey. “You have piqued my interest. You, The person who Yukine holds in such high regard.” POSTED ON NOVEMBER 23, 2019BY GRAVEROBBER.KUN “You have piqued my interest. You, The person who Yukine holds in such high regard.” The same moment her word reached me, a chill runs through my body. It was as if the area is filled with static electricity. The atmosphere itself is pricking at me. And not just that, my body started to tremble as the temperature rapidly lower. Furthermore, thanks to her swirling magical energy, the air around her are shaking like she was surrounded by a heat haze which made her figure looked quivering. President Monika crosses her arms and look at me with a sharp gaze. That’s not all. As if trying to overwhelm that magic power, Shion-san also directs her magic power toward me. A jet-black smoke emerges from Shion-san and starts floating around her. It slowly descends to her feet and gradually spreading, slowly eroding the floor. Shion-san looks at me with her eyes lowered. She must be as curious as president Monika. It is not as much as president Monika but a huge amount of magic power is surely being direct at me. This time, I feel another magic power rising from the other side, I think it is Sempai’s. However, this magic power wasn’t directed at me. It is wrapping around as if trying to protect me. That’s what I felt. It was like she was asking president Monika and Shion-san, what are they trying to do. Shion-san put her hand on the folding fan, her weapon and spread it to hide her mouth. Since it’s her then she is surely hiding a big smile behind that folding fan. “Fufu, Fufufufufufu.” Beside me, Nanami starts laughing. Everyone’s line of sight turned toward Nanami. “What is so funny, Nanami-san?” Nanami continues smiling after president Monika addressed her. “It is too funny, my stomach is hurting. To try intimidating Goshujin-sama with this amount of magic power is so funny that it gives me a stomachache.” Saying so, she performs a maid-like bow and looks at me. “Isn’t that right, Goshujin-sama?” Seriously, what are you doing? Gathering their expectations, increasing it and direct it back toward me. You are actually laughing on the inside right? But I don’t really hate this kind of burning situation. Rather, I should praise her for stirring things up. Since Nanami already laid the groundwork, let’s do this. “Haa~~” I sigh and shrug my shoulders. Then, I strengthened myself and put more magic power into the stole so that I can release it at any time. I intentionally raised the corner on one side of my stole. Now then, why don’t I overcome president Monika’s expectations? I keep sending in more, more and even more magical power. Without holding anything back, I gather together the absurd amount of magic power contained inside my body and let it scatter into the atmosphere. Fully intended to fill the entire room with it. There are various reactions. A look of surprise on vice president Fran’s face. “Fufufu, Ha Ha Ha Ha Ha.” Dispersing her own magic power, Shion-san let out a burst of laughter. Captain Steph was surprised but she managed to remain calm and put her hand on her wand so that she can act at any time. Lord Benito is still smiling but he stared at me with a sharp gaze, never cutting his own body strengthening magic. And Mizumori-sempai who somehow has a proud look on her face. Finally, president Monika calmly stands up and directs her gaze toward me. She shut her eyes and exhale. Then she slowly opens her eyes while erasing her magic power. Looking at her, I also lower my magic power and wait for her words. “That was great. You are truly wonderful...;.!” The president walks toward me with a wide smile. She stopped two heads away from me. She then sways her hair and looks at me. Looking at her closely you will notice. Naturally, she would have her own Fanclub. She’s beautiful, too beautiful. Each part of her face is like a piece of art, they are all composed at the best place possible. Everything is in harmony which increases her beauty many times over. “Takioto Kousuke-kun. How about joining the student council?” That took my breath away. Before I can say anything, I heard a voice from my right. “President Monika, aren’t we supposed to not extend our invitation to him in this meeting?” Said Lord Benito. He looks our way with his wonderful handsome(Ikemen) smile. As his eyes met with mine, he gave me a wink. Then. “Hey Takioto-kun, what about us Shikibukai? I have to apologize in advance but I have looked into you beforehand. You see, it looked to me like what you truly want is your own freedom correct?” “Well, I am happy that you offered me freedom.” To my reply, Lord Benito smile, and nod. “Certainly, thinking about the behind the scene role of the shikibukai you might have to stand out a little but you see, the shikibukai can provide you with freedom and if you join now, you can have Shion-chan, you know!!” “Fuhahahaha, Lord Benito, to think you would offer me as a bonus! Well, if we can get a subordinate like him then I will have to think about this.” “Oi, Shion. Enough with the joke.” Unexpectedly, Sempai scrunches her eyebrows and said so looking ill-humored. “Yukine, I understand that he is important to you so settle down. Takioto-sama, it seems like our Yukine wants you to join us...;..and right now, I am very interested in you.” “Please calm down everyone. Aren’t we all just invited him? Don’t we have the thing that we have to do before extending our invitation? Vice president Fran said so and everyone shut their mouths, each one of them has various kinds of expressions. “That’s right, let’s leave it at this.” Monika-san turns back and starts walking away. “It is very unusual, for each of the three committees to all want him like this.” As vice president Fran said so, president Monika returns to her seat. Then she sweeps her eyes at everyone. “Takioto Kousuke. Let’s ask you then.” As president Monika said that, the vice-chairman of every committee touches their crest on the wall behind them. Looking at them, captain Steph raises her voice. “The [Justice] and [Model] of the public moral committee.” The crest of the public moral committee shines while Mizumori-sempai and St.Stefania stand in front of it. “The [Model] and [Goal] of the student council.” Said president Monika as she standing next to the shining student council crest with vice-president Fran beside her. “Or the [Goal] and [Rivalry] of the Shikibukai.” Said Lord Benito who lined up next to Shion-san in front of the shining shikibukai crest. “Which one do you choose?” Asked president Monika in front of her shining crest. “The one I want to join is...;...;.” There was no need to ask. All of my action was all for joining them from the start. That’s why, without hesitation, the place I want to join is of course...;...;. “The Shikibukai.” “I want to give you a reward.” If a beautiful girl/woman said that to you, what would you think? First, you would doubt your ears right? Then once your brain processed those words, your brain will surely be filled with joy. Of course, that’s what I think as well. I have really worked hard lately. I won’t say it out loud but I tried my hardest. Obviously, I thought that it would be nice if I could get some kind of reward. However, “...;...;.?” Nee-san tilts her head to the side and looks at me as if she wanted to ask what’s wrong. So let’s ask that question again. What would you think about those words if the one who said that was Nee-san. She suddenly said that to me when I just got back from the lively discussion about the details of my welcome party with my two new sempais after I decided to join the Shikibukai. “Somehow my body feels really good today, my movements are so smooth, I feel mysteriously satisfied you know. is it just me being in top form?” Said Claris-san, after we finished our usual training. It happened after I took a bath and finished dinner. Nee-san entered my room looking extraordinary happy, she takes Marianne and sits down on my bed. “I want to give you a reward.” That’s what she said. Seems like she thought I didn’t hear her the first time from my lack of reaction, she repeated herself. “Ah, sorry. I heard you the first time.” Is it because I told everyone that I joined the Shikibukai or is this about the 40th floor–No, that doesn’t matter. For now, I have to do something about this situation. Well, when you hear the words [I want to give you a reward] from a [beautiful woman], you surely would be elated. Somehow my heart is beating like crazy and I have to reflectively swallow my saliva. But there’s a but. Along with said joy, I also get a sense of anxiety. It is what both my mind and body crave for but there is also a part of me that tries to reject it. It is a mysterious feeling. “Even if you don’t give me one, Nee-san has always helped me right? In the first place, the fact that I have Nee-san is the best reward I can get, you know.” I decided to answer so. This is the best answer I can think of. I can convey my gratitude toward Nee-san and also get the reward at the same time. What a perfect reply. There’s no mistake in that reply. I can’t come up with what I want right now anyway so I will let this conversation just naturally flow away. Nee-san slightly opens her eyes and rapidly blinks a few times. She got up and sat next to me. Then she places her hand on my head and gently pats it. What a wonderful reward. “I want to do something more. What should I do?” But it seems like I picked the wrong choice. What should I do? What should I ask of her? “Hmm, what Nee-san can do for me huh, I can’t think of any particular thing right now.” That was what came out of my mouth but it is actually the truth. It would be nice to have Nee-san teaching me magic but since there are things I want to do right now I want to save that for later. “Don’t you have anything you want?” “Even if you say that...;...;” Of course, there’s something I want, but that’s not something I should ask from Nee-san, it is something that I can get from the dungeon anyway. However, it doesn’t come out so easily and If I think about it then it might be nice to ask her for it. It just that if she has to go out of her way to buy it then I don’t want to trouble her. “...;..Then how about Nee-san giving me something that you no longer need and I can use?” “New one, I will buy it.” “No, what I have in mind is something that you don’t have to go out of your way to buy it for me.” In the first place, since she is patting my head right now, that is already a great reward in and of itself. That’s why it would kill two birds with one stone if Nee-san gives me her old stuff that I can use to cut the unnecessary expenses. On the contrary, perhaps this is more difficult than the first one? [Something I don’t need...;.] Nee-san muttered and tilts her head. “...;..what about eight kilos of diet goods that Luigia used when we were a student?” And why are you still holding on to them I wonder? “Hmm, I don’t think I want that. If I ever want it then I will ask for Luigia-sensei’s permission first.” Does she still have the pictures from that time, I wonder. If I try asking her and it turns out it is not something she wants to talk about I will stop. If it seems funny then I will have to ask her for more details though. “Something that Nee-san doesn’t need but I can still use...;...;.how should I put this, the feeling of getting your hand me down is kinda make me happy.” Something like stationery would be nice. It’s not expensive and I can use it too. “Consumables are fine with me too, and it would be good if it is something that has a practical use for it. Do you have something like that?” Nee-san starts mulling over it again. Perhaps I raised the bar a little too high? [Ah] Nee-san raises her head and looks at me. Then she does a little snort, and stare at me with a look of excitement on her face. “I do.” For Nee-san to get this excited, this is rare...;...; no, I feel like that happen a lot recently. “Something that I have no use for that can make Kousuke happy and have a practical use.” “Really!?” Nee-san shows off her chest by taking in a huge breath. She looks really confident. This must definitely be a good one! “Kousuke will definitely be happy with this.” “What is it!!” Now, I’m very excited. “Something that supported me, a wonderful item.” Support and wonderful? What is it I wonder? Is it a doll? Nee-san’s important doll that cheer her up just by looking at it? A powerful item that wonderfully supports her heart? If it’s that then I will have to take good care of it. “The beautiful thing that you will surely feel different once it’s gone.” Somehow, I kind of get a bad feeling about this. “...;...;.Umm, and that is?” “Brassiere.” “HOW DID YOU CAME UP WITH THAT IDEA! ?” What are you doing giving a brassiere to a man! What support!? How do I even use that! But I want it, I want it, I want it. “...;...;...;...;...;..!” Nee-san’s expression hasn’t changed much but I can tell that she is surprised. But then, as if she remembered something, she nods with an expression like she understood something. “It’s okay, I will make sure to use it before I hand it to you.” “Hoo, that’s a relie—...;...;...;..THAT’S NOT IT! THE BRASSIERE IS ONE THING BUT WHERE DID YOU GET THE IDEA OF GIVING ME THE USED BRASSIERE FROM!?.” “Mother told me that you would be happier if you get the used one.” Just what did she teach her daughter. I won’t deny the truth that I would be happier, if there were a poll for the gentlemen all across the country then surely the majority would combine their voices into the used bra army. Moreover. “In the first place, I want something unnecessary for Nee-san alright, that is something you need no matter how I think about it!?” How is it possible that it is not something she has a use for, you have to wear that everyday right? “It is a pair with my panty, but I already sacrificed it in the dungeon.” Ah...;...; “Um, umm you see. I, it certainly is something unnecessary for Nee-san but I don’t really have a use for it so...;..” “Like when you suddenly want to dress up as a woman...;...;” “NO WAY! NEVER!” “I think it would suit you.” “I WON’T DO IT EVEN IF IT SUIT ME!” “I see...;..” Why are you looking so disappointed? “Then, what should I do...;..?” “R, right.” Then it came to me, something with not that much of an expense. If we are talking about getting something for me then, “How about we go shopping together next week? I would be happy if you buy me a present at that time.” Isn’t it good if I came up with this from the start? She can buy me something that looks useful and inexpensive. At worst, she can just treat me to a meal. It’s a wonderful idea. “Leave it to me.” Nee-san gives me a thumbs up. The only thing I am worried about now is that [Leave it to me] she said with so much confidence that basically doesn’t sound reliable at all. How can a [Friend Character] like Takioto Kousuke benefit the [Protagonist] like Hijiri Iori? In terms of ability, it would be the amount of his magical power. Except for Iori, he has an overwhelmingly higher amount of magic power than Ludi, the Saint, or president Monika who were already considered characters that possess a high amount of magic power themselves. However, the amount of magic power he has to spend is also very large. A lot of players would avoid using him just by seeing the amount of his magic power that keeps decreasing despite him not doing anything. To some of the players, the fact that his magic power keeps decreasing like that is inconvenient. In a certain meaning since it could be considered to be his special power, so depending on how you use him he can be a useful character. Even so, because of the nature of an eroge, his usefulness is lower than the other female characters. Next is his face. From the heroines’ comment; he is pretty handsome if he can keep his mouth shut. His face is considered better looking than Iori who has cute facial features. That only applied to his face alone though. Now then, In the game, that is pretty much all the point that Takioto is better than Iori. There might be other points too but they are insignificant. Right now, there is one point that the current Takioto Kousuke has that is overwhelmingly left Iori in the dust. What is that you asked? It is money and power. At home, there is the person who is the embodiment of authority within the academy and the Magical Society, Hanamura Marino. That provided him with quite an influence. That influence is very helpful in making things run smoothly. If Marino-san hadn’t laid the groundwork for me, it wouldn’t be such smooth sailing. Now I am a member of the three committees, that will provide me with a new kind of power called the Shikibukai. With the power of the Shikibukai, my range of activities has expanded. Now I can access the dungeon that I want to visit. Then what about money? Money is a nice thing to have. If you could stock up on consumable items, you could hardly struggle with the early game monster even if you are underleveled and poorly equipped. I would never even consider such a high-level plan like solo capturing the Tsukuyomi dungeon if I haven’t possessed such money. If I didn’t have the money, there’s no doubt that I would have gone to other dungeons to earn some first. I have earned the money in the game before so there shouldn’t be a problem if I allocate some time to do it. If I have the time that is. There are many ways to earn a huge amount of money like doing an RTA but some of the methods are quite morally wrong. In a lot of meanings, the method that is quite impressive is that [Store] event. In Magiero, you can own your own [Store] depending on the event you encounter. In that store, you can sell your used equipment and the like to other students and adventurers. When I consider making my own store, I can’t see myself doing it considering the time and risk (monetary) it will take. Iori might though. Iori has some leeway from hunting the monsters but that is still a very small leeway. He surely has a lot of expenses. Money to upgrade his equipment, consumable items, and advancing the event. Just by thinking about it, I can come up with a lot of things. If Iori makes his own store then I will definitely give him a visit and buy his merchandise. It would be nice to help around his store too. On that point, I have an advantage over him. There are weapons lying around the Hanamura house and I have that incredible amount of pocket money too. Also, the reward for soloing the 40th floor of Tsukuyomi dungeon is also tremendous. The awarded points and the point I got from selling off the magic stones and equipment I gathered, I have a tremendous amount of Tsukuyomi points. I would have to turn in the points for the money if I want to use it outside the academy but it has quite a cost considering the conversion fee and the exchange rate. Realistically speaking, the revenue of owning a condominium alone is on the level that you can play around without doing anything. “Based on that...;...;...;.how should I plan out my future.” Since I have both money and authority, there are a lot of things I can do. However, there will definitely be some deviation. The event of the three committees is very different depending on the faction you join. Moreover, depending on your recommendation, the people who will later join the three committees will also change. If you haven’t done a very difficult task of flag management, there will surely be a situation where you have to shout [Why the hell did you join that faction!!] Also, even if I joined the Shikibukai, I can still get the events of the other factions. However, depending on the faction you joined, the content of those events will also change. Some events exclusively belong to the public moral committee and the student council as well. Now, the most uncertain factor for the events of the three committees is undoubtedly me. I am concerned that some events will not occur because of the fact that I, the embodiment of uncertainties has joined the three committees. If that’s the case then I might have to forcefully advance the event myself. If I don’t do that then there’s a possibility that the event’s content will become troublesome later and since I have become a member of Shikibukai, it is better to work myself toward that. However, there are events that will almost certainly occur. It is an event that will never occur unless you join the Shikibukai. You could say that it is a compulsory event. If it’s her then she will come charging in. She will definitely be charging in. She has been behaving herself until recently. However, if the grades are public and she knows that I took first place in the entire school year then she will definitely stop behaving herself. The person that can be paired up with Shion-san in terms of their disregard for the academy uniform. A domineering Ojou-sama that wears the dress all year long with a croissant-like drill hairstyle. That character who could pull off a high-pitched laugh. Iori from the game said it himself, she is...;...;...;...;.. My train of thought broke when I heard someone knocking on the door. It was Ludi. “Kousuke, are you ready?” That’s right. Today is the ramen outing with Ludi. Although the sun is shining brightly, the weather isn’t hot. When I stretched my hand toward the blue sky, the sleepiness and tiredness in me disappeared and I felt my body became lighter. It is a good but strange feeling. I left the house with Ludi, she is walking beside me looking elated. The occasional winds sway her beautiful blond hair. The scent of the hair treatment she usually uses envelop that air around us. She brushes away the hair that got in her eye and takes a small breath. “The wind is nice.” “...;...;Yeah.” I think it’s a great day out. Ludi has been in a good mood since we left the house but her mood is still getting better after she starts walking under this clear sky. We found a cat lazily stretching its limbs while basking in the sun. It looked so lazy, such an action wouldn’t look good on a human but it would look so cute on a cat, it’s kinda unfair. Seeing Ludi who stare at the cat with a cheerful smile and twitching her ears in tune with its tail, there’s nothing to describe it but unfair. Unfortunately, the ~yaaNyaa sound she tried to imitate and will never reach the cat. My heart on the other hand, not to mention reaching it, it almost knocks me out by a critical hit. Honestly, I want to respond to that sound myself but since right now I can only reply with the *Buhi Buhi* sound like a pig so I guess keep watching her do that from the side might be best. I check the time when we arrived in the downtown area. “Want to take a detour?” I asked. “We would have to line up because of the lunchtime rush if we go now after all.” Hearing so, Ludi nodded. However, there’s still a problem. I said that I want to avoid the queue but I don’t have any other destination to go in particular. Thinking about this now, it might be better if I took a good look at the plan that Nanami made for me. [Since I am worry about Goshujin-sama, I haven’t been able to sleep for seven hours. That’s why I came up with the plan for today. You could say that it is nothing less than the bestest plan there is.] She said that before I meet up with Ludi and left the house and handed me a piece of paper. I thought that there’s no need to worry but since she said that it is nothing less than the best plan there is...;.. [HAVEN’T YOU SLEEPING WELL LAST NIGHT!] I insert a retort there but inside I had some expectations for it. However, the content of the plan was seducing Ludi and take her directly to the hotel so I immediately tore it up and give it back to her. Moreover, the part where Nanami accompany us to the hotel for some reason was retort-worthy in itself. But in the off chance that a miracle like snow in summer happened and she seriously writes the rest of the plan, I may have wasted a good material. “Ludi, do you have anywhere you want to go?” “Let me see...;.” Saying so, she takes a look around. The place that her eyes stopped at was unexpectedly a supermarket. “Let’s go over there.” “Sure, let’s go.” Supermarket huh. Why is it the supermarket I wonder? Ludi is an Ojou-sama. It might just be my opinion but it seems like a supermarket is a place far away from her daily life. I think she couldn’t normally visit such an ordinary place like this. Since she never set her foot in a convenience store or the like before, that must be the same for the supermarket. Does she want to visit those commoner-like places? I thought about asking her to be sure but...;...;...;...;she immediately went straight to the cup ramen corner with a serious expression. There’s no doubt left in my mind now. I look at Ludi who has cup ramen in both hands while examining it. Today her long blond hair is braided into a half-up hairstyle different to her usual hairstyle that let her long hair flowed behind her back with a single braid on the side. Thanks to that, I am able to enjoy her white and beautiful nape. She often uses that hairstyle when she wears her plain clothes I think it looks very good on her. Well, no matter how she dressed her beauty would make it look good on her anyway. Maybe she noticed that I have been staring at her, Ludi turns to look at me while tilting her head. “I think that hairstyle looks good on you.” “Really. Thanks.” She gave a curt reply and takes her eyes back to the shelf again but I saw it. Her serious expression has turned to a smile. We bought a few cup ramen despite the fact that we are going to a ramen store after this. I put them in a bag and left the supermarket. Seeing the leaflets saying that the Daikon is on sale on our way out, we start discussing what pickled vegetables is the best dressing for ramen. “Daikon is good an all but cucumber is delicious too.” “Radish and turnip are great too you know. When we were talking, I saw a doll similar to Marianne in a store. We keep going to our destination, the ramen store. It seems like I was right to avoid the lunchtime. There is only a small line formed in front of the usually crowded store so we shouldn’t have to wait long. Ten minutes later, we entered the store. “Let’s try the most popular menu first!” The most popular menu here seems to be the thick and oily miso ramen. Ludi orders it with sparkling eyes. I look at her who keep staring at the menu while humming even after she had already placed her order. It seems like she is fully looking forward to the next time we come here. Thinking about ordering something different, I was thinking about ordering light miso ramen. Then, my eyes turn toward the menu Ludi is looking at. Ludi has no likes or dislikes. Whether it is full of oil or lots of garlic, she would just ask for a refill anyway. There should be nothing she can’t eat this time as well. Also, when we visit a ramen place together, Ludi is always more talkative than usual. This time is no exception. “And you see, by using a special magic you can make instant ramen without losing any of the taste at all, you know.” “Since when have you become such a ramen expert...;...;...;...;.” And the topics are not only limited to the ramen-related one either. “You see, Rina-san just kicked Orange-kun the other day.” Her daily life, the movie she saw, the book she read, she has fun talking about everything. Seeing her like that make me smile. It was a few minutes after that when the ramen was served. As she expectantly waiting for it, she looked at it with sparkling eyes. Like she was attending some memorial ceremony, she straightens her posture and faces her ramen. The oily reddish-brown soup, the yellow and gray noodle. The dish is garnished with vegetables, egg full of flavors, and a big slice of Chashu (TLN: Slice of pork.) Then what about mine? The soup was less as oily, the noodles were more yellowish. It seems mine has more Chashu than Ludi’s though. Ludi said her [Itadakimasu] and scoop up a spoonful of soup. She takes in its scent before putting it in her mouth. “Such a violent taste...;...;” That’s what she said. Like her, I also scoop up the soup and put the soup along with the Negi (TLN: green leek) floating in it to my mouth. Since we ordered different things, it’s natural that our impressions are different. The word that I think should be describing this would be elegant. The addition of Negi also enhanced the taste of the soup. After I enjoy eating some of the noodles, I try the Chashu this time. It was very soft and melted in my mouth, spreading the taste throughout. “The fact that Chashu didn’t take away the taste of the ramen deserves a lot of points.” “To be able to bring out the delicious taste of the meat that complement the dish itself, it could be said that it is nothing less than the best match.” Saying so, Ludi stares my Chashu. On the other hand, I also stare at Ludi’s Chashu. Looking closely, isn’t her Chashu’s thickness different than mine? Maybe Chashu’s taste is varying on its thickness? If so, what’s a great dedication from the chef. I look at Ludi’s face again. She is making a serious expression while her eyes are still sparkling. Does she want to try mine? “Take it.” She stretches out her hand adorned with the green ring and take my Chashu. She then drinks the soup with no hesitation and brought a Chashu to her mouth. “The taste of the meat is spreading in my mouth...;...;!” Seeing her like that brings a smile to my face. She is really a girl who can eat ramen so happily. Why does a woman who can eat her meal so deliciously look so cute? Just by looking at her, not only my stomach is full, my heart as well. “Nn, why are you staring at me? Do you want to eat this?” “Then, just a little.” Saying so, I try her soup and eat my ramen. After I ate all the noodles, I was wondering what to do with the soup. “That’s right”, Ludi said. “Kousuke might already but...;...;...;...;.this morning, Yukine-san gave me an invitation.” Aah, I nod. “I...;...;...;..think I will join the public moral committee.” “That’s great.” Personally, I think that it is great for Ludi to join the three committees. Of course, considering her position as an imperial princess, I think the Shikibukai wouldn’t suit her. However, there won’t be a problem if she joins either the student council or the public moral committee instead. She will even get a good evaluation after she graduated. “Yukine-san invited me personally but it seems like she hasn’t consulted with Saint Scaglione yet though.” “It’s okay, you will be fine Ludi. The saint herself wouldn’t oppose this either.” “What are you assuring me for.” The saint probably doesn’t care about this anyway. Of course, I won’t tell her that though. “Subjectively speaking, you would be a fool not to join and objectively speaking, I can only say that you definitely have to join them.” She has very good grades, the same goes for her popularity and her capability in combat. She is the best candidate, subjectively or objectively. “I know you Ludi. I would oppose it if you are going to join the Shikibukai but I think you would be a great addition to the student council or the public moral committee. If you want to grow stronger then especially so. If you are going to join I will definitely cheer you on. We can do our best together there.” “Yes, about that.” Ludi gives the bowl to the waiter after she finished her ramen. “What do the three committees do exactly?” She probably doesn’t mean the official duty here. I look around and take a small breath. “...;..Let’s talk about this somewhere else.” ——— “Welcome, please take your time.” Said the woman wearing clothes with Asanoha pattern. She gave us a bow and leave the room. We are currently alone in a Japanese style room that she led us to. Asanohana I started eating the matcha cheesecake and ask Ludi. “I asked you before but how much does Ludi know about the three committees?” “The student council manages the academy’s event like the Tsukuyomi tournament right? The public moral committee is pretty much self-explanatory?” I nod. “And the duty of the Shikibukai is auditing them. The rest is behind the scene works.” Well, you can find out about this just by looking at the Academy’s rule on Tsukuyomi Traveller. Only until this part that is. “Now then, Ludi might already know about this but do you know that there is more to the duty of the three committees?” “I have an idea, yes. Seeing Kousuke joining the Shikibukai confirmed my guess. The people who know Kousuke are probably noticing something as well.” Like Iori-kun or Rina-chan, Ludi added. Certainly, if it’s those two then they might have an idea about this. In the first place, Iori seems to be seen as a promising student in the subordinate organization of the student council so he should know about it soon enough. “That’s right. They actually have more hidden roles to play.” “So it’s true...;...;” “So, their roles...;...;..Hmmm, guess I will have to start from the beginning. There are words to describe each of their hidden roles. The public moral committee is the [Justice] and [Model], the student council is [Model] and [Goal], and the Shikibukai is [Goal] and [Rivalry]. “Their’s roles are overlapping?” “That’s right. Each of them has different roles to play, but they actually have one goal in common. All of those roles are there to achieve a certain purpose.” “A purpose?” “Yes, it is to improve the ability of the academy’s student.” “...;...;That sounds normal isn’t it?” “Of course, it is normal. But isn’t that why the academy exists in the first place?” After they graduated, they would become researchers or join the Knight Order. There are even those who become adventurers and set out to explore the New World or those that become dungeon specialists. What each and every one of them wants most is to improve their abilities. That was why the magic academy was created. “Right.” “Now, I will explain each of their roles one by one.” “First, I will start with the public moral committee. ...;...;Well, Sempai will explain it to you later anyway so I will keep it short. The [Model] part is just as it sounds. Its meaning is to be an example for the student to follow. And [Justice], well, I think I don’t have to explain much about that. They are there to protect the public moral of the academy. However, they still have another duty...;...;.I will let Sempai explain that to you in detail later.” “From Yukine-san? ...;...;I understand.” I take a breath and put the matcha parfait to my mouth. “Okay, next is the student council’s role...;...;. It is to become an ideal” “Ideal?” “Yeah, to make it easier to understand...;...;...;. Well, what do you think is the best way to improve the students’ abilities?” “It’s vague so it’s hard to answer. Umm...;..how about studying, training and challenging the dungeon?” “That’s right, but there’s something else.” I nod while taking a bite at my parfait. Then I pull the spoon out as I did with my sword and sheath it back into the ice cream. “Training and studying have its own type.” “Type?” “Yeah, there are good training and bad training, it will determine how much you can improve yourself.” “I kind of understand what you wanted to say.” Ludi said that and put her fork back on the plate. “In short, you want to say that training in a good environment with a good teacher is better than a normal training right?” “Yeah, that’s right. The student council and the Shikibukai share their roles to create that environment.” “What do you mean?” “It is the student council and the Shikibukai’s duty to encourage the student to improve themselves. Yes, it is their duty to manage the important factor that affects their improvement, their [Motivation].” There are children that keep improving themselves from receiving praises and children that turn their anger into power. If there are children who are easy to motivate by their friends and goal, then there are children that need to set an enemy as their goal to be motivated as well. “For example, You are studying in the library, if you see a Sempai you love and admire you would want to try harder right? There are also those that study with all your might because you don’t want to lose to a guy they hate because he is always lazing around all day and still get top grades.” “I see...;..I get it.” “Yeah, [Model] and [Goal], that’s the role of the student council. The one who becomes the target of the students’ admiration and acts as the ideal for them to aim for, that’s the student council. Also, at times they stand on the students’ side, praise them and give a pat on their back.” “I see, if the student council acts as [their goal and their target of admiration] then the Shichibukai act as the [enemy] for them to overcome...;...;right?” “Yes, it is as you say. The roles of the Shikibukai are [Goal] and [Rivalry]. This is the reason that they intentionally act as the villain and gather the hatred from the students, [becoming their enemy as well as their goal].” “Since Kousuke joined the Shikibukai, I thought that they are not actually evil but all of the stunt you pulled to appear as a bad guy up to now was intentional for this purpose right?” Well, it was the setting of the game after all. It won’t work in a normal school, and normally you can’t even put it into practice in the first place. “Additionally, besides becoming the enemy of the student, the Shikibukai also has a different role to play. That role might be what is actually important to the public moral committee and the academy as well.” “Another role?” “Yeah, it is to unite the students together and protect the academy’s public order.” “Unite and protect?” “You can unite them by having them share a common goal but it is still better to unite them by creating their common enemy. It is easy to unite people using grudge and jealousy after all. Moreover...;...;.” “Moreover...;...;..?” “An enemy of an enemy is a friend right? That’s why the Shikibukai gathered hate toward themselves so much that the students don’t have any left toward each other.” Well, sometimes this also backfires toward them so they have to rely on the other committees though. Ludi’s eyes slightly narrowed. “Then, isn’t the Shikibukai a dangerous place to be...;...;?” “That’s exactly why there’s a condition to join them. You have to possess overwhelmingly unrivaled power or some kind of authority outside of the academy to join them.” Ludi nod and use her fork to cut her cheesecake. “Being a part of Hanamura family and powerful enough to soloed the 40th floor...;..surely, there’s nothing you can’t handle. But that still doesn’t mean that it is completely safe right? Like if someone were to challenge you to a duel.” “That will happen eventually, yeah.” There’s a high chance that someone will start something with me when they announce that I will join the Shikibukai. I will have to lay some groundwork with my classmates beforehand. “However, the upperclassmen are now allowed to challenge the first year to a duel for now. There’s no need to worry, there’s no one who’s gonna challenge me anyw—-Ah.” “...;..I think I just heard some disturbing sound.” “N, No. it’s nothing. Besides, I will probably win anyway.” I forgot about that domineering drill-haired Ojou-sama. That girl...;...;.I kinda feel anxious about facing her. W, well, the future me will do something about her anyway. “Wait a minute, why is your face getting paler...;...;.?” “It’s nothing, I’m fine. Yup, totally fine. Alright, let’s get back to the topic. Umm, I was talking about the Shikibukai right?” “You are not okay at all...;..if something is bothering you then just tell me.” “Thanks, I will rely on you when the time comes.” But if it comes to that girl then I might not be able to rely on you though. “Well, the Shikibukai has a bit of a special role to play. They are hated and there are some hidden sides too. That’s why there’s a faction who has to secretly protect us from behind the scene.” “I know, the public moral committee right?” “Well, yes. On the surface, we may have to look like an enemy but in actuality, they are tight together. To gather all the hate from the students, they have to include the student council into their act as well. Then they can celebrate a job well done after that.” “Don’t tell me, the scene when we first saw them was also...;...;” Does she mean when I explained the matter about the three committees to Iori? Of course. “Yes, that was an act.” Ludi let out a small sigh. “Just hearing that, it made me think the public moral committee’s [Justice] isn’t that just after all.” That’s a good point. “Well, about that. There’s actually more to it than that but let’s leave it at this for now. She should roughly understand the outline already. Well, I didn’t mention the fact that they are competing under the surface or [The True Role] of the three committees though. I will leave explaining that [True Role] to the president after we captured the 60th floor. “Alright, now I can focus on my parfait.” I dig into the matcha ice cream and put it in my mouth. Then a little later, Ludi finished her matcha cheesecake and mutter. “Eating sweets like this make me want to eat more ramen...;...;.Wai-, I’m already full so I won’t okay? Stop looking at me like that.” POSTED ON DECEMBER 2, 2019BY GRAVEROBBER.KUN “Welcome, to the Shikibukai!” Lord Benito said and open the door. Inside, Shion-san greets me with a wide smile and welcome me with open arms. “HaHaHa, Welcome, Welcome!” “Sorry about this, Takioto-kun. You came all this way and there are only the two of us here.” Lord Benito said so apologetically and close the door after I and Nanami entered the room. “Well, the Shikibukai is basically just us anyway. There are others who would come if we call but it seems like they can’t make it today.” Certainly, in the game, I was often involved with these two. The other two...;..I should be able to meet them soon enough. “It would be nice if we have president Monika here though.” “Lord, we planned about Shikibukai’s future with him after this right!? We don’t need her here. Well, if she wants to come then she would be here without us inviting her anyway...;...;.” “Yeah, it wouldn’t be weird if she suddenly shows up. But we will have a joint welcoming party at a later date anyway, she might be able to endure it you know.” I sit down on the chair that Shion-san pulled out for me while Nanami politely declined. Shion-san then went to the other side of the room and start preparing tea for us. Nanami immediately goes to her side and start helping. No, she practically took over. Shion-san heads back toward me and takes her seat. On the table in front of me is a well-made wooden box. There are confectioneries wrapped in colorful Japanese paper. It is definitely a luxury item. “Actually, I want to close down the cafeteria for this but since we still haven’t announced it so...;.” “No, your hospitality so far is already amazing.” “Ohh, stiff stiff too stiff! Speak with us like you would your family! Right, you can just call me Shion! Nanami-dono too.” Nanami served me the tea and nod. “Understood, Shion-sama. However, you don’t need to add an honorific when addressing me.” “Then I will call you Shion-san. You can call me without an honorific as well.” Since I’ve been calling her Shion-san for so long, it’s a little hard for me to change now. Still so stiff...;...;...;...;...;muttered Shion-san. “Then should I call you Takioto from now on...;...;.no, wait a minute, I will just call you Kou then.” I’m looking forward to the reaction at the next meeting, Shion-san said so and laugh. “You can simply call me Benito as well. My little sister is also a student here too after all.” L, little sister...;...;.. No, I like her enough for her to be my waifu but when it comes to her...;...;...;” “You don’t want us to confuse you with your little sister right? Understood, Lord Benito.” Un Un, Lord Benito noded and thanks Nanami for the tea. “Thank you, Nanami-san.” He still added it even though she said that she doesn’t need the honorific. Well, that’s what Lord Benito would do. Even in the game, the only person who he never used an honorific on was his sister. Well, he might do it when he was acting as the Shikibukai but I can’t remember every little thing. “Now then, let’s get to the main topic.” “It is about the Shikibukai’s job.” “You seem to be aware of the hidden role of the Shikibukai but do you know what we actually do? Don’t get surprised when you hear it...;...;...; “ Lord Benito said with a serious expression. “Actually...;...;...;we don’t really do anything!” His serious expression broke into laughter. Shion-san who sits next to him is also the same. “People are interesting you know, once they hate you so much, most of your actions always seem to be irritating to them.” “Right, I know that feeling too well. Hahaha!” “If you become hated then as long as you did not do anything drastically then their feelings will never change. You can do whatever you want.” “We have to stir them up some time though.” “Well, if we can raise their motivation by doing that then I will stir them up as much as they want. That’s right, I’m sure it is a needless worry for you Takioto-kun but I have something that I want to ask you.” “What is it?” Lord Benito nod and continue. “Can you endure it?” “Endure it?” “Yes, that’s right. You are already the center of attention of the entire academy. Your appearance, relationship, and ability. I think they already attracted something close to malice from the start though.” Well, they looked at me like that ever since the matter with Ludi too. I don’t particularly mind though. “However, you might be receiving the malice that is incomparable to before.” “The Shikibukai has performed its duty long before we became its members. They have been accumulating the hatred for a long loooong time.” “That’s why we are the [Rivalry]. You can still turn back. However, after you officially joined us, you can never back down. You will become their nemesis until you graduated.” Something like that, I already knew. “You don’t have to ask me that...;...;..I will be in your care from now on.” “Hou, I see I see! ...;..What about you Nanami? Have you changed your mind?” “I am honored by your invitation but I have no plan to increase my station beyond being Goshujin-sama’s maid.” It seems like Nanami won’t join the Shikibukai no matter what. Well, since she will be accompanying me when I work as a member of Shikibukai anyway, she is practically a member already. “Speaking of which, is it okay for Nanami to be here?” “Aah, It’s fine. Nanami-san has that card after all. Depending on the situation, she might have more power than a Lord like me.” Normally, Nanami would show off the card and make a [FuFuun] sound but today we are not with Ludi and Sempai but Shion-san and Lord Benito instead. However, why does she have that...;...;...;...;? Well, knowing it’s Marino-san, she must gave it to her as a follow up for me...;...;..that person is overprotective so I am really in her debt. “In the first place, the Shikibukai is different than the student council or the public moral committee. We have a lot of unique members so having a personal maid wouldn’t be that weird.” “Rather, it might be a good idea to use that to anger the other students on purpose. I think it is already in effect though.” “That’s true.” I nod. Nanami knew about what I’m trying to do even before I joined the Shikibukai so she was doing that on purpose. I think the main reason is that she finds their reactions funny though. “Now then, When should we announce Takioto-kun’s recruitment?” Shall we announce it tomorrow? Is that okay with you?” “Yes, there’s no problem.” I already laid some groundwork with my classmates today. It should be alright even if I become Takioto Kousuke, the member of Shikibukai. Probably. “Then will we announce it on the bulletin board?” “Yeah...;..I will ask the newspaper to cover it too. Come to think of it, Takioto-kun, are you hiding the fact that you are a part of the Hanamura house?” “No, I am not it just that...;...;.I never tell it to anyone since no one asked, that’s all.” “I see.” Said Lord Benito. He was closing his eyes and crossed his arms but eventually, he opens his eyes and smile. “Then should we make that as the big announcement? It seems fewer people know about it than you thought after all.” “Yes, I don’t mind.” “Right. I didn’t know about it until Yukine told me as well.” I didn’t talk much about it but I am not hiding it or anything. It seems like there are a lot of people who don’t know more than I thought. “I want to advertise you as much as possible, Takioto-kun.” “Then shall we ask the Tsukuyomi Academy Newspaper to cover that too?” “Nice. we can leave it to those girls. Ah, my apologies. Continuing the talk without asking you like that.” “No, it’s alright. I have already predicted this after all.” I already know about their agenda after all. I also knew that the Academy’s newspaper is also in cahoot with the three committees. “Okay, then I will go and ask them myself. Even so, it seems like I haven’t done such a Shikibukai job in awhile. Hahaha.” “Right, we haven’t been doing anything major lately. We have been secretly helping the student council and the public moral committee though. Speaking of which, you piled up a lot of work for them when you soloed the 40th floor, you know.” “Yes, I already apologized to Sempai for that...;...;.” “Don’t mind it, there’s no need for you to apologize to her. Since you did such an impossible task. It’s normal that we have to do that much work. Well, the saint was irritated because you increased her workload but that is always the case anyway.” HaHaHa, Shion-san said so and laugh. And as if she suddenly remembered something she said: “Oh, that’s right.” “Come to think of it, it seems like the public moral committee will have a new member. A big one too.” “Yes, you are talking about Ludi, right? I heard that Sempai asked the person herself.” “Hee...;...;” Benito-sempai said so and smile. “What is it, Lord? Smiling like that.” “Well, you know. An idea just came to me. Well, I thought about it ever since vice-captain Mizumori made her announcement but now I am convinced...;...;...;Fufu.” “...;...;You are acting weird. What are you thinking.” “Let’s keep that as a secret. Right? Takioto-kun.” “What do you mean?” “You see, I have something to ask you.” “Ask me?” “Yeah, that’s right. It is fine if you just tell me what you know. Are there any promising students who are worthy to join the three committees within the first year?” Thinking about that, there are many names that come up. If it’s about ability alone then it would be Katrina, if I included the personality then it would be the classrep. If it is both ability and cunningness then it would be Yuika, the same goes for Lord Benito’s little sister. However. “There are actually a lot of promising people but there is one of them that is especially amazing.” However, the best one among them is him. “Please be sure to remember this name, Shion-san, Lord Benito. If you are talking about his potential alone then he has the same level as president Monika.” The person who is not losing to the three strongest like Sempai and the first saint. “...;...;..is there such a monster beside you?” “...;...;...;this is interesting.” So they are treating me like a monster huh. “Yes, he is definitely an ace. Right now, he is only a little famous but he will eventually stand out more and more from now on.” “That’s definitely interesting...;.. Just who is it?” Since his demon subjugation was featured on the Academy’s newspaper before, “The Shikibukai should hear about him before, even more so for the student council.” He is someone who is talented in close combat, long-range magic, skill learning and growth capability. The person who is excellent in everything, the protagonist of Magical★Explorer. “Hijiri Iori.” —— Author Note: The Shikibukai seems like fun...;...;...;...;.By the way, other than Lord Benito and Shion-san, the Shikibukai also has two other members from the second year and third year. I want to introduce one of them soon but when should I introduce the other one...;...;...;...;. ——————- The official appointment ceremony for me to be a part of the public moral committee was completed after the afternoon class when the other students start returning to their home. “Sorry about this Ludi, you must be surprised right?” “I heard a little from Kousuke before but...;...;...;yes, I am still surprised.” It was as I heard about it from Kousuke. The three committees I thought were in conflict with each other are actually working harmoniously together. Furthermore, the Lord of the Shikibukai who I thought that he would be the most hated person is actually the best mood maker of the three committees. Looking at the students who are heading back to their dorm, Sempai let out a sigh. “The freshmen this year have it hard huh...;..” “Is that so?” “Yeah, it is. You have a guy who can solo the 40th floor and invited to join the three committees you know?” I let out a dry laugh. “that’s true.” Fufu, Yukine-san laughs. “Right, It’s like they got hit directly by a typhoon and stuck in a slump.” He is probably going to start something again, she complained about it but it seems like she isn’t against it herself. “Thanks to him, the atmosphere around the first year students is completely different than last year. And since he joined the Shikibukai so he will become even more of the center of attention than before too.” Certainly, he will definitely become the center of attention. And in a bad way as well. He is the one who thought that he himself is an inferior, he who is actually just an idiot inside, he who skipped the classes and rarely come to the academy, even so, he has accomplished something that even the students on advanced years can’t do, not to mention the first year. And Kousuke who despite all that only said sorry that he has troubled us and treats everyone else jokingly. That’s why the current evaluation from people who don’t know him is [An Ominous guy who has real ability]. His accomplishment of soloing the 40th floor has improved the opinion of him a little though. However, because he joined the Shikibukai, the opinion of him that finally improved will be lower again. Moreover, he will have to do things that will get more people to start outrightly despise him from now on. But Kousuke won’t care about it. I can say that with confidence. It was the same when I was the source of that hatred. The petty rumors and slanders only serve as a tailwind that boosts him further. A normal person would be swept away by the flow, stumbling, stop advancing and start hiding away from it. But Kousuke is different. For him, something like that is just a gentle breeze. After Nanami joined him, he seemed to be enjoying the reactions of other students too. Rather, he used that wind like a bird soaring through the sky. That’s the impression I have. No, Kousuke is already flying high. He is the one who gave us the wings of possibility. “He is amazing...;.Kousuke. I have to try harder too.” “...;.I think that Ludi is amazing too you know.” “Me too?” “Comparing you to Takioto, I can’t help but think like that right?...;...; In the first place, you also joined the three committees yourself right, Ludi” Saying so, Sempai takes a look at her Tsukuyomi Traveller. “It’s time. Let’s head to the bulletin board. It’s about time for the announcement.” I nod and start walking toward the bulletin board. The students on their way back to their dorm stopped their feet to look at what is being announced at the bulletin board. The three female students nearby look at it with their eyes wide, their mouth hanging open. Looking at the brooch on their uniform, they seem to be third-year students. One of them mutters. “It’s a joke right?” “...;I have never heard of someone being appointed so early before.” They said such a thing while looking up at the bulletin board. I took my eyes off them and look at the board. —- The following person is now appointed as the Vice-President of the Shikibukai in the position of [Junior Assistant]. First-year: Takioto Kousuke. Lord of the Shikibukai, Benito Evangelista. —- “Wai, wait a minute.” Suddenly, a woman shouted in surprise. In her hand is the Tsukuyomi Traveller, she flusteredly shook the shoulder of the female student next to her. “Hey, look at Tsukuyomi Traveller.” “What, it just the Shikibukai stuff right?” “It is but that’s not it. Takioto...;.-kun...;.he is a member of that Hanamura house.” When I heard her, I took out my own Tsukuyomi Traveller and read the breaking news that just came in. Yukine-san also reading it by peeking from my side. –Tsukuyomi News Report– Breaking news! The Lord of the Shikibukai, Benito Evangelista has appointed a first-year student, Takioto Kousuke-kun as his vice-president in the position of his [Junior Assistant]. He is the great-grandchild of His Excellency Hanamura Ryuuen and the cousin of our very own Prof.Hanamura Hatsumi. Previously, he has captured the 40th floor of Tsukuyomi dungeon solo within only one week, making a new capture record. It is rumored that he is being appointed due to said achievement. The Tsukuyomi Academy Newspaper has an interview appointment with Takioto Kousuke-kun. If you are interested in this story please check us out at Tsukuyomi Academy Newspaper! Tsukuyomi Magic Academy Newspaper. Nanami looks around and takes a small sigh. “Look at this Goshujin-sama. A group of those lower life forms is looking our way.” Was it because of the official announcement? I feel like I am getting a lot more attention than before. I don’t think the situation changed that much though. Was it because I am originally the center of attention in the first place? Rather, “Oi, haven’t you returned to your default setting?” Even so, what a nostalgic word. When we first met she wanted to call everyone besides me a lower life form. Rather, this is the first time I saw someone using the word lower life form to call someone outside of anime and manga. “No, of course, Normally I would not be using such a word to describe a person like that. I just call the lower life forms as the lower life forms they are after all. For me, everything that looks down on or is hostile toward Goshujin-sama is categorized as a lower life form though…….? “Can you stop replying it like it is a matter of course? I’m happy that you think so much about me though.” Well, since she only highlighted the word lower life form, it seems she is doing that to agitates them on purpose……probably. “Can’t be helped then….I will be more careful. Well then, let’s get back to the main subject. Goshujin-sama is attracting a lot of attention right now so I think this is a chance. I have prepared a selfie stick for you.” “You let a lot slide away huh. So, what is it about this selfie stick?” That’s the most unnecessary item I can think of here. “Let’s take a commemorative photo with them as the background.” So you are going to upload such a picture. We are not live streaming artist you know? And you want to use the selfie stick because you want to be fully included in the picture as well right? Well, I do want to take a picture with her though. But when I carefully think about it….. “Well, it seems useful if you want to stir those people up huh.” “It is a chance to show them that Goshujin-sama is different from them.” “Such a strange and simple thing to do. Well, it might suit my character huh.” Nanami takes out a selfie stick. So she actually has it. Even so, why does the selfie stick has [NANAMI LOVE] engraved on it? Oi, did you used my money on something USELESS again? “Unu, just when I wonder who it is, isn’t that you Kousuke.” I and Nanami turn to look at the person who called out to us. The person who is standing there is a beauty in Japanese kimono who has no regard toward the academy uniform, Shion-san. When we already gathered so much attention to ourselves, I can feel that it has increased even more. Shion-san coming toward us while raising her folding fan to cover her nose and knitting her eyebrows. “Even so, this place sure is stink. Must be the smell of the insects around here.” Her mouth is as bad as Nanami’s. She refers to others as an insect like a strong enemy character in the game. Well, from the normal student’s point of view she is practically an enemy already, Shion-san is a strong character on the main heroine level so she is out of their reach though. Even so, what’s with this insect’s smell stuff? Shion-san doesn’t actually think there is such a smell. Of course, that was just an act. She is not a person who would speak ill of another for no reason. If I ask her she would definitely say [I wonder what kind of smell it is, I don’t even know myself WaHahahaha]. This person is actually quite polite after all. When Shion-san noticed Nanami’s selfie stick, “Hou, Nanami. Quite an interesting thing you have there.” She said so and laugh. “If you want to take a commemorative photo then you don’t need that, you know” Then, she moves her line of sight toward the school building and takes the smartphone out from the stick. She walks toward the place that people are gathering together and says: [Hey, we are taking a commemorative photo here so get out of the way]. As expected, it doesn’t seem like they are that willing to move away but if someone suddenly told you to piss off then normally you would get angry right? As soon as the place opened up, Nanami says: [Then I will take the picture]. As I was about to walk toward the open space, I grab Nanami’s hand and shake my head. “No, let’s take it together Nanami.” If we are going to take it anyway then it’s better to have everyone in it. We have a selfie stick as well. Nanami looks at the surrounding reaction and smiles happily. Was it because there are Nanami’s fans here or they just dislike me for flirting with these beautiful women, I can feel the angry gazes coming my way even more than before. WaHaHa Noticing Nanami’s aim, Shion-san also starts laughing. “That’s right, let’s take it, let’s take it. You don’t have to take the picture for us Nanami, we can just leave it to those guys over there, right. They have their uses after all.” Hearing her, an idea came to me. “Taking a picture together like this makes me want to take a picture with all the Shikibukai members.” “Right. Well, it’s hard for us to gather together though……. Then once we filled up the remaining first-year slot, should I try calling out to them?” Shion-san calls the second-year student who was trying to sneak away to a stop and hand her the smartphone. On my left is Shion-san, On my right is Nanami, and me at the center. The three of us took a pose with our weapons and took a lot of pictures. Then after we have a number of photos, Shion-san finally lets her go. “That took quite some time.” I muttered so Nanami nods and tell me the time. The afternoon classes will be in session soon so the people around us started to thin out. Seeing the still relaxed Shion-san, I was about to ask her about her afternoon class. Well, since it’s Shion-san, it wouldn’t be weird if she were to join it midway through. While Shion-san transferring the photos, she confirmed that no one was around and let out a small laugh. “Thanks to you I can do the thing that I wanted to do for a long time.” Because I was thinking about something else, I tilt my head wondering what she is talking about. “Well, I was talking about her.” Apparently, she was talking about the second-year student who took the picture for us. Shion-san takes out a purse from her pocket and continues talking while closing her smartphone. “I know her, she has trouble with relationships you see, so I try forcefully getting some sympathy for her. It would be good if it works out though.” Hearing her light explanation, I give her an understanding nod. It seems like that girl has been isolated so Shion-san gave her a helping hand. “That’s why you purposely make her take our photos……I’m sure it will work out.” Since Shion-san made her took our photos, I’m sure that there would be someone who starts to sympathize with her Then, in return, she gathered the ill will that has been directed toward the girl to herself. Well, that’s something the Shikibukai would do. Depending on the case, they might start thinking [Let’s stop bullying her since she was targeted by the Shikibukai] after all, if it turns out like that then the student council can move in to protect her. If everything goes well then the reputation of the student council will improve as well. By the way, that act should be more effective in letting them know that I am now a part of the Shikibukai. To let them witness it themselves would be more effective than some letters written on the bulletin board. Letting them know that I am on good terms with Shion-san from Shikibukai is definitely more impactful. Moreover, reacting to such an impact, the reputation of the student council will rise while the Shikibukai managed to protect that student, it’s a winwinwin. “That’s right, we are doing well in collecting all those malice. I am such a wicked woman……..WaHaHaHa!” Shion-san said such a self-deprecating thing but is that really true? Certainly, Shion-san is being called a wicked woman but if you get to know her then there’s no way that you could see her as such a villain. Rather, as you get closer to her she is a woman who you would keep liking her more and more. That’s my impression of her. “Seriously, everyone is so blinded. No matter how hard they try, they wouldn’t be able to find a finer woman than Shion-san anywhere else.” I really like her straight-forward personality. I also love how she is actually a kind and caring person. As a matter of fact, she is one of my dozens of waifus. This must be why Sempai gets along so well with Shion-san. The fact that she often plays pranks on people might be her flaw though. However, I think that part of her is nice too. “What is it, suddenly flattering me like that? I won’t give you anything you know?” “Oops my apologies, I blurted my thoughts out loud. I am not aiming for anything Shion-san.” “Ho, what a smooth talker you are.” But.., Shion-san continues. “I understand it now.” “What is it?” “Since I am normally the target of slander, hearing such a thing once in a while is making me happy.” Saying so Shion-san starts laughing and hit my back. “Wahahahaha, I sure have got myself a cute and caring Junior. Come to think of it, are you heading to the moon palace?” “Yes, I have to talk about something in the future with Lord Benito and Sempai. I want to talk with Ludi after that too.” Well, I can talk to Ludi and Sempai at home though. “I see, I am also heading to the moon palace as well. Alright, let’s go.” There are two things that I want to do at the moon palace. After I finished requesting Lord Benito’s aid and partway with him and Shion-san, I head to the public moral committee. “Well, this is it for me, do your best alright!” When I thanked him for guiding me all the way here, he hit my back and says: [Don’t worry about it]. “That’s right, seeing Benito like that...;.the Shikubukai sure have it hard huh. You can come to me if something comes up alright!” Such a cool parting word. He turns back and heads towards the exit. He is one of the companion characters you could recruit in Magiero. His body is that of a bodybuilder, a third-year student who is kind and possesses a strong sense of justice. A sempai that all the gentlemen called him Aniki (TLN:Big Bro) However, if you ask me if he is a strong character or not, then the answer is no. His attack power and physical power are as high as his muscles suggested but other than that he is not that great. Also, his high attack power is only considered high as long as we are talking about male characters. His power is a far cry from the heroines that are specialized in close-combat. His defensive power is also inferior to that of [Ms.KuhKillme] or Takioto in shield-mode. Even though he is one of my favorite characters, sadly, he is practically unusable. It is rather difficult to find a good male character. Leaving the protagonist aside, only Lord Benito and some of the male characters were given preferential treatment. In a certain meaning, Takioto also received some preferential treatment. Though he has his faults, he is undoubtedly stronger than other male characters. As long as his opponent doesn’t possess a cheat weapon, he is strong enough to contend with the other main-heroine tier characters. The only situation that I don’t want to think about is when he has to go against characters that are specialized in long-range attacks though. “Alright, let’s go.” After confirming that Aniki has left, Nanami gives me a nod and knocks on the door. After about 3 seconds Sempai answers the door and we enter the room. Inside the room are the Saint, Ludi, and Sempai. Seeing me entered the room, the Saint narrowed her eyes and blatantly give me a sigh. “Oh, it’s you. Good day. We don’t have anything to serve you but make yourself at home.” There’s no trace of her normally graceful self as she gave us a curt reply like she couldn’t care less about me. I glance at Sempai and she pulls a chair out for me. Nanami insists on standing but since this might be a long talk I told her to sit down. “Thank you.” “Let me say this first. Congratulations on becoming the Junior Assistant, do your best Mr.Future Lord.” “Thank you very much. I know that I am not suitable for such a position but I will strive hard to not bring shame to the three committees name.” “...;...;.” Saint Steph’s eyes open wide, her expression is that of a surprise. “Is there something wrong?” “Captain, Takioto is this kind of person. Ah, Takioto, you don’t have to be so stiff here okay?” I kind of understand why Sempai’s words are a surprise to the Saint. On the surface, I dressed sloppily like Takioto from the game. Moreover, I also brought along a personal maid with me even before I joined the Shikibukai. No matter how you look I would seem like some kind of delinquent. Of course, she would think of me as some foolish young master. However, the words that came out of my mouth, on the contrary, are polite. Since I am a former member of society, I would use honorifics wherever possible. Moreover, this is the first time I have settled down and talked with the Saint. “Haa, look like the Shikibukai is in safe hands.” “Your words are wasted on me.” “Well, enough about that. I have a little something that I want to let you know.” “Something you want to let me know?” “Can you stop increasing my work?” To make me felt the pressure of her words like this, did she added her magic power into it? “It is our and the student council’s duty to extinguish the fire. You can do whatever you want at the Shikibukai but it is us who have to clean up the mess alright.” “I apologize for troubling you with my previous dungeon capture. However, I will make sure to consult with you before I am going to make a big move in the future. Please rest assured.” “Well, it’s fine as long as you understand. Even so...;...;.” Saying so she makes a serious expression, I am a little surprised. Saint Steph is a beauty. Well, most of the characters in Eroge are pretty and cute though. Looking at the Saint is making me a little embarrassed. Rather, I’m a little excited too. “Don’t you have some thoughts, seeing me like this?” “Thoughts? Ah, about how splendid Saint-sama is right? You are usually nice and graceful but looking at your inner beauty and strength, you are looked even more splendid to me. Ah, if you are asking about my thoughts then, let’s see, I’m glad that I can see a new side of Saint-sama. I think.” Was my answer went above her expectation? Saint Steph let out a huge sigh and touches her temple. “...;...;...;.You said the same thing as Benito.” As expected of Lord Benito. Since I only know her for a short while it might look frivolous coming from me, but what about Lord Benito? Such a daring thing. Depending on how you say it you might be on the receiving end of an absolute zero gaze here. No, Lord Benito is a noble from the principality so he should know about her circumstances to some extent. Knowing the environment she grew up in, that should be something you would want to say to her. That must be the reason why he also appeared in the Saint’s event. Originally, since Lord Benito is a noble from the principality, he supposed to act as an antagonist in the saint’s event. However, he is actually her ally. He was the one who helped the saint out the most alongside president Monika. Even so, he still says something like: [I have no romantic feelings toward the saint]. But is that really so? “...;..talking with you made my pace go out of order. So, what do you want?” The saint let out a huge sigh and change the subject. “Yes, I was thinking about how I should conduct myself inside the academy in the future...;...;and there’s this one thing I came up with so I want to let everyone here know about it beforehand.” “Are you now? What is it?” “Yes, I am going to start seducing women from now on.” The air froze. Well, I deliberately said something that could be taken the wrong way, so in a way, I guess I’ve created this atmosphere on purpose. “Hey, Kousuke. Can you say that again?” “...;.I heard that you are going to go around seducing people but...;...;what are actually planning to do?” Ludi and Sempai are staring at me as if they are looking at trash. Honestly, I can’t get enough of it. “To be specific, I am going to flirt with a woman who is related to us at the three committees, I was thinking about flirting with Sempai and Ludi at first but to the normal students, it might appear so already though.” “...;.Can you tell me why?” “Well, if I look at myself objectively I would appear like a man who makes a pass at Ludi despite already having a cute maid to himself.” “Ah, Goshujin-sama, start calling cute like that...;...;so you want the Nanami Special B for today, I have to prepare a piercing and a rope now.” (TLN: What are you making me google Nanami!?) “If you are going to suddenly join the talk then can you not say something that people can take the wrong way? There are people who would take that seriously you know.” Especially the saint. She is already pulling away from me. But well, it was as expected. But seriously, what is Nanami Special B? What is she going to use the piercing and rope for? “...;.Umm, putting Nanami’s joke aside, what I said about how other students viewed me is true. So I have an idea to use that to our advantage.” Since they see me like that, I will act like a frivolous character. “With this, it wouldn’t be weird if I am seen at Ludi or Sempai’s side. It’s all good letting them think that I just tag along trying to woo them.” “Heee,” The saint let out such a voice as if she couldn’t be more care less. “Well, that might be a surprisingly good idea...;.from the outsider perspective, they can’t interfere with a person from Hanamura house and Yukine can just let them think that she has no choice but to let him tag along after all. But what would you do if something goes wrong?” “That’s the reason I am limiting the person I am going to get involved with to be only within the three committees. I don’t think anyone would start something if there is a person from the public moral committee or the student council around. They will definitely work as a deterrent.” “I see.” Sempai said. “If we are there with you then even if something gets out of hand then we can just say something like [we will give a warning to Takioto ourselves], I see...;...;” “Yes, we can agitate the student and control the situation at the same time.” And most importantly, I can be around Sempai and Ludi without anyone finding it out of ordinary. Suddenly, the saint raises her head as if she thought of something. “Wait a minute here...;..you said that you would start wooing the women in the three committees right?” “Yes, Since Stefania-sama’s Fanclub is on the same scale as the president’s you are actually on the top of my list. Ah, since I will be mainly acting with Ludi and Sempai they will have higher priority. Please leave it to me. I will do my best to seduce you.” The saint seemed to hate that very idea. —- “Takioto.” Sempai called out to me after I left the room. She told Nanami that she wants to talk to me in private so Nanami excuses herself and head toward Ludi who is still inside the room. Seeing so, Sempai turned to face me and start talking. “Um, you know.” She stuttered and her face is getting redder. “You know, is it necessary for you to include me as well? Ludi and Captain have their own Fanclub and they are both a beauty after all. President Monika too. Even if you do that to me too...;...;...; So it’s about that huh, I let out a sigh. “What are you saying Sempai. If I have to list the good things about you then it wouldn’t only take a day or two, I can’t even list it all even if I spend a lifetime doing it you know.” “How much are you intending to praise me!?” “Well, I was more or less exaggerated it but I still don’t think I would run out of good things I could think about you though. That’s how much of a splendid person you are to me. It is because Sempai is such a person that I want to gon on adventures with you.” “...;..Takioto.” “Sempai, please take care of me from now on as well.” — After we parted ways with Sempai and the other, we head to a cafe inside the academy where we can relax and talk. We head to the floor that is exclusive to the members of the three committees and takes our seats there. I told Nanami to order anything she like so she ordered a parfait. She keeps staring at the menu even though she already placed her order. I let out a small sigh. What should I do now? There are many kinds of skills in Magical★Explorer. The problem here is that there are too many of them. It is something you can acquire to strengthen characters like Ludi, Takioto, and of course, Iori, the protagonist himself. Every character has their own weak and strong points. For example, a character like Ludi is not compatible with close-quarter combat. With that said, the skills that can be acquired and its effectiveness are varied from character to character. However, with the seed of possibility, you can increase the number of skills that can be acquired along with its effectiveness. But the skills that can exhibit a clear change in your ability are rare. Now, there are many cheat-like characters that can obtain such skills in Magical★Explorer. Among them is Hijiri Iori. He can learn all kinds of skills such as close combat skills, magical attack skills, defensive skills, recovery skills, support skills, detection skills, unlocking skills, and ero skills. He is a cheat character who can learn all sorts of almighty skills and can fully demonstrate all of its effects. That’s totally unfair. Having an [Aptitude for every kind of skills] like that, I wonder if I can call it the [Protagonist Correction]? Honestly, the thought of such aptitude is irresistible. But to that cheat Iori there are some skills that he can’t acquire. Well, since he had already obtained the combat and primary skills already, he shouldn’t have any problem for now. Now then, there is a character that can learn more skills than him, an even more versatile character. Only she can acquire every skill in the game including all of the new skills added from every DLC with the exception of special skills such as gender locked and race-specific skills. That character is MKS73 (Nanami). [Maid Knight Shiki Edition Seven Three] she is the character that all of the ladies and gentlemen (Eroge players) want to shape into their ideal, [The cutest and the strongest maid]. That’s why it is only natural that she was designed to be a character who can acquire all kinds of skills. Thanks to that she is the character that is useful in combat, mapping, dungeon capture and even in daily life. However, there’s a reason that makes it hard for her to surpass the protagonist in terms of ability. That reason is the cheat items and cheat skills which were prepared for the protagonist. After all, you would have wanted to give the protagonist which is your own projection in the game a suitable ability. Of course, it doesn’t mean that Nanami is weak. At first, I thought that she should be one of the candidates to be one of the strongest characters in the game after all. However, since she was a DLC character who doesn’t have her own cheat equipment, she was considered a step behind the three strongest and the protagonist. That’s exactly why she was categorized in the second tier of combat prowess in the game, the [Main Heroine Tier]. But if you took her usefulness into account, she would be considered to surpass the three strongest. How should I raise her? I think that is an important question no less than how I should strengthen myself. Since she is the person that would be together with me the most, if her combat ability improved then undoubtedly our battle effectiveness would be increased. Nanami is expressionlessly enjoying her parfait but once she noticed my gaze she covers her cheeks with both of her hands and twisting her body while saying [Oh dear]. “I, if you say such a thing so suddenly then this Nanami will be troubled?” “No, I haven’t said anything yet though. Rather, your character has completely changed hasn’t it.” What did you hear? Did I said anything?. Yup, I didn’t.” “I heard you clearly from the telepathy, you are saying: [Nanamin is so cute. Just looking at her my blood is starting to boil.]” Since she can both act expressionless and over the top herself, she should strive to become an actress. “Well, I can certainly agree with that statement.” “Wha, what is this!? I thought that my heart would jump out of my body. Please don’t stare so much, what would you do if I get pregnant. Ugh, I’m suddenly feeling nauseuos...;..it’s time for a celebration Goshujin-sama!” “There are too many places to retort I can’t even keep up...;! Rather, Isn’t this situation accelerated too fast!?” “Combining my and Goshujin-sama’s name, let’s name our child Minami.” “So we are going to continue that...;...;.and I don’t think that you included my name at all though.” “Can’t be helped then, let’s go with Nami.” “Aaaaagh, let’s leave it at that. Alright, it’s planning time, planning time alright!” “Overseas destinations are popular but I personally like an eastern Onsen more. But since Goshujin-sama has so many Madam...;.it would be better if we rent out an open-air bath huh.” “We are not planning the honeymoon!! And when did I get so many wives!?” But I will never deny that I want to go on that trip with everyone! I take a sip of coffee and take a small breath. “Getting back to the main topic, no joking around alright. Nanami, what do you want to be?” Hearing so, Nanami tilts her head. “It’s too vague so I can’t answer.” “Since we are going to challenge the dungeons together in the future I want to know how you want to strengthen yourself. I know that you are using a bow as your main weapon right now but if you want to change it then you can still do, you know.” Nanami is frowning a little. “Umm, why are you asking me this all of a sudden?” She put her spoon down and said so. Well you know, it came to me when I captured the 40th floor. If there is something she wants to become then I want to respect her opinion on how she wants to strengthen herself. Since we already used the seed, we can still change our combat style. Rather, it would be more correct to say that such an opportunity won’t come by again in the future. “Well, to be honest, you are too versatile Nanami. I am worried about which path you would take in the future. And most importantly, I want to take your opinion into account too...;...;” It just that I really want her to keep her detection and trap skills. I guess I will have to ask her to do that. However, the remaining question would be what should we do about the rest? “So it’s about that. Goshujin-sama, I already have a clear answer for that. You are my number one priority Goshujin-sama. Your ideal Nanami is the Nanami that I want to be.” “Actually, I already expected you to say that...;...;Unn, this is why I am so troubled.” If she has some ideas then I can come up with some suggestions for her. Rather, that way is much easier for me. Even her bow has several combat styles to it like the type that keep running around and attack from a distance or the type that stay in one place and attack with high firepower. “There are too many choices to choose from...;...;” If there’s a second run then there would be a lot of skills that I want her to acquire however, this is a reality. I don’t know if we have that much time in the first place, it would be better to be as specialized as possible rather than a jack of all trades. “I have been training with it so far, isn’t it better if I further improve on the bow and acquire other scout skills?” “So you are going to keep your current style after all. But what do you think about getting some recovery skills?” “If in the future, Goshujin-sama should require the recovery skills then...;...;...;no, I understand that such a thing won’t be needed if you can recruit new companions. However, it might be a good idea if I acquire some of them at the basic level.” “I can’t say that I am against the idea...;...;...;actually, there are some promising people that I am considering to recruit in the future. That child can use recovery magic as well.” There are only two candidates to be specific, but both of them are very proficient in recovery skills. “That child was it...;...;Haaa. so, the recovery skills won’t be necessary. If so then is it okay for me to tell you my suggestions now?” “Yeah.” “It might be a little vague but firstly, I think it is a good idea to increase our firepower. I think that only the bow will be insufficient for such purpose.” I nod along. “If we are thinking about efficiency then it would have to be that after all huh.” In order to gain Magic elements (Experience points), we have to defeat the monsters. And what is needed to kill the monsters efficiently? The answer is firepower. “I think it is better to kill two birds with one stone.” “Two birds with one stone huh.” “Yes, first Goshujin-sama will have to pick a good skill to increase your own power, meanwhile I will also take mine. We are talking about Goshujin-sama after all, you must already have something in mind at this point.” “Well, that’s true.” “Is it a long-range one?” “Well, it is usable at long-range but...;..it would be closer to a mid-range skill I think?” Only having a mean for close combat is harsh after all. However, even if I already consumed the seed, Takioto’s long-range magic is still poor. That was the case in the game and I also felt it in reality. It was better than before but that’s it. It is still inefficient and its accuracy is still poor. I was thinking about using a bow or other long-range weapons to cover for my weakness at first. However, since I will be acting with Ludi who is good at long-range magic in the future, is there a need for me to learn such a skill? Not to mention Nanami who has decided to use the bow as her main weapon. So I changed my perspective. Can’t I just get the skill that I always want which can also let me attack from a distance? Then it came to me. There is a skill that I wanted for a long time which also allows me to use mid-range weapons as well. Yes, let’s do it. Moreover, it can increase my efficiency to wipe out the enemy. Rather, I want Sempai to learn some of the skills in that tree as well. Alright, I’ve decided. “Alright, let’s get that skill.” “That skill? What is it?” It is a skill that could be said to belong to the cheat skill group, rather, it is a cheat occupation. “I am going to learn Ninja-skill.” —- This is a good day. We finally decided on our course of action. We were about to leave after Nanami finished her parfait.  “Wait a minute, Hey, wait for me. Kousuke-kun. Hearing a familiar voice, I stopped my feet. “I’m glad...;.I thought that you might already leave.” “TeHe, Good afternoon ?” Iori showed up with a serious expression along with Yuika who is wearing the same smile as usual. It’s the Hijiri sibling.” “Here, Iori-kun.” “Thank you, Sakura-san.” Iori brought me to a room inside the library. Apparently, Iori already passed the library organizing event which is one of the events for the student council. That’s why he can use this room and even get a cup of coffee from Sakura Rue-san, the librarian. It seems Iori is properly getting his events as well. Seem like I can’t be careless too huh. “Here, Takioto-kun...;..I heard a lot about you from the rumor. The Shikibukai is a harsh place but hang in there okay? If there’s anything I can do then,” She makes a fighting pose and smile. “You can rely on me okay?” “Thank you very much.” After she finished saying that, Sakura-san left the room. Of course, the teachers in the academy also know about Shikibukai’s inner workings. That also applied to Sakura-san, the librarian. That’s why Sakura-san offered this place for our use. However, Iori shouldn’t know about that yet. I have laid some groundwork beforehand so he must have some idea when he heard the official announcement. I guess he’s here to get the truth from me but he also understands that it is a secret that should be hidden from ordinary students. That must be why he asked Sakura-san to let him use this place. “You need more sugar? I got a lot from Nanami.” Iori was a little reluctant at first but after a little struggle with himself, he nodded and said yes. It seems like he really needs the sugar. I take out a bottle with various shapes of sugar from my storage bag and put them in front of Iori. Normally, Nanami would prepare them without me saying anything but she’s not with me right now because I told her to head back home without me. She should be preparing for our skill acquisition right about now. She should be, right? Iori opened the lid and takes out the sugars, there are various shapes of them like a star, moon, heart, and square shape. He is now choosing which of the cutely shaped sugar he would put into his coffee. Interestingly, Yuika, his own sister seems to be pulled away by her brother’s action. “W, wow, what a cute sugar.” After Iori finished, this time I hand the sugar to Yuika who is already trying to pulling away from her brother. She said: [Ah, I already used the stick sugar!] Saying so, she takes one and lightly stirs her coffee. I think a stick sugar should already be enough though. But look at your brother, on top of the stick sugar, he already put in several more cube sugar you know. “Cute right? I got them from Nanami. You can take some with you if you want. I don’t know if it will be enough for you guys though...;..” I take my eyes off Yuika and look at Iori. He is normally sipping his coffee despite the amount of sugar he added. I stopped counting after he put the fifth one in. It’s fine as long as he doesn’t have diabetes. Well, in this world, magic should be able to do something about it. “...;...;Can you sneak some for me later? We are living in the dorm so we wouldn’t be able to share unless we meet up.” Is she going to use it in secret? She’s not going to plainly eat it right? Nah, she wouldn’t. She’s not going to right...;...;? “Now I am curious about daily life in your family...;..” Iori and Yuika are basically always staying at the dorm in the game. There’s almost no information about their daily life after all. Hearing me, Yuika’s expression brightened. “Eh, by any chance are you interested in me?” She should know that I didn’t mean it like that though. She gives me a cute cheerful smile and raises her body a little...;...;.nay, she moves over to me and starts hugging my arm. Can you please stop doing that? Seriously. You are too cute I might break into a smile. Well, if I have to say whether am I interested in the Hijiri house then I would have to say that I am very interested. “I am curious but there’s something I am more interested in more than that.” Saying so, I slipped away from her. “Kya ?” Yuika made such a well-practiced voice. “Can’t be helped then, what do you want to ask? Is it my—–” “Yuika.” The conversation didn’t continue. Unable to just watch, Iori gave her a warning. Yuika reluctantly stopped and takes her seat next to me. Yuika-san, aren’t you a little to close? Looking at Yuika, Iori let out a sigh. It seems like he will be getting to the main subject soon. “Takioto-kun, why did you join the Shikibukai?” “Well, you must already have some ideas right? It is as you thought. Or perhaps you are still thinking that the Shikibukai is an evil organization?” There’s no way that he would think so. Clearly, Iori has some confidence in this. That’s why there’s no way that he wouldn’t know. “As I thought...;...;” “Yeah, sorry for making you worry. Well, originally I shouldn’t be talking about this in the first place. So sorry if I have to be a little vague.” Well, there are several people who know about the actual situation outside the three committees like those at the Tsukuyomi newspaper club for example. “So that is the case after all...;...;..” “Mou–!” He let out such a voice as if he is angry with me or was it relief? But once our eyes met, we started laughing. “It is clear as day to some of you guys after all huh...;...;” “Of course. In the first place, you were the one who asked me and Orange-kun to ignore you or act like we are on bad terms right? It was good for me to at least doing some groundwork with my classmates after all huh. I can already picture Orange saying something like: [Shikibukai? You are still you right?] Aside from his wife-stealing hobby, he is a good guy after all. “Well, even if I don’t tell you myself, you should be getting the full picture soon anyway.” “Eh? Why?” “The student council, you are aiming to join them right?” Iori nodded with a serious expression. “I don’t know if I can ever join the three committees but I am doing my best.” “You will, there’s no way you couldn’t. I guarantee that.” “You really think so?” “Yeah, you can ask for the full detail from president Monika or vice-president Fran after you joined them.” Iori nods understandingly and lets out a huge sigh. Then as if he suddenly lost power, he leaned back on this chair. “...;.what’s wrong? Don’t tell me, did something happen with the president?” “No, it’s nothing. Both the president and vice-president are kind, they are good people. It’s not about them.” Saying so, he corrects his posture. “I’m, just relieved.” “Relieved?” “It’s because I get to know that Kousuke-kun is not that kind of person you know.” Iori laughs, his cheeks slackened. “I am very relieved that I got to hear that from you directly Kousuke-kun.” “...;..Sorry. It seems like I made you worried again.” “Seriously, I’m glad. you properly took the steps to prepare for it unlike last time so this time I will forgive you.” “Oi oi, forgive me you say? aren’t you getting a little too cheeky?” At first, he was just a timid guy who never complained no matter what happens after all. “Ehehehe.” Iori laugh. “Well, I have grown too after all.” Saying so, he pushes out his chest. — We chat for a while after that, but it seems like the student council has summoned him so he left after saying: [Sorry, I was the one who invited you too]. Now the only ones left are, “Shall we head back as well?” “Yes.” Me and Yuika. We put away the coffee cup, thanked Sakura-san, and left the library together. Then when I was about to say goodbye, I thought of something. Come to think of it, is her initial event already over? Looking at her behavior, don’t tell me...;...;. “Hey, Yuika.” “? What’s wrong? Looking at me so seriously like that?” “If, yeah,– if you have got yourself into trouble you can use my name alright? At worst you can use Marino-san’s...;...;...;the headmaster’s name too. I will ask her myself later.” The moment I said that. I didn’t miss the moment when her smile faded from her face. So it still isn’t over huh. “...;..Really, what are you saying?” “Well, just put that in the corner of your mind for the time being.” Iori should eventually resolve the event himself but I better put some safety net in place first. It is still an early-game event so he shouldn’t have a hard time with it. If we are talking about difficulty then the saint’s or Ero-scientist’s events are quite bad. The latter is especially much more dangerous in a lot of meanings though. For the time being, I will have to talk with Marino-san about this. “Well, I am going back first.” Saying so, I turn my back and head toward the transfer magic circle. Then at the moment I almost reach the gate...;. My stole suddenly got pulled. “Wait, please.” Yuika sneaks a peek at me, a cloudy smile on her face. “Do you, know?” “No, I just thought that you looked like you have something weighing on your mind. If that’s not the case then there would be no one who would approach me like that right?” Of course, I know everything. As long as everything goes according to the script that is. “Um, you see?” It was when Yuika tried to bring up the subject...;.. “F, FOUND YOU!” I heard a screaming voice. “Finally, Finally I found you!” ...;...;...;.So she finally appeared. I don’t even have to see her figure. I can tell just by hearing her voice. I thought that she would appear eventually. It is a certainty on the same level as an Eroge childhood friend heroine must be a virgin. When I turned around, I saw her standing next to Yuika. Her blond hair is more yellowish than Ludi’s. The characteristic croissant-like hairstyle. Her accessories look so expensive like the one you would find on a nouveau rich. In her hand is her favorite weapon, a parasol. It is currently shaking by her strong grip. “I’ve been looking for you...;I’ve been looking for you all over the place!” If I have to say whether I like or hate her then I have to say she is my waifu. An Ojou-sama character like her is out of place in a game like this but everyone still loved her. “Uuuuuu, whenever I visit, you never come to the academy...;.each and every time. Then when I heard that you came, you never went to the classroom!” Sorry about that. I am rarely coming to the academy in the first place but before I asked Lord Benito for his help, I did my best to avoid you. But, aren’t you becoming too much of a stalker? “You didn’t even take the test and you still got the first place...;...;” Well, it is that kind of evaluation system so I can’t really do anything about it.” “On top of taking the first place you also joined the Shikibukai! You must have done something underhanded right!?” How should I put this? Is it because I know that she would come? She is fully intended to start a fight but I don’t feel the stress at all. My heart is the picture of calmness itself. “And of all things, even Onii-sama is...;...;.Kyiiiiiiii! I can’t even put it into words! I have never been angry with anyone this much before!” ...;...;Ah, this pattern, Lord Benito must have failed. Moreover, she seems pretty angry as well. Seem like I will get a message with something like [Sorry, I can’t do it!] from him soon. Even though I have already asked the Lord for help beforehand. “I...;...;will absolutely, absolutely not forgive you!” “No, I didn’t do anything though...;..” “DON’T LIE TO ME!” Ahh, I’m done for, I sigh in my heart. I took my eyes off the enraged girl and look at Yuika. Her usual smile disappeared, it seems like she got caught by surprise. Well, it can’t be helped, Gabby’s impact is strong after all. ...;...;..Even so, things have become interesting huh. The Shikibukai member [Takioto Kousuke]. The girl who can join the Shikibukai, also the sister of Lord Benito, [Gabby]. And the heroine who can join any of the three committees depending on the event, [Yuika]. To think that all the character who can join the Shikibukai has gathered. “Takioto Kousuke! I, Gabriella Evangelista challenge you to a duel ! !” Now then, when I was wondering about how to reply, Yuika opens her mouth first. “W, well, calm down Evangelista-san. Let’s calm down first okay?” “Ara, who might you be?” “Nice to meet you, my name is Hijiri Yuika. I don’t know what you are talking about so I can you tell me why you are so angry?” “That’s simple! That man over there, he used an underhand method to get the first place in the last exam!” Well, heading to the dungeon on the day of the exam, depending on how you look, it would seem underhanded after all. IS THAT EVEN LEGAL! Or something like that. “Calm down. Certainly, that might be an underhand method but he still did everything according to the rule right? Everyone will be heading to the dungeon from the next exam on anyway, I think the current ranking will change a lot you know. Let’s do our best on the next one!” It would be great if she can back down with that but she’s Gabby after all. In the next ranking, since the other student’s ranking will increase as well, I think my ranking will decrease though. However, if Gabby does her best in both dungeons and the exam, she might be able to win against me. I definitely won’t be taking the first place next time after all. In the first place, this time I was thinking about a plan that centered around getting the seed of possibility and joining the three committees so I aimed for the first place. The only benefit of getting the first place in the next exam is just the items and Tsukuyomi points. I can get more valuable items in the dungeon so I think wasting a week to take the exam would be a waste of time. Rather than taking the exam, taking a few days off to relax is much better. If I am a member of the public moral committee or the student council then it would be a different story though. “Well, it’s only natural that I would place first next time.” That’s certainly something Gabby would say. It’s great that she confidently says something about herself like that. Incidentally, I also like how she often loses too. Moreover, it’s bad when they announced that I took the first place, I think the one who will take the first place next time is Ludi though. She will be challenging the dungeon with me and she always takes the exam seriously too after all. Another candidate would be Iori huh? If Nanami takes the exam seriously she might actually take the first place but if she sees me skipping it then she will definitely skip it too. Ultimately, I can hear her saying, it doesn’t matter as long as I can graduate. Well, she would say something like [After we graduated, I will still forever be Goshujin-sama’s] or something like that after all. I have relied on her so much so I really want her to stay with me. “But! I will not let it slide! And most importantly, most importantly!” She uses her finger to point at me with the hand she used to hold her parasol. “The fact that you are planning to use Onii-sama, I will absolutely, ABBBSOOOLUUUUTELYYYY, never forgive you!” ...;from what I heard so far, it seems like the trigger this time is really Lord Benito huh. There was an event that she went berserk for Lord Benito on her own so this must be it. Yuika is the same but she really has a severe case of brocon huh. As I was in the process of enlightenment, I heard Yuika muttered something in a small voice. “What are you planning Takioto-san?” “I am not planning anything. Rather, do I look like I am planning something to you...;...;?” If I am planning something then it would be about how should I act as a member of Shikibukai from now on. Of course, I have to think about that, I am its member after all. And I would never think of using Lord Benito for my own gain too. “Hijiri Yuika-san right? You should stop being around this coward as well. He will only drag you down. Now is the chance to get away from him.” When Gabby said so, Yuika tilts her head. “Takioto-san is a coward? He is strong, kind, and a gentleman you know.” After she said so, Yuika hugs my arm and smiles at her. Then she glanced at me and give me a wink. So this girl has been calling Iori Onii-chan huh...;.Should I make her call me Onii-chan too? Gabby is trembling while staring at my face but finally, she couldn’t stand it and start laughing. “Pupuft-, Oh dear, I am so sorry. I can’t hold my laughter. Even so, Pupu, a gentleman—-?” Except for being strong and kind, I am confident that I am a gentleman. A pervert one though. “A joke ha, has KuKuKu, it’s limit you know Fufufu. This is a gentleman? Yuika-san must have been living quite a sad life it seems.” Yuika is still holding my arm but I heard it. She said [Haa?] with a small voice. Then the power in her arms gradually getting stronger. I concentrate all of the nerves in my arm, her arms are small but aside from the softness I can feel their firmness...;...;,Ouch, Ouch, Ouch, Ouch, Ouch, Ouch, Ouch, Ouch, Ouch, Ouch, Ouch, Ouch, Ouch, Ouch, Ouch, Ouch, Ouch, Ouch, Ouch, Ouch, Ouch, Ouch, Ouch, Ouch, OUCH, OUCH, OUCH, OUCH!! “Yu, Yuika. Calm down, Really, Calm down.” Despite my pleas, Yuika stares at the laughing Gabby, the smile on her face didn’t crumble. “Umm, do you even know about what the Shkibukai actually does in the first place though, Evangelista-san? The voice, the voice is getting scarier. “Ara, my brother is the Lord of Shikibukai you know. Of course, I would know about it! That’s right, if we are talking about a gentleman then my Onii-sama is the prime example!” “Oh, Reaaaally. Then, it is only your speculation correct? There are a loooooot of things that the Shikibukai can’t talk about, after all, right?” “Impossible, I am the first in the school year you know, of course, I should be joining the three committees soon as well. That’s why there are a lot of things that someone like Yuika-san doesn’t know that get to my ears you know.” Making herself the first place is also something that Gabby would do huh. “In the first place, it is impossible for Onii-sama to hide anything from me. Even so, on top of him hesitating to talk about Takioto Kousuke, he also did a strange follow-up when I start to complain about him. This man must have done something to him, there’s no mistake!!” “Hee, aren’t your Onii-san just tired of your broconness?” Waii!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!??!?!?!?!?!?!? “Speaking of which, your brother is the Lord of Shikibukai right? Looking at you, I think I can guess what kind of person he is. I think Mr.Lord should just hand in his resignation and let Takioto-san here take over already.” Wait a minute, Yuika-san! Wh, what are you talking about!? It was within my expectation that Gabby would pick a fight with me but why are you picking a fight with her instead!? And you are hurting my arm, isn’t your grip getting stronger too!? “...;..I won’t forgive anyone who badmouths Onii-sama you know?” “Oh no, it was just my opinion. Even so, Evangelista-san, not only your hair, it seems like the inside of your head is also empty too isn’t it? I’m so surprised!” Ahhhhhhhhhh! “...;...;..Apologize.” “Then please apologize to Takioto-san first.” “There’s no need for me to apologize to him.” “Then, it seems like I don’t need to either.” Wait a minute, what is this situation!? You two, your magic power is leaking you know!? There was no conflict between you two in the game you know!? Moreover, you two supposed to be close because you are both brocon so why is this happening!? “...;It seems like there are two insects I absolutely have to crush here. A badmouth one at that.” “Eeh, are you introducing yourself? And there’s only one insect here you know? Should I apply some healing magic on your head? Ah, it would be meaningless if that’s the default state, ah, sorry about that!” Someone, help me...;...;! Whoever is fine, please do something about this situation! And please apply some of that healing magic on my arm as well...;.. “...;...;have you said your prayer?” “That’s my line though? Even if you apologize now I still won’t forgive you after all.” They are glaring at each other. It was like there was an electrical discharge from their eyes. I was worried if they would start battling each other right here right now but it seems like that won’t be the case. Gabby who was glaring at Yuika take a small breath and start laughing. She then turns back and heads toward the magic circle. “I will prepare a training ground or a usable dungeon in a few days! You two can run away if you want though, Oh-Ho Ho Ho!” Seeing Gabby left with a high-pitch laugh, Yuika clicked her tongue, her face still smiling. “Mufu, Delicious-☆ Thank you very much Takioto-san! Is it really okay for me to eat all of this?” Well yeah, eat as much as you want. “Yeah, I have troubled you a lot today after all...;Even so, why did you defend me? I am happy but now you will be attracting attention too you know?” Hijiri Yuika was a character that utilized her [Charm] as her weapon. She used it to build relationships and is a character that gets along well with people. In the case that she joined the student council or the public moral committee, she would cleverly utilize her charm to improve the image of the respective organization. At the Shikibukai, she would act like she is sucking up to the strong people of the three committees or make people think that she was bribing the teachers (Which of course, are cooperating with the three committees) to accumulate the hate toward the Shikibukai. In addition, seeing how she was well-liked by almost all the sempais at the three committees, it could be said that her ability to make people like her is really extraordinary. Of course, she wasn’t just spreading her charm unconsciously, rather, she did it on purpose. That is the root of her perfectly crafted smile. Even she herself said [It’s the weapon to beat people who can’t be defeated by the charm alone you know?]. Was she quoting Natsume Souseki? (TLN: Natsume Souseki was a Japanese novelist.) However, since Yuika is a strong character on the main-heroine level herself, even if she doesn’t utilize her charm she can demonstrate her power enough in the game. “Well, I wonder why?” Saying so, Yuika averts her eyes and scratches her head while smiling bashfully. “Even I don’t understand myself. Normally I would just fade out of there you know? I don’t know how to put this...;..but. When I saw Evangelista-san laughing at Takioto-san you see, Umm, what is it, I don’t know what it is but I felt my veins popping you know!” Back then, I thought that Yuika would just fade out too. If it is the game’s Yuika then it wouldn’t be weird if she says: [Well, I will be going first ☆] and disappears from the scene. But, she spoke out. Looking at Yuika who is laughing while scratching her cheek, I suddenly recalled the game setting. The character called [Hijiri Yuika] was one of the characters who don’t possess a strong dislike toward [Takioto Kousuke]. Most heroines would just abuse him without sugar-coating it. However, Yuika didn’t do that. She would often stand up against the strong heroines and defend him. Don’t tell me, is there some kind of secret setting between her and Takioto that wasn’t explained in the game? Well, there’s no way to find out at this point anyway, maybe I will get to know that in the future. “Really, I wonder why I did that. Takioto-san isn’t the type that would make me want to protect you either.” “Did you casually dissed me just now?” “That’s not it, you just seem so reliable so I don’t think that you would ever need my protection after all.” What is she, she dissed me and immediately praise me afterward. Aren’t you too good at scoring points with me? And I like that you find me reliable but I want to be pampered too you know. Suddenly, Yuika lowers the hand she used to hold her fork on the table. Then she looked away and says with a small voice. “That’s right, you looked really reliable. Well, this time is just, you see...;Umm.” This is that right? It’s that thing about her initial event. “Well, you can consult with me any time, if you are in trouble then you can give out my name as much as you like too. That’s right. If it’s hard to consult about it with me then I can introduce you to a good person. She’s the vice-captain at the public moral committees you see, she is really reliable. If you want to consult with a classmate then you can consult with Ludi or Katrina too. Then there’s your brother as well. They will surely become your ally.” Originally, this case would be solved by Iori, it might be fine if I just leave it to him. However, if she is worried to this extent then it might be better if I move to resolve it myself. Seeing a heroine of Magiero making such an expression, there’s no way I can just stay still. Moreover, just now she used her healing magic on my arm, not to mention how she protected me from Gabby...;...; Eh, was she protecting me? Alright, it’s that event huh. I’m fine with getting this event and all but how should I resolve it? It is a compulsory event so I don’t really have to do anything special, the content of the event is just being attacked in the town when you are together with Yuika after all. In the first place, since it is her initial event, the assailant will only be some third-rate magician, I can beat a single untrained guy with ease. If Yuika isn’t scared then she would easily beat him to a pulp. “I am still not certain but...;.when I am confident about it, I think I will consult with you Takioto-san. You have listened to me so far after all. And since I saved you this time, of course, you will help me right!” “Of course, leave it to me.” She stared absentmindedly at my face, then after a while, she takes a small breath and continues the talk. “...;...;.Even so, Evangelista-san is really an impactful person isn’t she.” It is as Yuika said, she is certainly a person who easily leaves behind an impression. However, “She really is but you shouldn’t be surprised only by that degree you know?” There are a lot of characters who are on the same level as Gabby. Moreover, she still hasn’t shown her real self yet. She still hasn’t shown the most stood out part about her yet, it will be after she joined the Shikibukai that we get to see it. She will abandon her uniform and wear her dress all the time after all. After that, she could compete against Shion-san for the No.1 stand out spot. With Shion-san’s kimono and Gabby’s dress, they are the two-top of the Shikibukai after all. “Ehhh...;.why is this academy has so many weird people?...;...;there are strange people everywhere I go.” So she already found some huh. I thought that she just transferred in though. Nn? No, wait a minute. “You are not including me right?” “Umm...;..I’m sorry but even if I excluded Nanami-san, I think you would still be a top-class weirdo, Takioto-san.” “ ! ? “ “Umm...;from my point of view, I can’t wrap my head around your reaction at all.” She said so while she reaches her hand out and pulled on my stole. This is unexpected. I thought that it was because of my two-man group with Nanami but, to think that she would find me to be such a weird person even without her. But Nanami, even to the eye of an ero-gamer like me you are still a weirdo you know. “If you know her, can you tell me what kind of person is Evangelista-san?” “You picked a fight with her without knowing that?” “I didn’t pick a fight with her. I just accept the fight she is selling to Takioto-san! Rather, you should be grateful that I accept the fight for you, you know!” “Yeah yeah, thank you. Eat as much as you like.” “Of course, I will. Thank you very much. But I still don’t feel enough gratitude here, how about we settle this with a luxury apartment for me!” She might only be joking but I actually do have one though. The one that Luigia-sensei is living in. I wonder what kind of reaction I would get if I really give it to her. I can’t give it away though. “Oh, if you want I can buy you a present you know. Well, let’s return to the topic, Gabriella is the little sister of the person who is now acting as the Shikibukai’s chairman, Lord Benito. She placed lower than me in the last exam because I went into the dungeon you see. She is also a noble from the principality as well.” Well, president Monika and Shion-san are both a noble too but they came from a different country though. “Hee, is that so...;..” She put the cheese into her mouth without a care in the world. “Delicious.” “...;.You are still so carefree even though you might have to go against her in the duel huh.” “But Sempai is backing me, right? And most importantly, I don’t feel like losing if I only have to take on Evangelista-san one on one after all.” “...;...;.What do you mean?” I don’t want to talk badly about Gabby but I think both me and Yuika can win against her. However, that’s the conclusion coming from a person who played the game like me. How come Yuika who doesn’t even know Gabby’s name until recently came to that conclusion? “Aah, how should I say this. That’s right...;..I have a very good intuition you see.” “Intuition?” “Yes, somehow I can sense people’s ability. I felt like I don’t have to be that on guard against Evangelista-san you see.” Perhaps it is the effect of Yuika’s crisis detection skill. It is a very useful skill. When your opponent is stronger than you (higher-Lv) it can boost your status and raise your chance of escape. Since it has the precious effect of raising your chance of [Escape] I think that it is a skill that everyone would aim for. Depending on Iori’s choice, you can recruit her even before the first exam begins too. “How does that work?” Of course, she never told me that she possessed such a skill so I am feigning ignorant. “Evangelista-san isn’t that much of a combatant, I kinda get that kind of impression. But was she really placed second on the last exam? The Academy ranking seems unreliable to me. There are a lot of dangerous-looking people in the first year after all.” “Well, studying and fighting is a different thing, right? I think once they start taking the dungeon progress into account, the result will be a lot different you know?” Dangerous people that Yuika sensed through her crisis detection skill huh. I’m curious. Literally what he said here “Katou-san is one, Ludivine-san too. Another one is that fox-person who always taking a nap on the bench. Ah, I am including Takioto-san too you know. Rather, aren’t you on the top? The others I don’t think I wouldn’t lose against but still managed to surprise me is...;...;.Onii-chan I think.” Probably because Iori will get explosively stronger I guess. “Iori eh?...;.. I can’t lose too huh.” “I don’t want to lose against Onii-chan too. But at this rate, I won’t be able to keep my little sister’s dignity soon.” “Normally, the older one would be the one to have that dignity right?” “At the Hijiri house, the little sister is the one who has that dignity. But when I see Onii-chan’s growth you see...;...;” Well, I can picture Iori getting stronger than Yuika after all. “Well, there’s a simple way to keep that dignity isn’t it.” “Simple? Onii-chan is getting a lot stronger you know?” “Yeah, simple. If Iori becomes that much stronger, then you can just become stronger than him right?” Yuika was chewing on the cake, it was supposed to be sweet but her face had already soured and she let out a dry laugh. ——- On my way home after I split up with Yuika, a man showed up. “Takioto Kousuke, prepare yourself!” I thought that it was the Cult of the Evil God event for a moment. But judging from his clothes and movement, I immediately deny that possibility. He used body strengthening on himself and swings a mace down at me. However, to my eye, that speed is much too slow. Well, having a mock battle with Claris-san and Sempai every day might already make my eyes adjusted to their speed already. A *Gakin* sound echoes as I grabbed the mace. It was a man wearing a pair of glasses. He is wearing khaki-colored skinny pants and a black polo shirt that can be bought cheaply at a chain store. Honestly, this is not even a fight. As I catch the mace with my stole, I buried my fist into his stomach. I didn’t intend to do it so strongly but his body bent and flew into a wall. A little flustered, I rush to check on him but it seems he only fainted. I immediately take out my Tsukuyomi Traveller and contact Marino-san. “Ah, Marino-san? I was attacked by some strange person? No, he’s really weak so I don’t think he is related to the evil god cultist. Maybe he is only a normal student? Shikibukai? Ah, that’s right, I want to ask for your help with something, can I give you the detail at home? Alright, see you later.” After I contacted Marino-san, I take a look at him again. Does he have something to do with the town attack event? there were a lot of candidates for that after all. Well, let’s make a list before I go to bed today. Surely, this shouldn’t lead to a big incident right away. I am Takioto Kousuke in the first place after all. For now, let’s go home and prepare to get those ninja skills first. Speaking of which, is it okay if I start doing it tomorrow? “Come to think of it, I don’t even have a way to contact Gabby ain’t I!” Well, can’t be helped then. Guess I will have to ask for Lord Benito’s help again. I can give him a complaint too. Even so, is it really okay? Dueling with Gabby. If it is a simple face-off then I will definitely win but she won’t be using that dungeon capture game right? It will be troublesome once we visit that dungeon, well, it should be fine since Lord Benito is mediating things for us anyway. I deal with that if I don’t have Nanami with me after all. Seriously, I don’t want to go there at all. Well, this time Yuika is with me so...;..Eh, perhaps the chance is increasing because she is with me? N, No it must be nothing! It’s okay It’s okay. The chance of that happening in the game was only 1/8 after all. It’s not something that could happen so easily. ...;...;...;...;...;...;...;.I wonder why, I felt an incredible amount of anxiety. It is like the anxiety when you can’t complete debugging for the masterup when you only have one week left. I want to sell the game but I still don’t mind even if it stuck in delay forever. Shion-san’s POV ———————- “Gabriella should be meeting Takioto-kun right about now huh.” Lord Benito said so with a cheerful smile while closing his Tsukuyomi Traveller. “Is that okay? Saying something like that and leave it all to Kou. She’s Lord’s important little sister right?” After I said that, the Lord says [Of course] and nodded. “I think it is for the best. it is for Gabriella’s own good that I leave her in Takioto-kun’s care. It is not something that I should interfere with. I do feel sorry for Takioto-kun though...;...;I will have to apologize to him later.” I don’t know the full details but since it’s the Lord, “You have your reason right? Well, it’s that child after all, it should be fine as long as you explain your reason to him.” But it’s another question whether the Lord will talk about that or not. I also have something that I don’t talk about unless I get the result after all. “...;...;.” “What is it? Looking at me like that.” “Come to think of it...;...;...;aren’t you like Takioto-kun quite a lot too, Shion-chan?” “He is cute you know. I can see why Yukine likes him so much.” The fact that he can make Yukine that much into him is already quite impressive in the first place. “I see, then that’s all the more reason for me to left her in Takioto-kun’s care.” “Hou...;then don’t you have to tell her? The fact that she was eligible to join the three committees and the fact that her own brother, the Lord, rejected her application to the Shikibukai. I really do want to hear your reason on this Lord.” Hearing so, the Lord replied with a bitter smile. “For better or worse, I think Gabriella is forcing herself this time.” “Why? How is she forcing herself?” “You know, to me I think that in order to grow up, there are times that you have to force yourself to do the impossible.” ...;..Well, I understand what he wants to say. People can grow up by purposefully putting themselves into a difficult position and polish yourselves through it. Even I have repeatedly put myself in danger to do that countless times before. “But you see, the Shikibukai is really a harsh place. Everyone is not as strong as Shion-chan and Takioto-kun you know.” “Well, I think those are just the cry of the losers though.” “There aren’t many people who think like that you know. Especially, Gabriella, I think she is very conscious about it. Of course, it is not a bad thing to be a little conscious about such a thing. However, that is the thing that we, the Shikibukai must show that we can take.” The Lord takes a small breath and stands up. “Gabriella is a serious child but she is too serious. That’s why the Shikibukai is not suited for her. But you know, I think that if everything goes well, it can serve as an obstacle for her to grow.” Hearing his reason so far, I know that the Lord is really thinking about Gabriella. “If Gabriella has the conviction to overcome this and the friends that are ready to support her, I don’t mind having her here at the Shikibukai. I am really sorry for Takioto-kun but I will have him ascertain that for me. And if possible...;...;” So after he considered it, again and again, he decided to leave her in Kou’s hand huh. The Lord moves his eyes away from me and looks at the door. At the same time, a knock can be heard from the door. “Good afternoon, Benito-kun. Shion. And...;..Ara, he’s not here?” President Monika entered the room. She said that as she sweeps her eyes over the room and walks toward us. Seeing that, I immediately stood up and start preparing the tea. “So rather than me, you are here for him huh? I’m getting envious!” “That’s only natural right?...;.. Speaking of which, I just remembered, it seems like he’s planning to seduce me you know. I am looking forward to it.” She said so and laugh. Looking at her, and I don’t intend this as a lipservice, she seems to be really looking forward to it. Lord Benito bearing his usual smile pulls out a chair for her. “Aah, it’s about his standing in the three committees, right? So, what is your business today? You are not just here for him right?” “It’s about the three committees member selection. There are a lot of amazing children this year, right? Compared to last year, they joined the three committees a lot faster too.” While listening to the president, I pour magic power into the magic stone and activate the magic circle. When I heard the sound of boiling water from the kettle, I poured hot water into the teapot that I prepared beforehand. “There’s certainly a lot huh. Starting with Takioto-kun, Trefle-san, even Gabriella too...;...;” “What are you going to do about Gabriella? She is your little sister, right? I thought that you would just accept her into the Shikibukai...;..Ara, thank you.” As president Monika accepted the tea from me, she immediately takes a sip. “Haha, Shion-chan also said the same thing you know.” “Isn’t it natural? Haven’t you always brag about how great your sister is? I thought that you were a big siscon you know. So, Benito-kun, do you want Gabriella to join the Shikibukai? Or...;...;” “If you ask me whether or not I want her to join then yes, I want her to join but that will be after Gabriella made her resolve. Not some image that she was instilled by me but her own resolve.” “Her own resolve?” “That girl chased after me too much.” Saying so, the Lord gulp down his tea. “You see...;..I have a thought. There is a person who acts as a [light] in this world. In our generation, it would be you, president Monika.” “Ara, Thank you. I’m happy you said that.” “Then in Shion-chan’s generation, it would be our vice-presidents. And for this year...;.among all the people I have seen, he is the person who left the most intense impression.” “And that person is Takioto Kousuke right?” The Lord places his cup on the saucer and gives me a small nod. “Yeah, that’s right. He is interesting, right? He became such a hot topic among us. And not just that, both in a good way and a bad way, normal students are also taking their interest in him. Even talented people such as yourselves are attracted to him, even headmaster Hanamura has placed great expectations on him as well.” “...;.That is certainly so.” “A bright light huh, sometimes a goal, sometimes a rival and some times an ally. And most importantly, a light that leads the way. For everyone, and Gabriella too. Well, he also cast a big shadow at the same time as well.” Shadow, huh. I kind of understand that. There are those that dropped out of the academy. Losing their confidence to the bright light, they lost their own goal. Both I and Lord Benito believe that such people are better off dropping out. Especially those who are aiming for a dangerous future like that of an adventurer. “And I have a feeling that ultimately, he will be able to bring it to an end...;...;.No, I think that it will go well if we work together.” “What will?” “If I, president Monika, Stefania-sama, and the sempais at the three committees were to——-” “—STOP.” President Monika stares at Lord Benito with a serious expression. “I am going to see that duty through to the end myself.” “Aah, that’s right, isn’t it. We still have a year to afford. You might have to be the one to do it in the end. However, I think Takioto-kun might offer to do it himself too. Also, I get the feeling that you and I might be included as his party members as well.” I don’t understand what they are saying. Sometime after I joined the three committees I get the feeling that the sempais are hiding something from us. But I’ve never spoken that feeling out loud. “I thought that you were hiding something, so it was the case after all.” The Lord put his hands together and wink. “Sorry, we want to tell it to Mizumori-san and the other as well so can you wait for now?” “then...;..I don’t mind.” There are parts of me that want him to hurry up and tell me though. President Monika was staring at Lord but she eventually gives up and let out a small sigh. “...;.so you have that much expectation for him.” “Yeah, I expected a lot from him. A big, big expectation. Just like what we are expecting from vice-captain Mizumori.” After he said so, he loosened his expression and smile. “Well, at the same time, I’m excited to see him wading through the strange event that will happen around him. Especially his relationship with women and how he is going to determine the course of the Shikibukai in the future!” Certainly, he seems like the type that would cause problems huh. Even if he is being careful, there’s nothing to do if he is suddenly attacked after all. “WaHaHaHa! That’s right, that’s right, he will definitely start something up.” “Haa, when the number one problem child in the second year said that it sound so persuasive...;..it would be good if it is just on the level of his previous dungeon capture but I don’t want to deal with something even more strange than that you know.” “OOH, that’s painful to hear.” As I put both of my hand to cover my ears, Lord Benito takes out his Tsukuyomi Traveller and said: [Ah, it’s finally here]. “Who?” “It’s a call from Gabriella.” “Ho, about that huh.” “What is it? Can I hear about it too?” “I don’t mind, I don’t mind. It is about what we talked about earlier. Lord Benito deliberately directed Gabriella to attack Kou you see. Of course, we didn’t tell Kou beforehand either.” “I see, Un Un, you already met Takioto-kun right?” Lord Benito is talking happily with Gabriella. “Arara, poor Takioto-kun. Should I invite him over to the student council, I wonder.” “Hahaha, that’s already impossible isn’t it.” “Eeh!? Wh, Why?...;...;I, I see. U, Un, I understand. Then I think a dungeon capture would be good. I will arrange it for you.” “...;...;...;...;...;...;.Hey, doesn’t he look kinda suspicious? Perhaps something already happened?” “I agree, that’s what I am thinking too.” Looking at Lord Benito’s bitter smile, there’s no mistake. “I screw up. I know that he is a person who did a lot of unexpected things but this is truly outside my expectation, Hahaha.” “What happened?” Lord Benito makes a bitter smile to president Monika’s question. “If his luck is bad I thought that it would end up in a duel but...;.well, it is still a duel in a certain sense though.” “So what happened?” “President Monika should know him well right? Hijiri Iori-kun.” The man that Kou said to pay attention to? “Yeah, come to think of it, he is close to Kousuke-kun huh. Ah, I am thinking about recruiting him to the student council someday, please take good care of him okay.” Not only Kou, he also received a good evaluation from president Monika huh. “...;.did he defended Kou?” Since they are close, that might be the case. I won’t feel anything no matter how much people talk badly about me, but if they make a fool of Yukine, Fran or Kou then it won’t end with just me being a little angry. “No, you see, about that, it is a little different...;...;..it was Iori-Kun’s step-sister instead.” “Sister? Ah, I heard about her, she is the child that transferred in recently right? Come to think of it, headmaster Hanamura also said: [She’s not on Kou-chan’s level but she is a talented child. I think she’s a good candidate for the three committees].” “Hou, she is in the same grade even though she is his little sister huh.” “It seems she became one after the remarriage so she’s his step-sister. Actually, I was about to talk with you about that child too.” “Fumu, to received the seal of approval from the headmaster, she must be quite talented...;..speaking of which, Lord, what happened with her?” “...;...;it seems like Hijiri-san also joining the duel too so she wants me to prepare a three-ways competition with Takioto-kun you see...;...;. Moreover, it seems like she is eager to fight with Hijiri-san even more than Takioto-kun now.” And when we thought that we could leave this to Kou, this happened. “Hou! Isn’t it getting interesting!.” Alright, let’s call Kou to get the details! There is something important in running an RTA. Needless to say, that thing is efficiency but in other to achieve it you would need firepower, reflexes and the like. In the case that you want to be the first place in the world, another thing you would need is perseverance. Now that I have mentioned a few, there is something else that is important. That’s the chart. A chart is something like a dungeon capture guide that you write down. To achieve your target time you must make the chart to maximize your efficiency and record your previous mistakes. To achieve the target time, the RTA runners must strictly perform every task according to the chart after all. On the contrary, if you made a trash chart your time will be trash as well. Then how should you make your chart? The easiest way would be to find the pioneers (The people who are also doing the RTA of the same game). You can watch guide videos online and there are even some that hand out their own chart as well. You will then try it out yourself and modify it over and over until perfection then you test it out again. If there’s no pioneer...;...;you have to collect information on the sites and perform the research yourself. In the case of Magiero, I was something like a pioneer myself so I have already personally done the research and the test myself. I think that did serve me well. Because I have repeated it many times over, there is a lot of information left inside my head. If I just used other people’s chart I probably won’t remember most of it by now. Well, I made a lot of charts but one of the most essential ones would be the ninja skills chart. Since Iori can obtain most of the skills with the protagonist correction, there’s no way you would pass on getting the useful ninja skills for yourself. And if you are going to get it anyway, it would be better to hit two birds with one stone. Of course, my chart was designed that way. That’s why I invited everyone to go with me. After a short break, I go to the meeting place and——– “Hey, Takioto. I thought about this since our training this morning but aren’t you the least bit tired?” When I was thinking so, someone called out to me. When did she get here? Sempai peeked at my face while wiping her hair to the side and said so. Although my heart is racing when I saw Sempai’s beautiful face, I feign calmness and answer her with [Yeah]. “I might be tired but well, there’s a lot of things going on so...;..” Honestly, to answer her question, I am tired. Gabby declared war on me, immediately after I got home Shion-san called me and on top of apologizing to me, Lord Benito also said [I will leave it to you]. He didn’t say what but he wants me to do something. And...;.I wonder why. Why was she running and doing a mock battle with me this morning? I take my eyes off Sempai and look at the seated Yuika. She looks at me and gives me a smile while winking at me. Such a cunning cuteness. Still cute though. “Haaaaaaa” “What is it, that sigh? Aren’t you happy that I’m here~~?” Did she heard that or did she just saw my shoulders dropped? She walked over, looking unsatisfied. “Ah-h, I’m super happy–.” “And what is that unmotivated tone of yours? I am here you know? C’mon, be happy, HAPPY!” I won’t deny that this person is gorgeous. However, when I remembered what happened yesterday, I can’t really say that. “...;..Why are you here?” “Ah, that’s what you want to know huh?” She said that with a small voice and avert her eyes. Then she hesitatingly opens her mouth. “U-mm, well...;..you see.” She muttered. “Takioto, leave the matter about her to me. I already told Ludi as well.” Listening to Sempai’s words I finally realized. It must be about that consultation. After that meal, there are a lot of chances for her to talk with Sempai. Yuika must have gone to consult with her. And of course, Sempai readily helps her out. Yes, such a steadfast Sempai is really the Sempai that I like. It must be quite boorish of me if I make her speak of such a thing. I already guessed what happened so it is all the more unnecessary. Then...;..I feel a smack on my back. “Why are you smiling like that. It’s creepy you know?...;...;...;..but, thank you.” Well, let’s leave it at that. Seeing such a downhearted Yuika, there’s no way I can maintain a good mood. “You don’t have to thank me. But make sure to give your undying gratitude to Sempai alright. Right...;.you came at a good time, want to come with us, Yuika?” Hearing I said that, Sempai makes a bitter smile. “Such gratitude would trouble me though...;...;.the matter still hasn’t been solved yet either.” Sempai is so nice that I wouldn’t mind devoting myself to her though. Well, enough about that. “Well, I will do that. But more importantly...;.where are you inviting me to?” “It’s a place that can make you stronger. ‘I don’t want to lose to Iori’, don’t you think so too? and there’s that matter about Gabb-...;...; Gabriella too after all.” “I don’t want to lose but...;...;” “Do you have other plans today?” “I don’t but...;.you really are enthused about this. Even more enthused than a run of the mill playboy you know.” “Well, you don’t have to come if you don’t want to but it will definitely be beneficial for you Yuika.” Her face is saying [ Eeeh, what is he saying?] but this will definitely help with Yuika’s battle style so I really recommend it though. “After all, Sempai will be there too so just this time alright?” When I said that the one who reacted first was not Yuika but Sempai instead. When I heard the sound of her breathing out, mine and Yuika’s gazes turn to Sempai. She is having a very gentle smile on her face. “What’s wrong?” Asked Yuika while she is tiling her head. “No, I just often think like that about him too you see. There are times that Takioto was a little exaggerated after all. But” “But...;...;?” “Looking at him until now. I sincerely trust him from my heart.” Hahaha, Sempai said that and laugh. Looking at her, my chest is getting hotter. Such a word fulfilled my heart. “I too, trust you from the bottom of my heart, Sempai.” Ludi too, Nanami too, Nee-san too and Marino-san too. “...;..I understand. If Mizumori-sempai said so I will go with you despite my liiiiiiittle anxiety.” Looking at us, Yuika said so. Unfortunately, she is still looking at me suspiciously. — After we see Yuika off to her dorm for her preparation, we also head back. Because it is a holiday morning, there are not many people walking around the residential district. “Sempai, thank you.” “? what about?” Sempai tilts her head. She isn’t feigning ignorant, She must have done it naturally. Helping Yuika is only natural for her. That’s what I thought. “It’s about Yuika.” “Aah, about that huh. I rather want to praise you for it though Takioto.” Saying so, she shows me a blooming smile and hit my back. “Me?” “Yeah, I heard from Yuika you know. That you were very caring and let her consult with you.” It is true that I was being as caring as much as possible but I don’t remember giving her a consultation though. I thought about forcefully solving her case though. “I didn’t give her any consultation you know?” “Certainly, Yuika said that she didn’t go in detail with you. But she said that you were willing to listen to her. That’s why...;.you know, about that.” Sempai is smiling, she takes a deep breath with her face a little red. “I like that part about you, Takioto.” Honestly, I think that was really unfair. She took me by surprise. My heart is racing so fast, it might fly out of my mouth. “Is that so. I also like everything about you, Sempai.” Since I can’t feign calmness anymore, I decided to go with it. “EV, EVERYTHING! ?” Seeing the usually dignified Sempai with her eyes swimming all over and her voice raised like this, she is super cute. “Y, You fool. Don’t joke around like that. What are you saying.” “But, it’s true.” Saying so I take out the amulet I received from Sempai. As I show that to her while smiling, Sempai got redder and grabbed my clothes. “W, why are you trying to seduce me in an isolated place like this! You are trying to gather the hate right? There’s no one here so there’s no meaning isn’t it! ?” If it’s Sempai I am ready to do this wherever I want though. Well, let’s leave it at this today. My heart is approaching its limit too. “Sempai, it’s a joke, a joke.” [Ah], that weak voice leaked from Sempai. “Wha, what. I...;.I see. That’s right. Don’t tease me so much alright...;...;” Looking at the lonely and disappointed looking Sempai, “Well, I was joking when I said that I like you but I actually super like you though.” I couldn’t help but saying that. “——-! THAT’S THE SAME THING ISN’T IT!” In Magical★Explorer, Ninja is one of the jobs that received preferential treatments. One of the male characters that was a part of the public moral committee was a viable character thanks to his ninja job, and even the girl from the newspaper club can compete with the main heroine, thanks to that. Now, there are a lot of ways to obtain the skills in the ninja tree. You can learn the [Ninjutsu] from the teachers or characters who have those skills or obtain them from a special dungeon. If you simply want to acquire the skills then it is faster to just go to the teachers or other ninja characters. However, if that skill can be obtained inside a dungeon then it would be better to go to a dungeon considering the items you can obtain and general efficiency. If that’s the case, it is inevitable to go to a dungeon. However, depending on how you progress through the dungeon, it might be better to get a teacher to teach you. If it takes too much time to capture that is. Only one skill is absolutely necessary, if I can get skill...;...;...;let’s decide the route with that in mind. Well, I will think about that later. Right now, I should be concentrating on the dungeon. It should have been like that, “...;..Even so, this feels strange.” Somehow I can’t concentrate. “What?” Ludi looks at me with an appalling expression. “Look, we are walking on tatami mats with shoes on you know.” Saying so, she pointed at her feet. The dungeon that we are diving in right now is [The Karakuri Castle] (TLN: Karakuri mean mechanism). It is one of the dungeons that can be challenged after you become a member of the three committees or after you have breakthrough a certain floor of Tsukuyomi Academy Dungeon. As its name suggested, the Karakuri Castle is a dungeon that has the appearance of a Japanese castle equipped with traps and special gimmicks. On the surface, it would look like Ooku (TLN: Inner chamber) of Edo Castle. The walls inside have the appearance of a sliding door, making you feel like you are walking inside a room. I thought, if I just punch at these thin sliding door what would happen? The result: it bent but it never breaks. Some sort of mysterious power must be at work here, I can’t make a shortcut with this. Well, with my experience so far, anything can happen in a dungeon. I don’t mind an unbreakable sliding door or two. Well, that’s fine and all. The problem is the floor. You won’t notice anything from a wooden floor but tatamis are a different story. It has a weird elastic feeling like you are walking on a rubber. In the first place, stepping on tatami with your shoes is already weird enough though. “Certainly, it does feel weird.” Seeing Ludi, Nanami, and Yuika poking on the tatamis, I thought, if the tatamis have a fetish wouldn’t it be in an excellent position right now? If you become a tatami you can get stepped on legally and you might be able to feel their butts too. What is this, I feel strange. When I was burning with jealousy toward a mat, Nanami ready her bow. At almost the same time, Sempai also reaches for her Naginata. I immediately take a stance with my stole, ready my katana and exchange look with the now serious-looking Ludi. “Goshujin-sama, they are coming.” A short moment later, a few monsters appeared. As its name suggested, the monsters that appeared inside the Karakuri castle are all Japanese style. “Azukiarai and Ittan-momen huh.” Azukiarai and Ittan-momen are small fry monsters that appear in the lower floors of Japanese style dungeons. “Leave the flying one to me.” Saying so, I leave the Ittan-momen to Ludi and Nanami while I and Yuika start running toward the Azukiarai. The troublesome part about Azukiarai is that it has long-range attack. It molded its magic power into the shape of a red bean and send it flying toward us like a bullet. Even so, its speed isn’t so fast and I can easily deflect it with my stole wall. And even to the girl next to me...;...; “ ? what’s wrong?” She deflects the red bean bullet with her gauntlet without even looking at it. “With room to spare huh.” If I have to describe Yuika’s battle style then it would be a healer that can also do close-quarter combat. She is originally a character who is good at martial arts but she can also use a mace or a sword as well so she doesn’t have to stick to martial art alone. Of course, because she is a popular character, she also received some preferential treatments as well. However, she also has a disappointing part. That part is when she was compared to the [Final Weapon] aka the First Generation Saint, their role in battle is overlapping. But Yuika is super cute, her thighs and black knee-socks also have much destructive power, she even calls you Onii-chan and she is useful as well. So in other words, she’s a waifu. There’s no way that I wouldn’t use her. Well, if you are not going to do an RTA then having two healers in a party is not a problem, you can use her together with the first generation saint...;On the contrary, she has quite a compatibility with the first generation saint. Well, the first generation saint was heterogeneous after all. “Oh c’mon, Takioto-san is also the same aren’t you.” Well, in my case I already trained my teamwork with Nanami and Ludi after all. Rather, if I can’t do this much then it would be bad, isn’t it? However, it is surprising to me that she who shouldn’t have collected that many magic elements can move this well. Is it talent after all? In the game, I know that she is one of the best talents in the academy. “Then I will throw one over to you, take care of it for me.” Saying so, I move forward while deflecting the red beans. There are two Azukiarai. I used fourth hand to punch the first one’s head then grab and throw it over to Yuika while I draw my katana. I make sure that the Azukiarai was cleanly cut in two and look back at Yuika. “SEIIII!” Her gauntlets are emitting white light, Is it because she is using a skill? She throws a punch at the Azukiarai with all her body. “One punch kill huh.” “I don’t want to hear that from you, Takioto-san...;...;..Honestly, I can’t imagine the current me winning against you at all. I can imagine myself being cut in two though.” I smile bitterly at Yuika who is staring at me. I have been strengthening myself the best I can. If I who already utilized so much of the game’s knowledge lose to Yuika here, let alone Iori, I wouldn’t be able to compete with the three strongest or the other main heroines after all. “You will become stronger too Yuika. If you have the motivation then you will definitely become stronger.” “I wonder why you can say something like that so confidently...;...;.? Because I know. “Everyone, great work. It was a splendid combination.” Sempai who was watching over us said with a smile. This time I asked Sempai sitting this one out for us to gain experiences. Of course, Sempai kindly agreed to my request. After we retrieved the dropped cotton sheet and magic stone from the Ittan-momen and the magic stone from Azukiarai, Sempai mutters. “Alright, let’s move...;..” “Ah, well, wait a little Sempai. How is it, Nanami?” Saying so, I move my eyes toward Nanami. “Yes, Nanami sensor is beeping. It must be around here.” After checking with Nanami, I strongly hit one of the sliding doors. However, there’s no response. It should be around here, right? This time I hit the other side. Is it the one next to it? Then the door slowly slides open after a sound as if something was unlocked ringed from it. What appears was a passage. It is a hidden passage that I must take to obtain the skills I want. “Sempai, let’s go through here!” “...;.I have a feeling that I will be in your debt again.” Smiling bitterly, Sempai was the first to enter the passage. I tried to immediately follow after her but my arm was strongly pulled. “Wai, please wait a minute. Is, is that a hidden door!? Eh, this isn’t your first time here, Takioto-san!? Rather, why is everyone so calm, it’s a hidden door you know!?” It was Yuika. I was about to reply to her with my prepared answer but Ludi answered her before I could. “Get used to it. You never know what Kousuke will do next after all.” Before this, he even soloed the 40th floor too, Ludi said that while entering the passage after Sempai. Looking at Yuika who is staring blankly at the hidden door, Nanami calls out. “Yuika-sama, let’s go.” Her face still shows that she couldn’t understand what happened but in the end, she walked into the hidden passage without saying anything. When us players first met with [the Karakuri Castle] of Magiex, what immediately came to our mind was a secret passage. Among all the dungeons, it has the most hidden passages and inside each passage, there are various items, skills, and bosses hidden in it. However, despite having the most hidden passages, it is also a dungeon that can be captured without going through any of them. On the contrary, because there are so many passages that can be discovered, even a player who plays through the game for the first time would at least found one of them. It is quite a rare setting for a dungeon so it was one of my favorites but I do have one complaint. That is the fact that there’s no hint provided to find these hidden passages. Moreover, there are goddess statues that provide you with valuable items and skills that you can only find in those hidden passages as well. Do you know how hard it is to find these hidden passages?” However, it is exactly because of that hardship that I can be so carefree right now. The reason is that I already remembered all the locations of those hidden passages. Then, what should I do next after I conquered all those passages? For the time being, I would certainly go back to the entrance and challenge the dungeon again. The second long-range skill I want is hidden relatively close to the entrance after all. As I am planning things, Nanami calls out to me. “You look free, Goshujin-sama.” “Well, I’m not in a hurry...;..” I have time to slowly think like this after all. In the first place, we are inside a safety zone, monsters do not spawn here so that should go for everyone right? “Then how about we play some pretend newlywed?” “...;.what’s this so suddenly?” We are certainly free but I don’t understand why a newlywed play suddenly came out. “Welcome back Goshujin-sama. What would you like? An Angel? A Maid? Or do you want...;Na?Na?Mi?” Why are you changing poses on after another and lifting your maid outfit eh? Well, ultimately she is still cute though. “You will do it even if I don’t answer right...;..rather, aren’t those choices practically the same? Well, let’s go with a meal then.” “Kyaa? Goshujin-sama is going to eat Nanami! ?” “...;..a bath?” “Kyaa? You will take a bath with me right!? please leave backwashing to me!” “Both choices ended up with you isn’t it! ?” As I retorted, Nanami impishly smiles. Unn, if I have to choose then I would go with a bath huh. “Umm, do you always do something like this...;...;.?” Yuika is confused because we are messing around huh. “Sometimes it is even worse than this you know?” Said Ludi. I want to deny that but it is exactly like she said. “...;..Hanamura house really is amazing isn’t it.” “Hanamura house as a whole is...;...;...;well, I can’t deny that there are a lot of weird people there.” “They are certainly unique but they are all good people you know.” Sempai said with a bitter smile. Her follow up doesn’t really help though. “Here, Goshujin-sama. It’s a sandwich. For you to eternally dedicate your love toward Nanami, I added THAT in the ingredient for you.” “We are continuing this? You didn’t put in any poison right?” What eternally? She sure added a worrisome word in her sentence, I won’t die from this right?” I look at the sandwich she gave me. It seems the way she placed the vegetables is different from the one I ate earlier. Well, I ate one before so let’s try this one out. As I decided to take a bite, Nanami opens her mouth. “Ah, speaking of which, that one was made by Ludi-sama.” Hearing her, I finally understood. So that’s why she handed that sandwich to me. She is implying Since Ludi-sama made it make sure you gratefully eat it okay?, I think. But I think it would be better if you don’t make put it weirdly like that though. “Ah, Um. its shape is strange compared to Nanami’s right? You see, I don’t have much time, so I just tried making one.” “No, it’s really delicious. Thanks.” It looks normal and tastes very good so I think she should be more confident about it. “Is, Is that so.” She turned away but she looked very happy. Come to think of it, I feel like I received a lot of things from Ludi, no, everyone recently. I want to give something in return after this. Even so, this sandwich is real delicious huh. Delicious? Sandwich? I feel like I ate something like that recently...;...;.when was it? Hmm, the one that smells like energy drink? Eh, Nee-san? Aw–my head...;...;.. “Takioto-san, what’s wrong?” “N, No. it’s nothing. Let’s rest a little more and get the skill ahead of here.” Hearing that, Yuika stares at me. “Hee, you can get a skill huh...;..” While smiling bitterly I think. Since it’s Yuika I might be able to clearly tell her about it, Ludi and Sempai might already guess it but I still don’t dare to tell them. Not just Nanami, it is something that someday I have to let Ludi and the others know as well. After the break, we immediately continue advancing. “So, what kind of skills can you get here?” Should I tell her everything about the skill? Well, let’s. “It is an escape skill.” “What?” Since the Ninja skills were set as a hidden skill tree, it’s normal for Ludi to not know about it huh. In the game, if you don’t get to know those two characters, you wouldn’t be able to learn the skills after all. Well, if you recruit them, they will never stop talking about it though. Are the ninjas okay with that...;...;...; “Simply put, it is a skill that lets you flee from enemies, I guess.” It is a super useful skill if you are going to do an RTA. Escaping is an essential part of RTA after all. One of the most common things to do in an RTA for RPG games is to go to the town that you can barely make it despite your low level. In short, you advance to the second half of the story by running away from enemies with your low level. Why would you do something like that? There are a lot of reasons. Getting your hand on strong weapons from the early phase of the game, recruit party members from those towns, obtain useful items and skills that you normally wouldn’t be able to get so early or getting strengthening items from the NPC houses. That’s right, it is to strengthen the protagonist and their companions while their level is still low. Buying items that are not appropriate to your level, enhance your fighting power and raise your level by defeating the enemies with a single blow. That’s the best course of action considering the efficiency. Of course, you can also do that in Magical★Explorer. Avoiding all the enemies inside the beginner dungeon, you can defeat the boss with fire magic stone and return with a magic circle. Then after you assembled your weapons and armor, you go to a different dungeon to earn experience points with more efficiency. Actually, I planned to do that at first, and I already carried some of those steps out. However, this world is not a game. That’s why annihilating enemies with a strong weapon is not a waste. It is best to raise your level efficiently and improve your ability at the same time with other party members. Then let’s think of a way to raise more efficiency. The basic way to collect the magic elements is to go to a dungeon. It is necessary to avoid fighting the trash mobs to save time. That’s the most crucial part of an RTA but there is another way to increase efficiency. It is to increase your speed. Increasing your speed leads to faster action order in the game. But what about this reality? If each of my action gets faster and faster, I think it’s a great way to strengthen myself. Considering that, then there is no doubt that it is a super useful skill to have. We continue to defeat the monsters that appear and advance further. Then we found a place that looked like a reception hall. There were some wooden tables and scrolls there but honestly, I don’t have to read them. There are two things you need to do to get the escape skill. First is to find the hidden door that leads to this place without any hints provided. The second is to solve the puzzle. There is a scroll with a hint to solve this puzzle on the last floor but...;..with the game knowledge, I already have the answer in my head. After we got the skill, we left the dungeon. I thought about taking a shower for a mood change but as if someone was waiting for this timing, I got a message. I thought that I was being monitored for a moment but I immediately denied that idea. Maybe the message did not arrive because I was in a dungeon after all. The sender was Lord Benito. “Yuika, she might really come.” “Eh, what are you talking about?” I immediately open the message and check the contents. Yup, it’s about that. And sure enough, it is that, am I cursed or something? I want to avoid this as much as I possible but it ended up happening all the same. Maybe they saw my sour face, Ludi and Yuika peek at my Tsukuyomi Traveller from the side. “Hee, competition instead of a duel huh? Moreover, the location is the dungeon too.” Maybe they avoided the duel because Yuika might be too eye-catching. But because of that, they have to choose that place...;...;This is seriously troubling. What to do? But I can’t explain that it is a place to collect ero CGs to them either. No, it shouldn’t be completely decided yet. And that dungeon’s ero CGs can’t be collected unless Gabby does the event herself either, I can just watch out for that. At this stage, I might be able to change the location too. It is something like a mock battle so they might allow it. For the time being let’s start the negotiation. A Short Break and Second Entry. It might be a failure on my part to contact Lord Benito immediately after I received his message. I didn’t account for the fact that Gabby was with him. “Ara, are you going to run away?” Gabby interrupted us after I propose a location change. Apparently, she thought that I was chickening out so she happily tried to provoke me. I am just looking out for Gabby and Yuika’s safety, I have no intention to run away. Of course, I mean “safety” in a lot of meanings. A part of my true desire does want to observe their panicked state though. Another failure might be the fact that Yuika is currently with me. “I don’t mind at all you know~. I mean, Takioto-san is just worrying about you because he can’t bring himself to beat you down after all. Even though he offered to change the location out of worry, I never would have thought that you are willing to humiliate yourself like that ~☆” Provocation, after provocation. Even though she spoke with her usual sickeningly sweet voice with three times the sugar, she is clearly already snapped. Gabby told us the date and time with a trembling voice and hung up the phone after saying don’t you dare escape now. “Seriously, that brocon drill.” Yuika angrily said so but you are also considered a brocon by the ladies and gentlemen(ErogePlayer) too though, yup. Even so, I also want a strong drill as my little sister too. “Shikibukai also have it hard huh.” Seeing Yuika angrily complains to Nanami, Ludi cordially said so. “Too? Does something happen at the public moral committee?” I wonder what’s going on there? Things that could happen there should be [Dungeon Trial Event] or [The Muscle Event]. [The Management Event] should already be over as well. They are events that can only occur at the public moral committee, they are what the upperclassmen called the trials. On the dungeon part, they are events that have you recruit party members from the three committees to challenge dungeons to have them recognize your ability. However, this time we have a strong recommendation from Sempai so even if these events do not occur...;...;.Well, they might make it happen for the other members who want to know our ability huh. “Yeah, you see. It is a “what if though...;...;” “I will make time for you, you can come to me whenever you want.” “...;.Yeah, thank you. ...;...;Hey, I, didn’t say anything yet right?” Ludi was smiling as usual but for a moment her expression turned black and she tilts her head. She certainly didn’t say anything. But. “Well, I can understand what you want to say Ludi.” “What’s that? Fufu.” Ludi turned away, seemingly unable to hold back her joy. She put her hand on her mouth but she couldn’t hide her smile from me. “Well, can I ask for an escort then?” Saying so, she looks at me with upturned eyes. “Sure, even like this my nickname is a gentleman you know. Even if it inside the dungeon, you can leave escorting to me.” After we took a short break, we enter a transfer magic circle to continue capturing the dungeon. Ludi is in a good mood and the still irritated Yuika. As I getting my fill of their beautiful legs from behind, I call out to a person after I sensed a presence from my side. “What is it? Future consultation?” “No, I just thought that she is quite an interesting woman.” “Hmm, you are talking about Yuika?” “Yes. she has a splendid ability and as a human, she has a great point as well.” “Are you curious about her. Nanami...;...;?” “Yes, I think she is an incredible talent.” An incredible talent huh. But if you listened to the call earlier her temper might serve as a minus to her rating though. Well, she’s not a person that is usually got angry like that. Inside, there are times that she can snap like this too though. she’s gentle and considerate of others as well. If she doesn’t care about something, she will never pay it any mind though. “...;...;.I know that Yuika is a good child but she also has a part of her that always goes berserk though...;...; I wonder why.” Haaa, Nanami sighs. “It is an improbable possibility but if Ludi-sama was slandered or being ridiculed...;..what would you feel Goshujin-sama?” “Well...;...;.” “You would feel the same right. Well, everyone is starting to move...;.let’s go, Goshujin-sama.” We have acquired the [Escape] skill and re-enter the Karakuri Castle. Of course, we are using the skill to escape from the enemies...;...;...;.well, actually that’s not the case. We defeat every trash mobs as we advance through the Karakuri Castle for the second time. And of course, we don’t forget to collect the drop items. “Even so, there are a lot of traps here isn’t it.” As Ludi said so while jumping over a trap pointed out by Nanami. “It is this kind of dungeon after all.” Unfortunately, the traps in this dungeon don’t provide you with CGs. Well, even if there were some, I would like to avoid it if possible due to my heart condition. But you know, just a little, if it’s only just a little then...;...; “But this is an amazing party isn’t it...;...;” Yuika seriously said so. I immediately blow off the delusions and ask what she means while feigning my calmness. “What do you mean?” “You wouldn’t be able to see such a great party even at Susanoo Martial Arts Academy you know?” “Is that the case?” “Yes, I think that even the upperclassmen from that academy couldn’t compare to this party.” “Yuika.” When I turned to that voice, it is Sempai who is following behind while smiling. “Even inside Tsukuyomi Academy, Takioto and the others are abnormal so it’s alright.” “What abnormal so it’s alright...;...;.and you even casually included me into that too.” I super agree with that. “Speaking of Tsukuyomi Magic Academy, this academy is really amazing in a lot of ways, isn’t it.” “A lot of ways?” “Yes, I mean, other academies don’t have such a big facility, we can move around using transfer magic, and there are Tsukuyomi points too.” (TLN: Why does this academy has so many dungeon characteristics I wonder...;...;) “Eh, is this place really that great?” Haa, she sighs and looks tiredly at me. “That’s why this rich boy is so...;...;Please give me some magic tools made by Rosekreuz Company, no, the one made by Hanamura Group please.” Hanamura house is quite weird after all huh. On the surface, it has the image of a rich family but I get the feeling that it is quite a dangerous family. Especially the reactions I got from the noble-ish guys in the academy. “Certainly, I think that Tsukuyomi Academy’s facility is one of the best, no, the best in the world.” Sempai agrees. “I once visit Amaterasu Academy and Susanoo Martial Art Academy for a tournament, Tsukuyomi Academy’s facility is overwhelmingly superior to theirs. Maybe because of that the general quality of the students here is higher.” Hearing so, Yuika nods. “That’s right I think that played a part too. But, there are a lot of amazing people at the top of those academies too you know.” “Right. I know a few myself too. They can’t compete with president Monika but there are people who are on par with Captain Steph there. But it’s not like everyone there deserved to be respected though...;.” A person that Sempai speaking ill of huh, I wonder who it is. If that is a simple skilled person then there are a lot of candidates but...;...;is it him? Well, either way, Sempai will surpass all of them including president Monika in the end. Will a party that has enough power to capture the 40th floor of Tsukuyomi dungeon have trouble in a boss battle in a beginner dungeon? Of course not. “Haa…..” Yuika let out a sigh as she watches the boss that was guarding a hidden treasure, [Akaoni] (TLN: Red Orge) turning into magic elements. “What’s wrong Yuika. Sighing like that.” “I now understand that I am just a frog in the well.” “How so?” “Even like this, I am confident in my ability you know. I never lost to Onii-chan either.” Saying so, she disperses the magic power in her hands. Would it be better if I let her deal the final blow? Nanami blocks the boss’s path of retreat with her arrow while Ludi hits it with Storm Hammer and sends it flying and finally, I draw my katana and cut it in a single stroke. The boss disappeared, unable to do anything. “Ahh- Mou, aren’t I the biggest burden here.” “You think so? I don’t see it like that though. You can even use recovery magics too.” It just happened that she doesn’t have the chance to show off her skill, she did a great job on the battles with the trash mobs too. Moreover, just by being here, she’s already a feast for my eyes. Now I want a little sister for myself too. “You don’t have to flatter me. Do you even need healing in the first place? This time I don’t think you need any healing at all though?” Nanami walks up and shakes her head. “Yuika-sama, Goshujin-sama is trying to say………..It’s not like I can attack the enemy recklessly because of you, Don’t get the wrong idea here alright!” “Why did you say it like I am a Tsundere? If she took it at face value she will misunderstand isn’t she.” And you even added the boom to change the tone of your voice too right? Rather, that’s the line that I want Ludi or Yuika to say to me isn’t it. Well, if they say that for real then it might be awkward so let’s not do that…..! “Then what is it, is Takioto-san saying that you are only after my recovery magic?” “Can you not say it like I am only after your body…….There’s no way that’s the case right.” “You are so cruel Takioto-san. I wouldn’t mind if you give me a vacation trip with four days three nights Suite in Trefle empire though!” “Yuika is really true to her desires huh.” I can’t say it to her but I think her an easy to understand person. By the way, that proposal, I think Ludi would just casually give an OK to that if I just ask her. There was an event for a vacation at a resort in the empire from the additional patches too. If there’s a chance we can go there together as well. “It is as Nanami-san says, Takioto-san is really good at retorting aren’t you.” “Wait, it’s Nanami’s influence huh! ?” Nanami, why are you smugly doing a double peace pose. “Ahh Mou, I’m kidding! KIDDING! But I am really glad that I came with you today. You really help me today….thank you. Of course, Ludivine-san, Mizumori-san, and Nanami-san too. Thank you for letting me capture this dungeon with you today.” “You can call me Ludi. And if you want to visit the empire I can arrange it you know? Yukine-san too, please come by all means.” “Eh, Ehhhh. I was just joking around you know ! ?” “I will trouble you when there’s a long vacation then.” Yuika was seriously shaking while Sempai casually replied. It seems she still has some restraint when it comes to Ludi huh. “Of course, Otou-sama already gave me an OK as well. Ah, Kousuke. He wants to thank you properly so you come too.” So she already decided that we have to go huh. I want to go but it would be certain that I have to meet that isn’t it……..I wonder what will happen. As we talk, the monsters seem to have completely turned into magic stones. After I retrieved the drop items, Sempai walks over to me. “Now, let’s move on everyone. Since we are inside a hidden passage, there must be something ahead of here.” Saying so, Sempai looks at me. It is as she says, the skill I want is just ahead. “Right, let’s go.” I said that and start walking next to Sempai. “From Nanami’s research, we should be able to get [Throwing Mastery] skill here…..right?” “I’m fine without honorifics.” Yuika was saying that to Nanami. My timing is a little bad huh. “I can’t say for certain but it is the case as far mine and Goshujin-sama’s research go.” Despite getting caught by surprise, Nanami gave the answer I was looking for. “Throwing huh……I see. I think it really fits you Takioto. Right, I also have some experience in that, do you want to see? Also, have an acquaintance who is good at such skills, Do you want me to introduce you later?” Who is she referring to I wonder? The student who was good at throwing skill should be…… As far as I remembered, that should be the girl in the newspaper club huh. “Thank you, Sempai. Please schedule it at your acquaintance’s convenient.” Well, there are a lot of things I have to do, Sempai who is living with me most of the time is one thing but that person might not have time to meet me so let’s leave it at that for now. “I see. I will confirm with her later.” Even so, I can’t just leave everything to Sempai. I have to do something myself too. My throwing performance should be pretty good since I already have the seed of possibility. I still haven’t tried it out yet but I should be able to raise the performance of throwing weapons with my enchantment as well. But there are still a lot of concerns. In the game, throwing weapons like shuriken, throwing knives, kunai were treated as consumables items. They will be gone after you used it up. To compensate for that……..you will need money. Visual aid That’s one of the reasons I didn’t get throwing skill before I went into Tsukuyomi Academy dungeon. And I can make do with battle magic stone as well. There was a special throwing weapon you can get from a dungeon that has a cheat-like ability that no matter how much you use it, it will never run out but that dungeon is still too hard for me at the moment. It would be a different story if I have president Monika and the Saint in the party in their serious state though. Well, as reality is different from the game, I don’t think that I can use it an infinite number of times. There will be a time that I won’t be able to use it anymore and if I only have one I will only be able to throw it one at a time so I will have to carry a few with me at the very least. However, the thing that you can throw is not just throwing weapons. This is a reality so the things that I can throw will not be limited to those inside a menu. There’s worth in testing that out. Things like hammer seem throwable to me and I might be able to throw poison bottles as well. I don’t want to have a lot of weird things in my pocket though. Moreover, if I can use skills with third and fourth hands, the potential will be raised even more. It’s normal to grab and throw things with my stole. I even threw the monsters in this dungeon today. If there’s another concern it would be that the skill isn’t suitable for long-distance battle. I can imagine an enemy evade it with ease if there is a lot of distance between us. If it is a mid-range battle then I think I will be able to compensate it will my enchant magic though. Well, I can just rely on my party for the long-distances battle. Fortunately, Ludi and Nanami are specialized there. If she has to do it then Sempai can also fulfill that role as well. Well, anyhow. “Guess I will have to try it out in my training huh.” It will only be after I’m done with Gabby though. The dungeon that will be the stage for our match with Gabby is [The Twilight Road]. It was one of the dungeons that I will absolutely have to capture……Actually, it’s not. In the game, it was a dungeon that you can capture around the middle stage of the game. It is one of the dungeons that unlocked after you joined the three committees and a dungeon that was a stage of Shikibukai’s events. The dungeon itself is not so difficult. The enemies are not strong unless you are near its deepest part. Well, it was a dungeon that unlocked after you joined the three committees so it might look easy for those who normally strengthen yourself through the game story. In a normal capture, the only thing you would have to keep in mind is only its traps. However, the traps are so basic that you can discover it with low-level detection skills and I can easily handle it with the ring I have. The items you can get are appropriate for their level, they are good and all but they are not that attractive. The rings I got from the dungeon with Ludi and the others are rarer and even have better performance. However, dungeons that were added with Magiex DLC tends to be good items that were not in proportion to the dungeon difficulty. Those rings were not an exception. That’s why I prioritized DLC dungeons above these dungeons. Also, the monster that appears in this dungeon are also common in other dungeons, so there’s nothing special to note. The drop items are nothing to turn your head for either. In other words, there’s not worth in capturing it. However, this dungeon is unskippable for the ladies and gentlemen who joined the Shikibukai. Especially to those who want to collect the CGs. …………..Even so. “Can’t Lord Benito hurry up.” “We should already be inside the dungeon five minutes ago too.” “Well, I understand that he has to submit an additional application to use the dungeon but…..I feel like I’m alienated so much right now, so I want to finish this as soon as possible.” Saying so I turn my eyes toward the two people who are arguing in front of me. “O-H- Ho-Ho-Ho. Are you ready to grovel before me?” “I wonder who is going to be the one groveling here?” The one she was supposed to pick a fight is certainly me. However, looking at the spark between them and the way they are laughing at each other, why do I feel like I am being left behind? Well, I am actually being left behind right now though. “Goshujin-sama, isn’t this where you supposed to use your Ikemen voice?” “I don’t know why it would be necessary to have an Ikemen voice but it might really help in mediating this huh.” Some example from an Otome game Both of them are casually strengthening their body, they won’t suddenly start punching each other right? And why are you pronouncing [Voice. (In English)] so well? I did reply to her with the same word though. “Please rest assured. I thought that this would happen so I prepare a word to stop them beforehand. Thanks to that I couldn’t sleep much last night.” “You don’t have to ponder about meaningless stuff so please go to sleep by all means. But since you already thought it up, I will hear it.” “Mademoiselles, please don’t fight over me! Aah, I am such a sinful man……!” “If I say that even Yuika will become my enemy too isn’t she.” Even more so for Gabby. It’s just like something Lord Benito would say so I will never say that for sure. “Please rest assured Goshujin-sama, I will dashingly appear and clung to your arm then—–” Nanami hugs me for real while she’s saying that. Yup, they’re soft. “—You were just playing with me right! and continue with something like that.” “Both of them will probably be too shocked to say anything though. Which drama did you get that from?” The place will surely get more chaotic right. You can move in a little closer too alright? “After that, I’m planning the story for you to set out to beat the Dark Demon King together with the people we met in a cooking class too, just imagining that makes me so excited. I think it should get a movie adaptation……!” “What kind of story is that…..” “let’s have a simple title of [Holy Angel Nanami – the Hired Maid Case Files].” “Seriously, what kind of story is that…..and the woman who appeared all of a sudden is the leading actress!? It will never sell so just give up that idea.” Rather, she didn’t hear a thing I say isn’t she. It’s the usual though.  “I understand your concern, Goshujin-sama. It is about the theme song right?” “I think the story and the theme should be done before the theme song though.” Why would I concern over a theme song, I didn’t even have the word theme song in my head in the first place. “Let’s have Ludi-sama sing the theme song, it will surely be the talk of the town.” If you have Her Highness Trefle sing such theme song for your movie, it would normally become a hot topic, right? She won’t do it in the first place. “Let’s have Yukine-sama plays the bass. Leave the guitar to me, I have never played one before.” “If you never played it then how can I leave it to you!” There would be no time to do that right? Rather, no one has that kind of talent right? It seems Ludi can play violin a little though. “We can leave the keyboard to Hatsumi-sama, and for Goshujin-sama…….a tambourine?” “Why are you having a question mark there? Moreover, why a tambourine? If it is going with this flow it should be a drum isn’t it? Wouldn’t I feel like I’m alone at karaoke!?” “For the name of the band, we put everyone’s name together into [ Hatsuyikinanatambourine].” “There’s not even a trace of my name, and am I really have to stuck with tambourine!?” Why did you put two characters of the other’s name into it and leave me as a tambourine? Is that tambourine representing me in the first place? And she didn’t include Marino-san and Claris-san right?….. Claris-san should….she should be able to play the drum and Marino-san……a triangle maybe? No, somehow I think Nee-san is more fitting for that. Then should I have Marino-san playing the keyboard? “Kou is really interesting huh.” Muttered Shion-san who is looking at everyone with interest. “Why are you saying that to me I wonder?” In this case, she should be saying that to Nanami or Yuika and Gabby who is arguing isn’t she. I didn’t do anything yet. “What, you are not aware?…….Well, fine. Still, have you heard?” “About what?” She raises the corner of her mouth and starts speaking after she hid her mouth behind her fan, “About Yukine inviting Yuika to the public moral committee.” Since this looks like it is going to be a long story, I leave Yuika to Nanami. Of course, I already know about it. No, I thought that it would turn out like that, seeing how Sempai like Yuika at the Karakuri Castle. She also gets along well with Ludi. Moreover, she might be annoying sometimes but she can stand up for herself. It is fun talking with her too. In terms of her ability, the fact that she is modest might be the part that Sempai likes about her. The part that she is a hard worker and how she said that she wants to train with us might play a part as well. Rather, there are only a few people who will not be interested in such a child. She’s a beautiful girl after all. “In the first place, I was there when they were talking about it you see. Personally, I find it more surprising that she didn’t give her reply immediately. And…..I’m sure that the student council contacted her already as well.” “That’s right. the president mentioned her when she came to Shikibukai the other day to talk about you too.” “…..Shouldn’t that be kept a secret?” “Well, if it continues like this you will become the victor after all. I was thinking about shaking you up a little bit.” “How can you say that so confidently when you still haven’t tested my ability yet?” “You soloed the 40th floor right? Even that’s impossible for me.” She muttered. Then before I can reply, Shion-san changed the story. “Well, it is about Yuika, actually it seems like the headmaster has been keeping an eye on her you know. I think that’s what got the student council to be interested in her.” “I see, it is because of Marino-san huh.” “The one who is interested in her is not just the student council. The public moral committee too. That’s why the Lord and I are thinking about inviting her today so we want to hear your opinion.” “Un?” I unconsciously tilt my head. “Please wait a minute. Isn’t the Shikibukai going to recruit Gab-……Gabriella-san today?” Somehow……I can guess what happened. Perhaps that’s one of the reasons that Gabby is so angry. Hearing me, Shion-san tells me to calm down while raising both of her hands up. “Don’t look at me with such scary eyes. It was Lord Benito’s decision to not invite Gabriella in.” Did I look at her like that? I don’t intend to do that though. “I thought that you already invited her. She looked like an able woman after all.” “Hou….that’s surprising.” “Surprising?” “Yeah, it is. I thought that you didn’t think well of Gabriella after all.” “Of course, I will accept the criticism where it needs to be. At the very least, for an academic standpoint, she is definitely better than me after all. I don’t think such a thing can be achieved overnight. I think that her combat power is a step behind that of the main heroines but due to her personality she is a hard worker, she is not a disappointing character like any normal main heroines after all. The people who like her would have used her. “…..As I thought, the future Lord of the Shikibukai should be you, Kou.” “What are you saying all of a sudden?” “What, I’m just expecting a lot from you, Kou.” “I see, I will eventually surpass Shion-san and become the strongest anyway.” “Fu, Fuhahahaha, you said it. You said it. I have to stop playing around too lest you overtake me huh.” Saying so, Shion-san laughs like she is looking forward to it. Looking at her laugh, I decided to ask her about things I have been curious about. “Speaking of which……” “What is it?” “I originally was thinking about inviting Yuika to the Shikibukai you see, but why do you want my input on this? Honestly, I thought that Shion-san and the Lord would make that kind of decision by yourselves.” “What, we won’t do anything without mine, Lord’s and your opinion you know.” “Is that alright?” “Both I and Lord do value your opinion after all, WaHaHa!” “I see.” I have the feeling that Yuika is interested in the three committees. Her game self was after all. However, I have one more question. “Even so….why Yuika? I think that she doesn’t quite meet the condition of the Shikibukai though.” The ideas behind the Shikibukai are Rival and Goal. To become the Rival, you must beware of the various dangers that come with it. Shion-san and Lord Benito are noble. Lord Benito’s little sister, Gabriella is also a noble. And I also came from the Hanamura house. We have our backing. However, Yuika is different. In fact, this also raised a question even inside the game. Iori as the protagonist of Magiex is one thing. In the game, there were conditions for joining the Shikibukai. That is the ability to always be above a certain power level, or the ability to capture the early floors of Tsukuyomi dungeon. It’s like this time that I soloed the 40th floor and show them the overwhelming difference in ability and silence the other students. But what about Yuika? If she joined the student council and the public moral committee it is still understandable because those two only evaluate you using grades and real ability. But the Shikibukai is different. If Yuika joins the Shikibukai with the overwhelming power of Hijiri Iori at her back then I can understand that. However, there are also times when that’s not the case as well. It might just be a mistake in flag management from the developer though. “You recently act together with Nanami and Yuika right?……Don’t you think that makes Yuika notorious enough?” “Eh, really?” “……so you really didn’t know. Well, it’s fine as long as you understand. You see, there is another rumor about her. They are saying that Hijiri Yuika is now under the Hanamura house patronage.” “Well, I just went along with them.” It was to guarantee her safety during her initial event though. “So that’s why the rumor that you two get along spread huh? Well, what would you think if you are on the normal student’s point of view?” Well, they would think that she is just brown-nosing the Hanamura house or she just a favorite of Takioto Kousuke……I see. I understand what she wants to say but I can do nothing but give her a bitter smile. “It’s like that.” “I understand. She is strong and has a solid backing because people are thinking that she is related to the Hanamura house, right. No, it is true that I am considering being her supporter though.” “The other two committees will surely spread the rumor that you forced her to join to us. It will serve as a lure for them to hate you even more. In the end, Yuika is suitable to join any of the committees anyway.” I see. But. if that’s the case, why did Yuika take such an action? In a sense, Yuika is the best character in Magiex in human relations. She can be annoying sometimes but she always chooses who to act like that around, she even properly does a follow up and also good at flattering people as well. And above all, she can read the mood. If she senses the danger she will immediately run away, she’s quick-witted after all. She can snap once in a while like this time though. The fact that there are rumors about us……..Yuika probably already knows about it. Unlike me, she usually keeps in touch with the other classmates and Iori. Well, Iori often comes to talk with me though. Well then, why did she choose to stay with us despite that? Is it because she believes that she can become stronger when she is with us? Well, I can just ask her directly later. “So, what do you think Kou?” “Umm, what were we talking about?” “Yuika.” “Um, she’s cute and strong?” “….I am not talking about that, it is whether we should invite her to join the Shikibukai or not.” Sorry, to be honest, I already forgot what we were talking about. “Before I answer, let me confirm one thing first.” “What is it?” “Which committees does Gabriella-san going to join?” “……It hasn’t been decided yet so it is still up in the air.” “Then, does the Shikibukai………..no, Lord Benito doesn’t want Gabriella-san to join us?” “Fumu, that’s a difficult question. I think that he wants her to join. By the way, did you know that Gabriella recommended herself to join the Shikibukai? Well, the Lord turned her down after took a look at you though.” “I see. That’s why Gabriella-san came to me.” I understand now. Well, there’s no way that a siscon like him wouldn’t think about his sister. Of course, he is worried about her. Maybe Lord Benito talked highly about me and Gabby was getting jealous because of that. Or perhaps he led her to believe that he will reconsider it if she can win against me. Well, it must be something like that. Ah, so that’s why Lord Benito said that he would leave everything to me. Seeing my expression, Shion-san suddenly looked restless. “Ah, I’ve done it now…..did you see through him……….” “Thank you, Shion-san. It was Lord Benito who created this situation right? I get it now.” “K, Kou. about that, don’t you suddenly feel like forgetting some urgent business and run off?” “Nope. But it’s fine, I am not angry or anything.” Honestly, if he just says so I would comply though. Well, he must have felt bad about it that’s why he apologized so much over the phone. “R, right. There’s a cafe I like near the academy, I will take you there later. Of course, you can order anything you like too.” “Hahaha, even if you don’t do that I won’t tell anyone that Shion-san let it slip you know. Well, if you are offering me that then I won’t be holding back though. Honestly, I want Lord Benito to be the one to treat me instead.” Well, Shion-san really does talk before thinking and let slip something important in a friendly conversation huh. She won’t do it when she is acting for the Shikibukai though. “Ununu. I, I failed.” Yup, she is still cute even when she is holding her head with a dejected expression. Her usual smile is splendid too though. “Well, since you already failed, how about you tell me everything?” “Kou, when did you become such a sadist?” “Nothing will change no matter what you say now, you know. Now, please.” “I thought that I finally got a cute junior but inside he is actually a demon huh………” “Well, let’s get back to the main topic. Why do you want to invite Yuika to the Shikibukai?” “Aa.” Shion-san nods. “We are not inviting her immediately after we ask for your opinion you know. We have to let the matter about Gabriella calm down first after all. But.” “But?” “The Lord said that he would tell Gabriella that he is going to invite Yuika to upset her. I don’t know how it will turn out but I told him that if Kou is there it will all work out somehow.” Lord Benito is surprisingly strict huh. Still. “So I have to do all the heavy lifting huh…..” As I was about to ask her more questions, I see Lord Benito. He is smiling weakly but I already know everything. If I talk with him about this, I wonder which expression he will make. Well, I won’t do it though. Unfortunately, time is already up. I want to talk with her more while Lord Benito is away though…….speaking of which. “That’s right Shion-san. I was thinking about having Nanami relay it to you but I have a request for you before we enter the dungeon.” “Hou, say it.” “If something happens to Yuika, Gabriella-san or me in there we will be fine. Please don’t worry about us. They will probably get angry though.” “…….Wait, Kou, what do you mean by that.” “Ah, Lord Benito is already here.” What Gabby demands from us was as I predicted from the thing she said so far. “If I win, please kindly remove yourself from the junior assistant position. And YOU! You have to do a dogeza and apologize to me for your disrespect so far! !” “Haaa? Then if I win please dogeza to me as well. Hey Takioto-san! This Drill is saying whatever she wants again, don’t you feel anything? Please do something about her.” “Well, I will win this anyway so…..” “Goshujin-sama winning is only natural.” “KIIIIIIII! It’s the first time someone has insulted me this far!” “……..somehow, this is getting more exciting huh?” Commented, the main cause of all this, Lord Benito with a smile like this has nothing to do with him. There’s a mountain worth of things I want to say to him but that’s not what I should be doing right now. “Now then, it’s about the rules…..do I have to explain it?” There are only a few rules. The three of us will dive into the dungeon at the same time to capture it. The first person who arrives on the fifth floor which Shion-san is waiting for us, win. There’s no limitation on the weapons and items. If it gets dangerous you can use the item to flee the dungeon. I think it is very simple. Why the fifth floor? It is probably because everyone has to gather for the floor boss on that floor. This dungeon The [Twilight Road], is a dungeon that has multiple capture routes. There are four transfer magic circles that can send you to the next floor. The four magic circles each have their own destination on a different floor so we basically won’t encounter each other. Depending on the route it is possible to meet the other though. The only exception for that is on the boss’s floor. Since all the routes converge on that floor, the fifth floor was chosen as the goal. Shion-san is probably waiting for us at the safety zone in front of the boss room. “Yes, we will be fine. I, Yuika, and Gabriella will each enter the dungeon via a separate magic circle and capture it. Then we have to meet Shion-san who will be waiting for us on the fifth floor in order to win right?” The fifth floor should be easy enough. Both for me and the girls. Well, in terms of compatibility. They are far more advantageous against the monsters inside this dungeon than me in the first place. “Un, you will be fine……Then, we are already late so, Shall we. Shion-chan should already arrive at the goal by now too. Let’s head to the dungeon entrance.” With that said, Lord Benito walks to the magic circle and enter it. “Just imagining you crawling on the ground already put a smile on my face! OHoHoHo!” “I wonder who will end up crawling in the end.” We followed Lord Benito and enter the [Twilight Road]. I touch the wall inside and wait for Yuika. Perhaps Nanami wants to confirm something, she looks at several magic circles there and talks about something with Lord Benito. I confirm that Yuika and Gabby enter the magic circle and follow behind them. “I wonder how I should pick these magic circles……” “Fuh, I will be fine anyway so I will choose the rightmost one!” It was when Gabby said that with a smile. Gabby stumble on the uneven ground and reaches for a wall to balance herself. “Ara!” “Tsk, and it would be fine if you could just roll over too……..!” “What did you say……………?” Gabby tried to complain to Yuika with an angry expression but she couldn’t finish her sentence. GOGOGOGOGOGOGOGO, echoes the noise as if something heavy falling and the ground starts to shake. Everyone besides myself and Nanami must be panicking right now. They must be wondering what just happened. Immediately after the ground started to shake, something like magic circles with numerous characters appeared under Yuika and Gabby’s feet. “HII” Gabby must have lost her balance again with all this shaking. As if she aimed for it, Gabby stepped on one of the characters on the floor. Then Yuika who is nearby also stepped on one beneath her feet. They stepped on five letters and the sound of fanfare resounded. “Seriously!” I muttered in surprise. However, there’s no time to be surprised. The magic circles under Gabby’s feet have already been activated and the particles of light are floating up like fireflies. Yup, no doubt about it, it is the transfer magic circle to the hidden floor. Pitifully, Yuika who was nearby was also dragged into it. She is staring at me while being wrapped up in the light. So it ended up happening after all. I was almost certain that this would happen that’s why I try to remain close to them as much as possible. “GABRIELLA.” The moment I jumped into the light, Lord Benito’s voice echoes inside the cave. Hearing his voice, a thought came to me when I was being swallowed up by the light. That’s rare. Seeing Lord Benito startled like that. My sight is wrapped in light. The last thing I saw before that happened was Nanami bowing to me as if trying to say [Have a safe trip]. Gabriella Evangelista is, in a way, a character that always answers your expectations. As her looks suggest, she always laughs with OHoHoHo, the same goes for her personality, and above all, she also meets your expectations inside battle. In a way, I think she also answered my expectation this time as well. I don’t think anyone would just simply push a button on a wall and correctly pressing the key in the magic circle that would activate it on coincidence, that’s not something any normal human being could do. Still, if it’s Gabby or that debtful-sensei (Luigia) then they would surely be able to do it. Was it their charm(?) that made me think that they can do it? Well, there’s nothing at the destination of the magic circle. It is just the hidden floor of this dungeon. The events so far were within my expectations. That’s why I tried to be as close to Yuika and Gabby as I could. Depending on the case I would have Nanami stay with them. That’s why I made it in time. However, if there was anything unexpected then it would be their mood after the transfer took place. “GYAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA” “KYAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA” Suddenly wrapped in the feeling of weightlessness, I was startled for a moment but I immediately look for the two of them. As I located them, I extended the stole toward the girls. As we fall, Yuika grabbed on to the stole herself, while I have to wrap it around Gabby to catch her. Immediately after I got both of them, I pulled them together and spread my arms wide, MUSCLE PARACHUTE……not that, I spread out the stole. I feel that the fall speed has decreased a little but if we keep falling like this we can’t avoid collision with the ground. I have to protect them, I cast body strengthening magic while Yuika cast defense buff for me. Honestly, I am impressed. She was screaming on top of her lungs before but it seems her head is still working in such a situation. This is in contrast with Gabby who keeps screaming and clings to her white panties. But that Gabby is still cute. But why did Yuika only cast the buff magic on me? No, it’s not like I don’t know the reason though, it must be that huh. [Do something Takioto-san] or something on that line. I immediately expand my stole to the limit and shape it in the image of a parachute. The falling speed decreased further. With this, we should be able to endure the impact. Or so I thought but it seems I don’t have to worry about that. The moment we landed, my feet bent and the shock didn’t reach my body. It seems my feet acted as a cushion of sorts. To describe the feeling it would be like a water balloon. Landed on the slime-filled floor, I hold the two of them up with my stole, move away from this weird landing place and let them down. Gabby has a pale face. Well, it’s understandable. She entered the dungeon with all the confidence in the world and suddenly she made a mistake that miraculously sent her to some hidden floor and now she doesn’t know what to do next. Moreover, if you normally fall from such height you would already be dead. Honestly, I want to hug her right this instant and whisper to her that everything will be fine. Of course, there’s no way I could do that right now. Depending on how I do it, I might even get beat up by Yuika after all. I sit the still shaking Gabby down on the floor and tell her [Don’t worry about it] to calm her down. Then I head out together with Yuika to explore the floor. Just like inside the game [Twilight Road] is an orthodox cave-like dungeon. The wall, ceiling, and ground are all made of stone. You have to mind your step on some of the scaffolding as well. Also, the dungeon is again illuminated with unknown light sources like usual so we don’t have to worry about lighting. As I stare into the passage, I recall how Gabby struggled in my arm. The number one reason why her nickname is Gabby is that she often screams [GYAAA] in the game. Of course, since the nickname for Gabriella in English is also Gabby, that also played a part as well. “Unn. it seems we have no choice but to continue on ahead……the escape item is not working too.” Looking at the path that leads to the next floor, Yuika said that after she examined the floor we fell from. “I think this is probably some kind of special floor.” Escape items might not work on some floors of the dungeon or on special floors. “I think returning to the previous floor is no good too. We can’t possibly climb that wall. Fortunately, this place seems to be a safety zone though.” Well, there’s no point in climbing anyway since we arrived here via transfer magic, not a trap hole. There’s no proof that we can find an exit up there after all. “I’m sorry………..” As I was talking with Yuika, Gabby who had lost her momentum completely said so downheartedly. “I told you right? Don’t worry about it. Something like this can always happen after all.” Contrary to how she looked, Gabby is a rather serious and responsible person. That’s the reason why she doesn’t suit the Shikibukai in the first place though. “Let’s be optimistic about this. Gabriella-san just discovered a hidden room that no one ever set foot in before right? There might be undiscovered treasure lying around here you know.” “Th, that’s true. I found a hidden room……” It’s no good. Despite saying that she is clearly depressed. Rather, her voice was shaking. Yuika is probably wanting to apologize to Gabby too. She understands that this is not the time to put blame on Gabby. That’s why she keeps her usual smile and didn’t say anything. However, she is surely irritated, I want her to stop pinching me every time I try to calm Gabby down. But unexpectedly, Yuika doesn’t seem depressed or panicked like Gabby. Rather than panicked, I would say that she’s calm. I’m fine because I knew what is in store for us but it’s weird for her who doesn’t know anything to not be panicked. “Take Yuika for example, she stepped on those keys as well and she’s still totally oblivious right?” “Haaa? What are you saying Takioto-san–?” Umm, I was just trying to reduce Gabby’s guilty feeling. I wasn’t trying to criticize you or anything so please don’t get so angry. Rather, aren’t you great at reading the mood!? “……Well, that’s certainly true!” “Th, that’s right! If Yuika-san didn’t also step on it, the magic wouldn’t activate in the first place!” Please, don’t pinch my back, don’t twist it either!? “R, Right! Let’s think of a way to get out of here together. Nanami and the others must be worrying about us too.” “That’s true. Haaaa, let’s get out of here.” I follow after Yuika who started walking away in a huff. “This is quite a strange feeling isn’t it.” “What are you talking about?” “Fighting together as a team with this member, you know.” Saying so, she drives her fist wrapped in light attributes magic into the [Sunakake-Baba]’s chest. As the Sunakake-Baba floats up in the air she follows up with a superhuman mid-air combo like the one you would find in a fighting game. However, the other monsters won’t just stand by and watch as she beat up Sunakake-Baba. The imp that appeared together with the Sunakake-Baba has its aim at Yuika and starts casting low-level dark magic. Visual Aid “Takioto-san.” Of course, before she finishes her sentence, I had already moved. Expanding the stole, I deflect the magic and was about to move to attack the imp but I stop my feet after I noticed the light spear flying from behind me. “Strange? That’s my line.” The intermediate light attribute magic, [Light Spear]. Depending on the power of the user, the number of the spear will increase. Even if it was just one spear, to be able to use an intermediate magic like this at this point in time is already proof that she’s an elite…….or so. That’s what Gabby said so it must be true. The imp that was impaled by the light spear was sent flying to the wall and eventually turns into magic element. Seeing the imp got attacked by an attack that exploits its weakness, I sigh………no matter how I think about this, I am really handicapped huh. [Sunakake-Baba], [Imp] along with the boss that is further inside are weak toward light magic. Even if you normally capture the first five floors, all the monsters there are weak against light magic as well. It is a dungeon that Yuika and Gabriella who specialized in light magic shine. Well, there is a difference because Yuika is specialized in close-range combat while Gabby is specialized in long-range combat though. “OH HO HO HO! Did you see? Witness my power!” “Aa– yeah sure, amazing.” Seriously, she doesn’t even know what’s lying ahead of us and still keep using intermediate magic like that. Just what is she thinking? Hearing Yuika mutter, I make a bitter smile. Personally, I’m relieved that Gabby is gradually returning to usual though. Moreover, even if she ran out of magic power I can just transfer some to her later. Seeing that it wouldn’t develop into a quarrel, I move to the disappearing Sunakake-Baba. When I saw this monster in the game for the first time, I didn’t think that it would be Sunakake-Baba. Normally, a Sunakake-Baba would just look like a crumpled old lady. Well, its tattered long white hair and deep wrinkles on its face made it look like an old man. However, on top of its strangely big mouth, its fangs are long and there’s a small horn grown on its head. It’s an Oni no matter how you look. I would never pass up a chance to post this tight midriff wouldn’t I. I pick up a small magic stone and continue inside. Then, after searching for dozens of minutes, we found a large door and a safety room. “So it is a boss floor. It was shorter than I thought.” “That’s true. Comparing to the beginner dungeon it is really shorter.” Yuika and Gabby are surprised that it didn’t take them even an hour to arrive at the boss’s room. “It seems to be a common trend in transfer magic traps you know.” There are several types of transfer magic traps. The most common one is the one that transfers you somewhere else within the same floor. Since it is on the same floor you can easily escape it by using escape items. The second most common one is the one that activates an event on a special floor like this or teleports you to a monster floor. Clearing those floors will allow you to delve deeper inside the dungeon faster than a normal route. If you return to the original floor, the place will often be built to be smaller and in case you go deeper, the floor will be much wider with an unusual number of monsters appearing. It is probably to adjust the game’s balance. This event floor was constructed to let us return to the previous floor so it is smaller than usual. “I wonder what’s ahead……” “It will be all right no matter what happens, I am here after all! OH HO HO HO!” “Well, with this member it should be fine……let’s focus and head inside.” With that said, I enchanted the stole with light attribute. Then I pushed the door open with third hand. It’s good that I don’t have to put in too much power despite it being a large door. Rather, I felt that it did open by itself. With the door opened, a wide space lies ahead of us. It is around a field in an elementary school big. We entered the room. After we advanced for a few steps, we heard howling from above. “AWOOOOOOOOOOOOOO! !” It was a body piercing voice. I felt an illusion like I was electrified from my nails to my heart. Soon after, I see a black fireball falling from the sky so I immediately deployed my stole. Then I grab both Gabby who was blankly staring up and Yuika who put magic power into her fist and pull them away. It’s good that I already enchanted my stole with light attribute. Every time the attack hit the stole, it disappeared with a sizzling sound like water on the fire and only one fell in front of Gabby. At the same time as the black flame falls in front of Gabby, a monster descends from above. “……! So SMELLY!” Yuika’s expression distorted as she uses her hand to cover her nose. A rotten smell spread through our surroundings and a jet-black dog dropped on all four in front of us. Gray eyes with no pupils or irises, it is…. “aaAAWOOOOOOOOOOOOOOONnn” Perhaps its roar is emitting some kind of electric wave as there are a lot of small sparks flying around. [Rotten Hellhound] is a hidden boss in Twilight Road. It was not that strong in the game and if you have enough strength to join the Shikibukai you would have no trouble defeating it………it’s supposed to be beatable but….. “It somehow looks super strong isn’t it.” Was that feeling came from its appearance or was it the effect of its [Roar] skill. Well, perhaps it was both. “Hey, Takioto-san. I’m glad that you protected us but can you let us down already, this is sexual harassment you know?” Immediately after I let her down, Yuika strengthens her body and cast support magic on all of us this time. Gabby notices that she has a support magic cast on her and jumps in surprise. It was the expression like she just realized what situation she is currently in. “Sorry that I have to suddenly grab you earlier. Are you okay?” “Y, Yeah. Of course.” It’s useless. Her eyes are swimming and she doesn’t even strengthen her body. Is this the first time she got hit by a roar skill? Well, dungeon aside, it’s not a skill you would normally encounter after all. “Is this your first time facing an opponent with roar skill? I was like that at first too. Since you will surely encounter more of it in the future, it’s better to get used to it now you know.” “Ah…….!” Well, I hope I manage to distract her with that. But it seems we don’t have such luxury. Looking at the hellhound that is rushing straight toward us, I immediately move to the front. The distance is around 3 to 4 meters. Even if it is bigger than I thought it doesn’t scare me. Perhaps that’s the effect the academy dungeon has on me. Or perhaps it is the effect of all my training so far. As it tries to scratch me with its front leg that is even bigger than my head, I use third hand to block it. The hellhound’s attack has some weight to it. Moreover, its stench made me flinched when it got so close. However, that’s all. Inserting strength into my leg, I brush the hellhound’s front leg away. Seeing the chance, Yuika punches its face with all her strength. “Wooh!” “Uuuu, SO STINKY! Its breath was bad but its body odor is even worse!? Come back after you take a bath and a brushed fur won’t you!” “Its body is already rotten so there’s no meaning isn’t it.” While we have that conversation, the hellhound lungs at us again. “That was a rhetorical question!” Yuika carefreely avoids it with ease. Ignoring her reply, I confront the hellhound. Placing my hand on the katana, I catch the hellhound’s leg with fourth hand and draw the katana at its belly. “oooooOOONn” “Then how should I reply to that eh?” A straight line is formed on the hellhound’s belly, then an ink-like liquid starts to vigorously flow from it. “How about starting with agreeing with the girl’s opinion first. Even so, compared to the mock battle with Yukine-san, it doesn’t feel that strong isn’t it. Rather, it stinks!” However, its wound is slowly closing. The self-healing ability you can find on some immortal or slimes monster must have been activated. The hellhound opens its mouth wide and shoot out a black flame. Perhaps it is trying to buy some time to heal its wounds. “Alright, I completely agree with that statement.” “Uwaa. Agreeing easily like that is the worst. This is unbelievable.” Saying so, Yuika hid behind me. “For crying out loud, how should I react then” While moving forward, I adjust Yuika’s position behind my back with my left arm. Then I deployed the stole to the front to defend against the black flame. “Well, it is as Nanami-san says. Talking with you is a lot of fun, Takioto-san!” “I see. Glad you like it. When this is over, I will talk with you however much you want. So, since its weakness is light attribute can you please focus and use some light enchantment!” “Can’t be helped then, let me know when you are ready Takioto-san!” Saying so, she places her gauntlet on my hand. “What can’t be helped, WHAT.” “He He He He?” When the flame stops, Yuika jumps out as if she were waiting for this chance. Then using the light enchanted gauntlet, she faces the hellhound head-on. There shouldn’t be any need to worry about Yuika. Like me, she might be able to solo the hellhound by herself as well. But here’s the problem. “Yo~, you okay?” “I, I’m fine!” She seems to finally return back to normal but she is still looking a little upset. “It’s alright. You saw right? Since we can block all attacks coming your way, Gabby, please cast light spears, support magic or in case something happens I will leave the recovery magic to you. I am no good at long-range magic you see……….can I trust you with that? Can you handle it Gabby?” “Of, of course. Please leave it to me.” Seeing Gabby readying her magic, I move to the front. Then as the hellhound engages in an exchange with Yuika, I punch it with third and fourth hand. “Was she alright?” “Since she’s looking like that she will probably be fine. Rather, are you okay?” “C’mon, Takioto-san. Weren’t you looking? I am totally fine. TO-TAL-LY.” “No, I was wondering if your gauntlet will smell alright when we finish fighting this thing though.” “UUWAAAA! I can’t laugh at that joke. Seriously, please stop joking around like that!” Leaving rotten odor on the weapon…………it seems like some kind of curse huh. We were casually talking while beating the hellhound when a light spear emerges from behind us. “YOOAWN!” The hellhound let out the highest pitched cry than ever before. It must have taken a lot of damage from that light spear. The good thing here is that, with Gabby and Yuika, I don’t have to spend my intermediate light magic stones. Well, there are a lot of opportunities to use it from here on so it is good that I can save it for later. Yuika continues attacking the flinched hellhound. It must really hate her light attributed attacks as it starts to whine over and over and tried to escape or painfully tried to put in a counterattack. After the second light spear pierced it, it starts to change its movement. It was flailing around from receiving the light spear until earlier so Yuika expects that it would do so again but this time it counterattacks with its foreleg. Yuika managed to avoid that but albeit slightly fainted, there’s a red line on her cheek. “Yuika, healing is one thing but you have to use detoxification too!” “Aah Mou, what would I do if I get cover by your stench!?” Saying so, Yuika fell down. However, the hellhound doesn’t come to attack her. Instead, it observes the situation and starts walking sideways. Then. “AWOOOOOOOONn! !” It roared and sent a black fireball toward Yuika. However, for some reason, its flame lacks the intensity from before. Then it starts running, not toward Yuika but to Gabby who was frozen from the roar instead. This is bad, by the time I thought that it was too late. The hellhound already heads to attack Drill. I understand that she is frozen because of the roar but she shouldn’t just standing there. But I can’t say anything except as expected of Takioto-san. He was already moved to follow-up. Well, he has been keeping the distance where he can move out to help us anytime and maintain his position to be in between Drill and the hellhound so it was natural that he could make it in time. “UOOOOOOOO!” He punches the hellhound with his stole despite the size difference. The hellhound that was heading toward Drill got hit and sent toward the wall with a loud crashing noise. However, the hellhound immediately rose to its feet, shook its head left and right and glare at Takioto-san. Takioto glanced at Drill and give her a reassuring smile. Then he immediately turned his gaze toward the hellhound and stand between it and Drill. “Sorry. I can’t let you pass.” Saying so, Takioto-san calmly walks toward the hellhound. He put his hand on his katana and approaching the hellhound step by step while emitting a tremendous amount of magic power from all over his body. Perhaps the hellhound got cautious toward Takioto-san, it clenched its teeth and starts walking sideways. As the distance between it and Takioto-san was about ten meters, the hellhound jumped back and greatly widen the distance. The hellhound continues to back away while Takioto-san keeps walking toward it. The sight alone tells the story. This is Takioto Kousuke-san. This is really Takioto-san. He’s a pervert but irritatingly strong, irritatingly cool, and irritatingly kind. Takioto-san doesn’t need me or Drill to fight this hellhound. If he feels like it, he can take it down by himself, and easily at that. The hellhound raises its head up and howl. “OoowoooooNNnnn! !” I can feel my body shaking like I was electrified. Was it trying to intimidate him with its howl? Seeing Takioto-san walking toward it with a smile, I couldn’t think of it as anything but a crying voice. As I collect myself, I take a look at how Drill is doing. I don’t know what happened but she is grasping her chest while staring blankly at Takioto-san. I was worried and readied my recovery magic while checking her for injury. However, this is. “Aah…..it might already be useless.” She has fallen. In a sense, this might already be too late. Well, I get the feeling that it is only a matter of time. Her cheeks dyed slightly red, rough breathing. holding her chest like it is painful, all that while sending a heated gaze at Takioto-san. Somehow I can see heart marks floating in her pupil as well. And I went out of my way to worry about her too. I languidly let out a huge sigh. I can understand her feelings. Although it is frustrating to admit, Takioto-san in a dungeon is an Ikemen (TLN: Good-looking guy). Well, normally he is one too. I think he is a person that the more you know him, the more you fell in love with him. Everyone always acts according to the image they perceived of him so those who don’t take a close look at him will never think about him like that. However, if they have the opportunity to know him as his classmates then it won’t be like that. Then when you get to know him even more………. “What are you doing? C’mon, focus, focus.” As I cast healing magic on her, Drill reacted in surprise and looked at me. Is she trying to say something? When she opens her mouth we heard the sound like something got struck down and turn to look at Takioto-san at the same time. There, the hellhound is missing one of its legs and starts rolling on the ground. Takioto-san immediately closes the distance while returning his katana to the sheath and immediately draw it again. I couldn’t follow his katana’s trajectory with my eyes. The same probably goes to Drill as well. When we noticed it, he already swung his katana and the hellhound stopped moving completely. Takioto-san steps about one meter back while keeping his eyes on the hellhound. Then he slowly sheaths his katana. At the same time, as if waiting for that to happen, the hellhound’s head cleanly fell off. Seeing that, Takioto-san relaxed his shoulders and dispersed his magic power while taking a deep breath. As he breathes in. “STINKKK!” I think he’s an idiot. If you do that in front of the source of the smell, you should know how it will turn out. Takioto-san gets away from it as if he is trying to escape. He draws his katana out again and sniffs on it. Seriously, what are you doing? ………………….. I also smell my gauntlet. It’s fine. Probably. If it smells then I can turn to Takioto-san and ask him to reimburse me as a joke and send it for repair or buy a new one later. I might be a little wasteful but it should be manageable. Takioto-san quickly retrieves the magic stone and head toward us. However, even though he defeated the boss his face doesn’t seem happy at all “It was ridiculously stinky.” That’s the first thing you say after defeating a boss? I painfully understand where he is coming from though. Seeing Takioto-san dropping his shoulder, I suddenly think. Since a situation like this rarely come by, should I tease him a little bit? “Aah. Um, you see, can you stay at least five meters away from me…….” Covering my nose, I crunched my eyebrows and turn away. “C’MON…….!” It is very effective. “Fufu, It’s a joke. I’m just messing with you.” Saying so, I cast healing magic on Takioto-san. I don’t see any wound on him but just in case. However, he anxiously sniffs around his clothes again. It can’t be helped so I hugged his arm and press my chest and nose on him. Showing off to Drill. “See. It’s alright isn’t it.” As I thought, Takioto-san is really a pervert. “Is, is that so. But I want to take a bath just in case………are you alright Gabriella-san?” “Y, yeah. Of, of course……umm” Replied, Gabby who was staring at us with a surprise. How flustered she is. In a sense, she is certainly not okay. “Umm, since earlier, you have been calling me [Gabby] for a while now……..” Ah…., Takioto-san’s face distorted for a moment. He tried to say something but it is completely incoherent. It’s refreshing to see Takioto-san in such a panic. Even so, [Gabby] huh. With the sound of something creaking, I return to myself. It seems I was strongly clenching my gauntlet. “S, Sorry, it was kinda easier to call you that so……I will properly call you Gabriella-san from now on—-” “Gabby is fine! Please call me Gabby from now on!” Takioto-san was taken aback by Gabby’s sudden loud voice. “Ye, Yeah. Then……Ga–” Hearing Takioto-san saying that I thought that this is bad. “Understood! I will be in your care then Gabby-san!” When I noticed, The happy-looking Drill has her mouth hanging open while Takioto-san was also taken aback by me. “Ah, I never said that you could call me that!” “Then I will call you Drill-san then.” “What did you say, are you trying to pick a fight!?” “Then it’s fine if I call you Gabby-san right! Looking forward to working with you Gabby-san!” I can understand the reason her mouth is rapidly open and close like that. But I have no plans to withdraw either. I won’t allow Takioto-san alone to specially call Drill like that. Above all, I was envious. Trying to close the subject, I change the topic. “Then, let’s go ahead and continue! We already defeated the boss so there would be a treasure chest or some kind of goal ahead of us right!” As we head toward the magic circle that appeared after the boss died, Takioto-san hurriedly approaches me. “Wa, wait a minute.: “What’s wrong?” “No, you see. Don’t you suddenly want to take a detour?” Ha? I muttered that without thinking. Somehow, my true nature always comes out when I talk to Takioto-san. Is it because he is easy to talk to? “What are you saying all of a sudden? Isn’t a straight path better?” That’s why we should keep going. “A, about that. I kinda have a bad feeling about it.” I don’t feel anything like that at all though. “Even if you say that there’s no path beside this one isn’t it? Let’s go! C’mon, Dri……Gabby-san too!” With that in mind, I pushed Takioto-san’s back into the transfer magic circle. Doing so, Gabby who seems like she wanted to say something follows us into the magic circle. What we found is a treasure chest, some kind of magic circle, something that looks like a projector and an unactivated transfer magic circle. “It’s a treasure chest!” It is a treasure chest that we found in a hidden room with a boss guarding it. Naturally, our expectations are high. From what I can see, there’s no trap attached to it either. When I ask Takioto-san whether it is fine to open it, He gives me a nod with a look of resignation. Despite feeling the sense of wrongness from his action, I decided to open the chest. “Are these……..clothes?” There are four sets of clothes inside. What am I hesitating for when we have already come this far. Haven’t I already prepared myself for what’s going to happen next? Yuika is holding a cloth in her hands. Those are the outfit that a magical girl would wear. Unfortunately, it is the type that came from the program that broadcast on Sunday morning…….not. They are the suggestive type that came from the late-night show instead. “I can feel some strange power from it.” “There’s no mistake that it was magically enchanted.” “Even so……this design…..” “Really, it looked super embarrassing. Even if it has good performance, I would hesitate to wear it.” No no, there’re a lot of people who would happily wear it you know! Moreover, some characters would have their abilities greatly improved when they do a magical girl cosplay you know! Take the serious type character like vice president Fran for example. She would embarrassingly say that she doesn’t want to wear it but she actually wants to try wearing one. It looks great on her too. No, that doesn’t matter now. What should I do? Should I insert magic power into the magic circle to activate the projector? There’s one thing I want to make sure that it is the same as the game here. I put magic power into the projector’s magic circle. Yuika looked at me with a surprise but as the image and ancient letters were projected, she decides to take a look at them first and ask me about it later. “What is this?” “…..I wonder? I can’t read the letters but I think I can understand something from the picture. Hmm, It seems to depict people that go on an adventure while wearing the clothes we found in the chest.” I too can’t read what it says but after I saw the image projected I confirmed my theory. It is this after all. You have to wear these clothes to proceed further inside. “Even so, what is this picture? It looks like she is protecting her chest with both her arm from water.” “Her eyes are [X] marks so should we simply interpret that she stepped on a trap?…..Eh, What’s wrong Takioto-san. Aren’t you acting a little suspicious?” “It’s, it’s nothing.” “….don’t tell me, you can read ancient language? Takioto-san.” I haven’t done anything right? She’s too sharp. But what do I do? I can’t just say it like it’s nothing. Even if I do tell her everything, she will surely protest. “On, Only just a little.” “Really!? Then what is that?” Saying so she points at the projected image of the girl. Next to it is a picture of a wiggly path. “First, it says that this is not the end of the dungeon. It seems that it will continue for a little more……” “So this wiggly shape is a passage right?” “Yeah about that. It is about what it says. Umm, it seems women will not be able to continue any further unless they wear these clothes…….!” Hearing me, Yuika’s expression changes. From a concentrated gaze to an angry one. “Haaa?” “Yu, Yuika, you are making a face that you shouldn’t normally let others see you know.” “But isn’t it well deserved. Takioto-san, can you think about what you just said again. Why do I have to wear this?” “Wa, wait, calm down. Look, see, isn’t it nice and breezy clothes.” “Haa? Did you smack your head or something?! Then, Takioto-san tries wearing pants full of holes that barely cover anything and shout [Yeah, it’s nice and breezy] for me please.” “ISN’T THAT JUST A PERVERT!” “That’s what you just said Takioto-san!” “B, but I just said what was written there you know…..and if you don’t wear it we can’t continue on either….an, and look at that.” Saying so, I point at the round and square objects drawn on the wall. “If you perform well you can get a commemorative medal and even a certificate you know.” “Is this some kind of competition! Are you stupid! There’s no way such a thing exists! In the first place, what is a good performance anyway!?” I think so too, we seriously don’t need it. But you see, the certificate is an important item in the game, there’s no way I would throw it away right? I can’t leave it alone right! “Right, there seem to be a lot of traps ahead you see. Isn’t it the certificate for those who can efficiently avoid them…..?” “I, I get it. So the picture where the girl protects her chest with both arms is really about the trap isn’t it.” It is but it isn’t. It isn’t just that AHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH! If this is just a simple Galge then that might be the end of it but this is an eroge Magiex you know? There’s no way that it would be over with just that! ! “………Takioto-san. What are you looking so worried about.” “Eh, no, this is.” “………Follow me for a bit Takioto-san. Gabby, please wait here for a moment!” Yuika firmly grabbed my arm and pull me through the magic circle to the previous room despite the grunting Gabby. “Now, Takioto-san. Please spill it.” Getting Kabedoned by a cute girl is a little scary. But I am happy about this after all. “I, I wonder what you are talking about?” “You actually know something right? I won’t get angry so please tell me about it.” Why do you know that! I never said anything right!? As I was wondering what to do, Yuika sighed with a slightly lonely expression. “Hey….Takioto-san. Takioto-san might now know this but I am actually grateful to you, you know.” “That is—-” “Sorry, please listen to me quietly a little longer. I am grateful and have my trust in you as well. Ludi-san, Yuikne-san, and Nanami-san seem to trust you from the bottom of their hearts too. Most importantly, you have been properly listening to me until now.” Saying so, Yuika brushed away her brown hair over her ear and smiled innocently. “This time…..I will tell you about everything that I have been worrying about. That’s right, since I will tell you all of that how about I include my three sizes in there as well! That’s why, please tell me about what’s on your mind too.” ? “Th, Three sizes!?” Wait, you, what are you saying! Did you drink some weird medicine! ? “I have that much resolve you see, it just what came to my mind when I think about it! Eh? Perhaps, Takioto-san really interested in my three sizes!? This Erosuke?” Don’t poke my chest with your finger! And sorry about this but I already know your three sizes!!! Rather, why did you know that I want the Ero detail!? I never said anything like that right? Aah Mou, if it comes to this then wouldn’t it be better if I just tell her? But it’s that you know? But if I don’t tell her…………AHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH No, let’s take a deep breath. Should I tell her or not? I can pretend not to know anything too. No matter what happens, it wouldn’t be life-threatening after all. And if it comes to that I can just warn them to mind their step in the dungeon too. But if she was able to read me to this extent, I can’t just say nothing to her. If something happens, it is certain that Yuika will look at me with cold eyes. Well, if I spill everything now she would still be looking at me with cold eyes too though. But for her to demand me to tell her to this extent, it’s impossible for me to keep hiding it from her like this. “Un, Understood. But I want you to listen to me without getting angry okay.” “I won’t…..! In the first place, it is not Takioto-san’s fault isn’t it.” Right, that’s what I think too. “Al, Alright. Okay…….actually you see, the thing that was written in the ancient language was not just about the clothes.” “Well, I can guess that much.” Right. “So, in that picture, there’s one with the water right? Actually, there’s a trap that spring out water if you step on it but….what show there was the outcome of the trap you see.” “Heee, so that’s what it is about.” It shouldn’t inflict that much damage, right? There’s a cushion to soften the damage after all. But Water, water, if we talk about the water then…… Crap, I can’t think of anything! Let’s tell her something that fit the description then! “Y, You know. Water is transparent right?” “….what are you saying all of a sudden? Of course, it is right?” “So you see, you know how clothes are right? That’s why when it gets soaked with water it will become transparent too right?” “You are not making any sense though? There’s no way that’s the case, isn’t it? Clothes that turn transparent is…………Nn? Soaking in water, soaking…………!” “Ac, Actually those clothes. If you sprinkle it with water it will turn transparent!” “……..HAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA?” “It will turn transparent if you sprinkle it with water Ma’am!!!!!” Stupid~~~The development team was an idiot! Of course, we all roll and rush into the water to get the CGs but AHHHHHHHHHHHHHH! ! “Isn’t that just stupid!? Why did they put those into the treasure chest then? Why can’t we proceed without wearing them!?” Just think about it, Of course, it is there for the H Scene! Naturally, you would have to wear it right!? “Yui, Yuika?” Yuika lowers her head while her clenched fists are trembling. I can’t clearly see her expression but her face is bright red up to her ears. “I, I understand. If we step on the trap we will be showered with water and our chest will be exposed right……….! That’s why she was covering her chest and her eyes turned into X mark isn’t it…..!” “S, Sorry. But I just want to say this, It’s not my fault okay!” “OF COURSE, I KNOW THAT!?” The bad one is the developer! It is absolutely not my fault. Certainly, the gentlemen said that they want some erotic events after the boss battle, the developers understand that and answer their expectations but we eroge users never voice that out loud. Regardless, the developer team still put the H scene here. That’s why everything is the developers’ fault ! ! But I can’t say that can’t I! Crap, I can’t be escaping from reality now! I have to say something to make her see the bright side of wearing a transparent swimsuit here……! Th, that’s right! There’s that isn’t it! “Wa, wait a minute. There’s good news too you know. On top of getting a medal if you don’t get wet, you can get a certificate too you know!?” “Yeah, I got a certificate! You thought I would say that!? It’s like I got something useless like a centipede leg!? So the good performance from earlier is about not getting wet!?” Isn’t it too much to compare it to a centipede’s leg! It’s still a certificate you know!? But if you compare a [certificate] to the [H CG] then the certificate is really worth about the same as a centipede’s leg! ! No, it’s even lower than that!? “Uuuuuuuu! I understand, FINE, I GET IT! !” “Y, You get it?” “I’ve decided, I will wear it.” “Ha?” “I will wear it! I WILL WEAR IT ALRIGHT! I just have to avoid every trap without getting wet is it.” She says that and grabs my chest. Her face is bright red, her lips are shivering but she looked at me with determination. Since the trap has more impact it seems like she forgot about how sensual those magical girl outfits are. Well, I will leave that alone since I don’t want to poke the sleeping dragon. “Let’s not tell this to Gabby. We don’t know what will happen after all.” Whether we tell her or not, those things still likely to happen though. “Then I will be changing over there, please wait here until we call you over okay.” Saying so she released her hand and turn around. Seeing her like that I hurriedly call out to her. “Wait, Wait. is it really alright!? If something happens…..” It will be totally see-through you know!? “Either way, if we don’t wear it, we can’t advance, right? Moreover.” Turning back, she slowly walked over and placed her forehead on my chest. “If I step on a trap……….. Takioto-san will be there to protect me right?” “…..Of, Of course, I am!?” “Right! Then, I’m going to get change alright!” She walked toward the magic circle and turn her head toward me. “Takioto-san.” With her back facing me, she calls out. “What is it?” “You know. I think I have to say this just in case.” “Say what?” “I would absolutely hate it if other men see me like that but if it’s Takioto-san………..I think it’s okay to let you see a little bit.” Saying so, she entered the magic circle. Developers of Magiex are without a doubt splendid people worthy of praises. Normally, in Eroges and Galges, the story and characters are one thing but they are always put an emphasis on H-scene as well. Naturally, some users are actively looking for those scenes, so there’s no reason to not focus on it. The developer team of Magiex was, of course, focus on those scenes and spare no expenses to create them. Yes, along with their setting. The first time I played the game, I was both expectant as well as anxious. Just wearing some clothes on top is fine right? That’s what I thought the heroines would say. However, the developers were expecting that and throw in the setting for us. “When the magical girl outfit touches the skin of the girl, it will be supplied with magic power and the dungeon’s barriers will be released.” Or “If you wear other clothes on top to hide the outfit, the magic power supply will become inefficient and the barrier won’t be released.” Forcing their logic through with that kind of setting, the heroines try everything they can to avoid wearing it but they all fail. The scene where they have to take off their clothes because they can’t proceed with other clothes on top was awesome. That’s right. The heroines that no matter what, with no path left, have to endure their embarrassment and curl up. The heroines that tremble with humiliation. The heroines have to make a signature pose while carrying a magic stick. I was able to enjoy all of those. That’s why they were praiseworthy. That’s why I have to curse them right now! (TLN: praiseworthy and curse sound the same in JP) How much you guys are going to corner me huh! Consider for a moment if you have to wear an erotic outfit in order to proceed and moreover, it will turn transparent if it got soaked by water, what would you think if that happen in real life! It might just be a bonus in the game but if it’s done in real life it is just a punishment game isn’t it, you idiots! I have to ask them to wear it you know!? “As I thought, it’s useless……..” “It seems like we were blocked by some kind of invisible wall isn’t it.” While saying that, Yuika puts her clothes in a storage bag. She is now dressed in the magical girl outfit but for some reason, she is still looking dignified. “You seem so carefree Yuika.” “What are you saying. I am just desperate. Listen here Takioto-san. In a time like this, you have to make fun of it you know! It’s too embarrassing I don’t feel embarrassed anymore!” Saying so, she turns to look at Gabby. Following her gaze, I move my eyes to Gabby as well. “This is……..looking like this is………..! !!!” Pinching her skirt, Gabby is panicking. Perhaps she noticed my gaze, she embarrassingly hiding her body with her arms. Comparing Gabby to Yuika, it is exactly like what Yuika says. But I think that she is amazing to be able to pull it off. However, I know. Yuika’s face is red and her hands are slightly shaking as well. Noticing my gaze, Yuika’s face became even redder as she stares back at me. Then, as if she thought of something, she takes some distance from me while smiling impishly. “Look, How is it? Does it look good on me?” Saying so, she pinches the helm of her skirt and twirls around. After she finished spinning, she put one of her legs a little forward and slightly flapping her skirt. I, I can’t……I can’t see. You know. Can you stop doing that? Even like this, I am a gentleman with common sense you know. If you do such a shameful thing in front of me I will have to recite sutras in my heart while pretending to be calm you know. Do you understand? Even though I am closing off my consciousness with my whole existence, you are still asking me for a comment? Don’t say something crazy damnit! Does it look good on you? Of course, it is. It strangely looks good on you! It looks so good on you that I might go crazy from it! And you know, why are you flapping it! That’s suggestive you know, are you an idiot? You are going to get arrested for indecent exposure you know? Moreover, what is that! That healthy, full of culture and limit break thigh. Isn’t it too EROTIC! “Look, look, Takioto-san, how do I look?” My spirit is going to break. No, calm down my heart. That is just a radish, a radish, a radish. It is just a little thick, straight, smooth, very soft, and smells good. I want to be squeezed tights by it. It would look good in tights but kneesocks are still better after all…….wait, it should be Daikon isn’t it! ! ? (TLN: Daikon = Radish in Japanese, also it is the words used to describe white&amp;thicc leg.) Damn it, calm down…….it is just a little erotic, calm down, calm down, calm down. I don’t want to leave anymore weird impression! Let’s not try so hard to come up with a reply. Let’s make it simple and give her a gentlemanly reply! Cool and Simple like a Gentleman. “Hmm, it’s erotic.” AH AHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH WHAAAAAAAAAAAAAT AMMMMMMM IIIII SAYYYYYYINGGGGG. What cool and simple, wasn’t that just my true desire! “What is that, that unmotivated reaction? Aren’t you the least bit happy?” IT’S ALRIGHTTTTTTTTTT!? Did I manage to give an appropriate reply!? Let’s smooth this over. “I’m kidding, it looks great on you. Gabby too, it looks really good on you, you know. You guys are super cute.” “Right!” “……N, Naturally.” Gabby’s voice was so small, it was like it is going to disappear. No doubt, that was embarrassing for her. Thinking about how embarrassing it was for Gabby, I also think that the part where she always puts out a brave front is the best. Also, the part where she is the type she looks slender in clothing is also wonderful. The parts that should show are properly showing. She has a seductive body that I want it to wrap around me like that of Nee-san. Well, that’s good and all but the problem is the property of that outfit. We didn’t tell her that it would turn transparent when it gets soaked with water. I wonder what would happen if she knows. In the worst case, she might not even move a single step from this place, isn’t she? Well, if she doesn’t get soaked she will not have to know it anyway. Simply put, if I can protect them with my body everything will be fine. Even if I get wet nothing will happen. I really want to see their soaked figure but of course, I can’t do that. “Alright, let’s go.” Saying so, Yuika starts walking with great strides, Gabby is still a little embarrassed so she is walking with a small step. Then, when I tried to follow them to the magic circle. I ran into something invisible. “Eh?” There was no pain or shock. I simply can’t go any further. “What’s wrong, Takioto-san?” The two curiously look at me. They already passed through this invisible wall……? “No, it’s like there’s an invisible wall here?” I hit the area in front of me with third hand. Third hand doesn’t pass through, it just soundlessly sto[ped. “Nn? Invisible wall…..? The thing that I was………ah!” Yuika suddenly screams and stares at me. Then she takes a look at her and Gabby’s figure and turns toward me again. Gabby is confused and looks at both me and Yuika. Then like Yuika, she raised her voice. “Wai-” And look at this floor’s treasure chest. “Ah………” That voice leaked out of me. Looking at the magical girl outfit which looks very great on Yuika and Gabby, I turn to the leftover outfit on top of the chest and look at my clothes. I finally understand. “HAAAAAAAAAAAAA ! ?” “Takioto-san, what’s wrong? You are making a face that you shouldn’t show to others you know—” “But it’s well-deserved, isn’t it. Yuika, think about it. Why do I have to wear this?” “Bufu-! It looks really nice and breezy isn’t it!” “YOUUUUU! Don’t you use my words on me! I’m so sorry about what I did earlier!!!!!!!!!!!!” “It seems our position has been reversed isn’t it………” “IYAaa, what a pervert?” “Why are you looking so happy!?” Oi, the guy who came up with this setting, come out and do a dogeza here right now! Who the heck came up with a dungeon that you have to do a transparent magical girl cosplay to capture!? “It’s alright Takioto-san! If you perform well you can get a medal and a certificate you know!” “It was my bad! I am really apologizing here so please stop it!” “I don’t care about the apologies. Now, let’s get change Takioto-san!” Oi Oi Oi Oi, Wait a minute. “Oi, why are you coming over, looking excited like that? Wai, WAit, please. Let me have some time to calm down, wait, Gabby too? I can change by myself. Sto, Stop, Stopp it—–!” Have you ever crossed the wall? Have you ever works hard while enduring the pain to cross the wall? I……just now have abandoned something important to do cross that wall. Aah, I wonder why. The wall that didn’t even shake after I hit it with third hand, disappeared like it was never there in the first place. But I wanted someone to say that it isn’t so. I am dressed as a magical girl. [Magical Girl (Mahou Shoujo)] is a kind of [dream] that enthuses young girls in elementary school and old men alike. Personally, it was a kind of [Sanctuary]. As I wear the magical girl outfit, it is like that Sanctuary being contaminated yet it felt like I was finally united with that Sanctuary and my heart got purified. Perhaps it is the closest thing to being reborn. I am currently in a dim, humid dungeon but my heart felt like I am lying on a vast prairie with my arms outstretched. I am not scared anymore. “Pu, PuPuPu, Takioto-san, it, it sure looks good on you isn’t it.” “Is that so.” “Th, that’s right, Buh, eh, umm, It looks better on you than I thought.” You too huh, Gabby. But now my mind doesn’t care about such little things. “Ahh, what a good atmosphere…..” “This is a dungeon though, did you get so happy that your mind already broke?” “It’s like he was enlightened. Takioto-san, are you okay?” “It’s alright, the world is sparkling★ for me you know.” “Somehow, it seems he’s already gone. I have a wig with me, do you want me to put it on you?” “…..That’s a wonderful idea.” Can you not raise the crossdress level in me? Rather, why are you guys chatting so casually? Did you guys bond when you put this on me? “C’mon, please focus up!” “But I can’t get my tension up you know.” “Then, let’s do some signature pose. Nanami-san said, if you do a signature pose, you can focus your body and mind you know.” Did Nanami open a new world for Yuika when she was talking with her? I think their conversation was even more commonsense breaking than the one between Nanami and Nee-san. “I have a tripod with me so let’s take a picture. You see, actually, Nanami-san lent it to me before we enter the dungeon.” “Do you really want to immortalize such a black history……?” “It was embarrassing for me at first but it became funnier over time you know. Moreover, Takioto-san, don’t you want to see how you looked right now in a picture?” Well, getting to see something scary like that, I wonder what will become of me. Rather, she said that she borrowed the tripod from Nanami right? Just in what context did she managed to borrow it from her. Rather, why is Gabby taking a pose with a cane? She was acting so embarrassed before too, did her embarrassment disappeared after she saw how I looked? “Now, Takioto-san. Please take the most important place in the middle. Since Gabby-san takes that side I will be on the opposite side okay?” “Should I raise my arm a little higher?” “I think you are perfect with that pose!” Somehow, aren’t they a good friend now? Seeing them get along like this I can’t bring myself to say no. Just when did they become so close? I guess something happened between when they were changing and the time I changed into this. They quarreled so much before too, I wonder what happened. …….They really look happy chatting with each other huh. Let’s make my resolve then. “I just have to do it alright, C’mon Just do it! !” Standing the already posed Gabby, I lower my hips and put my hand on my katana, it is the drawing technique pose. Yuika set her Tsukuyomi Traveller on the tripod. After that, she came over and put something on my head. This is. “A wig?” “Please don’t move okay……! Let’s go with the flow here.” She stretches her white arm. She pinched her hair and straighten it but did she forget? That outfit is open on the side you know? If she showed me that white, beautiful, mysteriously immoral side, let alone my body, my heart will start moving too you know. Yup, it was right to leave my extra clothes in my luggage. “Fufu, Alright! Then I’m taking it.” Saying so, Yuika circle around my back and, CHEESE. Then the moment I saw the photo, I realized. Just now, a page in my Black History has been born. ——————————— The same cave dungeon continued after we enter the magic circle. However, there’s something that we must understand about it. From here on, we are traveling on a floor that has a lot of traps. And unfortunately, these are high-level traps that my ring can’t detect. You see, in a lot of ways, this place is out to kill me. Why wasn’t the game’s Iori blocked by the barrier? There was no text explaining that but perhaps there was a minuscule possibility that he was wearing it too? I want to see that. Speaking of the unexpected, the first time I met Nanami was the same wasn’t it. There were choices that never appeared in the game….I don’t intend to see everything as a game but it seems I still think like that subconsciously. This time it is just an outfit but I might make a fatal mistake in future events. Rather, I have to focus on defending them first. It will turn into a broadcast accident if there’s erotic happening here after all. I absolutely have to do it. Let’s fire up and focus. “Ara, I wonder what that is?” Saying so, I followed Gabby’s eyes. For some reason, there is something like a Kusudama hanging on a string from the stone ceiling. No matter how I look at it, it looks suspicious. Gabby head over toward it. “Wait Wait WAit! ! ! ! !” “STOP! GABBY-SAN! !” “? It’s fine, I won’t just pull it you know.” Although I’m certain that she won’t just pull it but if it’s Gabby I can imagine her stumble and pull it by accident. “! Takioto-san, I have a bad feeling about this……..!” “Really! ?” “Yes, my intuition says that the area over there is dangerous.” If it’s Yuika’s intuition then there’s no doubt about it. I immediately remove the baggage and take out a lower grade earth magic stone. I activated it and aim it at the area where the string is. Then the magic circle emerges in front of me, from which a stone about the size of a person’s head flies toward my target. It hit the ground next to the string. At that moment, water shot out from below. It quickly lost its momentum but it was enough to soak you if you get close to it. “Wh, what was that. Wasn’t it just water? Does it really think that it can stop us with that?” “….wha, what a sneaky trap.” “Th, this is bad, isn’t it!? It was aiming exactly at that spot too.” Gabby tightens her eyebrows and looks at us. Sorry, but I can’t talk about it. More importantly that trap, it was as Yuika said, it was precisely aiming for our vital spot on the lower body. Certainly, it is natural to aim for a vital spot in battle but it is crazy to set up such a thing in this kind of place. “It is going to finish us off with one blow…..” “Ta, Takioto-san. We just arrived here right? Isn’t that too much of an overkill?.” I think so too. It was a feint using the string while the real trap springs up to attack you from below you know!? We have to change our mindset. Focus, we have to focus. Remember the time I meditated under that waterfall. At that time, Sempai was in a wet shrine maiden outfit getting soaked by the waterfall……No, No, No, No. My heart has wandered astray. I have to focus up here. I have to protect both of them. “You two, just what is…..? Well, never mind, let’s keep moving.” Saying so, Gabby tried to go on ahead. “Wait a minute Gabby, I am something important to tell you.” I hurriedly take her hand and make her turn around. Then I take a deep breath to drive away the evil thoughts. “I don’t know how you think about me but you and Yuika are both important to me.” “HaEh! Wh, what’s this!?” “I want to protect you, right now, all I really want is to protect you.” Stunned, Gabby stares at me. I take her hand to my chest and stares into Gabby’s stunned eyes. “You see I, I don’t want you to get hurt, Gabby.” Yes, I don’t want to scar her heart. That was what was in my mind. However, I won’t know what Gabby will do. At worst, she might drag us into it too. So. “This place is dangerous. That’s why I will be on the vanguard. Please follow behind me, if something happens I will protect you.” At least I have to get her behind me. So please, don’t do any more weird thing alright? This feeling, please get through to her. “Yes….!” Seeing her small nod, I released her hand. Then I sent a signal to Yuika to advance, she was staring at me with her mouth half-open like she is trying to say [Uwaa]. “What’s wrong, Yuika?” “No–, it’s nothing.” “I see. Yuika. You stay close to my stole too. In the worst case, I will act as a wall for you.” The one who will be left with the least damage if the outfit turned transparent should be me after all. But I want to avoid that with all I can and I have no intention to get soaked at all. “If you find something strange, tell me immediately alright. I trust you. Let’s get through this together!” I have to use everything I can. If it is necessary, I will use the magic stones too. It won’t need much except for some parts after all. This is no time to be stingy. Contrary to my expectations, we have been proceeding pretty smoothly so far. Perhaps it is thanks to Yuika and Gabby. Yuika can senses the danger and tell us where it is dangerous while Gabby can shoot long-range magic to check it out. There’s no doubt that I am the most useless one here. However, we might let our guard down because everything so far was so easy so I have to be mindful not to get distracted. “Wait, what do you think that is?” I stopped everyone and point at the box placed further inside the hallway. It is different from the box we found the magical girl outfits as it is a much more luxurious box. Gabby looks at it with sparkling eyes however Yuika has a bitter expression on her face. “It’s a treasure chest!” “It’s a trap……………..!” “Yeah, that’s definitely a trap…….!” The sparkle in Gabby’s eyes faded as she looks at us. “No, wait, Gabby. I understand that you are happy but.” If I find a treasure chest I would be happy too. However, I want you to remember the thing we found when we first entered this floor. There was water shooting at our lower half right? “When we open it, it might shoot water at us.” “I don’t think something like that is worth worrying about though.” “Takioto-san, I don’t think that’s it. Let’s be a little more cunning here. The string earlier was a fake, wasn’t it? Maybe this time that treasure chest itself is a fake too?” “…..That’s true.” I was too naive. If its goal was for us to focus on that chest then. “Gabby, I have something to ask of you. Can you use your magic to attack the area around the chest?” Gabby doesn’t really agree with me but she starts casting her magic. As soon as Gabby’s specialty light magic, Light Bullet hit the side of the chest, water spewed out from the wall. As I thought the chest itself was a decoy. “Gabby. I’m glad you are here. Having a reliable person like you behind my back really gives me peace of mind.” “….is, is that so? This is somehow a complicated feeling for me.” “No, Takioto-san. It’s too early to be relieved. Please look over there.” I stare at the place Yuika points at. What’s there is something with a head of a fish……. “Gyo, Gyoblin?” Speaking of Gyoblin, it is a monster that combines the body of a goblin with a head of a fish. I encountered and hunt them together with Ludi at the beginner dungeon under Sempai’s watch. Speaking of a certain national RPG (TLN: Referring to Dragon Quest) They are small flies that even weaker than those soft bluish monsters. Rather, it is difficult to compare the two of them. They can’t possibly do any damage to the current us. Physically that is. However, such small flies might be the monster with the highest attack power in this place. Their specialty is their water gun. It can do almost no damage to you but it can certainly get you wet. At most, you only have to avoid slipping on the floor. However, what about the current situation? Try letting it graze your vital spot, at the very least it would still prove fatal for you. But these guys are supposed to be weak. It should go down with a single punch from me or Yuika. However, it is not alone. Yes, they are Gyoblins with the [s]. Any mistake could cause a broadcast accident. “Let’s hide for now.” Looking at its strange appearance, I exchange look with Yuika and pull Gabby to hide behind a rock. After a while, I heard the footsteps of the Gyoblins. “Gyo-Gyo-Gyo, Gyo-Gyo-Gyo–Gyou.” Is it saying that [this is weird]? I let out a sigh, seeing that the Gyoblins have turned back. “What to do?” “I haven’t heard that there is such a strong enemy in such a place.” “…..Earlier you easily beat up the [Rotten Hellhound], why are you being afraid of a Gyoblin now?” Whispered Gabby. I shook my head and say [It’s not like that]. “If you got hit in the wrong place, it might leave an incurable scar you know.” “You completely lost me.” “What will we do?” “Fortunately, they haven’t noticed us yet. It is a straight path so we have to get away from that place. Can we breakthrough?” “Let’s blitz through them, I will be counting on you Gabby-san!” “Yeah yeah, I got it…..” Gabby starts casting her magic while I and Yuika prepare to jump out. Adding magic to the stole, I prepare it to be ready to smack them down at any time. Yuika doesn’t equip her gauntlet but she should be able to finish off a Gyoblin with her bare hand. “I’m shooting!” At the same time the light bullets flew out from the magic circle, Yuika and I jumped out. The light bullets directly hit one of the Gyoblins and sent it flying. It shouldn’t be able to withstand that. There are four left. I immediately deploy the stole and beat down the confused Gyoblin. When I hit a nearby Gyoblin, I turn my eyes toward Yuika. Yuika was also moving out to battle her second Gyoblin as well. However, she was unaware that the color of her footing was a little strange from others. “Crap!” The sound of water being shot out echoes together with Yuika’s scream. It’s good that I acted immediately. Yuika only fell on her butt but she seems to be alright. I know it already but it is white. “Ah, ahhhhh……..” Yuika looks at me confused. It was inevitable. The water gradually seeps into my clothes and my shoulder gradually becomes exposed. “Ta, Takioto-san………! Y, you protected me…….!” “What, this is but a shallow wound.” “Please don’t put on the brave front…..are you out of your mind!?” “Ta, Takioto-san!? What is that?” “Aah, Gabby, so you saw it….” My figure with the shoulder and one side of my chest exposed. She must understand the danger that came with wearing such an outfit as she hurriedly hugged her body. “It’s fine, Gabby. Calm down. I’m sorry that I didn’t tell you from the start. But believe me, it was not on purpose. I just thought that it would be better if you don’t know.” Gabby looked at me with a half crying face and stepped back to the wall. Then *Click*. “ ! Gabby, get down!” Water gushed out from the gaps in the walls. I spread out by stole to protect Gabby but. “A, Ahhh, T, Takioto-sama.” I couldn’t protect myself. Apparently, the trap was aiming at the chest part, the water then dripped down to my vital part. “I told you right, I will protect you, Gabby.” “But, Takioto-sama is……” “Oi oi Gabby. Why are you making such an expression? It’s alright, even if I ended up like this, I managed to protect both you and Yuika right. That’s why please look at me.” This is my way of life. “Yuika, if you judge that it’s safe then follow after me. I will leave Gabby to you.” “Ta, Takioto-san? W, what are you going to do?” “Open a path for you.” I say that as I started running. I’m already finished. Traps? I can just step on all of it myself! Various traps are activated and water keep gushing out from all directions. I continue to single-mindedly head forward. I also crushed any Gyoblins that show up along the way. Fortunately, the goal was close by. It was immediately after I saw the brilliant light of the transfer magic circle. I stopped and checking out my figure. My consciousness almost flies away but I manage to hold on to it and turn back. Then the moment I saw the two beautiful magical girls, I realized. I was able to protect them. It filled me with a sense of achievement and a mysterious feeling of being released. “Look, it’s a transfer magic circle.” After I gave them a nod, together with Yuika and Gabby, the three of us walk toward it. With happiness plastered on our faces. Then, when we had almost arrived at the magic circle, Gabby stumbled over something and *Click*. The moment I heard the sound, I immediately added magic into my stole. This must be the last trial before the magic circle. *GOGOGOGOGO* resounded the noise that we never heard before in this dungeon from all directions. Where does it come from? Up, Down, Right, Left, Front, Back…..Back…..something massive from the Back……massive…….no, seriously. “A, AWAWAWAWAWA.” “H, How will we survive this!?” What is that amount of water? So they prepared the big one as the very last huh. Still, is that a pool-worth? Yeah, nope impossible. “Rush to the magic circle, eh, a-aH it seems like we are surrounded by some strange cage.” This is impossible. I disperse the magic power in my stole. You know, I’ve been doing my best haven’t I? Desperately risking my own body and all. But, somehow, I’ve always felt that it would end up like this. You see, it’s Gabby huh. it’s Gabby you know. It’s Gabby after all. Ah, her tearful panicked figure is so cute. The really freaking out Yuika is also cute. “TAKIOTO-SAN, PLEASE DON’T GIVE UP!” “Well, that’s impossible for me.” And then, we were swallowed by the water. Of course, we can’t just exit the dungeon like this. Normally we wouldn’t be able to show ourselves with this kind of outfit, even more so when it has become like this. This is why we have to change before leaving the twilight road. Bearing various kinds of scar, in order to hide them, we changed our clothes and head to the exit. When we went outside, the sun was setting. Maybe it is already time for dinner. Nanami was waiting for me outside this time as well, she greeted us with a welcome back and head over to receive us. Since there’s a scent of meat lingering around, perhaps she was having her meal but I pretended not to notice Gabby’s stomach roar. The embarrassed Gabby is really cute. Now then, it seems like we did not cause that much fuss despite everything that happened so far. I already told Nanami what would happen and since I relayed that much to Shion-san beforehand, it didn’t seem to become an uproar. Lord Benito was pretty upset though. Well, it’s only natural to get panic when something like that happened in front of his eyes huh. Even more so when it happened to his precious little sister. For the time being, we were able to talk about what we would say to Lord Benito when we were changing. Eventually, she will choose her own path. I don’t know what choice Gabby would make, but he would surely support whatever choice she chooses. With this and that happening, the next day has arrived. After I was done with the usual running and mock battle, I was feeling like taking a day off and take it slow. But unfortunately, I have an appointment today. “Welcome to the Newspaper club. I have been wanting to meet the rumored Takioto-kun. Hey,hey, Can I call you Takky? Takky★” Suddenly greeted by the high-tension Chief Editor, Ivy. I let out a sigh. “Ah, sorry about that. I haven’t introduced myself yet have I. I am the Chief Editor and the President of Newspaper Club, as well as the Idol of Tsukuyomi Academy, Ivy! Takky and the others don’t have to use an honorific with me Ya’know! Mufufu.” Saying so, she straightens her fluffy rabbit ears while making peace sign pointing at her eyes. She is a rabbit person, Ivy. She is a rare rabbit person character in Tsukuyomi Academy. There seemed to be some fox and raccoon beast people in the academy beside those who are sub-heroines however, I have never seen any rabbit person other than her. That might be due to their characteristics as one of the rabbit tribe. Although there are individual differences, rabbit people often have less magic power than fox and raccoon people so they are not very good at magic. However, they are a race that has strong legs and capable of fighting using their speed. They seem to be quite a common sight at Susanoo Martial Arts Academy. “Nice to meet you, Ivy-sama. I am Kosuke-goshujinsama faithful bishoujo maid Nanami. You may call me Nanamin as well. Nanamin?” “You don’t have to compete with her you know…..?” “I see, thank you. Takky, Nanamin?” “Ah, so it’s already decided.” Come to think of it, if it was Iori she would call him [Iorin] so I have a feeling like I was the odd one out though…… “Then it might be sudden but how ‘bout we start the interview. You can talk frankly okay! I will fix it up for you later after all.” “Fix it up to you say………” “Adding more spice will make it better received you now! Now, let’s start with a self-introduction～” “It might be the same as what you previously published but I am the Junior assistant of Shikibukai, Takioto Kousuke. I am also a part of the Hanamura family, I guess.” “Un un, that’s a good feeling. Thank you-! Well, those are old news anyway! Let’s talk about the three committees shall wEE!” Her tension is really high huh. “You were appointed as the Junior Assistant of the Shikibukai but how do you feel about that? Ah, this topic might be modified later after I consult with Lord Benito so keep that in mind OK!” “Is this interview really needed then?” “It will basically be Takky’s words you know. But I think it would be better for the Shikibukai to review it first so I’m just letting you know about it in advance!” Certainly, we need the Shikibukai to act as a filter. The readers will also have their own colored glasses to view the subject as well. Well, it’s better to have someone review it rather than letting me blurting something strange out by mistake. Let’s leave it to them. For the time being, I have to answer these questions like a member of the Shikibukai would. “Understood, I will leave the content modification in your hand. Well, if I to answer your question with that in mind then [I’m very honored to be accepted into an organization with such a long history as Shikibukai. Well, it’s only natural that I was chosen though.]. How about that?” “Yup, that’s just like what a member of Shikibukai would say! Uwa, Takky is really amazing. Your answer really helped me with my work. You saved me a lot of trouble when I have to adjust it later!” Saying so, she turns her eyes toward the materials in her hand. “Then next……It’s about dungeon capturing! Dadum! You set such an unprecedented record when you soloed the fortieth floor but personally how does Takky feel about that?” “I think anyone can do it right? If I say that President Monika will surely hold her head though. But I think that’s very Shikibukai-like you see.” “Aah, right…..the student council and public morals committee will surely do that. Unn, no matter what Takky says it would add oil to the fire isn’t it. Let’s leave that aside, for now, shall we!” “Then the next question! Dadum! What kind of woman is your type, Kyaa!” Ivy holds both of her cheeks with her hands and twists around. When I was about to retort with [Do I have to answer that?] Nanami gives me a glance that said leave it to me. Somehow, I got a bad feeling about this but let’s try letting her handle this. “Ivy-sama. Since Goshujin-sama is a shy person, please allow me to answer in his stead. Goshujin-sama loves Silver-hair you see. The length around semi-long to long is right on his preference.” Talking about such characteristic features, all the eyes went toward Nanami. However, she is being nonchalant about it. “Giving off a slightly cold impression, Charming eyes, his favorite eye color is purple by the way. Then, wearing a maid outfit that emphasized the thighs, those are the thing called Nanami-type.” “Isn’t that just you!? Or so that was what I was about to retort but you really came out and say that it is Nanami-type huh. Well, I won’t deny that though.” Silver-haired maid is the best right. ARe,…………Nanami, isn’t your body comes strangely close to me? “Such enviable intimacy……..but can I change something here for a bit? Rather, I’ve been having this idea from the beginning.” Was there any meaning to my permission then? “What do you have in mind?” “I want to insert Ludi-chan’s characteristic there and make Ludi-chan your type you see.” I kinda understand that. Rather, this might help us in the future as well. “I don’t mind. I will tell Ludi about it myself.” “Yup yup, I’m glad that you are so understanding～! Then, on to the next question!” After answering a few more of her questions with the Shikibukai in mind, the interview was over. Then, it’s time for idle chat. “Ahh, the three committees really hogged all the good people away aren’t they, well, this year’s newbies are so nice so it’s really a big help for me too!” “The Three Committees are really attractive aren’t they.” “TOOOOOTALLY. You can get a lot of preferential treatment there! We are quite advantageous ourselves…….but it can’t be compared to the three committees at all, I’m so envious!” “But, with your ability, you should be able to join the three committees yourself aren’t you, Ivy-san.” When I said that, Ivy’s eyes glow in suspicion. “Hee, you see it like that?” “I do.” At the very least her power should be able to rival that of the main heroine. Well, that’s thanks to the ninja-skills though. “Fufu, Thank you! Speaking of the three committees, are you comfortable at the Three committee, Takioto-kun? There’s a lot of information restrictions over there isn’t it? If you find that suffocating you can join me instead you know?” “I don’t intend to quit the Shikibukai you see.” “I see. Fuhn, that’s a little disappointing. Then you can stay at the Shikibukai but won’t you consider becoming a journalist?” “I don’t think so.” “Is that so.” Ivy said that and sigh. “I haven’t found a freshman to join us yet you see. If you meet someone good, be sure to introduce them to me alright!” For the time being, there’s a person that I can introduce to her but I haven’t talked to that person yet. When I was worried about what to do, Ivy clapped her hands. “Ah, right right, Takky, Takky. I just remembered a brilliant child just now. Do you know Takky?” “What about?” “About the other interesting boy, Hijiri Iori-kun!” Obviously. I nod. “Is that so, the story about him taking down the demon was popular you know. But as expected, you still haven’t heard about yesterday’s matter right?” Saying that, Sempai looks at my face. “His party seems to break through the thirtieth floor you know? And you see, they got an official offer.” —— I part ways with Ivy at the newspaper club and head outside. Then I called Nanami to a stop in front of the bench in front of the flowerbed. “Is there something wrong?” “I have something to talk with you about.” I pointed at the bench. “Nanami, I have something that I have to apologize to you.” While saying so, I remove a towel from my storage bag and wipe the bench for Nanami to sit. With a bitter smile at how close Nanami sat next to me, I was silent. “…..what do you want to apologize for?” “Actually, I have been hiding something from you.” “A vacation trip with Nanami…….if it’s something like that, then it would be great though.” Judging from her plain tone of voice, she must understand that this is a serious talk. “That is, well, let’s go with everyone later. It is as you guessed, it is something personally important to me.” “I’m looking forward to the trip. So, what do you want to talk about?” “Right. I want to say that it is an event but…..this is not a game huh. Unn, should I put it as capturing then……no, event should be easier to understand. But don’t get the wrong idea, at present, it isn’t dangerous and there won’t be any battle either. “Understood. It’s still not dangerous at this point isn’t it.” Nanami stares at me. I’m glad that she was able to understand what I wanted to say. “Yeah, presently that is. But I don’t know when it will happen. Depending on the cases, I will…..truthfully speaking, I want to end that event already.” “…I see, can I ask the details?” “About that, I want you to wait for a little for that. When it happens, I will surely let you know.” “Why…..are you making such a half-hearted confession?” “Well, there’s still no danger at the moment but I wonder if everyone will get angry if things keep going like this.” “So you understand. They will surely be angry. Of course, not just myself, Ludi-sama, Yukine-sama and everyone at the Hanamura house as well.” I think so too. That’s why I want to make it a little clearer for Nanami now. “But I have a reason I can’t speak about it you see. And I still don’t have all the pieces necessary in order to capture it yet. If I can gather all of that, I am thinking about talking to everyone about it.” “The necessary pieces…….?” “Yeah, actually, I have assembled some of them already, but I want to get the rest as soon as possible.” “Is that so…..Haa……I understand. Eventually, no, please make S?U?R?E! To tell me everything okay. And, if you come across a dangerous situation, please unreservedly come to me.” Nanami staring into my eyes. “Yeah, I understand. I will surely let you know. I want to borrow Nanami’s power after all.” Sorry but, please wait a bit more. As for that girl’s case, I still don’t know what will happen after all. Also, thinking about it, Marino-san might have a role to play in that as well. I have to doubt her with no exception. Well, I will have her ask Marino-san directly about that. If it’s Marino-san, I don’t think that her reason is a bad one though. There are lots of things to think about that event but that’s not the only thing that I have to think about. “And this is about a different matter but……..beware of the people in the Tsukuyomi Newspaper Club. Especially Ivy-san.” They will only probe us for information since we just joined the three committees but It is best to be wary of them. Those girls will start to move in earnest soon after all. Who was the character that took care of me the most in the game? Combining the word take care in various meanings, that character would be Sempai. Sempai hit me on the right spot in everything she does, she was also a top-ranking character because she possessed the strength of the three strongest. If we are talking about dungeon capturing that would be Nanami by far. Her versatility can be compared to that of Iori, the protagonist. If you raise Iori together with Nanami, not only you would be able to capture almost all the dungeons but you will also be able to obtain their treasures and items. If it’s love life then Ludi would rank highly. I can’t imagine anyone can go against her when she can tightly hold your weak point as a man like that. However, if we are talking about H-things then that would definitely be her. Cutting short my capture of The Karakuri Castle, I meet up with Ludi whose class was just over and head to the research center with her. I’m a little worried because in a certain sense she was the character that flew that way the most. Even so, this is still our first meeting. She shouldn’t do anything weird, I think. “Hee, Gabriella-san and Yuika-chan was?” “Yeah, they were quarreling so much before but today they seem to have some business together.” Cutting classes, I, Yuika, and Nanami gathered the skills and items at Karakuri Castle today. We only part ways just a little earlier. Yuika met up with Gabby and went to the student council together. Ludi might think that they are a strange combination but to me who saw how they were inside the dungeon and know that they were quite close in the game, I already knew that this would happen. Still. “I am more surprised that Ludi is running an errand for that person though.” “Apparently it was Yukine-san’s task you know. But since Yukine-san was busy, I came in her stead. And I want to try meeting her once too.” Well, she was once a noble from the Trefle Empire after all. That woman has a special circumstance though. “It seems the first research center is this way.” Nanami said after she confirmed the direction with her Tsukuyomi Traveller. The building interior was bright and clean but for some reason, there’s not even a single person there. We passed through several automatic sliding doors and finally reached our destination. There are a glasses-wearing woman and a woman with aromatherapy exude from all her over her body. But the main reason that we are here today is the dark elf in front of us, the Ero Scientist. “Hey, I’ve been waiting. Takioto-kun and Your Highness Ludivine. I am the Third Assistant of the Shikibukai, Anemone de la Cerda. Ah, I hate my last name so just call me Anemone alright.” Saying so, Anemone smiles. Anemone is a dark elf woman with many hardcore fans. Her height is around that of Claris-san’s but in contrast to the slender Claris-san, her chest is massive. “Pleasure to meet you, I am the Junior Assistant Takioto Kousuke.” “……I’m Ludivine, I am here on the order of the vice president of the public moral committee. It has been a long time.” “I’m Kousuke-goshujinsama’s bishoujo maid, Nanami. A pleasure to meet you.” “Aah, I have been wanting to meet you. My juniors. I’ve heard a lot about you and Nanami-san from the rumor you know. And Your Highness Ludivine, the last time we met was probably over ten years ago but you have grown up so beautiful.” “That’s not true, isn’t Anemone-sama a beauty yourself.” Anemone is, of course, a beauty but I think her words fit you so well though. “Fufu, don’t mind the honorific with me. Kouhai-kun too, you understand?” (TLN: Sempai = Senior, Kouhai = Junior.) “Yes. I will call you Anemone-san then. Still, there’s a lot of members here today isn’t it.” I look at the glasses woman behind me and the pink-haired teacher who turn away from me and tried to hide her face behind a bag of potato chips. “Good afternoon, Takioto-kun, Ludivine-sama, Nanami-san.” Said vice president Fran while adjusting her glasses. “………Good afternoon.” For some reason, Luigia-sensei won’t meet my eyes. Ero Scientist and Luigia-sensei. Such an anxiety-inducing duo. Let’s pretend not to see her. Well, that’s impossible huh. “Vice president Fran, what are you doing here?” “Yes, I came here today to retrieve the item that the student council requested. Third Assistant Anemone can make a lot of splendid inventions you know. We were given some strange products from time to time though.” For the ladies and gentlemen (Eroge players) those strange products are more desirable for them though. Rather, there were those who put in a request for exactly such products. “What strange products? They are all wonderful stuff aren’t they. By the way, Luigia-sensei is here for a certain matter you know.” “Uwaaa…………” Somehow, I am getting nothing but bad vibes from this. Since Ludi knows about our relationship, she looks at me and Nanami who are having an unpleasant expression on our faces with a bitter smile. The smiling Anemone must also know about the relationship between me and Luigia–sensei as well. Only vice president Fran who doesn’t know the circumstances tilted her head in confusion. Luigia-sensei hurriedly rushed to Anemon with an expression like she was saying [Mou]. Looking at the tall Anemone and the small Luigia-sensei, I wonder who is the teacher here. “Now then, you said that you have a business with me right?” She said as she stares at Ludi. Ludi nodded and handed her a storage bag from me. “This is from the public morals committee.” “Ah, did it arrive? Great, with this, now I can create that thing. Thank you!” “By the way, what are you planning to make?” Ludi probably asked out of her curiosity without thinking too deeply about it. “Well, Fufu. This you see, is the material you need to create an item that can produce tentacles on impact. Umu, it’s so wonderful just imagining about it.” ……………………… She dropped a big one so suddenly. What should I do about this situation? Why are you pulling out the big gun from the very beginning? It hasn’t even been ten minutes since we met Anemone right? At least go to one from zero, please don’t say something that goes from zero and immediately to a hundred, good grief. See, Ludi is already speechless you know. Vice president Fran and Luigia-sensei just look on because they are already used to it though. “Hey, Kousuke. Have I been carrying a tentacle material all this time…….?” Ludi seems to receive a big shock. I think Sempai probably doesn’t know the content too. If she knows she would definitely never entrust it to anyone else. Still, tentacles huh. I am incredibly worried but let’s not ask her any more about that. Everyone beside me has a dangerous look in their eyes after all. But I have to consider buying one when it’s completed huh. “How about it, you want one?” Madly so. However when I gave up and want to end the topic, [Won’t you have a chat with me about it?], she said that and smile at me. Can you please not direct such a beautiful smile at me? “This is a wonderful item, it’s really perfect for Goshujin-sama.” I would like to question her for about an hour on the topic of how such an item is perfect for me. “…….Don’t be stupid, let’s continue our talk.” But I don’t deny that I want one though. Hell, I would even help with its development. “So, what is your business with me Kouhai-kun?” “Ah, that’s right.” The impact was so strong that I almost forgot the reason I came here. “Um, I have something that I really want you to make.” “Hou, you want me to make something for you, huh?” There were several research centers in Magiex that you can develop items in. The fastest way to access them was to join the three committees and have the characters you met there develop items in the research center. This is one of the possible ways to get some of the strongest weapons. You can also pay her and the other professors to have them make it for you as well. This time the item I want is one of such items. “I want items that can capture both angels and demons. A lot of them at that.” When I said that, Nanami keep poking my body. She is holding her cheek with one hand while shyly shaking her head around. “Geez, even if you don’t use something like that…..I am always ready you know?” No, what are you imagining!? It’s not something I would use on you alright? Rather, you will make me imagine it too so stop it already, it’s embarrassing. “I see, so you have such an intention huh…….I am getting motivated!” “I’m getting stared at with super cold eyes right now so please stop it already, I’m just going to normally use it in the dungeon okay? ”Dungeon play you say……..” “Dungeon play is it Goshujin-sama……you just gain a 100 billion points of my respect.” Stop, please don’t mutter those weird things anymore.! Their eyes are piercing me. The one from the vice president is especially bad. Rather, you added too many points! “Well, let set the joke aside, I have one condition in making it.” “A condition?” “That’s right. It is to build something else than the one I will be making this time you see. I want you to fetch it for me. Ah, if Kouhai-kun is in a hurry then I will give you the priority. If it’s someone who can enter the Shikibukai then I can have that much trust in you.” “Thank you very much. Is it okay to prioritize my items over the others?” “Yeah, then let’s have a serious talk shall we. Can you tell me more about what you are going to use it for? And I would need battle magic stones and a little something to create it you see…..” Ah, that huh. I give her a nod. “I’ve already prepared the [cottons] from the Ittan-Momen and I also have several battle magic stones at the ready as well.” “…….Hou.” Of course, I went into that dungeon to get ninja skills to strengthen myself but I was also farming those [cottons]. Yes, it was to hand them over to her at this moment. I noticed that Anemone’s eyes turned sharp which I also know that it means she has become interested. Seeing her like that, Luigia-sensei and vice president Fran look at me with a different eye than before. “Then let’s talk about the spec right away. Fran, Sensei. If you already finished your business then please leave.” “Ah, I have something to talk about with Sensei later so please wait for a little.” I have to ask her what she was doing here. For the time being, let’s hope that she isn’t here to ask for some weird machine again. Hearing me say that, Anemone laughed. “Ah, Kouhai-kun. You don’t have to worry about Sensei you know.” “…..? What do you mean?” “Well, she is here to find out more about your constitution after all.” “Se, Sensei?” Sensei shyly laugh. “Actually…….I was worried about you after all. But as expected I still don’t clearly understand it so…..I was thinking that I shouldn’t talk to you about it yet you see.” “Se, Sensei……” “You have found yourself a good teacher huh, Kouhai-kun.” “Really, you are right.” I’m so happy. To think that she was researching it for me. “Oh” Exclaimed Anemone while clapping her hands. “That’s right, that’s right. Sometimes she came to get some sweets too you know. She took a lot of them so I was a little troubled you see. It seems like she always shorts on her pocket money too.” Luigia-sensei looks down while her face turned bright red. —— Yuika’s POV *** There were two turning points in my life. I don’t know whether that is too much or too few but I think it’s a lot. I am still a student, I have only lived a short life but I still have two of such moments in my life One of the big turning points is my mother’s remarriage. That’s where I met Onii-chan and Otou-san(Father). I wouldn’t be who I am today without that event. The second time is——. “Alright, are you ready Gabby-san.” “I’m good. My heart is already prepared.” “Let’s head to the student council then.” I renew my view about Gabby-san inside that dungeon. I thought she was just a stupid noble lady but that is not the case. Takioto-san saw her true self from the very beginning. It was through that pervert dungeon that I finally understand her. I can clearly remember our talk when we were changing our clothes after we got doused in water. It was Takioto-san who started it. — “Gabby, can you tell me the reason why you are so obsessed over the Shikibukai?” Gabby was really regretful that she get the others caught up in her mistake. Because it was the second that it happened, she was quite depressed. “Me?” “Yeah, you were trying to get involved with the Shikibukai through me right. Or should I say that you were trying to get closer to Lord Benito instead.” Takioto-san asked the depressed Gabby. “That’s is, it is as you say……but before I talk about it let me apologize to you first, I am really sorry. Yuika-san too. I am sorry.” “Un, it’s fine. I’m not angry at Gabby in the first place. Well, I do have some grudge against Lord Benito though.” Saying so, Takioto-san smile. In a time like this Takioto-san is irritatingly an Ikemen. Well, more importantly, there’s something I must apologize for as well. “Well, earlier I also said too much too……I’m sorry.” “No, I think that it is only natural for you to get upset like that.” Saying so, Gabby turned her eyes away and stared at the dungeon wall. Then she looked down and begins to speak as if she was confessing her sin. “For a long time…..I have been looking up to Onii-sama. That’s why I wanted to join the Shikibukai and become like him.” That’s….I kinda knew it. “The reason I was so irritated at Takioto-sama at first was, I thought that he bought his result with money.” Takioto-san listens to Gabby’s words with a serious expression. “Embarrassingly, I do not possess a talent like Onii-sama, Monika-sama or Takioto-sama. My ability is only average. I’ve been working hard to make up for it. Both in study and in magic.” Gabby only put it lightly but I know that to reach her level of ability it would require a considerable effort. It would be impossible to reach first place without hard work after all. “I thought that it would be impossible for me to reach the fortieth floor on my own. Without resorting to some underhand methods I think that it would be an impossible task. You did such a thing and happily took the first place. But the thing that made me even more frustrated was how Onii-sama talked about Takioto-sama so happily like that. What kind of hand did Takioto-sama used to achieve that, Onii-sama was having a good time chatting with me about it. Then after that, Takioto-sama joined the Shikibukai.” Hearing that, I felt something inside of me connected with her. “I was jealous. It was pure jealousy. Onii-sama acknowledged Takioto-sama and let him join the Shikibukai, I grew even more jealous when that happened. But right now I know why Onii-sama did what he did.” Vexed, Gabby bites her lip. “I’m aware that I can’t forgive underhand methods. I love doing things fair and square. I know that what I was doing is bad.” Aah, I understand her. Perhaps it was Lord Benito who was pulling strings behind the scenes while Takioto-san already knew what was going on and intentionally went along with it. “That’s why I understand that I am not suitable for the Shikibukai. Even so, I’m still admiring Onii-sama.” I didn’t know why Takioto-san was so supportive of her but now I do. It was because he knew that Gabby-san was actually a very serious, hard-working person. That’s why he knew that she wouldn’t be suitable for an organization that continuously receive malicious intent like the Shikibukai. She wants to become like her brother but it doesn’t suit her, her jealousy toward Takioto-san. The two feelings mixed together so she let it all out on him. “I do think that it wouldn’t be suitable for you. That’s why it might be better for you to search for another path but I think joining the Shikibukai has its own merit too you know.” “Takioto-san……you are contradicting yourself you know?” “I know, but let me say this. I think that both paths are good in their own way. Think about it like this Gabby, do you want to gain more strengths to become stronger or do you want to overcome your weaknesses to become stronger.” Perhaps Lord Benito didn’t want to say too much. As far as I can tell, Gabby admires Lord Benito very much. That’s why he thought that if he suggests one path over another by mistake, Gabby would take it at face value and won’t be able to make her own choice. Understanding that, Takioto-san assumed that role for him. That’s the reason why he started this conversation. Aah, so this is an important turning point for Gabby. “Gabby, let me tell you one thing. You see, I would support you on whatever choice you choose to make. If you joined the Shikibukai, I think it would prove to be quite a hard time for you but I will be there to help you, Shion-san as well. Everyone is your ally, Gabby.” Gabby nods. “But you know, even if you choose not to join the Shikibukai, we would still be your ally. Gabby is an important person to me so whether you choose to join the student council, the public morals committee or the newspaper club, I will continue to support you.” AAH, so irritating. Irritating, irritating, irritating. Why, Why are you have to be so cool like that. “Gabby. This is what you should consider and come up with an answer yourself. It’s time for you to think for yourself.” Gabby stares at the ground. Suddenly, a thought came to me. Isn’t it better for Takioto-san to stop talking now? If he supports one choice over another I think Gabby will end up choosing that choice instead. The important thing here is for Gabby to think for herself right? “Takioto-san, please let me talk with Gabby alone for a moment.” Takioto-san stands up with a smile. When he walked passed me, he whispered [She’s in your care] to my ear, and left the room. Yuika’s POV *** Seeing Takioto-san left the room, I start the talk. “Gabriella-san, what do you think about your brother?” “About…Onii-sama?” “If I have to honestly describe my brother, the word would be delicate you see. I think that seventy percent of his body is made of sugar you know. I think he is pretty feminine myself.” “Is that so.” “He is. But you see, he’s a gentle person. He also pretty reliable when opportunities arise too.” Just rarely though. “Isn’t he a pretty good Onii-sama?” “Well, he is. Speaking of which, at first I wanted to become stronger to protect him you know.” In the past, the stronger one was me. Before he entered Tsukuyomi Academy, I was sure that I am stronger than him. “But recently, how should I put this, it is frustrating but Nii-chan became a lot stronger. And I, I don’t want to lose to him.” Now we are toe to toe but it seems like I will be overtaken soon. However Takioto-san is helping me right now. “What about you Gabby-san?” Gabby exhales and begins to talk. “I……..wanted to be like Onii-sama. I have been looking up to him you know. But.” She looked at me and smiles. “When I saw Takioto-sama and Yuika-san, it made me remember. I was envious and I want to act more like myself.” “Envious? Of us?” “Yes. that’s right. The two of you are both living the way you like after all.” Certainly, both I and Takioto-san might be living the way we like. “……Nee, Yuika-san. If I join the other positions in the three committees will he really continue to cheer me on?” “Of course. It’s Takioto-san after all. Saving other people is kind of like his hobby you see, that person. Well, I was saved by him after all.” From what I heard from the headmaster, he was the one who solved the problem that I had always been worried about. Takioto-san might not be aware of it himself but he showed me the way that led to the answer to my problem. That’s why I will have to thank him later. I glanced at Gabby, She is laughing. “What’s wrong?” “Fufu, nothing. Nee, if it is fine with you, can you tell me about Takioto-sama too?” About Takioto-san? Hmm. “That weirdo? Let’s see. I have been training with him recently but he is a strange person you know? He always wakes up early in the morning and casually jogs for several dozens kilos, practicing the exact same sword swing for tens of minutes, then has a mock battle at the people at Hanamura house. He does that almost every day you see.” Well, Yukine-san who was there with us is also strange, Ludi-san apparently has trained quite a lot as well. That might be because his surroundings itself is strange though. “After that, he visits the dungeons every day to train himself. When he was done with that he would sometimes come to the academy for the Shikibukai’s business. Sometimes he also does something strange like making an account book or manage some kind of pocket money too, it’s not even his you know.” “Bookkeeping and manage pocket money? What’s he doing…….Fufu.” “Ah, you don’t believe me……..he really did that you know? Well, back to his training, that person really commits to it like an idiot you know. Because of that, it seems like cutting classes and head to the dungeon is a lot more effective. It’s no wonder that he became that strong.” “So he did that much……somehow, my war declaration is getting a lot more embarrassing.” “Speaking of which, I’ve seen the people who badmouthed him you see, it’s kinda ironic, all they were saying was [You spent all day playing and used your money to get into the Academy right]. You know, from where I see it, he is working many times harder than any one of them.” Ah, was that the same for Gabby? She is making a bitter smile though. Well, whatever. “It’s normal when you think about it right? Simply being a genius wouldn’t make him become that strong isn’t it. I’ve changed my image of him. Certainly, Takioto-san might be talented. But I don’t think that his talent is as strong as that of the president’s or the others’. Still, to make up for it, he has been gathering the knowledge and put in a lot of effort.” Gabby nods along with a meek expression. “I think of him as a great person but the fact that he is a big pervert also deduct from the points at the same time you see” Saliva erupted from Gabby’s mouth. I wonder why, I thought I would give her some talk when she was depressed but seeing her carefree smile like this, I think that is no longer necessary huh. “Gabby-san. About the three committees, I think it’s a good idea to think about it slowly you know.” “Yes…..I will do that. Um, Yuika-san.” “What is it?” “Thank you very much.” As if her worry was dispelled, Gabby let out a smile. ———- Thus, she made her choice. That’s why we came here. “Welcome, Yuika-san, Gabriella-san.” Said president Monika with a smile. “What business do you have with us today? If my guess is correct…….you are here to talk about joining the three committees right.” Well, if the two people who were invited before came to the student council, that might be the natural speculation huh. “President Monika, please listen to my selfish request.” Gabby looks at my eyes and nods. “Selfish? Yeah, please, feel free to say it.” “I had previously refused to join the student council before but if there’s still a spot left, would you please allow me to join you?” “……Can you tell me your reason? Ah, I’m not angry at you or anything you know. I was just surprised. Purely a surprise.” Maybe the president thought that Gabby would choose to join the Shikibukai. That was what I was thinking too after all. “I’ve been chasing after my brother all this time, I’ve followed and followed him to the place I am now. But thanks to Yuika san and Takioto-san, I realized.” “I am myself. I want to grow stronger in my own way. Not to be strong like my brother, I want to become stronger so that I can become a splendid person like my brother.” “….your goal is Benito-kun right.” “Yes, I……want to overcome my beloved Onii-sama. Rather than aiming for where he’s standing, I want to surpass him in my own way.” She stares straight to President Monika, and let her heart out. “That’s the reason I want to join the student council.” “Fufu, fufufufufu.” President Monika laughs. Her smile came from the bottom of her heart. “Good, this is great. I love things like this you know.” President Monika stands up and touches the magic circle on the wall behind her. She added her magic power into it and produce the crest of the student council that is glowing with white light. She touches the center of the magic circle and pulled out a single document. She then writes something on it and puts it in the envelope with magic circle engraved on her table. Then it starts flying. It doesn’t fly as fast as a shuriken. However, it wasn’t hit my the air resistance or flutter like a paper would either. The letter slowly floats up slowly and settle on Gabby’s hand. “I will accept you in. I won’t let the other members object to this either. The first time that we invited you in, there was no one voicing their objection in the first place so I think that there shouldn’t be a problem though.” Saying so, president Monika laughs. “Let’s become stronger together.” Gabby shyly smiles and glances at me “Sorry, Yuika-san. Since your brother will join the student council as well, we can’t accept both of you since we are already reached the quota you see………just kidding, Fufu, sorry about that, that was a joke. Yeah, I just want to try saying it once. I understand. You have no intention to join us right?” Exactly. “I am very honored to receive your invitation but please allow me to refuse. I will not join the student council.” “So, which one do you want to join?” Somehow, I think that the president already predicted which of the organizations I am going to join. “I’m thinking about joining the Shikibukai.” “Fufu, Fufufufu. Can I ask why?” “Gabby-san said that she wants to surpass her brother right?” “She did.” “I am the same. I don’t want to lose to Onii-chan either.” Yes, I don’t want to lose to Onii-chan. That idiot, he’s not reliable no matter where you look, without me he can’t do anything, isn’t he? I can’t lose to that Nii-chan.” Gabby chose her own path at her turning point. This is the path I chose. “If Gabby-san thinks that the place that she can grow stronger in her own way is the student council then the best place that can let me grow on my own way is at the Shikibukai.” But my main reason is different. I won’t say it out loud but I want to be near Takioto-san. I don’t want to leave his side. I want to become stronger at his side. Then I want to stand beside him. The important turning points of my life This is where my second one is. It was the moment I met Takioto-san and stay at his side. “That’s why I am going to join the Shikibukai.” “Here you are.” I was offered a cup and a saucer with a picture of rose painted on it. Lifting it up the fresh scent of Darjeeling tickles my nose. The sweetness and fragrance of the tea leaves spread throughout my mouth when I sipped the beautiful walnut color tea. “It’s delicious. Thank you very much, Sakura-san. I’m grateful that you let me use this place again.” The librarian, Sakura Rue-san, we met her once when we briefly explained the matter about the Shikibukai to Iori and Yuika last time. Come to think of it, I got involved with Gabby right afterward huh. “Still, this is weird. To think that Iori-kun hasn’t arrived yet. Whenever he is going to meet someone here, he is usually the first to arrive too.” Is that so. Well, I purposefully came here early so this is only natural though. “Is that so?” “Yes, Iori-kun come here often you know. Yuika-chan too….but lately I haven’t seen her though.” “Oh……” I might be the cause of that. “Hey, Sakura-san. Do you have time? Would you like to join me for a chat until Iori arrives? Actually, I have something I have been meaning to ask you, you see…….” “Fufu, okay. The borrowing and returning of books here are fully automatic and there aren’t that many people who came here anyway. Even like this, I’m quite free all the time you know…..do you want to invite me out on a date or something?” “I don’t want to be heartbroken so please allow me to refuse.” If possible I would like to invite her out but if I invite the current her, I would definitely get shut down. “AraAra, am I already too old after all?” “It’s not about your age, I just think that it’s not going to work out for now……well, let’s leave that aside.” I put the cup on the saucer and stared at Sakura-san. “Sakura-san……do you like this world?” “Fufu, what are you asking all of a sudden?” “I am just a little curious you see.” Sakura-san narrowed her eyes and show me a very gentle smile, it was as if she was looking at her own child. “You asked me whether I like this world, correct?…………I like it you know. I like it very much.” Looking at that smile, the emotions I felt before resurfaced. It was what I felt when Ludi got herself cornered at the hotel. The same feelings as when my favorite heroine fell into a crisis. “……I am relieved to hear that.” I said that and reach for the tea. I was truly relieved that she thought so. But I originally thought that would be her answer from the start. That’s why. “Ah, Kousuke-kun!” It was at the same time as I was swallowing down the tea. Iori suddenly called out to me from the side. Both I and Sakura-san turned to look at him at the same time. “Sorry for arriving so late Kousuke-kun.” “No, I was just too early. I wanted to say I don’t mind but.” Saying that I pull out a chair for Iori. “What?” “But I can’t forgive you for interrupting this blissful moment between Sakura-san and me.” Hearing that, Sakura-san put her hand on her cheek and laugh sneakily. “Ara Ara, Mou-.” “Wh, what?” “HaAa, and I finally get to hear the word like coming from Sakura-san too……!” Hearing I said that, Iori’s eyes went wide in surprise as he stands up. “………EEHHHHHHHHHHH !” Iori freaked out. When I was about to tell him that was a joke, he stares alternately at me and Sakura-san. “Mou, Kousuke-kun. If you asked me like that, I can only give you that kind of reply right.” “Eh, Uh Umm, S, sorry Kousuke-kun!” I catch Iori who was trying to turn away and run with my stole. I pulled the struggling Iori back to me and force him to sit down on the chair. “Sorry, Iori, that was just a joke. “Ah, Takioto-kun, so you were aiming for this when you said that? To think that you would toy with me like that.” Looking at Iori who is still staring at us with uneasy eyes, I and Sakura-san let out a laugh. “Uh, Umm, what do you mean?” “She was just saying that she said like in the meaning of she fond of a cake, you just misunderstand the context. Well, sorry about that.” “S, so it was like that? Come on, don’t surprise me like that!” “My bad, my bad.” “You don’t sound like you feel bad at all though?” Exactly. “Fufu, then I will go pouring you some tea, wait a little Iori-kun.” “Saying so, Sakura-san stands up.” As I was seeing Sakura-san leave, Iori calls out to me. “Sorry, it seems Yuika has been troubling you a lot lately right.” “No, don’t mind it. I was the cause in the first place.” Rather, I have the feeling that Yuika was corrupted the moment she got involved with me though. “She helped me out with the dungeon the other day, and it’s fun talking with her too.” It’s a shame that it turned out like that at the very end though. “Ah, Sorry I have only talked about myself have I. and the one who call me today is Kousuke-kun too. But this is a good time.” “Good time?” “I have something to talk about with you too Kousuke-kun…….eh, what about Nanami-san?” “Nanami is doing something for me so she should be with Anemone-san from the Shikibukai right now.” The reason that Nanami isn’t here is that I don’t feel like bringing her here yet. I was very careful every time I came here after all. “I see. So Kousuke-kun. What’s the important thing that you want to say to me?” I give him a small nod. That’s right. I have something important to say to him. That’s why I called Iori here. “I have something I want to ask you.” Considering the future, I have to ask him this. “What do you want to ask?” “Hey, Iori. have you ever play Ero-……..no, a Galge?” “FuE? Why are you asking me this all of a sudden?” Well, that’s a natural reaction. “This is pretty serious. So, have you?” “Hmm, I haven’t…….?” “I see. Well, let’s say that it’s a novel or manga then.” The thing I want to say is the same. “Do you like a happy ending or a bad ending?” Before Iori can answer, I continue speaking. “You see, I’ve played a lot of games but I like happy endings more than the bad ones. Well, most people would think so though.” That’s why no matter how many times I was brutally killed, I would keep visiting the Taiga Dojo until I reach a good ending. Even in that action game set in a cyber world, I would keep dying and starting over in order to save the heroine. I closed my eyes and remember Ludi. The first time I met her, she was heading toward despair. Depending on the cases, she might have been driven straight to the bad end. At that time, after I saw her, the option to escape was already gone. “So, if someone has to face a bad end…..well, you can call it misfortune too. If someone seems like they are facing a misfortune and you have the power to save them, what would you do?” I stare at Iori. Seeing how serious I am, Iori must felt something too. He narrowed his eyes and look at me with a serious expression. “I will help.” “Even if it proves to be very difficult?” “……Even so, I will help.” “I see…..that’s good.” Unintentionally, a smile floats up on my face. Then I realized. He is really a man worthy of being the protagonist of this story. “Yup, that’s the end of my business. So, you said you have something to talk about with me too right.” Iori made an expression that said [That’s all?] but to me, that was an important question. “…yeah, it’s not that important so I thought that I should just send you a message but if possible I want to say it directly to your face you see.” “Not that important?” Iori gets up from his chair. “You see, I broke through the thirtieth floor of Tsukuyomi Academy dungeon.” Hearing that, I smile. It was just a matter of time after all. When I heard about it from Ivy, I even thought [he finally did it huh] to myself. “I see, congratulation!” “Thank you. But you know, I understand something when I captured the thirtieth floor. That I still have a long way to go. I had the president and vice president helping me out too. Iori erased the smile on his face and stare at me. “President Monika gave me an invitation after we broke through the thirtieth floor you see.” My body trembles. “She said, [Won’t you join the student council?] The vice president also said that I could become much stronger at the student council too then…….” He paused. Then he took a deep breath while staring at me. “She said, [Don’t you want to surpass Takioto Kousuke?]” I felt like electricity running through my body. Iori’s words conveyed his determination. As he stared straight at me, I can see the determination in his eyes. “I………..will join the student council.” Ah, so it finally happens. Perhaps he has entered his first [Growth Period]. His basic skills have improved, he learned the skills, and he has started collecting items as well, as he comes to be able to capture various kinds of dungeon, the conditions for his growth has been met. In this first growth period, his growth will be explosive. “It’s not that long since I came to this Academy but I’m really glad that I came here.” Perhaps progressing through the events and story, his mind was strengthened as well as his ability. This isn’t the usual Iori. This isn’t the Iori who is usually somewhat unreliable. This Ioti is the one I know. He is Iori of the game who I’ve seen to the extent that I’m getting tired of him. No matter how strong the boss is, he is the protagonist that will be there to stand up for the heroines, [Hijiri Iori]. “This place has the best facilities for me to grow and the teachers who will be kind to me.” When I noticed, I already stood up. “I have the best ally I can trust. I have the best stage (Dungeon) to test myself in. and above all…….” Iori paused and let out his magic power from all over his body while approaching me. “I have both a goal and a rival.” I thought that I had to answer his feelings. That’s why I send magic power to my stole and scatter my overflowing magic power around the room like never before. Then, I smiled and looked down at Iori. Iori’s expression didn’t change even after he saw that. “Kousuke-kun. I will capture the fortieth floor soon. I don’t know why but I think that I can easily do it you know.” I nodded and Iori continued. “And I will become much much stronger.” “Yeah, you will. I guarantee it. You will obtain tremendous power beyond imagination.” But, I have no intention to lose to you. Iori shut his eyes, takes a deep breath and place his hand over his chest. “Hey, Kousuke-kun. The thing you told me in front of the Academy when we first met, do you still remember?” “……Of course.” On the road in front of the Academy, where the sakura was in full bloom. That’s where I declared. “Let me declare it this time.” Now, let’s show him a fearless smile to answer his determination. “The one who will become the strongest of the Magic Academy is me, Hijiri Iori!” Third Arc Magiero★Waltz -the Three Committees- End